Strikey;-;Ruined my life.
Ernest Wolf;-;This will be more of a ''my experience with this game'' type of review, because saying things like ''great gameplay'' will not suit something I've experienced with Counter-Strike. Here you go: I remember back in 2002 I was at a friend's house and he was playing a game. I didn't know the name of the game nor I had internet to find it. A few weeks passed by and another friend came over and he didn't have a computer, so he brought a disc with a game in it. He told me that it was one of the best games and from that very moment I knew that it is going to be the game I saw at the other friend's house. When I saw the Counter-Strike logo I was filled with gamegasm (?) and I was so happy. I don't remember a day when I was so happy like back then. So, the journey started. I was playing it hardcore. Made friends, clans, was involved in communities and even made two myself. Counter-Strike is my first game which I played competitively and it was a whole experience. Playing public servers and maybe some servers with mods was very fun, but playing it competitively made it very intense and stressful. In a pleasant way, ofcourse. Shooters these days try to be different, advanced in a way. Sometimes the most simple games like Counter-Strike are the ones that live to this day. Also, there are plenty of mods to keep your attention to this game. The gameplay is very simple - defend as a Counter-Terrorist, attack as a Terrorist to plant the bomb or save the hostages as a CT. I am sure most of you already know this and I doubt there are gamers that haven't heard or know the gameplay of Counter-Strike, so I am sharing here more of my experience. I wish I could find my CS Anthology account which I've lost since 2008. So, I decided I am going to buy this game again and here you go - more than a thousand hours played. I still play it from time to time to this day and it brings back many great memories and I sometimes even stumble upon people I've played with years ago. I think Counter-Strike changed gaming in a major way and we wouldn't have many games like we have today, if this game wouldn't exist. I am sure many of people already have played games like CS:GO, but never the roots. I doubt any of you will play it for more than an hour, because it's much more simple and it differs a lot in my opinion from CS:GO and modern games.
Brig;-;Every server is spanish or french. I can now fluently swear in both languages 9/10
Hedroks;-;Still better than Call of Duty: Ghosts...
Mr.Mimi | Trade Knife;-;I met a lot of people who slept with my mother. 10/10
Rezej;-;I never played a better first person shooter. Graphics doesn't matter for gamer, gameplay only.
Eno Etukeno;-;When you crouch, you lift your feet in the air and fall to the ground. 10/10
safeoff';-;WARNING : DO NOT buy this game, if you do, you'll never see the sunlight again !
ManaF;-;CS is one of the greatest and undermined games in history. It is, in my opinion, the best game to ever have a crosshair. It is not a contact sport, so for the girly girls, it is an activity to indulge in. It starts off with a team trying to kill another team. I started playing cs when I noticed jacking off isn't the only activity to do on a computer. I started inviting a lot of friends out and getting drinks, as well as a boom box, to spend a nice summer day in the living room playing this wonderful game. I wanted to play every chance that i could. On my road of cs adventures, I encountered a couple of problems; those being that nobody was as fervent as I was about playing, and that when we did play, nobody was good enough, so it wasn't a lot of fun. Then I discovered that I could sign up for a class with dboorn. I was overly excited, and signed up, but with skepticism at how the class was going to be. Sure enough, I was proven wrong. We started off by practicing a little bit. Then we split off into teams and started playing almost everyday of class. I made some friends, and played with people who had built up their skill gradually over the period of the course. When I play counterstrike, the whole world disappears. Only I, the mouse, and my teammates remain. We are united in a common goal. We strive collectively towards an end we all desire. Each player has a spot to hold. They stand ready and waiting, eager for their chance to aid the team in what they hope will be a forthcoming victory. Thus, CS celebrates the unity of man, the indomitable spirit in all of us that pushes us and drives us towards excellence. When I play CS, I play until my veins pump battery acid, and then I play some more. CS is unique among the games because it teaches all of us that no matter where we are in life, there is a role for us to play, and we can help our fellow man by fulfilling that role, and thereby our destiny. What destiny might you ask? I spoke before of unity. And it is that unity that brings us all together like one big loving family. That is the nature of counter-strike; the many working as one. One machine made of well oiled cogs and wheels, moving in unison, happy to play their part in the production of something greater than themselves. Not that these small metal objects are actually animate, I'm of course speaking only metaphorically. Over the course of the years, I have increased in skill, but I have learned a greater lesson than how to be a better cs player. I have learned how to cooperate with a team to accomplish a goal that we all share. Even if that team is less than ideal. I have realized that cs is about more than just one's athletic ability. Instead, there is a deeper meaning behind the colt, the AK, the AWP, the deagle, the sands under my feet (in d2 or inferno). And more importantly, the teammates at my side. I love them. It is the human element of cs that gives cs its greatness. In conclusion, I love cs. I love to win. I love pushing myself to my physical limits. It's that feeling that first drove me to the computer. For every second that I am not playing cs, there is only an unquenchable thirst to play. A thirst that grows as every minute passes by when I am outside, sitting at the television, or playing sports. I had an extraordinary time playing this game, and I will return to look at the future students of this game to see that bright eager look on their faces to remind me of how I used to feel. This review may be over, this game may be dead, but I will never stop playing couner-strike (1.6).
DESTRUKT;-;It's... aight.
ExuS;-;Ruined my life. 10/10
CJ HUNTER;-;Best shooter for 10 years. Steam evolved because of this game.
louko;-;Fire in the Hole Simulator 1999
The Plague Doctor;-;Counter-Strike: Ok, after 9 years of unlimited fun with friends, I have finally quit counter strike. Counter strike, in all of its versions, its just a great FPS game that anyone can enjoy it. Its a great game and all, you just cant stop playing it, you can just sit and play with your friends for days with out stoping. The huge weaoponary option you can choose and the smooth and sound of the game, its just f*cking addicting. With this games I've met so many different people and unique friends. This game is literally G(OLD). To all the young players who are looking for a good cheep and fun game to play with their friends, I highlly recommend on this. I've got (with steam record) 2,484hrs record in counter strike IN TOTTAL,,, and who knows how many more hrs in a non official steam version of this game.... Great Game. GG WP. And too all the people who will keep playing this game, all I can say, as always, GL & HF <3
Syllian;-;One of the best FPS Games, the 1.6 Version will stay always in our hearts. I recommend it vor everyone who wants a tactical/action shooter.
y u do dat Jokur?!;-;Well, look at my hours played you can already tell if it's a good game or not. (YES IT IS)
RomaniaN.exe;-;This game is the best game forever <3
croos[st];-;Best game ever! Started my gaming addiction :D
danh;-;Probably the best FPS shooter ever made. Nothing can beat Counter-Strike 1.6.
tantrum;-;Playing this game since 2001. It ruined my life. Five stars.
Numerius Prime;-;Still better than Call of Duty!
WoodE;-;I've played this game since I was around 6 years old back in 2002 and it still makes me laugh and have fun whenever I launch it to this very day. Over 12 years of endless entertainment. No other game on this planet has given me more entertainment and enjoyment than Counter-Strike 1.6 has and I doubt no game ever will. Reason i've only got 38 hours here is because I no longer use the account I originally played cs 1.6 on. func_vehicle is what makes this Counter Strike game the best out of all the others in the franchise. Find a server that has car maps or maps with func_vehicle entities and you will have endless fun running over teammates and enemies in all kinds of hilarious and goofy vehicles not giving a care in the world. You can drive a fork with a meatball on the end of it. Do i need to say more? Mods on this game are amazing too. There is a mod where you can catch pokemon, level them up, train them and use their skills. Call of Duty mod that is suprisingly better than cod its self, Warcraft mods, zombie mods, basebuilder and so on... There is even a map for the jailbreak gamemode that has driveable snowmobiles. 1337/10 Leet crew 5 lyf Kicks csgo's  by a mile. I forgot how good wallbanging is in this game. P.S - CS 1.6 is the only Counter Strike game where you can headshot with a knife or buy Riot Shields. Enjoy!
Jony-;-;PRO: + Best first-person shooter of my childhood, and still it is + Valve Anti-Cheat + Gameplay CONTRA - Cheating - No Achievments CONCLUSION: Oldies but goodies. Nothing to say more.
D7  CSGO.ZombiMod.Com:28015;-;After 14 years of existence, this legendary game is still in the Steam top 10 most played multiplayers in the world . While earning tons of money based on Counter-Strike sales, Valve shows its appreciation to the players that bought the game by still not maintaining it and treating it like it doesn't even exist. Even more, starting with February 2013, Valve has released a couple of minor updates for Counter-Strike which intentionally created problems for the game(suddenly stopping afterwards) so that the players would be forced to migrate to and buy CS:GO(which currently has and most probably will keep having major problems like fps drops and hit misdetection - problem present on all Source engine based multiplayers since 2004). Congratulations, Valve . Counting the players that migrated to or play the non-Steam version of Counter-Strike, the game still easily classifies itself even today in the top 5 most played multiplayers in the world .
Professor Chaos;-;best sequal to pokemon since skyrim
Peashooter;-;"Lock and Load." "Go go go!" "Fire in the hole!" "The bomb has been planted." "Counter-terrorists/terrorists Win." It is uncountable just how many times have these few sentences echoed in cybercafs across the world. For many, days were spent in front of the computer screen, manipulating the WASD keys with left hand and whirling the mouse with the right one. People yell and frown, they cheer and jeer as they team up their cyber-persona and pit them against another team. It doesnt matter who won, who lost, who managed to kill to most of their opponents and who died the most, as everything will be scrambled up and reset when a new match begins. What is important is that, for those who are a part of the team, this computer game is their reality. These personas within the computer screen are their true identities. This is counter-strike. Originally a modification (mod in short) made for Valves critically acclaimed Half-Life, Counter-Strike has gained much prominence since its initial launch. It is one of the first and definitely one of the most critically acclaimed multi-player computer games of all times. It is also the game used for many professional electronic sports competitions, such as ESEA League. Of course, this does not put Counter-Strike as a professional only game, as it has been enjoyed by many since its launch. Getting started with Counter-strike is simple. You start off in one of the two teams: Counter-Terrorists or Terrorists. Before the round begins, you will have to purchase your own gun from the market, namely the famous AK47, M4A1, Desert Eagle, MP5, AWP and many more. Do not ask me why the counter-terrorists (namely the police) have to buy their own gun, and that they will have to go out with their lousy default colt pistols. Perhaps the government had some budget cuts and the SWATs have to buy their own guns. No one knows, but at least this will balance up the game. Also, you can equipment such as Highly-Explosive grenades, Flash-bangs (not recommend for beginners), smoke grenades, helmets and kevlars. You can also grab a defuse kit if you are playing on the side of the counter-terrorist, but normally we will steal that from dead teammates. Oh and you will be given a knife for free. Dont worry about it, as most likely you use it to run instead of anything else. The gameplay is fairly straightforward as well. There are quite a few number of game mods. The most frequently played ones are the Bomb Defusal maps, such as the all-time famous de_dust, the Hostage Rescue maps such as cs_assault, the VIP Escorting maps and the Kill Them All maps, such as the custom fy_iceworld and awp_map. Like all multi-player First Person Shooters, you will need good coordination and communication with your teammates if you want to win. Dont worry about it though, because if you are new, just stick around and listen to what others have got to say. Just remember, you are not John Rambo, you only have 100 HP, and a stray bullet from a sniper rifle (AWP) will deal more damage than that. As time press on, the mechanism of Counter-Strike became outdate. Of course, the legacy of Counter-Strike continues through its successors such as Counter-Strike: Condition Zero, Counter-Strike: Source, Counter-Strike Online (Asia only) and, the newest of all, Counter-Strike: Global Offensive. Throughout the years, Counter-Strike has evolved to become what it is today while its legend remains. Together with Half-Life and (maybe) Team Fortress Classic, Counter-Strike has not only helped Valve to thrive as a gaming company, but also defined what First Person Shooter should be.
dublife;-;First of all its my first online game ever. I was very young and i was playing with my friends LAN matches sometimes for fun sometimes with bets the loser treats refreshments. xD This game its the reason that i maked my mum to buy me a PC to playing this game at my home. With the time i learn how to modding on CS 1.6 servers,plugins and more stuffs about PC. After this i learn how to aim on the enemy head, how to fire inside the walls, how to hear someone with his steps and HOW TO FIGHT!!! I have played many FPS(First Person Shooter) Games that they called me hacker of my fast killing. I had so fyckin good and bad moments on that game that i will not forget never. For others its only a game for me it was MY LIFE! This wasnt a review but a little story. SO COUNTER-STRIKE FTW ES!!
sLeepyheaD;-;Nice oldschool game! Counter-Strike is very cool game, but now we can play the CS series of games like CS:Source and CS:GO... I can't say which game is better, it's your choice. But i can't forget this game like my childhood, thanks to VaLVE for it!
Oatz;-;Counter-Strike is a great series. Though the real change they made was in CS:GO, Counter-Strike has been one of my favorite FPS games of all time. If you prefer a fast based shooter, this game isn't for you. Counter-Strike can have exciting moments where it's you VS 5 others, or where you have no defuse kit with only a few seconds left to defuse the bomb A comparable version of Counter-Strike's defuse gametype is the Call Of Duty "Search and Destroy"
Equinox;-;This game is unlike the other counter strike games. This game requires a different type of skill. You have to become used to the recoil each weapon has. You also have to become familiar with the different advantage points of each map. I personally think this is the best counter-strike game.
f0rever !?;-;I'm sorry to say for other games, but with counter-strike 1.6 i had best gaming experience in my life.
DeliciousHotSchmoes;-;Counter-Strike Review by: DeliciousHotSchmoes -Release date: June 19, 1999 -Genre: First-person shooter -Developers: Valve Corporation -Platforms: PC, Xbox, OS X, Linux The Review First starting off as a cute, little mod based on the GoldSrc engine, a heavily modified Quake engine, Counter-Strike's legacy continues to strife for a decade and a half over. Initially developed and released on top of a Half-Life modification, with the inspiration from the developer's strong theme and intriguement for military warfare and terrorism, the mod's success was immediately a marvel to behold; selling over 25 million units as a whole in the Counter-Strike franchise. The maps and various scenarios set around the globe, players assume the roles of soldiers on two teams, counter-terrorists and terrorists. Both with a task, depending differently on the mission. Bomb scenarios, the terrorist team must plant a bomb, in a secured bomb location, while the counter-terrorists must fight back and ultimately defuse the bomb, if it may have been planted. Hostage scenarios is where the counter-terrorists must rescue a group of hostages being held by the terrorists. With both these modes, it has become a traditional campaign over time in different sequels. The player, depending on what team they have been assigned to, can change their class into eight different character models, as well as buying weaponry and equipment, such as armour and grenades to help against the opposing team. As the round is about to begin, you're left in ''Freeze time'' that allows you to buy things with the money you earned by killing opponents the rounds before. This of course, gives players the time needed to choose wisely on what many strategies they will execute and whether it will be successful compared to your opponents. This game is also highly customizable on the player's end.The game gives the options allowing for the user to either install or create their own custom skins, spray graphics, sprites, sound effects and HUDS that can be used in-game. I forgot to mention that modding is possibly one the biggest things that makes Counter-Strike such a versatile game to begin with. I don't have much to complain about this game, other than it's become one of the biggest targets of hacking and cheaters, since its release. Aimbots, that auto-target other players while the player should naturally aim and shoot is just on of the many cheatings that players have executed. Wallhacks, that allows the player to see through walls through work by displaying objects that have translucent textures and can easily see targets through them, while the opposing team has no idea from their own perspective. To me, the cheating in this game is now more to do with experimenting than it is to do with cheating overall. There's a different meaning when it comes to something that is outdated and old-school. Old-school is for nostalgic value, something that will guarantee to put a smile back on your face from all these past memories you've experienced and this is what the first title of Counter-Strike engulfs. Outdated, being something you don't particularly want to go back to, while there is the famous remake, Counter-Strike: Source, that runs on the more powerful and overly-recycled Source engine, allowing for better graphic and communication capabilities. Nevertheless, if you're looking for original flare that is burning in the Counter-Strike series, this game is definitely for you. And to think, all of this success for the Counter-Strike series began as small little mod. Proof on how something so little, can create something so big. Recommended.
Mars0lin;-;Old But Gold
Aizen;-;so old! still a better story then twilight.
FaldarN^;-;The game that started it all. I love Global Offensive but i always return to 1.6 because of the hardcore, old-school feeling. I don't even know why i'm recommending this because obviously you all have it... Right?
chill_me';-;It's a real legend .. legend of PC games
BirdyGurdy;-;**Joins a CS 1.6 server** ** Filled with people that don't speak english**
Yureina;-;Blame this game for the rise of the online multiplayer modern military shooter. Good game, great custom maps, terrible community. Not much has really changed since 2000, has it? I don't think anyone still plays this particular version of CS though. Edit: Wait, there are over 8,000 people in-game right now. Wow... guess I have to give this a "yes" then because it isn't dead.
1grams EGA;-;old school
YounG SaiyaN^;-;Graphics is not everything! :) Old school love.
DIN;-;WE WONT FORGET 1.6
TAG;-;I've never met so many Brazilians in my life! 10/10
9a784g7H5t1;-;Oldshool classic. Totally worth of buying it!
[APG]RoboCop[CL];-;This game appears to remain No. 1 FPS Action games since 2000 for around 8 to 11 years. It is a intense game as your health and your exposure is important as well sticking together with your team mates at all costs. You should maybe try this game and learn the routes in common CS maps like dust or assault. Go on try it! However they are a several downsides to this game like the weapon nerfs like the recoils and smoke grenade failing to detonate airborne and the lame Tactical Shield. And cos this game is so popular that thousands of servers host this game online, that some PC criminals tend to take advantage on players like using hacking or server addon hacking materials. So you maybe best to stay clear of weird or dodgy servers with extreme adult material and Steam cannot unban victims who got hijacked and VAC banned, so please be careful! But if you are old and wise enough to handle this intense action game...BUY IT, SOLDIER!
[SY] SaFoO *Retired*;-;How to end your life Step 1 - Download this game done .
duracL;-;The best game ever :D !
dirtyjersey;-;gods creation
Why so serious?;-;The 1st and best game i ever played in my entire life! <3 I ing LOVE cs! <3 :D
geras1m [Madahekka BEJBE];-;The most perfect FPS game ever. Too bad they've killed it with offensive crap.
Angel;-;I have 800 hours of gameplay on this (since I got steam!). I played it for 6 years before then. Its wonderful. The best game I have ever played.
[JC]Penguin Box Set;-;10/10 Would get "Fire in the hole" tattooed on my . Again.
drag1c;-;I don't like because Steam blocked redirections from server to server. I know that people using it to slowhack, but now... servers with redirection are unusefull.. Also, VAC not working good for Counter-Strike 1.6. Maybe it could be good for some update, or something... I can give you anything you need for it. Contact me. Kinds and Regards, drag1c.
gaia.razus;-;Old good game never dies. I remember first time playing this game when I was in elementary school. Hiding teacher to play this game with friends is very fun, you should let your kid have experiences like this.
VENOMSNAKE-A-BenQ;-;A still alive first-person shooter, since 2000. The game that changed everything, along with Half-Life. Still, the best first-person for thousands. And you know why? Because this game's focus isn't on graphics. It's for having fun with your friends, or, even aim for world turnaments. All proffesional teams, such as fnatic, navi, sk, still play Counter-Strike, doesn't matter if it is 1.6, Source or Global Offensive. Highly recommend this game.
elemeNt;-;Old Times
Thiago;-;Wordless.... very very good.
TesseracT;-;Arguably the best competitive fps so far, the skill ceiling is very high; however getting started is easy.
Fairuz #BalikKampung;-;Harder than CSGO
20K;-;This game is just amaizing. If you have a game with cheaters then change the server with admins that actualy do stuff right like cs.kopideja.lv Yes The graphics are outdated and the physix may make no sense but this is what started it all... If you havent played this and you play other CS games then you know nothing about this game... Buy it play it and enjoy For me this game is more fun than CS:GO or CS:S because its calssic and was a my favorite childhood game 10/10
D zer;-;=100,000 hours
murderbits;-;Quake was the first game I was ever really addicted to and focused a big portion of my time on for months or years at a time. Counter-Strike was the second - and easily more addicting. There's a reason that I still compare every multi-player shooter experience back to original Counter-Strike, to this day. There's a reason I still compare every server community to this (Counter-Strike servers each had their own community and personality and people truly got to know each other back in the day, compared to these days, where a server is just something you're automatically dumped into and feels like every other server). Despite many iterations, nothing quite plays like the original. It's not hard to see why there are still 10,000 to 60,000 people playing this at any one time on any day , fifteen years after launch and why it is always in the top ten games currently being played on all of Steam. This is where it all started. Without this, there's an entire genre of shooter and multi-player that just vanishes. The original days of Counter-Strike remain the most enjoyable gaming experiences of my entire life. It's unlikely that will ever be trumped.
ID;-;it was one the best fps games back in a days.. would go back in time when this game was still popular 10/10
KING_B;-;The game may be old now but it is still a great game and full of fun custom maps. It's a good way to spend time with frineds and/or family with low hardware requirments and cheaper pricing. The game may be modded to improve your expierence as well which is allows for more customized game play that never gets old.
Fah-;-;Nice game, my first time PC games. 9/10
Ank;-;Counter-Strike is a first-person shooter game from Valve, the first of the Counter-Strike series. Counter-Strike is a round based game where you play as counter terrorist or play as terrorist. As a counter terrorist, your task is to prevent the terrorist from planting a bomb and detonate it or rescue a captured hostages and lead them to the hostage rescue zone, while the terrorist team has to do the opposite. Weapons has hard recoil so you can't just spray and pray, short burst fire can save you in critical situation. Before the round begins, you can and need to buy weapons and equipments with money, you get money by winning the round or killing the enemy team. This type of gameplay encourages team work. Counter-Strike is a good game. I recommend this game. Rating 8/10
Jet Jaguar`;-;My true love. JJ + 1.6 = OTP
RaptoR;-;The most legendary competitive fps game you could imagine. Same old graphics but still keeps you playing.
Alios;-;Game of my childhood. It was the year 1998, i-ve been having my Pentium3 PC for a few months (just upgraded from a 486 DX2 with windows 3.1) and my cousing comes along and shows me the new game he got... I ended up playing it for a whole year... over and over again. And then came along Counter-Strike 1.1 in 2000... and then the other mods from Half-Life. Thank you for my beautifull childhood
Shun;-;<The trees that whisper in the evening Carried away by a moonlight shadow Sing a song of sorrow and grieving Carried away by a moonlight shadow All she saw was a silhouette of a gun Far away on the other side He was shot six times by a man on the run And she couldn't find how to push through.>
Kaynee;-;This game was so fun before css and csgo
|-SAGE DUBS-|;-;Now i know what you guys are probably going to say: 'OMG this game sucks the graphics are bad D:' and like 'Pfff this game is old nobody still plays it. well it's not, its a game that's made like 13 years ago so don't expect frosbite engine graphics etc... instead you get the way more epic pixel-ish graphics and really classic sounds, and this game is still active with about 30k to 40k players each day.(That's more then all cod games together) And in my opinion it's a must have game since it's one of the best games ever and you still can install skins etc and it's price is good it's only 10 euro or dollars for this great game.
Commandeer #3sixty;-;3800+ hours speak for themselves I believe.
unpre;-;Old but gold!
dimaxa;-;The best CS version! Old school :-D
SmokaJ;-;okay legit fine fair understandle exceptable reasonable justifiableokay legit fine fair understandle exceptable reasonable justifiableokay legit fine fair understandle exceptable reasonable justifiableokay legit fine fair understandle excep...table reasonable justifiableokay legit fine fair understandle exceptable reasonable justifiableokay legit fine fair understandle exceptable reasonable justifiableokay legit fine fair understandle exceptable reasonable justifiableokay legit fine fair understandle exceptable reasonable justifiableokay legit fine fair understandle exceptable reasonable justifiableokay legit fine fair understandle exceptable reasonable justifiableokay legit fine fair understandle exceptable reasonable justifiableokay legit fine fair understandle exceptable reasonable justifiableokay legit fine fair understandle exceptable reasonable justifiableokay legit fine fair understandle exceptable reasonable justifiableokay legit fine fair understandle exceptable reasonable ju
Terres;-;My first game on steam, and after all these years since 2004, CS is still my favorite game. It's interesting, fun and nice FPS game. 10/10
DOGE;-;This will be more of a ''my experience with this game'' type of review, because saying things like ''great gameplay'' will not suit something I've experienced with Counter-Strike. Here you go: I remember back in 2002 I was at a friend's house and he was playing a game. I didn't know the name of the game nor I had internet to find it. A few weeks passed by and another friend came over and he didn't have a computer, so he brought a disc with a game in it. He told me that it was one of the best games and from that very moment I knew that it is going to be the game I saw at the other friend's house. When I saw the Counter-Strike logo I was filled with gamegasm (?) and I was so happy. I don't remember a day when I was so happy like back then. So, the journey started. I was playing it hardcore. Made friends, clans, was involved in communities and even made two myself. Counter-Strike is my first game which I played competitively and it was a whole experience. Playing public servers and maybe some servers with mods was very fun, but playing it competitively made it very intense and stressful. In a pleasant way, ofcourse. Shooters these days try to be different, advanced in a way. Sometimes the most simple games like Counter-Strike are the ones that live to this day. Also, there are plenty of mods to keep your attention to this game. The gameplay is very simple - defend as a Counter-Terrorist, attack as a Terrorist to plant the bomb or save the hostages as a CT. I am sure most of you already know this and I doubt there are gamers that haven't heard or know the gameplay of Counter-Strike, so I am sharing here more of my experience. I wish I could find my CS Anthology account which I've lost since 2008. So, I decided I am going to buy this game again and here you go - more than a thousand hours played. I still play it from time to time to this day and it brings back many great memories and I sometimes even stumble upon people I've played with years ago. I think Counter-Strike changed gaming in a major way and we wouldn't have many games like we have today, if this game wouldn't exist. I am sure many of people already have played games like CS:GO, but never the roots. I doubt any of you will play it for more than an hour, because it's much more simple and it differs a lot in my opinion from CS:GO and modern games. I am glad that I lived through the golden era of shooters and if I'd have to rate it, it'd 10/10 ofcourse.
ho3 b4ng3r;-;Great game. A must have for any Steam user.
Misos;-;so old! still a better story then twilight.
roiler;-;I suck at this game. 10/10
Caesar_Gaming;-;If you can't get Counter-Strike: Global Offensive, this is great replacement for it. It's not as popular, but it still has a big amount of players. Some servers may be in languages you can't understand, but the game is still very fun and requires a great amount of skill. One of the best first person shooters, that still holds to this day from 1999. Although the game's graphics...aren't really the best. Even then, you can get skins, map textures, etc. to spice the graphics up a little bit. Though to me, graphics don't really matter. Highly recommend this game. 9.5/10
Low Zers;-;This game an immortal :D
OLD SCHOOL CS;-;CONNECT 91.211.116.28:27015
Wersuz;-;Play the world's number 1 online action game. Engage in an incredibly realistic brand of terrorist warfare in this wildly popular team-based game. Ally with teammates to complete strategic missions. Take out enemy sites. Rescue hostages. Your role affects your team's success. Your team's success affects your role.
Deadpool;-;Where it all started :) A true classic to the Counter-Strike Series that will never get old.
roX- #LilDurk;-;The best
Grim.;-;Got AK ? Dnt worry U r unbeatable :P (11/10)
Michael De Santomak;-;Buy Condition Zero instead if you want to play with bots. And Global offensive if you want to play multiplayer. But wait, I'm not done yet. Your PC/laptop can't handle CS:GO or CS source but still wants to play Multiplayer? Then this legendary FPS game is the right place to do it.
ownosourus;-;A heart-pounding, visceral experience that gets under your skin. The "just one more round" addiction factor is very high. When you play it properly, with team work that clicks like a well-oiled machine, the game offers a sense of accomplishment and comradery that is simply amazing.Buy it, download it, whatever; just get on board and enjoy. Sure-fire fun for the online enthusiast.
hyper[NL];-;Consumed my teen years. LANs lans and more lans. Memories.
`~[H2SO4]| HeRcuLeS!~`;-;One of my all time favourite games! You never get bored playing this. You may not find its graphics to be very cool as per today's standard; but, old is gold!
ez katka;-;Once bought, your f*cked. 10/10
emirp;-;WHEN YOU'RE A COUNTER TERRORIST YOU SHOOT THOSE BAD TERRORIST AND STOP THEM FROM PLANTING EVIL BOMBS IN AMERICA,
Freddy;-;Better than CoD. 10/10
Mffi.d\M/;-;Addictive Multiplayer game for me from Years. Till date the only Game i Like to play Online with friends. Love it!
Roskana *-* <3;-;Great Game :))
R1z;-;Counter Strike, A game which changed the era of First person shooting game since it was born made in 1999 beta version Released on 2000 'The Game' Released on 2002 *I think* I personally think counterstrike or CS made steam what it is thou Dota 2 and several others are there. This game has been ranked Number# 1 Since 2000 In front of my eyes. Ranked 1 by several industries and one of the most online server recording having more servers than any other game, Game tracker.com not rs.
sn1p3r_sk;-;Play this game. Its awesome.
NsP.infi;-;STEAM IJUEPUTAS DEJAME JUGAR CS
ceNTRL The 400 Blows;-;<3 Best games ever seen <3 CS is Love , CS is Life #cs4ever :D
Forid#RamadanKareem;-;The mother of all FPS games! Although some may argue that this is a outdated game, I still love it. You get that awesome freedom of movement which you cannot get on CS:S (as much) and on CS:GO. In addition, this game nearly runs on all pc's even potato's with wires. It has a large modding team behind it (AMXX), which isn't affiliated with Valve but nevertheless it makes the game 100x better, and adds amazing mods to it.
KLaZoMaNiaC;-;Even though the new CS is out the old never gets old.
NyX'zz#From nothing to something;-;the best game for RPG and it was very old and till now it is the most epic game :D
Cookie;-;i still dont know where A is on dust
steel;-;The best competitive first person shooter ever created.
suht lamp imo;-;Awesome oldschool game ;)
CHK!;-;Counter-Strike 1.6 ruined many hours of my life!
GDM;-;Yeah... the old Counter-Strike.... Everybody know, what CS is.. Counter-Strike - My rating - 9/10 Why or Why not to play this old classic ? Positive: Its a legendary game, and if u playing games like CS:GO etc. u will like it, cause it will be legendary in your library. Almost everybody played CS 1.6 "from start his cs:go career" Counter-Strike 1.6 is latest and best version on the game, and if u purchase CS, u can play it, if u will download it, theres is some chance, that u cant play it (Win 8 etc). Most of legens/pros in CS:GO played CS 1.6, its like beginning, and it could be your beginning! Negative: No more good tournaments on CS 1.6 (On CS:GO are tournaments like EMS, Dreamhack etc.) Graphic+Gameplay - Graphic sucks... but its still better then WarZ:P Gameplay.... yeah, crouching sucks, aiming sucks... u know... bad gameplay, if u see CS:GO, when is all so smooth, u will hate CS 1.6... but if u play CS 1.6 before then CS:GO, its good for you, and u will like it (probably:D) So... my opinion is: Its legendary game, everyone, who likes FPS must have this in his/her:P steam library. :)
c00lizz;-;Counter-Strike was an amazing achievement. A free mod for the original Half-Life that outshone it's parent game completely and become becoming incredibly popular, so popular in fact, that it was sold it stores as a individual entity back when it was still free to download for anyone that already owned Half-Life. Nowadays a mod turning into a full game is almost common place and happens sometimes even without the popularity but back then, it was a monumental accomplishment. Counter-Strike managed to become the most played PC shooter of all time and even to this day boasts both a strong competitive scene and tons of active public servers. How many other online shooters can say that their online community is still alive and kicking 12 years down the line? The game itself I never really cared much for, I played it back in the 5.2 beta days and although there is something to admire about the simplistic purity of it's gameplay this has never been the kind of game I could really get stuck into. The developers tried to introduce a number of new game-modes back in the beta days but quickly found that trying to complicate the game would only leave the players confused and unsure of how to proceed. Counter-Strike is a simplistic teamshooter but it is a milestone in gaming history and one that we should be happy and proud of because Counter-Strike's simple existence is the reason why modding turned mainstream.
MachaCocola;-;Greatest game ever.
amazinger;-;the wallbangs are real 10/10
Andy.exe;-;The best game ever
-=OzYrIs=-;-;Well only a line: its a life time addiction.
The Terminator;-;Its alot of fun.
Thomas *;-;I miss the old good times with 1.6.
Monkey D Ali;-;The best game
c0de;-;Best game in the world! :-)
4:20;-;Ruined my life
DS;-;2nd Best game from VALVe games after Half-Life 1, even with new VALVe games but this one is still amazing, played it for ages and still!
ReactioN tRADING #CSGOGIFTS;-;this game is awsume ,Graphics dose'nt matter for a GamER ;)
K. # gift me sf immo xD;-;Nice Game TO play !!
Uncle Kun;-;I got banned from this game in 2002 by VAC just because I logged in from a computer with hacks installed in a LAN SHOP. It has been 11 years since I was banned and I still can't play Counterstrike with my account. I am already 25 this year, even prisoners in democratic nations are given 2nd chance but not STEAM. Shameful!
chiLLy;-;The best FPS game in history !
purGed;-;will forever and always be my first love
Valueless;-;The best game ever made on this planet !
nigotenss+;-;I enjoyed so much playing this game :)
GumBa;-;So the dudes who really play Multi player games, a note to every Indian regardless whether it is a parent or a gamer. http://www.hltv.org/?pageid=135&userid=487400&blogid=8331&profile=1#r5441265 Go through my blog. and you will have a change of mind .. I bet P.S : Its long but worth the time spending :)
[Megurine Luka];-;One of best FPS games ever, it's about 14 yrs old, but still getting updates. Thanks valve.
Max;-;Cool game worth or buying
dipss;-;i like the gems cs1.6
!NTRANCE || MicK;-;Its an Awesome game... wud spend ma whole lyf playing dis game :)
!tz D #RektSeries;-;Highly recomended it is very good game it is a game that takes you to our child hood actually servers are very good buy this game
EGod;-;One of the best games ever out there. Yes, it is old but it is JUST amazing. Much better than CoD; and just as good as Battlefied 3 or 4 maybe :P. There are many things tod if you get bored of the tactical playing in games. You can bhop, deathrun, surf and a lot of other things. This honestly should be a $60 game for how good it actually is. So just get this game as it is simply amazing!
Rank1c <3 Ivanu;-;Nice Game <3
Your friend, Patrick Bateman;-;Excellent, superb, babelicious game. Ruined my last year of Jr. High and a few of my High school years, would ruin again 10/10. Excelente juego. Arruino unos aos de escuela, arruinaria de nuevo 10/10. PS I miss my WON ID.
Feel free to kill me;-;Mothering  game
Lagger - jOELZ on LAN? =DDD;-;Mother of First-Person-Shooter games! This 14 years old game is still in the top 10 most played games, was and will always be the world's number 1 online action game. Once you play this game, you will never get bored of it, even if you were unskilled in classic mods, there will always be a good and funny mod that will suits you. Still haven't bought this game? Go get it! Fully recommended - 10/10!
SELLiNG ZOMBiE PLAGUE 6.3;-;This game will never die. One of the best first person shooters.
Your friend, Patrick Bateman;-;Excellent, superb, babelicious game. Ruined my last year of Jr. High and a few of my High school years, would ruin again 10/10. Excelente juego. Arruino unos aos de escuela, arruinaria de nuevo 10/10. PS I miss my WON ID.
SELLiNG ZOMBiE PLAGUE 6.3;-;This game will never die. One of the best first person shooters.
GameMaster Devil;-;Its old game Bat steal playing all world.. :)
landocalrissian;-;this game is old i still  on kids
markwazir;-;THE BEST GAME 4EVER . I LOVE YOU CS1.6 <33
D3LLY;-;Classic which started the legendary CS franchise.
Cobrex;-;Still the best game ever made ... I don't think anybody can beat this engine ...
Mozgus;-;The biggest game changer of all time in the online FPS genre. Respect it.
Steve Mason;-;I've been playing this game since 2004, this game is mind blowing awesome. If you're not looking deeply into graphics, but just want to have fun playing, then this game is for you. Multiple gamemodes, will keep anyone amused. If you don't have it, then what are you waiting for? Get it now!
RoNaLs_WeAsEl;-;Counter-Strike 1.6 is a great ing game. What makes this game great is that I can write a review for it in one paragraph, completely summarize everything that is included in this game and still fully recommend it to everyone. This game is the most generic shooter at first glance, but after your first few weeks of CS 1.6 you quickly realize that this game's aesthetic simplicity only encourages more community map development. And when you really begin to play more of CS 1.6, you realize that the shooting mechanics and first person mechanics of this game is anything but simplistic. No other first person shooter feels just as a smooth as a valve first person shooter. And the amazing mechanics that are in this game are backed by an amazing community of players who will never leave CS 1.6 behind. The maps such as, dust2, inferno, and nuke are built to such perfection that they will suck you into the game as if you were in a modern militaristic tron. The gameplay is pretty similair to that of its opponent (COD). Search and Destroy is completely influenced by CS 1.6. Only downside I could think of is that really the only weapons that are worth using are the AK, M4, and the AWP. All the other weapons are left behind. In my opinion Counter-Strike 1.6 is a strong 8 out 10. It's a total classic.
cokbOY;-;great game
Buckwheat;-;This is the game that started it all, the original Counter-Strike ! It isn't as populated as the new games, of course, but it is still a worthy investment, in my opinion. It has that same feel as the newer ones, and I believe that it is a respective title.
Mozgus;-;The biggest game changer of all time in the online FPS genre. Respect it.
Steve Mason;-;I've been playing this game since 2004, this game is mind blowing awesome. If you're not looking deeply into graphics, but just want to have fun playing, then this game is for you. Multiple gamemodes, will keep anyone amused. If you don't have it, then what are you waiting for? Get it now!
RoNaLs_WeAsEl;-;Counter-Strike 1.6 is a great ing game. What makes this game great is that I can write a review for it in one paragraph, completely summarize everything that is included in this game and still fully recommend it to everyone. This game is the most generic shooter at first glance, but after your first few weeks of CS 1.6 you quickly realize that this game's aesthetic simplicity only encourages more community map development. And when you really begin to play more of CS 1.6, you realize that the shooting mechanics and first person mechanics of this game is anything but simplistic. No other first person shooter feels just as a smooth as a valve first person shooter. And the amazing mechanics that are in this game are backed by an amazing community of players who will never leave CS 1.6 behind. The maps such as, dust2, inferno, and nuke are built to such perfection that they will suck you into the game as if you were in a modern militaristic tron. The gameplay is pretty similair to that of its opponent (COD). Search and Destroy is completely influenced by CS 1.6. Only downside I could think of is that really the only weapons that are worth using are the AK, M4, and the AWP. All the other weapons are left behind. In my opinion Counter-Strike 1.6 is a strong 8 out 10. It's a total classic.
cokbOY;-;great game
Buckwheat;-;This is the game that started it all, the original Counter-Strike ! It isn't as populated as the new games, of course, but it is still a worthy investment, in my opinion. It has that same feel as the newer ones, and I believe that it is a respective title.
Xaro;-;One of the classics of the shooting genre and precursor to most of today's modern shooters, for all the good and the bad that may imply. Counter-Strike 1.6 is the second iteration of the original Half-Life mod and, quite likely, its most popular incarnation. The rather simplistic gameplay coupled with accessible system requirements and intuitive controls make it one of the most long-lived shooters today, still sporting a massive fanbase. A game that must be tried at least once by any shooting game neophyte.
Purtsikka;-;Old but gold! :)
kamimamita;-;I've played this 6 years ago and still do!
Law ScurB;-;beasstt
Mardscrhash;-;A classical! Definetly I recommend!
Don$N(+)P3R* |;-;Great FPS game, recommended!
kaliber /J/;-;Look son, a legend. (y)
TurKeys;-;This game is the Game of the Millenium...It's the only game that is played from 2000 to today. Every PC is capable to play this game, even the one that didn't got their driver updated on 2003(Probably). So yeah, if you are a fan of old-school, this game is for ya'.
Ancestor Balasla;-;One of the first games I played, brings back so much memories. And its ing fun.
Drugz N Hugz;-;1,694 hours on CS 1.6.. No regrets.
McaFee^ The Bot;-;Death is a great teacher. Failure in Counter-Strike is, as it always has been for this series, the greatest way to learn where you should have gone, what you shouldn't have done, and how you could have done better. Counter-Strike players spend a lot of time learning -- consequently, they are always getting better.
^|PraJ|>;-;Awesome Game Just Loved It....<3
abson;-;Great game
Tito;-;The best of all.
.uNREAL;-;Still the best CS ever made!
kisama;-;take a chance with the dice mate
"JavSpy";-;Cool
Nobody's like me !;-;my childhood game ! <3
4 8 15 16 23 42;-;A game you can play forever:)
Medeiros (   );-;I don't care what anyone else says, but CS 1.6 is the #1 FPS and it will never die. :)
Sync;-;Best hours I spent in my life (arguably <_<), even after so many years I'm still learning... That's ok because that's what make Counter Srike trully special, the learning curve is so steep that you'll never get bored, if you're up for the challenge of course... This game is the true tactical FPS multiplayer, many new games with fancy graphics try to accomplish what CS 1.6 did and fail terribly. 1.6 needs more love from valve, it was one of the games that made steam a 'thing', hell, back in the day it was the ONLY game to bring loyal users to the platform, the games available at the time were very reduced and steam was just an annoyance, to be completely honest we all hated steam, it was a broken nightmare. Valve could show some love for their baby... adding trading cards, bg's and emo's or even skins would be a great start... one call only dream.. :) tl;dr: Steam was very broken and the 1.6 playerbase kept it going, valve should recognize that.
Scaredy-cat;-;Basically this game was released back in the year 2000 and still is one of the most played games on Steam. So clearly it must be good because so many are still playing it. I definitely recommend this game and if you don't like to shoot terrorist or counter terrorists you can always try different game modes like zombie modes. 10/10
f0rz1 # hsCorp.de;-;great game
stronk_pancake;-;Bought this masterpiece in a TESCO. 10/10
Bv;-;made at 1998 and still played and loved <3333
doe;-;This Game Is Legend There is no need of comment
[#] Ozzy ^;-;Best Action Game Ever!
MrZawbZawb;-;This game is in awesome!
kAps;-;FANTASTIQUE!
DMG'Dealer;-;it's a very nice game :)
Andreea;-;is the best game in the world have fun ;)
tWd (retired);-;Best classic game that I've been playing for years, if it wasnt for CAL falling apart, the release of other verisons of counter-strike such as condition zero, source, and global offense. I would still be playing competitivly
G####;-;The best of its time.
Trollaren </Wizeguy.se\>;-;Best game 4ever, no game is gonna beat this
hOPE;-;This game is good.Really Good!!
S    T;-;i can't stop playing :D
Scaredy-cat;-;Basically this game was released back in the year 2000 and still is one of the most played games on Steam. So clearly it must be good because so many are still playing it. I definitely recommend this game and if you don't like to shoot terrorist or counter terrorists you can always try different game modes like zombie modes. 10/10
gg wp;-;Thanks valve for ing up the game. still awesome though.
slushbox;-;The only game I still play...
EBPEN;-;Good game! Really good :)
Anete Lva;-;Loved it <3
MojeOvceIduURikverc;-;Very good game :)
doe;-;This Game Is Legend There is no need of comment
SarcasticWisdom?;-;Happy 15th Birthday to the best FPS
kaelan;-;It's Counter-Strike you point gun and shoot terrorists (or counter-terrorists if you prefer the ak) Just don't cross the streams
Dont Play With Mee ^__-`;-;PLaying Counter Strike Felling Awesome with Steam...
azL;-;The one and only real surf there is
ellmiroff;-;good game visit my gorup and play on my cs server http://steamcommunity.com/groups/yuugaming
f0lhzz;-;Game one of the best!
vullneT-;-;10/10 would bang
4 8 15 16 23 42;-;A game you can play forever:)
f0rz1 # hsCorp.de;-;great game
Leon #ThugLife;-;the best game
RamenNoodler;-;why the  not?
Uncle acer;-;Great game, tho graphics are not nowadays quality because it's been made in 1999.
ButterBalls;-;if you don't know about this game then i feel bad for you son. i got 99 problems, but this game aint one. this game is my childhood. get it.
gANSKTA;-;this paradise game
sKratch;-;One of the best games in the history. It made a big difference in the game industry when it was released, just like Half Life did. It is shame that it is being left behind for games that were released after it, but it did survive for a long while for an old school game. even longer then the new gen games. I hope the player base of it will be back to the way it was the past, or even abit of it.
Solly: Panparam;-;It's simple. Terrorist x CTs Few minutes to complete objectives. The more you play, the better you get. I used to be professional but now I suck at this, And I dont think i can play as I used to, but it still worth playing this game. Counter Strike is about competition. I'll always like to shoot at my friends' faces. Counter-Strike is the best game-mod(-game) ever. Valve wins.
clockwork;-;almost 1k hrs on csgo, finally playing this game. "this aint csgo you stupid" -team 2/10
[xG] EroX;-;Even The Game Was Old But Many Players Still Playing This Game.There Was A Lot Of Server.For Who Planning To Buy This Game.I recommended you playing this..you wont regret buying this :) -Owner Of NRG-Gaming
SIMPLE MAN;-;My old game :) , Good Game ever
Ying;-;Played 3k+ hours, pretty bad game wouldn't recommend to others Kappa.
brodtosy;-;Omg, This Game is 1st best games in 2009-2011. <3 i will never stop playing, NEVER
skerrrrr;-;I got killed by a team of mexicans, russians, 40 year olds, and one asian. 10/10
Kassoul-VAC Banned;-;Counter-Strike 1.6 is one of my best games I've ever played even if I played alot of games, The graphics doesn't matter but the gameplay is the important :)!
bfRheostat @;-;Recommended. Here is the pros/cons of this game in my humble opinion: PROS + Nostalgic + Buy menu shortcuts + You can buy bullets as much as you like + Some unique server mods like Warcraft + Some unique original maps which don't included later versions of CS (even they are not so great) + Active community CONS - Literally ****ed up server list, probably server owners do that (fake ping/fake player counts etc.) - Except buy menu shortcuts, buy menu isn't so useful (especially if you hit ESC to close the menu, it doesn't works) - Weird hitpoints and lucky headshots - 7/24 "de_dust2", "de_inferno" playing community
JungleScope;-;Standard run and gun game that says it tries to stop cheaters and hackers out of the game, instead all it does is ban people who are having internet trouble trying to blame them for lag switching. It does not hitting those who you can obviously watch and see they are using aim bots by spectating after death and always aiming at people through walls at their heads ready to shoot the moment they turn corners.
DaTSiK;-;Its a good game :D
Destroyer;-;One of the best game i've ever played in my whole life! This game was the best ,this game is the best ,this game will be the best.
AXAAAAAAAAA;-;Classic is always Best <3
xX_Pr0Sc0p3r_Xx | trade.tf;-;CS:GO is good. CS is great. I keep on playing, and school I will be late.
IcEmAn911;-;8/10 Rate Good Game
SPIKEONE #brokenarm;-;Hands down the GOAT.
IMMORTAL TREASURE III;-;it's like cs.go but better ... k@pp@
Shaundi;-;True classic nothing more to say !! Will Miss You :)
[MOM]Fluffy;-;Game gives me 20-30 fps :D But the memories :)
MONE;-;Good old game, but time is up!
SaMoSa BiN ChutNEY;-;best game ever <3 cs 1.6 <oao
!ns@n3#deleted cs;-;Amazing game . Totaly adictive and loads of fun . Have been playing from quite long now. Never did i get bored of playing counter strike 1.6. :)
JooHyun;-;So I just played the original Counter Strike, CS1.6 for about an hour and after over 100 hours of both CSS and CSGO, this game is AMAZING! But so different! I love this game and its game series! It taught me tactical gameplay and how much communication is key but this game lacks a bit of that but not much. I absolutely love this and highly recommend it!
Musashi;-;Played this game for the first time in 2008. Since then I have clocked more than 5000 hours, that's how addictive its multiplayer is. Father of all FPS in MP. Plus has several mods deathmatch, hns, kz, gungame, scrim, zombiemod and paintball. It's been 14 years and the game is still going strong atleast in the Indian scene.
Wammbo #Kinguin;-;This is the BEST FPS ever, Counter-Strike was the game, which made Esports evolve big time and is the reason for alot of great games today. Without Counter-Strike, i guess alot of good games wouldn't exist today.
us sd;-;BES IME ILLER EVER !!!
Le Chat Ninja ';-;The time that your head was the size of a pillow :D
Nigerian Sandwich Sleeper;-;I played this game at school and the teacher game me an A
eXoZEW;-;gather-network.com - CStrike 1.6
[P]rincess;-;Best game ever. even this is the old game. but i played this game until now! 10/10 stars for this game :D
Baba valja it;-;Yes i recommend this game :D
Ic3 Cub3;-;The BEST game
~d0x.3x3~_ftw^ =;-;world no1 game
Kappo;-;Ruined my life.
helsiN.;-;Wery cool games :p
BeGuMine;-;the best!
nOBODYz;-;Classic.
,vaaS';-;nice game for ever :-* [Sn!per - GameinG]   Best Counter Strike 1.6 Servers   Classic : 31.186.251.197:27055 #1  AutoMiX : 31.186.250.74:27066 #2  Clan War : 31.186.251.197:27075 #3  Fast Download   Fast BuNnY Hoper Server          No Lag   Low Ping (Latency)   High FPS (1000)  Best Maps   Nice Plugins   New Sounds   Free Admin  *invet player = 15 +.  FB Group: www.facebook.com/groups/super3market/ FB Page : www.facebook.com/Sniper.Game1ng FB admin page: www.facebook.com/ALM0SHAKSS Web-site : http://neverstoptokill.wix.com/sn1pergaming We Are not the best but , we do best for you .!!
Sikanto;-;1999 is when this came out, but when I was born. Gladly though I grew up to find out and discover about this magnificent piece. There was no other game that I played once I purchased this with some B-Day cash on Steam. First time playing, I got mutilated like the noob I was, but when I started playing more often, I became better and everyone else can too. This isn't like the CODs or Battlefields that I have played here and there today. No it's much more different. Counter-Strike is a Tactical FPS which relies on teamwork and tactics more than fast paced arcade action. You don't unlock weapons, you buy them with cash earned from kiling enemies, completeing objectives, or winning rounds although you still get a little for loosing. Think of the game as Cops & Robbers. Robbers blow things up and the Cops don't them too. On the extra note, this game has probably one of the best modding communities out there. There too much to do or put in here but I can slam a bit down. -Zombies Survival/Escape -Soccer (Or Football for the Europeans) -Surf -Bhop/KZ (Climbing Zone) -Pokemod -Gungame (Those new may have heard such from Call of Duty's spinoff) -And more, etc. So now that I've explained the game I guess I can lay down some pro's yet con's to playing Counter-Strike 1.6 PROS -Fun/Unlimited Gameplay possibilities -Booming community that has been alive for 15 years -Plethora of servers to choose from -Competetive and Casual at the same time -Fun to play with a group of friends -More skill based than many other games out there -Cheap price CONS -Graphics from 1998 may seem slightly offputting -Not an easy game to jump right into, as it takes lots of time to become better -May seem repetitive after a while I came into CS late. But, I'm glad this was the first one I owned.
mildo S;-;Old but gold !
FunnyMan.;-;Best in' shooter eva' ! -_- \m/
AMNEZIA - Cs-palace.com;-;hmm. trying to earn a few batches.
Queer;-;this is counter strike: source, it's a video game. 10/10 it's counter strike: source.
Human;-;The Best Game :)
zeulike !;-;I like this game very much and.. LOVE IT .. :D In this game i liked strategy, team work and competitions, in specially i like to play with people, with friends:)
Gremmerz police officer;-;The classic. If you haven't played it yet give it a go (oh the pun) and don't let the lack of ShineyGrafix disappoint you. I have both the later Source and currently latest GO versions but still come back to the original version from time to time because it is still fun and its classic style is still completely fine... and a lot of people who still play CS regularly shares my view.
Cly;-;This Game Is a classic master piece. And has AMAZING replay value. As a young gamer my self growing up in a world where most casual gamers are xbox humping, cod playing, graphic s. It is shameful that this game is not played. This game made and broke friendships and made a childhood for many people. Even if you dont play the game often. Please just get it for it to be in your library. 8/10 for some bugs and a now strange community. But nonetheless a great game.
X;-;Playing the scrim mode in Counter Strike is just awesome. 5/5
Niqqa_roach;-;Black Screen... 11/10 Would buy again!
Huddleston;-;MLg Middle aged swedge Sadly not Dust II simulator I know 9/11
4;-;Counter-Strike is the best first-person online shooting game. Because it depends only in your own skills. There are no advantages like in Call of Duty series, you will need to aim correctly, know the recoil of your gun and shoot your enemies to death.
L3uM^S_420;-;awesome game .. cs 1.6 longlive
MsDarkLow;-;The chat was overfilled with people blaming for hacks. I like it that way.
nathanjo;-;DO YOU LIKE GETTING KIILLED BY PLAYERS WHO ARE 10000 TIMES BETTER THAN YOU? THIS IS THE GAME FOR YOU.
Sp!Der;-;awsome game world's number 1 game awsome
Overdosed;-;Nice game, i recommend it!
EagLe @ EvoDark.Ro;-;The best game ever :P
-Xylola;-;Started playing this game when I was 8 years old ( 2002 ). Bravo Counter-Strike!
HUSHO;-;Seriously the bestest game ever :D
100KG;-;Old But Gold!!!
Sidewalker;-;Cool
helsiN.;-;Wery cool games :p
BeGuMine;-;the best!
nOBODYz;-;Classic.
faintyy;-;Old but gold!
eXoZEW;-;gather-network.com - CStrike 1.6
[P]rincess;-;Best game ever. even this is the old game. but i played this game until now! 10/10 stars for this game :D
M[T]V <3 kN[!]f3|2;-;yeah its ing awsome !!!
siim944;-;Very nice old school game.
Baba valja it;-;Yes i recommend this game :D
Ic3 Cub3;-;The BEST game
Nash;-;I really like this game 10/10 soy adicto aydenme.
Lingu;-;So, fall asleep love, loved by me... for I know love, I am loved by thee. Read more at http://www.brainyquote.com/quotes_of_the_day.html#zvQY7U3Ax27DSMXQ.99
WansE^ # RIP Chinchi..;-;This game is probably the best game ever. Even it is old, it is still the best shooter game.
Daniel Hansen!;-;I've played this game for years and it has always been one of my favourite games to play. It's sad to see it die out slowly, but I enjoyed my time playing.
FmA;-;Play this game it's old but it's the best shooter game!!!
BURTOSH;-;The game is very beatiful and full of emotions while playing online. All the gamers, harcore gamers, have to play it. It is just about skills and trainings.
reiben;-;The Best!
x.x;-;This is s good game(:
TSquaD.crEw csgoshuffle.com;-;#1 GaM3, 0n3 of my favourite GaM3s.
SkunkIE;-;Fav game of all time. CS:GO is fun but still doesn't feel the same!
SKoy;-;Best FPS game ever, if you are truly a gamer, dont miss it
2f4usteel [On a break];-;one of the best fps game!
Arctic;-;This game is . 5/5 Must have.
SpeeDy GonzaleS [SES];-;Forever the best game on Steam <3
MAni;-;Counter Strike 1.6 Will Never Die ! Valve Created Counter-Strike , and it found an amazing success , many legends appeared , Spawn , Cyx , Heaton , Walle . were legends ! NAVI , SK GAMING , Fnatic , NIP ! were legendary cs 1.6 teams ! , Spawn Was Legend  But Took retirment in : 26-02-2010 ! Cs 1.6 lost a "Legend" , Cyx was Legend too ! but died in a car accident 29-07-2010 ! cs 1.6 lost an other legend ! Walle too ............... ! , Eved Edward , king of pistols with his awesome ace vs Fnatic ! , & f0rest ! we won't forget dalpan ! in addition to many other cs 1.6 legends ! ,,, but now a days ! many gamers leaved the 1.6 ! because of the new Global Offensive .... ! but what if everyone stops playing CS;GO ! what if wa all comback to the amazing 1.6 ! to this amazing game , awesom game , real game <3 ! we will see new legends .. new 1.6 legends ! .... Here zneel' :D a new champion ! we want our old 1.6 back ! with old emotions ..... <3 ! share this status everywhere ! to incite gamers to come back to the awesom 1.6 ! you can be also a legend or champion one day :) ! you can be as powerful as spawn ! or any other legend ! yes you can ! & we can return to the old : Counter-Strike Stille a live & won't die :'D
SKoy;-;Best FPS game ever, if you are truly a gamer, dont miss it
WansE^ # RIP Chinchi..;-;This game is probably the best game ever. Even it is old, it is still the best shooter game.
Daniel Hansen!;-;I've played this game for years and it has always been one of my favourite games to play. It's sad to see it die out slowly, but I enjoyed my time playing.
MenaRD;-;This game is pure jewel,i love it.
she said she was 18+;-;cs.promns.ro www.promns.ro
JAMAL;-;I love it very very very much i always play it when i got free time from my studies <3<3<3<3<3<3,i love to play it i liked this very much,every thing seems to be so real and i just love it :)5star from my side :)
LoudeRZz;-;Just buy it !!
SMokeR?! !amRe$|$taNCE|;-;A Very good game indeed..... proves that graphics dont matter, gameplay does
Mave;-;This is the game of my childhood.
Zoro;-;CS <3
DeAd FaCe;-;This game us so funn.
-Xylola;-;Started playing this game when I was 8 years old ( 2002 ). Bravo Counter-Strike!
HUSHO;-;Seriously the bestest game ever :D
100KG;-;Old But Gold!!!
alkotester;-;Perfect game :)
n1k;-;17-04-14 new update. Game doesnt even open. Error: Fatal Error- Cannot load Library. Please fix. Unbale to open CS 1.6
Artinemi.;-;despite it's graphic this game is one of the best fps first shooter games , u will enjoy it with a low recoil and a smooth game that nearly require no money.
Mave;-;This is the game of my childhood.
Zoro;-;CS <3
Hurley;-;Game will be played forever
!na;-;there is absolutely no need to review this game....!!! brilliant, fantastic..!!! well best online multiplayer game ever...!!!
**$FrUiT^_^NiNjA$**;-;THIS GAME IS AWESOME!!!!!!!!!!!
N8Gamin;-;This game is the reason Steam was invented so I think this must be good.
P@R@0!;-;the most addictive online game!
moythecreeper;-;This game, is not a multiplayer game, is THE Multiplayer Game. This game is classic, is a monster! Counter-Strike... I love those words. This is my 2 favorite game of all time. To be good in this game you must be a strategist, to have a good team relationship, and takes dedication. This game has tons of weapons to choose. THe game modes are PERFECT, the other community gamemodes are even better! You like COD with zombies, well, this game haved zombies before COD, and better zombies. In what game are you gonna do a deathrun, where you must be alert to everything and to have skills to survive and kill a terrorist? In what game are you gonna kill zombies, while they run at full speed and all your teammates throw granades and shoot as if there was no tommorow? In what game are you gonna surf on wall? In what game are you gonna find this quantity of maps, and good maps!? In what game!? Battlefield and COD can have better graphics, destruction, campaing and more guns, but, they will never have the community that Counter-Strike have. We made Counter-Strike, Counter-Strike made us. (English is not my first language)
Islandshadows88;-;Here's my story, I went over to my friend's house one day, he was playing CS. I tried it for myself, I was instantly hooked and have been for over 10 years with the counter strike franchise. Best online action franchise ever for the pc in my opinion. Counter strike is like a drug that you will never be cured from, trust me.
DEPENDENTTT;-;A great game!!!
#iOnlyGtaIV;-;The best game I played
DeadKitten;-;I'm not one to criticise a game but, this has to be a great title mostly for it's "Your role affects your team's success. Your team's success affects your role," system even if it had many problems. The gameplay is great with plenty of user created content to play. Vanilla gameplay is not advised as it gets repetitive fast. Overall gameplay is a 8.5 out of ten. The sound isn't very good with it's annoying tracks, the only way to fix this is to download custom gun sounds but thats a pain. The sound wasn't even good in 2000 when the game came out and thats telling you something. Overall 4.0 out of a possible ten. I know this is odd for me to review a game off of this but online community. The community if few and far between, there are BARELY any good servers up and sometimes the community is awful. (still not as bad as team fortress 2 IMO XD) Overall 6.0 out of ten. Graphics usually take the backseat in my reviews but, I do have to say the graphics are OK I mean in 2000 they still weren't as good as UNREAL 1 or IDTECH 3 but they get the job done. Overall 6.5 out of ten. My verdict is that this game is good and still is I have to say this is a damn fine game earning my score as an 80% out of 100% (BTW This is all criticism because, I AM A CRITIC.) (I go into detail about every problem a game has.) Therefore I recommend. Monstercat signing out.
Cato;-;Greatest Game of all time!
Nash;-;I really like this game 10/10 soy adicto aydenme.
Lingu;-;So, fall asleep love, loved by me... for I know love, I am loved by thee. Read more at http://www.brainyquote.com/quotes_of_the_day.html#zvQY7U3Ax27DSMXQ.99
DreamCSGO;-;Its a good game !
TSquaD.crEw csgoshuffle.com;-;#1 GaM3, 0n3 of my favourite GaM3s.
slimmmmmm;-;One of the best games ever
DeadKitten;-;I'm not one to criticise a game but, this has to be a great title mostly for it's "Your role affects your team's success. Your team's success affects your role," system even if it had many problems. The gameplay is great with plenty of user created content to play. Vanilla gameplay is not advised as it gets repetitive fast. Overall gameplay is a 8.5 out of ten. The sound isn't very good with it's annoying tracks, the only way to fix this is to download custom gun sounds but thats a pain. The sound wasn't even good in 2000 when the game came out and thats telling you something. Overall 4.0 out of a possible ten. I know this is odd for me to review a game off of this but online community. The community if few and far between, there are BARELY any good servers up and sometimes the community is awful. (still not as bad as team fortress 2 IMO XD) Overall 6.0 out of ten. Graphics usually take the backseat in my reviews but, I do have to say the graphics are OK I mean in 2000 they still weren't as good as UNREAL 1 or IDTECH 3 but they get the job done. Overall 6.5 out of ten. My verdict is that this game is good and still is I have to say this is a damn fine game earning my score as an 80% out of 100% (BTW This is all criticism because, I AM A CRITIC.) (I go into detail about every problem a game has.) Therefore I recommend. Monstercat signing out.
Islandshadows88;-;Here's my story, I went over to my friend's house one day, he was playing CS. I tried it for myself, I was instantly hooked and have been for over 10 years with the counter strike franchise. Best online action franchise ever for the pc in my opinion. Counter strike is like a drug that you will never be cured from, trust me.
DEPENDENTTT;-;A great game!!!
moythecreeper;-;This game, is not a multiplayer game, is THE Multiplayer Game. This game is classic, is a monster! Counter-Strike... I love those words. This is my 2 favorite game of all time. To be good in this game you must be a strategist, to have a good team relationship, and takes dedication. This game has tons of weapons to choose. THe game modes are PERFECT, the other community gamemodes are even better! You like COD with zombies, well, this game haved zombies before COD, and better zombies. In what game are you gonna do a deathrun, where you must be alert to everything and to have skills to survive and kill a terrorist? In what game are you gonna kill zombies, while they run at full speed and all your teammates throw granades and shoot as if there was no tommorow? In what game are you gonna surf on wall? In what game are you gonna find this quantity of maps, and good maps!? In what game!? Battlefield and COD can have better graphics, destruction, campaing and more guns, but, they will never have the community that Counter-Strike have. We made Counter-Strike, Counter-Strike made us. (English is not my first language)
qtsphere #Vac in tf2;-;CS1.6 <3
Hurley;-;Game will be played forever
DragoNNNN^;-;For me it is one of the best games on steam community :)
PeRvY SaGe -_^;-;1.6 ..name is enough
saint/m/;-;pretty good
wixxeN.;-;The best game <3
Scorp!on (Vac) --> AL-M3lm;-;it is my love :D
AWildBerryAppears;-;next gen graphics 10/10 wuld buy
pera.kiD;-;The best game ever!
Pingu;-;Still the best shooter out there. Nothing can beat 1.6. Get some mates, play on a well configured server and enjoy this masterpiece.
zeus;-;cs the best if u want to have a good game . :D
Dampy;-;The best game !
cODY420g;-;Best FPS ever to grace the computer.
JasonXtreme;-;Great!
I Didn't Choose The Gabe Life;-;It's the first counter strike game. Of course it's amazing.
John97;-;10/10 Would review again.
rybaby;-;now this is fragging
Summers;-;BOOOM HEADSHAT!!11!!!!11!!!!!!!11!1!1!1!11!!!!!!!!
Bilal' bAk`ganem`<3;-;NLA my love counter-strike
keV_thowseN1337;-;Back At 2011 I used to play it With my laptop I was like And I spended Like alot of hours on It and have alot of experience on 1.6 and cs go
DanGamer9977;-;it is the best counter strike ever
en0ugh;-;best action at all times
tomzenRrr;-;1.6 is love, 1.6 is life
RooR^;-;Still the best FPS. Even after playing CS GO, 1.6 will always have a place in my heart.
Sparkie;-;The god of classic fps.
'KLR';-;Best FPS game I've ever played . "Rise above all"
bReTT;-;Classic game. Love it <3
cachapa;-;I LOVE THIS GAME! just chill out with friends but still an awesome fps game.
AudiO;-;This is my all time favourite game. It is one of the first game I played. This game has been with me until now and I am still playing it with a big joy. It may be old but there is no other game that can replace it in my life.
raiven;-;This game will be remain legendary . But now is time to CS:GO , but i will never forget CS 1.6 !
Mountaineye;-;I don't have to talk much about this game... It's so perfect! I know people who have got about 4000 hours on this game :o and they are not bored yet:)
Isho;-;The best Action game beginning of the 21th century
SyniK *steelseries;-;ruined my career
araD0 .;-;I love it. :D
Jammin;-;Bought this game a bit too late... wish I would've been around to play it back in it's prime. This game is simply a classic. My first Counter-Strike was Source. I loved Source a lot, and that lead to me getting CS:GO. CS:GO is now my most played game. ANYWAYS, I bought this game pretty recently and I love playing it. Too bad the servers are bugged I think, otherwise, still has an alright community. great gameplay and requires a lot of skill. I love the wallbanging and the style you have to shoot. Not so much run n gun like the other games in the series. I definitely recommend this game. Even though I doubt many people are still buying this game!
[JuGuBuGuLe];-;Connect Cs.CsFraguri.Ro! GO GO GO!
z1mer;-;One of the best FPS game that is recognized around the world. A must have.
Isho;-;The best Action game beginning of the 21th century
SyniK *steelseries;-;ruined my career
AWildBerryAppears;-;next gen graphics 10/10 wuld buy
raiven;-;This game will be remain legendary . But now is time to CS:GO , but i will never forget CS 1.6 !
MYAC;-;Very cooool game :)!!!! I Llike This GAME :d
StrikeRekT;-;Old School Rules B-)
Vhilltex[DKA];-;The greatest multiplayer shooter experience I've had since Quake 1. The e-sport scene also helped it alot, it's the only computer game I've really followed when it comes to e-sports (back when I followed the CPL etc). The design of the game was simple but very effective and delivered a multiplayer experience that few other games can match. The Call of Duty and Battlefield titles, although good in their own right, never drew me in like Counter-Strike.
Yo-Yo;-;Good game no scamms like in tf2
Lord Bacon;-;I'm just here to post the 6,666th review for this game... get it.
.legaCy;-;Old but gold.
Lord Bacon;-;I'm just here to post the 6,666th review for this game... get it.
mouz // FLEX;-;It's a classic!
Summers;-;BOOOM HEADSHAT!!11!!!!11!!!!!!!11!1!1!1!11!!!!!!!!
araD0 .;-;I love it. :D
d3v0uTT # GLOBAL;-;Very balanced game. Should have Steam Trading Cards and Achievements.
Mountaineye;-;I don't have to talk much about this game... It's so perfect! I know people who have got about 4000 hours on this game :o and they are not bored yet:)
Skrillex#;-;Counter-Strike is a great game, from this game have 5 stars, really congrats to VALVe for make this amazing game.
Darkx | Team7;-;This is where history was written. the son of the big daddy Half-Life. Since the game was released, even with newer versions like Source and GO, it is still very popular. Example of a masterpiece.
CSGOPoker.com - rgztmdb;-;I will always enjoy this game. Best FPS I've ever played. It's 2015 and I still love it. BUY IT.
Upseey385i;-;This is not a drill,I kill with the skill
m2fizy;-;BEST GAME EVER It's Half Life engine multiplayer (+online) base first person shooter - Coop team game. Great mechanics and great playebility with basic idea creates a mix of perfect cooperative first person shooter (nothing more, nothing less). It's the one of the most popular multiplayer games on the planet. Over 2milion active players. Before DOTA2 this was the most played online FPS game on steam. + graphics + mechanics + coop team play + online servers + different types of playable maps (kz, he, de, cl, ...) - not as much players as before Graphics: 7/10 Sounds/Music : 7/10 Mechanics: 9/10 Idea: 8/10 Story : 0/10 Addicting: 10/10 ---------------------- Verdict: 9,5/10 (that -0,5 is for ... this game is not so popular as in 2000-2010 ... such a shame)
jdshnugles;-;Fun to pick up and play
Kamikaze;-;One the best games i've ever played. :)
|M|Moklakins|Inc;-;Its CS
BORIS;-;Shootest
Uncle Sam;-;One of best games ;)
d3v0uTT # GLOBAL;-;Very balanced game. Should have Steam Trading Cards and Achievements.
ROxOr'NATION;-;One of the best games I played and playing till now ^_^
Adr3naliN.;-;One of the best games and also my favorite :)
Tripppyy;-;Love It!!! <3 Brings Back So Many good time's with mates! :)
Bane;-;The best game of my childhood
PauLbOb;-;Counter-Strike father
_||H$^||_ <<NA.M.AN>>;-;Best Game ever. I love this game. I am playing for 4 years and now also i am not get bored :D Best Shooting game ever :D
anakin skywalker;-;Wanted a physical copy of this game , rather than purchasing it online, to leave my children a memoir of one of the gr8test games in history, but anyway... this will do the trick more or less. +1 , the only game i really knew how to play and i really enjoyed playing.
Arcy;-;Its a good game
LaGGer;-;The best old school shooter.
h0aX;-;Such a perfect game,
slicK;-;Absolutely outstanding game. beautifuly made and an absolute masterpeice to say none the least. If you don't have a good PC or want the old cs retro feel. Pick this up and enjoy yourself with some mates. Awesome game.
puhak;-;MINIMUM: 500 mhz processor, 96mb ram, 16mb video card, Windows XP, Mouse, Keyboard, Internet Connection i dont even have a video card what blasphemy is this 11/10 everyone is better than me
im from china;-;Old but gold
yanek //** ZOWIE;-;The best game that I've played for last 10 years, however cs go took my heart forever. Buy this game if you wish to come back to old days sitting in large screens and playing cs 1.6 all day. :)
Alan :D;-;It's alright
DJWeeder  [Ro];-;Counter-Strike is a pretty old game of "shooter", which was developed in 1999, and since 2000, supported by Valve. This game immediately caught on millions of players around the world. The game is a confrontation of terrorists and counter-terrorists, representing the forces of good and evil. Objectives of the opposing sides differ depending on the map, in which the battle. And here is my thoughs... This is the most entertaining video game i've ever played since 2007. I think i've played this game like 2000hrs i guess, played only the cracked version in that day... I finally i bought this game and it's worth 10 bucks indeed. I still play CS 1.6 because i had an amazing childhood with it! By that i didn't mean online or with bots but i had lots of LAN-party's in my country and my friends still play it though but theres still Lan-party's sometimes in my country ^^ The game is still fun and it never gets boring! I mean todally this game has lots of gamemodes which is ZM/ZE/CSDM/GUNGAME/FURIEN/SURF/DEATHRUN/BASEBUILDER and more and more and more... It's just fantastic! :D 10/10 Would recommand it!
`SWonderwolf;-;Although I'm keeping this a thumbs up. I never liked 1.6. Cool to see how the game evloved.. but I never liked the 1.6 update from 1.5.
ref1ux`;-;Used to be my favorite game till I was introduced to CS:GO. This game is the basic for all the players whom have just started to play CS. They should slowly grow up simply by starting off from this game.
Rastapopuolos;-;Back when Counter-Strike was good. Of all games in this series, the other games aren't as complete as this one. Though this game maybe feels outdated, it does pack alot of fun for anyone who is a fan of FPS games. The FPS function in this game is superb and it feels great to get headshots and so on. If you're intrested in this game and if you're full aware of what you are getting in to, then get it!
Sammal #3sixty;-;Great game, hours of joy! Recommended
Apple^;-;Great Game....Can play ofline and Online too.
#`GHo$T .. !;-;Best Game Ever xD But I Cant Play It On My MAC :/
KAIO!!!;-;DON'T MAKE ME INSTALL AND SCHOOL YOU KIDS IN THIS GAME
Worlds Sluttiest Pheasant;-;Counter Strike 1.6 Helping People Expand their Russian Vocabulary Since 2000
fancypants *hail hydra*;-;Seriously, one of my favorite games of all time.
Mavee;-;Score says it all. There's another version out called Counter-Strike: Source, but it's nothing compared to how the original Counter-Strike is. Plus, now adays it's really really cheap, like 10 dollars off of steam. As well, it has like the biggest competitive gaming community in the world, with hundreds of thousands of dollars worth of tournaments and players etc... good stuff.
he;-;Respect game)
alex;-;I want Hide'N'Seek Tournaments with high pool prize!
Proster;-;This game is my life <3
Dee;-;Best multiplayer game in all time!!!
Swordfish_;-;(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!(Radio) Need Backup!
brumboBiceps;-;I highly recommend this game!!!
xTHEOOO #BUYING SKINS;-;Good old 1.6 was and will always be the greatest counterstrike!
(o_)?   MaD;-;Great Game!! Nice Graphics!! Online Servers are good... Sometimes Non-steam Cheaters appears but if the server has admin, should be fine... Nice Game For People Who Got Low Graphics In The Computer
KlostaN;-;one of the best games ever made
xeisH. =D;-;playing better than admin means you are cheating. 10/10.
Micko;-;One of the best FPS games of all time.
CWANIAKSquezze;-;I really like the game, but I couldnt find the stupid cake.
vermin4prez;-;great game
I bleed rainbows;-;Playing with people within this game made me a bad person. Playing with people within this game made me reetarded. Playing with people within this game has formed a tumor inside my brain. Playing this game will make you a homosexual. And you will like it.
Jan3;-;One of the best games I've ever played.
Renome;-;Even after 15 years this is in top ten most played games on the planet. GG Valve.
narrow.cpp;-;im not 12 u idiot im 13. my dad works for valve and if u win im calling hacks and texting him on my nokia to tell him to ban your computer from the internet you noob. my mom owns microsoft so ill break ur windows noob. if u use mac u need to die. this game is ok
zohan;-;BEST GAME !
actioN;-;Quite possibly the purest form of First Person Shooter, only rivaled by Quake. In my opinion, it is undoubtedly the best game out of the Counter-Strike series. Only downside with this game, is that it has already had its primetime.
bondz0r;-;This is real good game!!!!!!
Monolith;-;This game sucks.
faXcooL 24/7;-;CS 1.6 <333! :)
Alexa;-;Counter Stricke 1.6 is a great game.! Recommends all players! Counter Stricke is an action game. If you play for a clan you have a lot to think about stack areas. Enjoy these in it.! GG & HL
IIII;-;10/10 better than all cod and bf games
DarK_St3alth;-;The original CS. This is where it all started, 1.6. While many forget about 1.4, 1.5 and those versions, 1.6 is a great standalone title. Graphics wise, you have to be able to run this. If you can't run CS at all, not sure why you have Steam. Simple, and basic is what a lot of people would describe the look and feel of CS to be. If you haven't played HL original it make look a little stupid, but the game is still great inside. Original can't get more original here -- when talking about the base game idea(s). Great for people with low end comps and internet like Link Freeman and his dial up. This game was made a while back so keep that in mind! 7/10
[DW]Terminator;-;You have this game to thank for modes like Call of Duty's "Search and Destroy." CS is arguably the most widely-played online shooter of all time, and it's still got a thriving community going on 12 years later. It's got simple, easy-to-pick-up gameplay that's spawned a massive competitive community. Unfortunately, it's extremely stale thanks to the fact that there are 3 game modes. Luckily, there are tons of customization options available online. Still, worth checking out for the sake of history.
Misogynistic Donut;-;This game is very hard for beginners like me. However, I recently watched a guide that upped my skill by like triple: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=GS5tRoVYFtg So if you plan on buying this game, I definately recommend watching this guide before doing anything.
...qCk~sTrIkEr{~`wow`~}...;-;THe best online multiplayer game ever
Lucifer;-;This game ruined my life. It's an awesome title! I never knew a game 14 years old would be so good and still, it's active in the community! That's really nice! This game is a huge hit in the market and still there are lots of buyers. It is a little thought for a guy like me who just plays non fps games. But still, it is really interesting and amazing to play with friends and online too!
Demented Mind;-;I remember being a younger kid, I had a brother take me out and walk for about 30 minutes to a gaming cafe where they have this game being played 90% of all computers. Playing this for the first time as a kid, I felt it was so realistic lol. It was like being in a new world, basically. We came back to gaming cafe every once a while whenever we can afford it. One time, my dad came home early and we were not home, lol. Somehow, he figured out where we were at! Good times good times! This is one of few games that made my childhood memories.
fonetic;-;Classics
Marcheziora;-;Despite people telling me to avoid this game because of the Extreme Elitist that are still present here, I had a great time playing with nice, mature, and helpful people willing to teach me the game, I guess it was luck that I've encountered such nice people!
Zgreat;-;This game costs real money
RottenWood;-;Cool and classic.who love this oldschool game.you can try!
Vaapukkamehu/VACationAustralia;-;Best online FPS till to this day.
mm_dedicated_search_maxping 350;-;It's cs1.6 and your on Steam, if you don't have this then please follow these steps: 1. Uninstall Steam. 2. Kill yourself.
The Sensateria;-;GOVNO SOBA4'E, NE IGRAITE POCONI
orelikas(SABAS);-;cs the best
Ioana;-;I love this game
kryscioteles;-;Fantastic game....
EdgeMaster 2.0;-;Oh Counter-Strike... If you don't have this game then where have you been the last 15 years -_- (Also it's my personal favorite FPS)
Cynical Paulie;-;Terrorists win.
Flux;-;Such game Much love Many sweat
Innocent VACantion-ed acc =);-;Old But Gold
R!4d;-;the best game ever seen
Samdolo;-;The game of my childhood.
WINDU hraju hovno;-;the best game forever...
Evan :);-;I couldn't think of think of anything to write, so here's a recipe for pancakes: 1 egg 3/4 cup milk 2 tablespoons butter or 2 tablespoons margarine, melted 1 cup flour 1 cup tablespoon sugar 1 teaspoon of baking powder 1 teaspoon of salt
Tropic (._.'');-;Loved it
india;-;HeatoNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNN
WectivusEL <3;-;So many years with us, but still the best game ever. :)
TheFinePlayer;-;As a CS fan I do like tis game. But I don't have that madness to the game as many other do. That could be because I grew up with CS:S. So I feel like you guys do, just not to the same game. But I mean this game was the start of the cs history so this game needs love! :3
ShaunSki;-;cool game bra
Mikee;-;best game connect 68.45.140:27015 for cybergame.ru look for me or assassinkiller69 (gf)
Sweta illshit;-;The best CS version! Old school :-D
Alfie (5 days till bday);-;Wow this game is amazing its addicting,oldschool,ragers and more! Well this game tough me something... Rage and play I mean I play oldschool games and i like them but this one is the best
[H] 30.33 Ref [W] 2 Keys;-;The reason why you should be using Steam in the first place.
kAM9 \_()_/;-;The best game!
BenZ;-;Old but gold.
Amm4r AlSyR!3;-;the best game :D
CHRISTMASDAY #PTGSTS;-;my frend borowed account and cheat, i play alot and can i have a new acount or maybe team can look into problem and not vac ban me anymore? cs is very good game please help :)
Po Oh;-;One of the best classic multiplayer games ever! Best gameplay in multiplayer games i've seen. Most People, who play CS:GO never played CS 1.6, which is kinda sad.. Not a single CS Game can replace 1.6. Btw. Most E-sport tournaments were held in cs 1.6. So since CS:GO came out, CS 1.6 kinda lost advantage. (Mostly cause of the years it already has.) I will miss you 1.6 <3 R.I.P. Remembrance of Counter-Strike 1.6: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=nrUMZZiheLU
kek;-;Legend from the good old days!
iNSANE;-;IT IS A GAME FOR PROS JOIN IT AND BE A PRO
MIOR | www.teamlyn.net;-;nice game old school
CSGOMBLE | Bot 1;-;No matter how many new versions of counter strike are yet to come, CS 1.6 is the best gameplay ever whatsoever it may be.
IceTearanger;-;This is the first FPS game i ever play, Classic
Cara Delevingne;-;This game tell me, Graphic doesn't matter
[OOL] hammer326;-;Not long before this game becomes yet another timeless tale of gaming's glorious past, and far from dead is that past. Newcomers to PC Gaming: Point is, it's a classic, and mandatory if you own a PC. So in short, straighten the hell up, ignore your idiot friends nagging you for a game of League or DOTA or BF4 or Planetside or whatever other garbage you've convinced yourself is good, and start from the ground up when you build your collection.
Snitzel;-;its a perfect game for learning precision in shooting games! i recommend it :P
[OOL] hammer326;-;Not long before this game becomes yet another timeless tale of gaming's glorious past, and far from dead is that past. Newcomers to PC Gaming: Point is, it's a classic, and mandatory if you own a PC. So in short, straighten the hell up, ignore your idiot friends nagging you for a game of League or DOTA or BF4 or Planetside or whatever other garbage you've convinced yourself is good, and start from the ground up when you build your collection.
Acabart;-;The classic game that everybody relates to :Fun,Skill,Good Memories ......And HAX !!!!!
ptK;-;worth the price... during the sales... on the russian store... i guess...
Countyzz. III;-;Seriously im playing this game because of kreedz mod and climbing other than that is  but still cool tho
AxelhacK;-;CS:GO, CS:GO, everywhere CS:GO. Classic stuff dies out.
qu3x^;-;Still a better game than CS:GO
Yella;-;Counter-Strike is a game that I recommend because: - is one of the legends from the category shooting - is cheaper than the rest from the category shooting - is a method to banish boredom - is a good method to increase your performance at aim - you can easy change the type of default skins by the skins from internet - have a fair VAC staff - and... why you don't try? Enjoy!
Snake;-;One of the best and evergreen games which i would like to recommend to people, interested in FPS games
toppazeazs/ finded u :);-;The BeST oF The Best /D
holydemon351;-;-This is my opinion your experience may vary- counter strike a name that almost anyone will recognize. Before I played counter strike I knew that it was a game loved by thousands even millions and that people play it every day. =The Graphics= this game's graphics are good (IMO) and it may not look to good by todays standards, they hold up just fine. =The Gameplay= The gameplay in Counter Strike involves starting out with some money to buy equipment, you earn more mony by killing members on the opposing team rescuing hostages, deactivating bombs, or plant and explode the bomb, also 1 life per round so work together. =My Verdict= I love this game the people who play it are pretty cool most of the time and the game can really suck you in and $10 may be kinda steep in for a game this old but it comes with -Counter Strike -Counter Strike: Condition Zero -Counter Strike: Condition Zero Deleted Scenes wich all come in the $10 asking price and I would give this game a 9/10
IqSkillz #dAk1Ng;-;Nice GAme
CallMeBack;-;One of the best games ever!
HeartBreaker;-;This is probably the game that set the foundation for Steam. This game has aged quite well, with its balance of original team based strategy and maps like de_dust 2 are legendary. This is without a doubt one of the greatest computer games of all time!
michalfogel;-;huehuehue 2006 all over again :D
GIVE THE CASH!|(_)iZ!;-;Counter-Strike 1.6  still one of the best shooters...CLASSIC!       ValveThank U
laz0rbeamz;-;Classic FPS, always entertaining !
Cerberus;-;Old but nice cs)
Jacob;-;really weird game but its fun its probably better to buy a different cs game. T.T!
AXP;-;Classic cs 1.6 still the best cs game out there
Alexcri1996;-;An old game but it keeps you in it :D
DeadKido21;-;Classic Shooter, good
mhhhhh DRAY -.-;-;It never gets old ;) one of the best games ever
D'Jok;-;Imi place Counter Strike
hit man no mercy #sick :"C;-;This is an old game. but its good and have some multimod servers and its funny game and i also play it , any 1 rich in steam can buy this game soo easly because its cheap
Arrite;-;You can't strike a counter, but you can strike other players with a knife. Or just constantly get one hit killed by enemies with deagles, ak's, and awps.
Razvan;-;One of the best games
NamajnaG;-;Invaded by ethnicities with bad computers and awful ideas with their server management, it is now impossible as of today to get a decent match without paying for ESEA, even in PUG servers. Not being racist, this is what actually happened. Surf servers and Fun servers finally died around 2011, whilst vanilla servers that ain't running dust 2 all day long died before Steam even came out, and all that's left is a bunch of latino-controlled servers with -awful maps and enough plugins to give you a seizure and a thousand hats.
zigster_-;-;this game will always be the best out of all the cs
29FAR*;-;the best of the best cs 1.6 <3
-FAK23-;-;Counter-Strike.. my favorite action game :D..
Leffty;-;Don't even look how mutch I played this game. Actualy i started playing it from 7 year's on pirated version offcourse, and you know? I wasted tons of time on this game. And I was realy enyoing this. THANKS VALVE for this awsome game.
Mr.Templar;-;This game goes very smoothly, and very funly!
The Cilveks;-;Really Good Game!
TheReal$am$hady;-;The best FPS's of all time for its time and still and a great alive community.
Ragnar # Esports Indungi;-;The best
tn5421;-;Can be run on even the lowest systems. Come play today!
Thirt13n || >.< ||;-;Great Game !
advasdnafbbdfaadfyrt;-;Nice game :)
Dewski;-;I really recommend this for people who want to play an old school, simple shooter. A lot of user created modes automaticly downloading in server joining. Really fun even though its old.
Cry;-;I love this game
--|B-TEAM|-- SPiNX;-;Best game known to man-kind. No enhanced engine captures the reality of this original. 1.5 was even better. Per. Head-shot boxes have NEVER been the same and since VAC I miss seeing the cheaters getting caught Red-Handed and added to the International blacklist. I still keep a black book of every IP at the scene of any crimes. If you want to experience the original AWP trying playing OP4. Shoot opponent in the hand or foot and they are toast! If you are still mad that 'they' Cliff and whoever took the silencer off the Colt I got the SOB back. Visit ANTPLA.NET to get skin pack II. Original was from ~01 and is still downloadable as General Sphinx Brothers of Steel BOS skin pack. I was there playing UK's Ganstawars Last Man Standing Gameplay type messing with the bots skins trying to get CS skins on Gangstawar bots and enjoyed how one of them was invisible. Sort of like a prank. If you can tommygun invisible opponent you are like a Luke Skywalker bad a$$. Skin pack II has the 'Starwars' lightsaber replacement for knife and the AK to plasma rifle from 1980's movie 'Alien'. The skins out compete CSGO any day of the week with 400fps instead of stuck on 30 same kernel. I got a duo-core up to 1200fps. Well I should not have shared the knowlege with other gamers on the map because next thing you know everybody was doing it on their own character. [AU] DeathWish settled it when it got to CS with rainbow coloured animated reskins instead of them being invisible. My first game was CS Canyon_Siege and I was wondering why we all were moving around as ghost spectators. I am not the Prodigy Inc SPHINX. I have only made auto-admin called 3 forms of punishment. It was for Admin Mod then re-written for AMX. Lost. No need for it anymore anyway. People still found a way to hack with it and fly around the maps prior to hook and vote for matrix, etc. Give them enough rope and instead of being slapped, killed, kicked, ban was in effect for short period. Essentially you mixed 2 words with lag and server and other various buZz words like gay server all these got punishments set fourth. Talking crap about admin was a slaying. Lag was a slap. It was based off Trinity and the server was the spirit. If trash talk is about the 'spirit', that is not forgivable or rather as tolerated and the ban was automatically set. That resolved major breach of security. Suddenly there is no need to have tons of admins. Most of whom were there just to exploit code often unintentionally, due to buggy 3rd party plug-ins such as STATSME.
- G R A C E ^ #StillMighty;-;phenomenal :)
gvmsky;-;This game have a nice place in my heart, 10/10 <3
Z|R CuDi;-;Always a classic. Though I miss the old days of CS, it will always remain a good memory for me.
snarkel;-;You better have a really beefy pc to run this game
Zole;-;This is my favourite game :)
DMT.;-;is of better games out there
p.i.r.i;-;Great game, still many people play it and is very good. 8.5/10
Tiago Arajo;-;A classic, totally recommend it to everyone who loves fps, multiplayer and have fun with other people
Shrekt;-;Absolutely, this is the classic shooter game everyone should try it .
Bowman's Guest2;-;Awesome game, have on multiple accounts
Nope;-;Great game
Hokage^;-;Best FPS game of all time...
VLK;-;Very fun game to play with friends!
fallen;-;the best game in the world, a child
adz #;-;Yeah, it's perfect game. Old school. This game didn't have life term.
Psychical;-;Best of Counter Strike!
l;-;cs 1,6 is not dead! revive the tournaments or riot!
stepperman;-;This game is old as , but it's better than cs:s but csgo.
life_is_fuckin'_me;-;most awesome game ever. i play it since betas in 1999. keep on rockin'!
paul.iskandar;-;a very nice game
Ola;-;Play It :)
Suck.it.Bitch!!!;-;Best game forever in world!
Mirva;-;cs 1.6 back geek time! :)
^j$^;-;best game in history of fps
CArry;-;Dis Is the good game all need buy dis game
Amochy {What Next?};-;best game ever <3 play it 5 years :)
LiP^-;-;one of the best games i have ever played!
***** AJAX *****;-;Great fps for someone who is just looking for some fighting action. graphics are still great for such an old game and servers still get filled!
razer Serbia power;-;Good game.Classic's !
HARDSTYLE;-;It was the best game ever made before valve  it up!!!And yes i still hardly recommend this hardcore shooter!
gauqmda;-;PLEASE HELP ME I FAILED WHEN I WAS MAKING MY GRAPHICS IN MY COUNTER STRIKE 1.6 I CANY SEE ANYTHING AND I CANT MAKE IT RIGHT I REINSTALLED IT AGAIN BUT IT DIDINT WORK SO PLEASE GOVE ME CHOISE I HAD SUCH FAIL AT PAST AND WHEN I CHANGED WINDOOWS AFTERWARDS THERE WASNT SUCH PROBLEM SO PLEASE GIVE ME CHOISE ABOUT IT :)
tik293;-;nice fun game, very hard though,
Battle@DiamondGardens;-;Very Fun , fast-paced, first person shooter game. Very fun for new players and veterans alike. Lots of weapons to choose from . Great maps , lots of good servers , lots of regulars . All-around great game. 5 stars
[DFS] Crazy Joker;-;FIRE IN THE HOLE. i hear that so many times. 10/10 The game that revolutionized Multiplayer First Person Shooters.
hn2 AFK @ 1 month;-;CS 1.6 is dead.
dat$tar;-;best of the best )))))))))))))))))
spid3r1987;-;loved this game for years!!!
KOFMANN`!;-;Cool game
SpL;aXS In a relationship;-;BesT game ever :D <3 cs4ever ^_^
Satana - [1337];-;Recomand tuturor !! <3
m i k o  a j;-;Old is Gold!
m1chA.;-;good game ,but cheaters.. :/
SDTH.eL Clon;-;Counter-Strike is a first-person shooter in which players join either the terrorist team, the counter-terrorist team, or become spectators. Each team attempts to complete their mission objective and/or eliminate the opposing team. Each round starts with the two teams spawning simultaneously. The objectives vary depending on the type of map, and these are the most usual ones: Bomb Maps: The terrorists must carry a bomb, plant it on one of the designated spots and protect it from being disarmed by the counter-terrorists before it explodes to win. The counter-terrorists win if the time runs out with no conclusion. Hostage Maps: The counter-terrorists must rescue a group of hostages held by the terrorists to win. The terrorists win if the time runs out with no conclusion. VIP Maps: One of the counter-terrorists is chosen to act as a VIP and the team must escort this player to a designated spot on the map to win the game. The terrorists win if the VIP is killed or if the time runs out with no conclusion.
len;-;By far the best FPS game ever!
Kejriwal;-;Best game in the world \m/
DAS.neighbs;-;If you didn't play this but play CS:GO, you probably like to pretend you did.
nycukiss \()/;-;it is still a nice game to play:D
Tealy;-;Best way to get a nostalgia boner, must buy.
Zoom JKKEEEE;-;The best game  !
FoxNull;-;This is the game that started a genre, every shooter since CS has copied its competitive team-based style of play. Its the original to a legacy, and many people still play it to this day. It has older graphics for people who might not have an expensive computer, plenty of dedicated servers, and the core gameplay that is known worldwide is right here where it belongs. But obviously you know this already unless you've been spending your life playing on Xbox and playstation. Right?
NuTz00000r - Building pc;-;YES, long live counter strike 1.6 - the best game ever.
AttiTuDe-NooB;-;best multiplay shooting game.
N3verM!nD ^_^;-;awesome game truly an nyc game with tactics, guns, different maps, etc
YOUNG GUN;-;If u dowload this game u will never see the sun!
Kabal 4 MESSI;-;The best Game
ellement. -A- #4M4DZ~;-;My Fave And Ostly Played Game by Me <3
-W    o M^^;-;Omg I Love This Game <3
MarcosFelipe94;-;Top old times game. So... what are you waiting for? just buy it damm
AttackeR;-;fun and action
Is Pepsi okay?;-;Better than CSGO.
KrekdaN L.;-;amazing oldschool game
furY ~ValAr MogHUliS~;-;UNDOUBTEDLY MY ALL TYM FAVOURITE...:D
+fRaGger;-;Counter Strike is the most popular fps game we played in windows pc.
Memory;-;Best of the best ;)
^nS;-;All good old Counter-Strike. Still better than beta CS1.0, 1.1 and 1.5 with a few new standards and fixes, but now is a new age with a CS:GO, cuz CS 2.0 we won't see soon enough. :)
i.w7913;-;so beast
InfinityAmmo [Tal];-;the best game ever!
Alogzi;-;The legend. <3
Toxic;-;10/10 The start of the greatest FPS Shooter ever
Pasha;-;My first FPS game onlinr, awesome experience,best maps, overall really loved it
REI;-;I have played this game for 10 years now since I was 6. It was not on my Steam until last year due to using nonsteam version which I regret. But hey I was little. I still play it even though I moved on to G.O this game is still fun to play with friends or in mixes/pugs. I believe this game was and is one of the best FPS games out there and there is no reason for you not to buy it. Enjoy.
allen;-;Great game, best FPS of all time.
Microsoft PowerPoint;-;I've played over 2.000 hours of this game and I really gotta say I love it. Counter-Strike has always been one of my favorite games to play, and the only thing is that the graphics are outdated, but that comes with playing an old game. Competitive playing is the best here. You really get to build up some teamwork and make some strategies to win games. I can totally recommend it 9/10
Edgar "Guallitoxstyle" Estevez;-;the best game ever :$
baiLey;-;The best Multiplayer FPS of all time.
HeKo`;-;One of the best time wasting games! All about ping, FPS, and exp.. Especially here: Classic: 95.172.92.152:27015 Auto-Mix: 95.172.92.152:27016 Do we even have time for this s***?
tik293;-;nice fun game, very hard though,
life_is_fuckin'_me;-;most awesome game ever. i play it since betas in 1999. keep on rockin'!
paul.iskandar;-;a very nice game
a2z;-;Best game of all times
xavez;-;Classic that will never die! Evergreen!
Kamatoz;-;game cool
mucuS^ GotMyGo;-;nah u can rate this...surely cant...just awesome...the pioneer of fps gaming and still has its hold ..simply awesome 10/10
Dosher;-;This game has shields O.O
paprcutz;-;Not the first fps i played, but one of the big ones. Anyone new to CS can go and play the orginal and see how much its changed. Don't forget to crouch when shooting on this one.
Fpole;-;Good game but dont play to much like 34k h
[Youtuber]Frosty;-;BEST GAME EVER... WHO NEVER PLAYED COUNTER STRIKE BEFORE
Stef1xx;-;This game is Perfect !
The Troller;-;Such an addictive game! (y)
daho1;-;highly recommended
Mattress AKA Matias;-;i love cs 1.6 but in this one there is no bots
Puscas;-;I spent almost 3000 hours in this game. Yes, it's that good xD.
sAd. kAlic - cs.csromania.com;-;The best game ever !
Andrei # DEVA.LALEAGANE.RO;-;One of the best older Games. Thumbs up for Valve!!!
overwatched boys;-;That game is suck amazing. It's.. counter strike, thats all i gotta say :)
Hormon_A3;-;Most Legendary game :)
ONE TAP GOD;-;Epic and old-school shooter , the best in my opinion.
[a]teh /\/\4573R 69;-;My computer is real slow so this game is great for me. I'm recently no longer a n00b nor an ultra-blocking . I still suck tho. Gun Game or nothing!
[kxo] \_()_/;-;I've been playing this game for almost 9 years and i recommend this game to everyone. There is ALOT of differnt things you can do on this game. You can surf,climb,hide,dance or you can play regular for fun or even try to get extremely good at the game and their is tournaments you can join for huge prizes
ivanLOST;-;Old but gold.
Necromancer86SW;-;This game is fun. It have got bad graphic but that is ok . I recommend It.
rEngo /j/;-;Only Counter-Strike game that was ever good.
Bibas;-;Old but Gold
ReDZoONe;-;This game should be a legend :)
phx- acc for sale;-;remember ! if u shot to wall on de_nuke or whatever map, u will get double kill or annother lol kill on annother map xD fkin hilarious & bay for noaimed pro players, this can be callled start ramp to csgo. Coz u dont need aim there & csgo also.
twitch.tv/nTeln00b ^drunk;-;This game would be good if iI could ever figure out how to play it. I got pretty good with the shotgun though! LOL!!!! : ) :) :)
RAR;-;Call of Duty ripoff
St3am;-;spray .... run ..... duck .... jump ..... repeat ! its a classic ...never ending Game . Final Verdict : The best competitive FPS till date ... might not be fun for casual gamers .
Sonic Son'edit;-;Classic.
Taassima;-;I used to play this game with my friends when we had to do military service; it was a lot of fun pretending that we were fighting Russians while putting to use what we would learn during training. However, it seems that the only people who play now are Turkish children who hack and have bad ping so, I would not recommend this game any more.
Firesweep;-;Best game I ever played. Put so many hours in to this. The Clan games climbing the ranks. Ah the memories!
FrostFire626;-;In my opinion, CS is the single greatest first-person shooter ever created. Complex, addictive, challenging, intense, precise, and infinitely replayable, CS was the defining game for an entire generation of gamers. But be warned, this game is absolutely brutal if you are new to shooters.
BuZz :];-;Realy Nice Game :) <3 :D
escritor;-;Really really nice game to play with friends =)
Rasko, 3 FPS;-;So many girlfriends lost 'cause of this (back in the good old days...) + Everything on this game is abso-f*cking-lutely great - Well maybe a bunch of players behave like 8-years old spoiled kids sometimes...but killing them (in game, don't get me wrong) is the purest satisfaction
highborn419;-;Favorite game ever to chill out and veg on
-=]BG[=-^~Phil #callformix;-;No doubt this is one of the best cyber games.. Come what may this game will never die, let the developers make revisions or better versions.. CS 1.6 stays forever!
Butt-Locker.fTw^ #10 days;-;Best ever shooting game played in my life i <3 with this game.....
LuRK;-;works on macbook air like a charm
Auske;-;Riot shield
Demonaz;-;I recomanded this game for is nice.
PoLt3rg3!$T~>;-;true game...must play...
weEd;-;Addicted :| !
ibRUue;-;It may be old but it still fits the word AWESOME! It's not all about gaming, it's also about meeting new people. I've met new friends through this game and I hope the others too. Overall, it's still one of my favorite games!
Freyar;-;Counter-Strike is the mainstay of competitive shooters, with the kind of prestige the likes of Call of Duty strives so hard to achieve. A number of gameplay modes ranging from what used to be the highly popular VIP to the traditional hostage and bomb maps, to eventually leading directly to two now-released sequels and one upcoming release leaves plenty to keep one busy. "Remember your roots." With simple designs to keep things tight and easy to practice (yet nearly impossible to master), Counter-Strike proves that a good shooter can stay in the forefront for over a decade.
Echith;-;A fantastic game that improves your fluency in the foreign languages. Every server you visit has the charming alure of Mexicans and Brazillians; an honorable bunch of players who praise your skills with phrases such as "filho da !!!!!!", "xiter!!!" and "jajajajaja". They are also very skilled players ingame; I often see a single player moving at the speed of sound, headshotting everyone in a blink of an eye, and getting all the praise from his fellow brethren, usually in the form of "xiter fdp!!!". Overall, I recommend this game to all individuals seeking to have a fun, non-hacker, non-english gameplay experience.
mangayen';-;Better than Source or even Global Offensive. Traditional old game that comes from another awesome game, Half-Life. You can not end your gamer's life without playing CS.
alf;-;Best fps game :D
Shame;-;Still the best counter strike ever
Strikey;-;Ruined my life.
Ernest Wolf;-;This will be more of a ''my experience with this game'' type of review, because saying things like ''great gameplay'' will not suit something I've experienced with Counter-Strike. Here you go: I remember back in 2002 I was at a friend's house and he was playing a game. I didn't know the name of the game nor I had internet to find it. A few weeks passed by and another friend came over and he didn't have a computer, so he brought a disc with a game in it. He told me that it was one of the best games and from that very moment I knew that it is going to be the game I saw at the other friend's house. When I saw the Counter-Strike logo I was filled with gamegasm (?) and I was so happy. I don't remember a day when I was so happy like back then. So, the journey started. I was playing it hardcore. Made friends, clans, was involved in communities and even made two myself. Counter-Strike is my first game which I played competitively and it was a whole experience. Playing public servers and maybe some servers with mods was very fun, but playing it competitively made it very intense and stressful. In a pleasant way, ofcourse. Shooters these days try to be different, advanced in a way. Sometimes the most simple games like Counter-Strike are the ones that live to this day. Also, there are plenty of mods to keep your attention to this game. The gameplay is very simple - defend as a Counter-Terrorist, attack as a Terrorist to plant the bomb or save the hostages as a CT. I am sure most of you already know this and I doubt there are gamers that haven't heard or know the gameplay of Counter-Strike, so I am sharing here more of my experience. I wish I could find my CS Anthology account which I've lost since 2008. So, I decided I am going to buy this game again and here you go - more than a thousand hours played. I still play it from time to time to this day and it brings back many great memories and I sometimes even stumble upon people I've played with years ago. I think Counter-Strike changed gaming in a major way and we wouldn't have many games like we have today, if this game wouldn't exist. I am sure many of people already have played games like CS:GO, but never the roots. I doubt any of you will play it for more than an hour, because it's much more simple and it differs a lot in my opinion from CS:GO and modern games.
Brig;-;Every server is spanish or french. I can now fluently swear in both languages 9/10
Hedroks;-;Still better than Call of Duty: Ghosts...
Mr.Mimi | Trade Knife;-;I met a lot of people who slept with my mother. 10/10
Rezej;-;I never played a better first person shooter. Graphics doesn't matter for gamer, gameplay only.
Eno Etukeno;-;When you crouch, you lift your feet in the air and fall to the ground. 10/10
safeoff';-;WARNING : DO NOT buy this game, if you do, you'll never see the sunlight again !
ManaF;-;CS is one of the greatest and undermined games in history. It is, in my opinion, the best game to ever have a crosshair. It is not a contact sport, so for the girly girls, it is an activity to indulge in. It starts off with a team trying to kill another team. I started playing cs when I noticed jacking off isn't the only activity to do on a computer. I started inviting a lot of friends out and getting drinks, as well as a boom box, to spend a nice summer day in the living room playing this wonderful game. I wanted to play every chance that i could. On my road of cs adventures, I encountered a couple of problems; those being that nobody was as fervent as I was about playing, and that when we did play, nobody was good enough, so it wasn't a lot of fun. Then I discovered that I could sign up for a class with dboorn. I was overly excited, and signed up, but with skepticism at how the class was going to be. Sure enough, I was proven wrong. We started off by practicing a little bit. Then we split off into teams and started playing almost everyday of class. I made some friends, and played with people who had built up their skill gradually over the period of the course. When I play counterstrike, the whole world disappears. Only I, the mouse, and my teammates remain. We are united in a common goal. We strive collectively towards an end we all desire. Each player has a spot to hold. They stand ready and waiting, eager for their chance to aid the team in what they hope will be a forthcoming victory. Thus, CS celebrates the unity of man, the indomitable spirit in all of us that pushes us and drives us towards excellence. When I play CS, I play until my veins pump battery acid, and then I play some more. CS is unique among the games because it teaches all of us that no matter where we are in life, there is a role for us to play, and we can help our fellow man by fulfilling that role, and thereby our destiny. What destiny might you ask? I spoke before of unity. And it is that unity that brings us all together like one big loving family. That is the nature of counter-strike; the many working as one. One machine made of well oiled cogs and wheels, moving in unison, happy to play their part in the production of something greater than themselves. Not that these small metal objects are actually animate, I'm of course speaking only metaphorically. Over the course of the years, I have increased in skill, but I have learned a greater lesson than how to be a better cs player. I have learned how to cooperate with a team to accomplish a goal that we all share. Even if that team is less than ideal. I have realized that cs is about more than just one's athletic ability. Instead, there is a deeper meaning behind the colt, the AK, the AWP, the deagle, the sands under my feet (in d2 or inferno). And more importantly, the teammates at my side. I love them. It is the human element of cs that gives cs its greatness. In conclusion, I love cs. I love to win. I love pushing myself to my physical limits. It's that feeling that first drove me to the computer. For every second that I am not playing cs, there is only an unquenchable thirst to play. A thirst that grows as every minute passes by when I am outside, sitting at the television, or playing sports. I had an extraordinary time playing this game, and I will return to look at the future students of this game to see that bright eager look on their faces to remind me of how I used to feel. This review may be over, this game may be dead, but I will never stop playing couner-strike (1.6).
DESTRUKT;-;It's... aight.
doTA pLayer;-;Best online multiplayer game ever!!
[r4angan];-;this is a goooo0oooood game only expert man can plzy this
Berebel;-;Just a classic game
ksharp;-;all time best
phadsge;-;must-have-played-classic-genredefining-game
George46D;-;Yes , worth it !
v_1 /Meeuu xuxuzinhuu\*;-;The best game ever
mbouchar;-;The original FPS shooter game. You should also look into Counter-Strike: Source if you like a more modern version.
Kronig Penny;-;Must Buy, if u havent played CS, den u have played nothing (Y)
Guille;-;Although a bit old, this game requires a lot of skill and strategy. Once you learn how to play it you'll get to enjoy it.
ruh roh;-;I wish it was still as active as it was back 8 years ago. Guess we gotta focus on CS GO now, oh the good ole' times.
>Marki< ^_^ # FuN MoDe;-;Awesome Game Many Modes
TheReal$am$hady;-;The best FPS's of all time for its time and still and a great alive community.
iRaVeNxX;-;1.Open the game 2)Play every gamemode and remember childhood 3)Shift+Tab 4)Fap 5)Close
gfdgfgdgfdfdg;-;Oldschool CS. Use it mainly for HNS gaming at bollnasteam.se servers.
Ganja;-;Most wonderfull gameplay of all the multiplayer games .
Baldy;-;That`s game is fantastic :D
verdant- GG COMP;-;that is an awsome game, i have played it for five years and i enjoyed every moment!!! highly recommended.
Seekz;-;Probably my favorite to play . Yes we get lots of hacks but... its too much fun to play . CS ftw.
A$$-KicKeR;-;Best FPS game you'll find. It's a must buy. You learn new skills, step up your game, meet new friends and have fun.
Niggich;-;Nice game
sysKey;-;Timeless classic! Counter-strike(1.6)is one of the greatest esport fps games(if not the greatest) in the gaming history and is still worth buying today. Graphics doesnt matter for a good gamer, gameplay does...
ChinChin;-;Best childhood steam game, landed me a $1000 internet bill, mods up the  ing amazing.. still one of the best counterstikes had fights with family just to play! ing 10/10
D@rk;-;Just Shoot !
[A]'!m*f1s7^^^;-;Incredible Action/Shooting Game, buy now on steam With amazing HD Quality!
SLaYeR;-;Old but gold.
Paul H.;-;Great game
1mmor7aL|HDRemiX;-;Very nice game
^_$!D-THE-PHANTOM_^;-;Really Nice game! A must Buy! Its has to feature in your library surely!
hit man no mercy #sick :"C;-;This is an old game. but its good and have some multimod servers and its funny game and i also play it , any 1 rich in steam can buy this game soo easly because its cheap
mudface #lost skills;-;Its The best game i've ever played :P
[-SoL-]Noodle ();-;Third best CS.
William Bonner;-;This is an excellent and classic game, every FPS player should play this game.
Exteez;-;You can shoot through walls.
Streets;-;Over a decade and still has thousands playing it!
Mintuk'as;-;Good game,but need more updates !
Fliip;-;CS is a must have for every Steam player.
Chelios;-;Great game ;D
smOOth cr!minal -_^ #LFDW;-;Best of the CS series :D
mhhhhh DRAY -.-;-;It never gets old ;) one of the best games ever
D'Jok;-;Imi place Counter Strike
Kermint;-;Its an 15 years old game and sill one of my favorites! Highly recommended.
#GN4;-;Counter-strike(1.0 - 1.6 not source) is one of the greatest esport fps games(if not the greatest) in the gaming history and is still worth buying today. Graphics doesnt matter for a good gamer, gameplay does...:D
EZQUILO CSGORage.com;-;ITS COOL
ozo;-;Possibly the best ever, this is the first part of the world-known seriies: counter strike, graphics aside this game takes full consentration and skill to be good at, not the first time i've played this game, but i just got it for my account, brings back the memories, a must buy for every fps-fan
Rin;-;very popular shooting game online! i recommend thos who love to shoot :)
dbrookZ;-;classic game.
ENCORE;-;fast b
mt:S;-;igrica kida old school :D
Ragnar # Esports Indungi;-;The best
tn5421;-;Can be run on even the lowest systems. Come play today!
Thirt13n || >.< ||;-;Great Game !
Kasabiii #back;-;One of the best cs games ever !!!! cant get enough of it 1.6 ftw
(   );-;I grew up with this game,best children memories , new friend , adventures. This game will stay on my heart.
Dedication 2 Holy-D;-;Neverending story...
Kodiak;-;Not really know what to say...but still the best online FPS game :D
Pr3t$k4z1v4cH;-;The Best gaming of the world
Aneurysm;-;love this game
BENG4N;-;Classic game
Shadi  *Not Here Alot ^^;-;very nice game! if you wanna be good cs:go players you must start from this game!
PGB;-;Great game
listerite;-;Thank goodness this game came out before Steam did. The number of hours I spent playing this during high school would make me cringe. Great classic.
DoYouWannaBalloon;-;Nice game
Bitches be tripping!;-;Great old game!
ChainFire;-;its old but gold i still like it <3 long life cs 1.6
0linko;-;There wont be anything like 1.6
' Bijerun [kP] W;-;really good
[TnM] F0rest <3 Shakshi;-;Awsome :D
Teeto556;-;The bomb has been planted.
Heltihundre;-;Still a good game!
Mike;-;It'a awesome game <3
JaegerMeister;-;One of the best multiplayer-shooter ever! A real must have! Unforntunately 90% of players are cheating :(
p.i.r.i;-;Great game, still many people play it and is very good. 8.5/10
Tiago Arajo;-;A classic, totally recommend it to everyone who loves fps, multiplayer and have fun with other people
Shrekt;-;Absolutely, this is the classic shooter game everyone should try it .
Bowman's Guest2;-;Awesome game, have on multiple accounts
Nope;-;Great game
DemonAck;-;must-have if you're a FPS fan. This game has started it all.
Bitches be tripping!;-;Great old game!
ChainFire;-;its old but gold i still like it <3 long life cs 1.6
0linko;-;There wont be anything like 1.6
' Bijerun [kP] W;-;really good
[TnM] F0rest <3 Shakshi;-;Awsome :D
Hudson;-;A beacon of online gaming, that despite being a dated title, so many players come back to it because of the well defined game mechanic. There's no great depth of content, just a simple yet enjoyable platform for team deathmatch with map objectives thrown in. Years ago I spent atleast 1,000 enjoyable hours playing it.
HYA;-;Back to old fps game? yeah this is the best! Counter Strike is the best online fps game i think..
Seek;-;One of the addicted games.. like it :D
Monster LDR.Gaming;-;The Best Game <3 :$
tyiN*;-;Old but good! :))
SLaYeR;-;Old but gold.
Paul H.;-;Great game
Sexy;-;Awesome Game Lve It <3
eno;-;Counter Strike was the first FPS game i fell in love with. Game play is superb.
23Mike;-;Not Bad
A;-;Best first person shooter to ever surface on to a PC or console. Counter Strike 1.6 is an old game but still very popular amongst PC gamers everywhere in the world. There are many clans and communities that still support this game, so its not hard to find a group of friends that enjoy playing. You can find various moded servers that include Warcarft 3, Call Of Duty Moder Warfare 3, Zombies, American Football, Prop Hunt, Paint Ball and many more!
Chezzy;-;My name is Commander Shepard and this game that ruined my grades
kEks;-;ing nice shooter game.One of the first FPS games I tryed in my life.
-S[n]K.|-Risky.Ftw;-;Cs 1.6 Only FOr Gamerz
SuperLlama57;-;Really fun and cool you should buy it it's really fun
panicc;-;Yo best!
YoniielV'I- YgvR;-;I Love Cs 1.6 <3:D
Edit;-;good blase morocco
striv3#WeKilluDie;-;awesome (Y) .. its my life
Ettur #sNAP;-;Awesome oldschool game.
Coneeee98;-;It's that game for me and my nervs
Symb1;-;Still one of the best FPS games
1mmor7aL;-;Very nice game
^_$!D-THE-PHANTOM_^;-;Really Nice game! A must Buy! Its has to feature in your library surely!
Alive;-;This game is the most mythical fps I've played and it will remain the best. :)
Punisher;-;One of the best games, not to even mention first person shooter games, of all time. After 16 years or so since it's release it's still got an avid active following. Speaks volumes for it's addictiveness and replayability.
Arabian MGZ -SPT Back Online;-;good game mother er
JnaN;-;After all these years this shooter remains to be a classic that can't be ignored. This game was a major turning point in the history of FPS, and this game is what made online multiplayer competitive gaming so popular.
Iulian..(-_-);-;good action game :D
ROI;-;The best shooter,period.No game will ever come close to this one.Love it!
Saci^.-;-;thnx for this game i love it
FOR SALE;-;One of the best multiplayer game :)
m1chA.;-;good game ,but cheaters.. :/
InfinityAmmo [Tal];-;the best game ever!
|| ^_^ PrInCe ^_^ ||;-;It's Counter-Strike!! The best one!!
insomnia;-;best of the best <3
pafy-;-;IT'S NOT JUST A SIMPLE GAME! - This awesome game will NEVER DIE  - CS 1.6 FOREVER IN OUR HEARTS! - CS 1.6 PLEASE STAY ALIVE! PLAYERS UNITED!  sea of emotions.. Thx you, Counter-Strike 1.6. Forever in my heart!
Shaykelele;-;Legendary game.
Polar;-;FPS game.
Yeti;-;Awesome game, kept me addicted for nearly 10years
In2ition - I'M THE REAL MVP;-;Review mission :D
Med$ack  TY GABEN LOVE YA;-;its really awesome game with players
The_Y|J;-;very nice awesome will contribute this for ...
Muppetti.;-;Nice game.
zuma;-;This game never gets old. I have a lot of fun every time i play it.
stfuNerd;-;This is a light hearted multiplayer game born launched in 1997 and a best one. I love this game as its the best one senn yet ! :D
iPoded;-;Get in position and wait for my go !
JunkieC;-;Good one!
xX_Destroyer_Xx;-;GG - what can i say..
Smoke;-;A good way to pass the time!
PhenaX;-;The best shooting game you will play in your entire life.
#GN4;-;Counter-strike(1.0 - 1.6 not source) is one of the greatest esport fps games(if not the greatest) in the gaming history and is still worth buying today. Graphics doesnt matter for a good gamer, gameplay does...:D
Global NooB;-;i think its a best skill game ...
0;-;Great Game <3
herrokittay;-;great game. registry is awesome.
DirtyReplicant;-;Counter-Strike destroyed my life. I had been playing HL deathmatch, and was waiting for team fortress 2 (some of those early TF2 screens are still etched in my brain) I came across a new mod called Counter-Strike, it had just been released, Beta 1 there were only 3 maps I think and the player models were so similar that in the darkend corridors of Mansion you couldn't see who was what, so there was team killing galore, even a console command for extra money, but it was awesome, I'd never played anything like it. So I played it. ALLOT. I'd come in from college stick it on and play untill I was ready for bed, screw school work I had people to shoot in the face! Anyway I failed my A-levels and got stuck with crappy jobs, but looking back, it could possibly have been worth it, because damn I had fun! I don't know what its like nowadays, I did get fed up with the bunnyhopping AWP gits and from what I gather that is the way the game went, but this was it, where it started for me, and if you haven't played it once then you should just so you know where all your call of duty and all that balls came from.
mongoose;-;cool
HybridWarrior;-;1.6 is the best game of all time.
Batmon;-;One does not simply waste 600+ hours on this game.Be sure to Buy/Play it.Besides its classic game.
Andrei # DEVA.LALEAGANE.RO;-;One of the best older Games. Thumbs up for Valve!!!
overwatched boys;-;That game is suck amazing. It's.. counter strike, thats all i gotta say :)
Hormon_A3;-;Most Legendary game :)
GrinS;-;When it boils down to competitive long lasting First Person Shooters, Counterstrike 1.6 is king. The unique money system on a two team map design is what puts Counterstrike apart from other Run and Gun FPS's. Many custom maps and mods are available, while still boasting a steady player base even 15 years after release.
m3dIum;-;well spent money!!
gehrke`;-;Best competitive FPS ever. Still fun to play even now with multiple other versions of CS out.
ExAUsTer;-;my game is best
MacedonianBoy;-;I love this game xD
Atrio;-;I've played this game off and on for the last 15 years, and it is still easily one of my favorite games of all time.
kalanikov;-;I ran out of spawn in a map called de_dust 2 running for b bombsite and got awped in the head, 1337/10 would run again.
Tiberiu;-;Counter-Strike is a first-person shooter in which players join either the terrorist team, the counter-terrorist team, or become spectators. Each team attempts to complete their mission objective and/or eliminate the opposing team. Each round starts with the two teams spawning simultaneously.
DrBlue;-;BETTER THEN ALL !
not on my face;-;I spent 1200 hours on testing plugins I made. 10/10
Mr.Jihad;-;Recommended
-=Dollar Bill=-;-;I have owned Half-Life for well over 10 years now. While Half-Life itself was not very addicting, I did find Counter-Strike to be too addicting, I tried to go cold turkey.... turns out that I just couldn't quit. So here I am, once again, back on Steam in order to simply play my favorite game: Counter-Strike. Players on the servers tend to dislike de_dust map, I love it!
zalupadeda;-;Do you recommend this game? YESH !
f0RceS;-;Fun, Classic, Well Executed even though it's old! Definite Recommend!
FlAsh;-;most awesome game <3
Jamaican Lizard {26};-;Well i played my first game got in a lobby FULL of cheaters every single server a cheater. Other then CHEATERS its a Fine- !! game
PATRICKSTAR - YEP I'M BACK;-;Have been playing this game whole my life (since 2009), played many other games including CSGO and still playing most of the time and will play in future. BEST GAME EVERRR..
Nigga McNuggets;-;Highly Recommended
DJIHA DJIHA 4 NOGE JBM TE U DUPE;-;CUKAM
whateverhappensletithappen;-;was gut game
=K.F.G= |0St;-;Awesome game for years and years and still years to come.
eMaggY;-;Try it out, you wont regret ;)
GRiMZ*[ONE AND ONLY]*;-;This is one of those game that will never be bored ... :)
ESETENDO mi amore;-;Life is 1, but CS is 1.6!
7ashesha;-;A Very Nice Game 2 Play (Y)
corpius;-;Best classical first-person shooter game of all time.
shilom;-;Best shooter of all times!! Been playing it since v. 1.4
aDelSHO1337;-;Best game of all time ;)
dzo;-;Really addicting and old game. I have every recomendation for this
hiatus;-;very enjoyable if you: a) use the AWP b) are good at the game c) have x-ray vision otherwise...still fairly enjoyable if you don't mind dying all the time
Interlakenn;-;king of fps :D
Brea~_~;-;Is an Excelent Game Very addictive and entertaining!
vockie;-;Life is 1 but cs is 1.6 .....
Genral Maguire;-;still and will always be the best mst skilled fps game made
*EmPeRoR*;-;Best of ...
LU LU LU;-;The best game ever :x
Tubigmill;-;its a classic, simple is that. Highly recommened for people who like fps
SasukeDGl Music;-;Awesome game before the update, it will remain one of the best games i've played. All the memories i've had with this game won't leave me that's for sure.
WhiteRabbit;-;Probably my most favorite game ever. The original is still so amazing, great servers, mods and tons of activity still!
justqrp. #;-;Best game of world <3
*DmK.SanK;-;Fully Interesting game Every one must play
Svaba;-;The best game
Illusionist:Abhi;-;The best multiplayer game ever..xD
Neet Neet;-;It's counterstrike, what you think. 100% one of the best games ever!
=K.F.G= |0St;-;Awesome game for years and years and still years to come.
eMaggY;-;Try it out, you wont regret ;)
GRiMZ*[ONE AND ONLY]*;-;This is one of those game that will never be bored ... :)
Victorisnice;-;This game makes COD,CROSSFIRE,BATTLEFIELD,and Etc LOOK LIKE TRASH
TeaCheR // Luck NOT present;-;No recommendation required :D
sens;-;Epic game playing Like 7 years <3
Madu.;-;this game never die
KOH the GURU 5.0k;-;For lose time, it's a really nice and exciting game :D
Gordon Freeman;-;An amazing game with an abundance of hacks to choose from for those that want more from their games.
badboy;-;this game is one of the feverate game for ever
LU LU LU;-;The best game ever :x
Noisia;-;A must have for any PC gamer.
Na_sL___________Destruct;-;its an awesome game ever
ice # 5 days CD;-;this game is best of all
Nexo;-;Best FPS game evah 10/10 i recomand this game.
LiP^-;-;one of the best games i have ever played!
***** AJAX *****;-;Great fps for someone who is just looking for some fighting action. graphics are still great for such an old game and servers still get filled!
Stefcio;-;Old classic - if you starting with Counter-Strike adventure, start with 1.6 - it's a good start "From Zero to Hero!"
DRAGONHUNTERZ;-;Don't play this  game.
CLEVATON;-;the best game ever
versus [] WTS-KaraFade;-;Cradle of all FPS Multiplayer games for sure!!! played approximately 8 years, spent over 10 000 hours (non steam) during my lifetime, & worth every single minute of playgame !!!! Shame, nowadays there arent many good players, so kinda makes it boring !
Lst Hop;-;This game can show this think: a good game dont need good graphics
gorgehertz123;-;Great game.
withche07;-;Dat cyber-cafe memories.
corpius;-;Best classical first-person shooter game of all time.
shilom;-;Best shooter of all times!! Been playing it since v. 1.4
aDelSHO1337;-;Best game of all time ;)
Zw1d;-;It's not a game, it's part of our lives.
-+]Aib[-+ I^ d^rK;-;This Game is FOr Gamers who take this seriously. :D
Daddy O;-;This game is a classic and will never die in my mind. I have not purchased the new Global Offensive yet because I am still stuck reliving my glory days on this wonderfully made FPS. Happy hunting!
7z3p0sU --- mix?;-;It's a very good game
Aicho;-;A Great Game fps Which Puts You and your team try ati
F.ALONSO aKa babubandi;-;its an awesome game ! just love it !!!!! ing addictive :D :*
pollocreew;-;old school game )) i really used to liked it but now i prefer counter strike global offensive
gorgehertz123;-;Great game.
withche07;-;Dat cyber-cafe memories.
TNTC | SkuLL3N;-;BSTA SPELET <3
The Cilveks;-;Really Good Game!
29FAR*;-;the best of the best cs 1.6 <3
-FAK23-;-;Counter-Strike.. my favorite action game :D..
michalfogel;-;huehuehue 2006 all over again :D
Gregory;-;Why are you reading a Counter-Strike review? You should already own it. Just buy it. For yourself. Now. :)
LUq;-;You can do thingies and shoot heads!
. Cuddlebug;-;1.6 was a revolutionary shooter inspired by some of the greats like Team Fortress Classic. There's a reason why Counter Strike is practically a house-hold name now, and why it's one of the most popular multiplayer games. Because it's a powerhouse of effective design and balance.
Antonis;-;this game shows the graphics has not matter!!
Madaruxas;-;I like this game, because u can do everything in this game.
Fray;-;Old School :)
xDOC #nord.indungi.ro;-;Great Shooter
void *;-;Some games don't need reviews.... Beta 7: August 26, 2000 ... Version 1.6: September 9, 2003 ... 11 years later... 01/2014 - Concurrent Steam Users: current: 7,652,718 peak: 7,652,718 CS Steam only: 87,100 87,100 Counter-Strike: Global Offensive 32,601 32,724 Counter-Strike: Source 41,300 41,577 Counter-Strike
Alw;-;Counter-Strike modifies the multiplayer aspects of "Half-Life" to bring to it a more team-oriented gameplay . Counter-Strike provides the player with an experience that a trained counter-terrorist unit or terrorist unit experiences .
Smurf;-;This is what todays FPS games are based on, in one way or another. If the community was as big today as back in 2004 than this would no doubt be ahead of alot of other skill based (reaction times, sound direction skill) FPS games. I would certainly suggest this game above others. The only negative is ofc the age of this game. This game is about how good you are, not about how fancy it looks.
Gregory;-;Why are you reading a Counter-Strike review? You should already own it. Just buy it. For yourself. Now. :)
Sneezy Maticorn;-;$1000+ for my new comp and all i play is CS 1.6
[MechMod]MarkDevastation;-;if you want a first person shooter that takes skill. this is where major first person shooters started.
skyLxne;-;Would love to see how much time I spent on this game 5-8 years ago when I was a big player of 1.6 back in the day. Easily in my top 3 games of all-time! 10/10
YoLoChicken;-;This game is awesome
Watek;-;Simply best fps ever.
lJcRacK;-;Great Game one of the Best
Limp;-;The best for shooter lovers :)
Hong |oan | mcgRIP;-;Best game i've ever played. One of the original first person shooters that got me into computer games!
VIEWS FROM THE 6;-;Good luck getting a kill if you're a beginner. 10/10
Spec;-;Counter strike is the best shooting game ever made
Basanti;-;the best game ever made
Dont' Panic;-;Awsome game!!!
Lilith;-;The original Counter-Strike, is a game one cannot forget. Albeit having 3 successors, the gameplay of "the original" is incomparable. The title "Number 1 online action game" was truly deserved during its glory days. That said, the game is tactical, and the guns handle close to real-life counterparts. Either you plant a bomb, defuse a bomb, defend hostages or try rescuing them, there's also a few deathmatch maps, but the tactical/competitive gameplay is a lot better. If you find yourself struggling to get kills while revisiting one truly legendary game, try Condition Zero, as it's quite useful to understand the mechanics in the Counter-Strike franchise.
kagg0rn im t0desgang;-;best tactical multiplayer shooter ever
MMaR0N;-;Very nice game
M|rZ`;-;Great Game
|M4^A1|aki_don;-;This is one of the best acion games i have ever seen til date and is famous than any other game . You ll be a good gamer if get this one.
Deyan[t]orius;-;This is game only for top players "D
Mr. Reaper  /USE the FORCE/;-;Best multyplayer shooter
7omsi , exhausted man :(;-;The Best :D
SnowiDragon;-;Best game ever :O! Finished it in liek 5mins tho
Queen Seester;-;Forever will be epic. Still love playing this regardless of all the newer versions. <3 1.6
kiraaaa curry;-;its aight
K4RL05;-;Very nice game. Most addicted multiplayer game of all time!!
Hakrit;-;GUWNO BO NIE DA SIE CELOWA!!!!!1 A W SNAJPERCE NIE MA CELOWNIKA ENG ITS CREYP COS U CAN'T ADS!!!!!! AND THERS NO CROSSHAIR ON SNIPR RIFEL! 9/10
bb;-;Still the best.
Death Eater;-;game from my childhood
Jaguar;-;..... long time player. like it.,
Wolfgang;-;Well if you think  game, graphics,iy weapons,you are a very crazy person.This game yes its an  Game but its fun so no give any crap.Don't buy it on 9.99 dolars buy it on when sales like 2.49 and 4.99 dolars.Great game for relax.Recommending!
Nerv;-;A wonderful game, i am so glad i got to play it :X it chaged my life. OMG OMG
JH0N L;-;Best FPS of decade!
Official GABE NEWEL.;-;Awesome game :D, addictive:D
-=Ri[z]a=-;-;superb game love it <3
HI, im al. Al from work.;-;i remember this game
plank;-;I love counter-strike 1.6! I've been playing this game since I was 9! Amazing game! Its still fun
shuLace;-;simply.... perfect
eNOC;-;Best game in the world !!!!!!!
Sweepy;-;Literally the best game ever.
OhG DeMonDoS;-;Great game!
Joseph Joestar;-;KlubPenguin1234ABC: Put The awp down you nuuub u suck uninstall the game Trolliee341: I Can Keep this awp you 2 year old. KlubPenguin1234ABC: I WILL HACK YOUR WEBKINZ ACCOUNT!!!!!
pFx;-;Old but gold.
Star[k].wow;-;Counter strike game 1.6 is a great game played by the company when the valve had the idea of launching on Steam platform is one of my favorite games. Note: The game deserves note 10, the structure and gameplay. Features: A great game played in recent years by many players
LuRK;-;works on macbook air like a charm
Auske;-;Riot shield
Demonaz;-;I recomanded this game for is nice.
PoLt3rg3!$T~>;-;true game...must play...
weEd;-;Addicted :| !
[vLk]MzQq;-;It"s like a GOD!
MeL0N P0rTaL :D;-;One of the best online game ever! <3 1000000/10
El Diablo;-;They should make a Counter strike remake of deleyed scenes and the old school one .
Pr0f3$10n@|;-;The best Multiplayer shooter
Nexo;-;Best FPS game evah 10/10 i recomand this game.
Nomadic_Poet;-;Really, this game requires skill. Not for the casual gamer.
Tyrox;-;this a good game i like the maps and the community in the game
[MNI] AyaaN;-;A Must have if u like massive multiplayer
Diavolo;-;Best shooting game forever
xxcallumxx02;-;its a very good game andvery fun
irqizelele / VACation / RO;-;That game is perfect, graphics doesn't matter in this game. Gameplay is awsome.
~CyBoRg~;-;Best FPS game i've ever played. Highly addictive..
masta blasta;-;If you didn't play that game, you don't know what is true meaning of FPS.
Cip|;-;belea
tomasisz csg0.com;-;This game sooo awesome!!!!!
romaN_;-;Whether you are a hardcore PC gamer, or if you have just bought your first PC, Counter-strike 1.6 should be the first game you buy. Graphics don't matter, this game can produce hours uopn hours of entertainment. 10/10 Highly recommended.
whO_o;-;A great FPS game that doesn't need much requirements .
Berebel;-;Just a classic game
ksharp;-;all time best
phadsge;-;must-have-played-classic-genredefining-game
George46D;-;Yes , worth it !
Kenny.;-;Best competitive game !
?fALLEN;-;Classic First person Shooter. One of the best ever
Only Mag-7;-;Recomand..
Caacrinolas;-;BENDERTOONS MOVIE - SHOW IT !!!
Maskulin;-;Cool game make fun to play with friends you should try it !
jasterw0w;-;BEST CS!
Tyrion Lannister;-;What a nice game,real oldschool,beats newest games,these kills and stuff get's people crazy.Clan wars is just wonderful in here,but the game has few bugs,with which i am ok with.
BadtzMaru;-;One of my best game!
jasterw0w;-;BEST CS!
Tyrion Lannister;-;What a nice game,real oldschool,beats newest games,these kills and stuff get's people crazy.Clan wars is just wonderful in here,but the game has few bugs,with which i am ok with.
fR0ST;-;hope this game never dies :D CS FOREVER <3
Fire Cylon;-;Headshot
911;-;my first game
kEEN0Y -;-;Great game!
pr0nstar;-;buy this if you are a winner
Skylark;-;One of the best online games Since Last 13 years i guess or 10 I have been playing it for now for past 2 years continuously
U N I C O R N;-;This game is a HUGE reminder of why PC gaming is a beautiful thing.
Bohemio;-;Its a great game, best for good
Fazzie;-;If you liked one point six of Counter-Strike you might have enjoyed Coldplay. Also, you're a ing hipster who needs to get off the Gameboy and ing play a game that isn't older then my mother. BBQhtc - My mother is a saint...
Yo;-;the best one of them... still the best one simple and with the right people very fun as well
the matrix 2;-;Probably my favorite fps of all time, been playing since the m4 had a scope.
fragy^#maaariiii;-;best game ever with loads of competition
[vLk]MzQq;-;It"s like a GOD!
I M Unicorn;-;game is awesome :D i play this game 9 years but on steam is better :DDDD
Den;-;Good for its time, still popular nowadays.
Mobius One;-;This game is a prime example of how a great game tends to pass the test of time. Although the graphics are very outdated (graphics aren't everything), the gameplay is good enough that the game is consistently on player number charts even after 15 years the original mod was released. BE CAREFUL: There are a lot of FAKE servers out there. Be sure not to click on those.
RUSSIANS SUCKS';-;Old, , just how everyone likes it. It's perfect.
Mare.;-;The best game in the world. ~
83457LY/bloodyforze/;-;IF YA WANT TO BE KILL`D, come visit me.
jigsaw;-;just classic, forever!
WeeDy;-;A nice game...but the time says his words..:D
De4nd;-;Classic FPS
NcSnax{New acc: NcSnax2};-;First at 8 years, since in 2007, A friend comed at my house and installed me a cracked version of Counter - Strike 1.6 . Well I played it like one thousand hours , my friend moved in other country, and when I was playing someone destroyed my CS. I didn't know how to install it again, so i watched on youtube ,I reinstalled it again, That story with the destroy repeats like 2-3 times. I started to be an admin at 10 years, yes 10 years baby, I was doing requests to be an admin and i was telling them i was from 15 to 25 :D Well servers that i was an admin closed , get to the next one , when this closed , to the next one and like that. I always knew that servers close because there is a lot of money to pay to have one. At 12 years i discovered Steam. The first year I did't have any friend on steam because i Haved a  laptop and i was not able to play call of duty 1 on 30 fps. I continued to be an admin on servers. 1 year ago I discovered an server that I love, I have some great owners that are very nice, and some day the owners decided that the admins need to buy Counter-Strike 1.6 . I don't planned to buy Cs 1.6 on steam because i already have it cracked , but i loved the server so much that i buyed it on steam! I think that i have like 5000 hours of play with cracked CS's :) I totally recommend this game! 11/10 Love CS 1.6! <3
kodyd194;-;Counter-Strike but classic! I must Play for Counter-Strike fans!
wdr * T$G V.L;-;the best game of the world, forever in our heart <3
AyMeN;-;After 14 years of existence, this legendary game is still in the Steam top 10 most played multiplayers in the world. it's Probably the best FPS shooter ever made. cs 1.6 4ever
Lieutenant Dawson;-;Amazing game, I would highly recommend to curious CS:GO players.
PoX;-;Very n1ce game of many people
Reiva^[J];-;Everything at all !
n/a;-;Top
uvs_- GrenD3L;-;I'm playing it even after 15 years :))
Em!N3M_kaLG;-;old is gold...awesome game
LephatimadareshwaR;-;Awesome game. Best fps game ever... you are gonna need some serious skills for this game.
6matko;-;The best game there was and there will be! Great balance and impressive legendary games.
Gawlo21;-;Its still good game!
Shadowderpy;-;the father of the modern multiplayer fps , a great game
Meghalsz !;-;After all these, years, always.
LuckyFOX_BH;-;That's great game!
azazeL;-;This game is a classic. I lost many hours of sleep and spent a lot of time playing this game from the 1.1-1.6 clients of this game. 1.3 will ALWAYS Have a place as my favorite time i played the game. Still love to pub with friends.
Dreamer;-;The Beast Game !
L1oN | HoT;-;This Game I'm Playing Forever! :)
KalashNikoV^;-;get this cuntsss!!
-=]BG[=-^~ darksidE;-;a game which will never bore anyone.. i never tire of playing this game..been 8 years and still counting..life as a CS player rocks..
H46161;-;Classic! No more comment needed.
OrginaL;-;Counter-Strike... This game is the reason to why I got a Steam account in the first place. I got this game six years ago from a near friend of mine. Everytime I was at his place we used to play this together in turns; he played for a while, maybe 2-3 deaths then I played. We had such a great time. But... the problem was that outside his house we couldn't play the game together. At the time my dad didn't allow me to buy the game, so my friend ended up giving it to me as a christmas present. Since that day we played it all the time. One of our favorite servers was Eropid (HS Only). He (my friend) ended up beeing in 4-5 place for a while on the server. Overall, I've had a great time playing this game, and still enjoy playing it today. The game was the start to my FPS gaming interest and since then I've bought every CS released. I recommed this game to anyone who wants to start play FPS games; as it is a great starting game. I also recommend that you play it with your friends; that way you will get the most fun out of it! Thanks for reading, and enjoy! - nit
-=Lu^Na']['iX^=;-;Very addictive :)
Mr. ZuKKy-;-;Join Cs.ZaRuL.RO . 31/31
DEXTER MORGAN;-;Ruined my life. 10/10
star warsior;-;The best competitive multiplayer FPS experience for low end computers. Even an old laptop can run this probably. Bit of a learning curve with weapons. Condition Zero expansion has Half-Life style campaign though not as groundbreaking, but also additional mp maps and a singleplayer bot mode that is goal oriented and challenging.
pollocreew;-;old school game )) i really used to liked it but now i prefer counter strike global offensive
ivanLOST;-;Old but gold.
`G[]LDeNNN``fRaG^;-;Cool game and its awsm (Y)
masta blasta;-;If you didn't play that game, you don't know what is true meaning of FPS.
ryu;-;Pretty good. OLDSCHOOL
AIR | AmbiTie;-;Play with me
twitch.tv/str3su;-;best FPS Game ever created
Zw1d;-;It's not a game, it's part of our lives.
-+]Aib[-+ I^ d^rK;-;This Game is FOr Gamers who take this seriously. :D
Daddy O;-;This game is a classic and will never die in my mind. I have not purchased the new Global Offensive yet because I am still stuck reliving my glory days on this wonderfully made FPS. Happy hunting!
7z3p0sU --- mix?;-;It's a very good game
Aicho;-;A Great Game fps Which Puts You and your team try ati
F.ALONSO aKa babubandi;-;its an awesome game ! just love it !!!!! ing addictive :D :*
Krycha !;-;Counter-Strike? It's very nice game, but why u put that all updates ?!
Sgt_Scott;-;Best game ever... fact
TysoN;-;Nice Game. Love playing it <3
JeT;-;Try this game
-NerD. w0w~` .kTw~;-;Really nice game loved it 1.6 is 1.6 ;)
vazelinas;-;Real warrior game.
Deyan[t]orius;-;This is game only for top players "D
Mr. Reaper  /USE the FORCE/;-;Best multyplayer shooter
iRumy3;-;0.6 hrs lol
justqrp. #;-;Best game of world <3
g4rini10;-;Great game!
Dokyz ?nyan;-;Nice game
Tinska;-;Fun & good ol' CS. Not my personal favorite but still recommended.
tomasisz csg0.com;-;This game sooo awesome!!!!!
BadtzMaru;-;One of my best game!
Paki;-;Play this game
Takesi;-;this is perhaps the first game that I play on PC
n0+_+l1mit;-;Awesome game. First FPS I ever got good at and still to this day I can load it up and have fun playing this game. This game has a lot of history behind it and it probably the foundation for a lot of the new FPS most notably CoD(Call of Duty). Thanks to this game I learned how to play an FPS properly and will alway enjoy playing this game no matter how old it is!
Batmon;-;One does not simply waste 600+ hours on this game.Be sure to Buy/Play it.Besides its classic game.
Mantas;-;Old but gold :)
Silent Koala [MY];-;The real version of Counter-Strike classic..... played like crazy during my childhood.....
Junior s2 Camila;-;Of course I do. This is probably one of the best FPS games of all times.
KT;-;First Shoter game i ever played .. recommend it evrey time
Ghettosmurf;-;Its counter-strike...... if you play'd 1.6 back in the day you'll love it because its as close as u can get to an updated 1.6 NOTHING like source (thank god)
Standin.Ava`<Da Ferenze;-;Very great and addictable game n good for online gaming
salkfjashjakfvhjkldfhvkldfhvkjl;-;Best game in the whole history of online FPS games.
Nozzy #RoadToSilver;-;If you like good'ol fps games then this is for you real gamers don't need grapichs only gameplay
alion;-;The Best Game but the better CSGO :/ =D
Albert Heisenberg;-;That game is only the best.... I can't say anything more...
Kenny.;-;Best competitive game !
UltraPro;-;Awesome Life Time Game..
Lunesco;-;One of the best classic-FPS available. It is unique and makes so much fun. It is a quiet old game, but is recommended for every FPS lover and for everyone with "wooden" PC.
C1rulz;-;good game when want hev fun
JUPItER;-;IT'S A DRUG!
RyD;-;Started at the very beginning to play counter strike at 1.3 and since then it was my favorite online FPS game. Played it very long and have to say since than it was and still is perfect. Sad but its old, and lost its support. Still coming back to remember everything. But now spending time on CS:GO.. If you have an older machine i recommend it to play, cause there are still many servers, and game mods active!
Tiberius;-;Personal rating: "Excellent" = 5/5 PROS: + great gameplay + big active community + great choice of weapons + huge amount of mods + lots of community created maps, weapons, AI, soundtracks, etc. CONS: - older graphics - rare issues with graphic cards (especially for laptops) - has replacement in form of newer CS games Comment: What is there to introduce? This is a FPS game that most gamers know and the ones that don"t should. The laughable half an hour I have displayed here was just testing out the newly bought game. In reality I have played many many many hours with my friends. I played it in high school. I played it in college. I played it with friends after work. While the graphics may be old and this game replaced by its' younger sibblings it still holds out the test of time. While I am no longer able to get my friends together and play this , this game will always be a fond memory for me. And who knows maybe I will pick it up some day again. What I can do is recommend this game to anyone who has not played it or people who are thinking about pruchasing this digital copy. The basic concept of terrorists vs. counter-terrorists is really fun and with the modding community the amount of variation is almost limitless. So grab it if you can, it is very much worth it.
GodPhantom;-;Love The Game. The Server is not dead yet,yesterday I just played 1-2 hours. 10/10 R.I.P. CS Classic.
Kabal 4 MESSI;-;The best Game
ellement. -A- #4M4DZ~;-;My Fave And Ostly Played Game by Me <3
[G]host [R]econ;-;Omg I Love This Game <3
Harry The Vowelcat AEIOU AEIOU;-;graphics are amazing
LUq;-;You can do thingies and shoot heads!
Zoom JKKEEEE;-;The best game  !
blackgames.ro;-;God Games :D
Dehennemska sablja;-;What to say ? The game is amazing ! This game is my past ! :)
Tablis;-;What can I say? My teenage years were in a large part defined by this game (pity about those hundreds of hours disappearing from record). This game is the reason I made a Steam account to begin with. This game made me love online gaming (even if it's a tough, one-way love). One of the first breakout e-sports (alongside Starcraft) and a significant influence on the FPS genre. A piece of gaming history. Play it if only for that, and see for yourself.
Morpheos <Sweden>;-;to be honest, the only things that needs fix is the flash. I highly reccommend this game! THIS GAME IS AWESOME
gg;-;Just Awesome ^ every part of it + modes + every single map of guns, deathrun, knife, bhoping, climbing etc. 100 % Fun + Addiction xD Thumbs Up ^
xio;-;old school style XD
unknown';-;old azz game, but still the best!
VIASZGYEREK`;-;A classic in the genre. Still a lot of players playing it. Not the best looking multiplayer FPS out there, but very fun to play.
ralziLmuSh;-;Best game of my life
KaHoSc;-;1.6 is just the game that started it all. No words cant descripe this game.
GGWP!.nfgrawker;-;Best shooter of all time. Revolutionary.
Nerhpe;-;I think pie is good I think.... you can't sue in case this is wrong... :D This is a good game...
Hidan.;-;It's like the most played game ever in the history of fps games.
mrwriter;-;Everything from here onwards was downhill, but CS GO was like a ing cliff. It'll never get better than this. Best FSP game ever made.
skizzi - Iarba e buna de fumat !;-;Best of the best game
Postal Dude;-;brb gonna learn russian
BRT SANTA CRUZ EXPRESSO;-;best joguinho since 1857, bj
FsT kt;-;One love from 2003 - Nowadays!
JUST HIT IT.;-;Best oldschool game ever, and still playable... but only one think is frustrating me is cheaters...
DEEJAY  GD'lDskooL|N;-;Best Fps Game on steam the game is old but still classic 999/100
Sid ~ Roy;-;Best FPS Game ever. played it for 13 years & still playing it, this game is just epic.
No Spanky 4 Me;-;Went on a server and I was Overwhelmed by Brazilian Piraters. Makes me think why I bought it. 10/10 move to Brazil to pirate the game.
Gorebelly;-;This is the most legendary game ever, I have played this for many many years. I wish I had my old account with all the hours I put in this game when I was younger. GL HF (> ' - ' )> BOOM HEADSHOT!!!!
Faker;-;Nice game!
sawlyte;-;Counter strike 1.6 took my heart for ever.
PikaPika MotherFucker;-;Very good game :)
hailstorm536;-;My favorite video game of all time!!! This online FPS is by far one of the best in its era! I would not choose otherwise! I highly recommend this game to anyone who is looking for a classic FPS! You will not be disappointed!!! : D ,kyleisdeadly
CC_Brutality;-;Golden old-timer. Still a great game to play
Battle@EmeraldGardens;-;Greatest game ever made. Fast paced action . Choose between counter-terrorists and terrorists. Plenty of guns and maps.
MoralensRiddare;-;verry good game. I recommend it to others.
Mike;-;Classic gun fight game
#k;-;Ruined my life. 10/10
Sotoskont;-;This game is; 10% Luck 20% Skill 15% Concentrated power of the will 5% Pleasure 50% Pain AND 100% REASON TO PURCHASE THE GAME.
Jestem Gejem;-;cs 1.6 is love, cs 1.6 is life
24H BAN;-;OLD and GOOOD
wut?;-;It's alright :P First C.S experience was with CS 1.1 and a keygen And it's not like anyone's gonna read this im just doing this for a "badge" lol
Daredevil;-;always cs 4 the best :3
boonzywoozy;-;Cool igrica
ANSKIS;-;The best all times game.
$$Busta Killa Easy Money$$;-;Super legit game, bring 1.6 back,  the rest!
saK [H];-;Ruined my life. IMHO best online FPS shooter game ever made. 10/10 would start playing again.
SKORG;-;You have been banned from this server.... 10/10 would get banned again XD
Juicy Olive;-;Of course I recommend it. It's freaking Counter-Strike. What's not to love? This is the game that started it all. :D
ninjaluuu;-;I can't stop playing CS 1.6.This is the game of our childhood , a game which would never die even there is CS:GO !
tu madre;-;Full of haxors x]
BestRanger;-;Old School classic
mike;-;no awp nerfs 11/10 would play this again
Imad;-;This Game Its The Best :)
Victor;-;Counter-Strike has changed a lot from 2000 to (present-day) 2015. Even with the release of CS:GO, Counter-Strike 1.6 still remains a favorite for me. There are still many dedicated servers with ten or more people in them. The graphics are outdated of course, especially in maps like nuke, but they still look decent on a few maps . This game is the beggining of one of the game series out there. I would give this game 8/10 and would reccomend this to any retro-style gamer! ;)
-=]BG[=-^~PrIcE^FFFFFFFFFFFFF;-;AWSOME GAME LOVED IT N WILL ALWAYS
Legend #RozForEver.com;-;best servers on www.rozforever.com 193.192.59.74:27043 193.192.59.74:27044 193.192.59.74:27015 193.192.59.74:27016 193.192.59.74:20510 193.192.59.74:20520 193.192.59.74:20530 193.192.59.74:20540 :)
Arminush;-;Old game, new players. Enjoy all the time!
hAnnah f.;-;The best FPS I've ever played...
ralziLmuSh;-;Best game of my life
KaHoSc;-;1.6 is just the game that started it all. No words cant descripe this game.
BrainFrost;-;When-ever I want to have a break off counter strike : Global offensive, I play this game! ^_^
n1g8m4r3;-;hey guyz miss me??? i m your nightmare
inDe_eD;-;CS 1,6. Great game.
TseRoF;-;Cool
Smugleaf;-;''Fire in the hole!'' (Bring back sprays)
-=[[D3@DP00L]]=-;-;i like this game! playing since i was 8! played a lot... fine graphics and other stuff.. no.1 game in fps world!!
ManOfMystery;-;Still better than GTAV.
eXact;-;Classic FPS! A must-have for every FPS player to explore the roots of FPS-Gaming!
Chu:lo;-;This is a certified hood classic!
Sotoskont;-;This game is; 10% Luck 20% Skill 15% Concentrated power of the will 5% Pleasure 50% Pain AND 100% REASON TO PURCHASE THE GAME.
Jestem Gejem;-;cs 1.6 is love, cs 1.6 is life
sfNNN///M Power;-;The best game!
[R]MeskY;-;You have it already.
SnAkS * Kinguin;-;GG for this game ..
Kada (LRRP.);-;wow.. it's amazing.. i quit this game year a go.. but now im again addicted o that!!
celmaitarero;-;easy game for relaxation
Bromwich ^.^;-;counter strike    first person shooter game(fps)   mods : Public , DeathRun , JailBreak , Furien , Zombie , HideN'Seek , HideN'Seek Blocks.        .     .     steam      server Gather         Non steam      48.     gather(Servers GRNet)   '   mIRC. All rights reserved.
BlazzEE';-;The Best Game
Tanoshi Shinto;-;this is a fun but old game will still make you amd like any other fps (this is alt account so i know what im saying)
Hrosik;-;This game will be forever in my heart as the best first-person shooter of all time.
Lazerc0bra;-;This game... Is great. No, seriously, this is an awesome game. However, It isn't quie worth 10 bucks, maybe 7.50, so either wait for a sale, or buy a retail copy and use the CD Key. PROS: -Extremely fun -Balanced weapons (Except for the AWP) -Lots of servers & players -It's classic -It's not that big, it's only about 400 MB. CONS: -Learning curve is a cliff. That's on fire. -Not the best graphics (Can be fixed with a texture pack) -No bots Overall, I give this game an 8/10. Now buy it, NOW!
<Bl^ck H^wk 07>;-;The best game ever!!! :)
Rand0m;-;One of the best games ever made ;) Definitely in FPS' Hall of Fame.
SHb;-;Best game in my opinon. I played a lot Counter-Strike , steam and non steam. I will play a lot of Counter-Strike in the future. I recommend the game but who doesn't know Counter-Strike right?
(*:*);-;Nice game!
Trench;-;Good game, strat and inv skills is a must to dev in game.
luosrevo;-;Was the best game ever:)
HeAd HuNt3R;-;Simply Awsome ;)
Roby. /A/;-;The best game 4ever
b0n34ka  ----;-;dymau vse znaut ny razve 4to-to ly4we est` 4em counter strike 1.6
GolDen;-;so old, but gold.
Dl.Inginer;-;The best shooter game ever !
GGWP!.nfgrawker;-;Best shooter of all time. Revolutionary.
Nerhpe;-;I think pie is good I think.... you can't sue in case this is wrong... :D This is a good game...
Hidan.;-;It's like the most played game ever in the history of fps games.
mrwriter;-;Everything from here onwards was downhill, but CS GO was like a ing cliff. It'll never get better than this. Best FSP game ever made.
Hrosik;-;This game will be forever in my heart as the best first-person shooter of all time.
Lazerc0bra;-;This game... Is great. No, seriously, this is an awesome game. However, It isn't quie worth 10 bucks, maybe 7.50, so either wait for a sale, or buy a retail copy and use the CD Key. PROS: -Extremely fun -Balanced weapons (Except for the AWP) -Lots of servers & players -It's classic -It's not that big, it's only about 400 MB. CONS: -Learning curve is a cliff. That's on fire. -Not the best graphics (Can be fixed with a texture pack) -No bots Overall, I give this game an 8/10. Now buy it, NOW!
<Bl^ck H^wk 07>;-;The best game ever!!! :)
Us One / #UP_Bruh!'.Z *wQw;-;I's Good Game World
juci;-;I like the recoil on all the cs 1.6 wapons. Specually on the dgl and the ak. Move this recoil to csgo :)
br0k3[N];-;The best game of all time
BicepZzz;-;this is old school game very popular in the world and I love this game ! Unreal epic battles and mm , good weapon and a lot of fun in this game ! Buy it and live more funny
Maxiibon;-;Just coz its old doesn't mean its good. Pros Skillfull Addictive Good maps Easy to learn Cons Need more players Losing players Hard on noobies You know what they say a game that looks good is impressive for a few months.... but a game that plays well is impressive forever. 10/10
Left Frog;-;Using an AWP is cheaper than ing my mother and no one wants to see either. Go play CoD.
Ezerious. =];-;Legendary game! :)
Alexonthejob;-;Old but Gold
Hippeo;-;My first contact with this was long time ago.... so fun !!!!!
Rand0m;-;One of the best games ever made ;) Definitely in FPS' Hall of Fame.
w3eD_anD_cRacK ->WeeD.Devilx.Ro;-;The best game ever made
[COOL]SausinsFmLv;-;+ Competetive. Easy to play. Can Include AI for training. Tons of servers/server plugins/custom maps/even custom guns. Fun to play, always. - Little repeating. In overall, I recommend it to everyone, please do not judge this game for graphics and/or lack of military actions, GoldSrc engine is not Real Virtuality 3 ( Arma 2 engine ), and this game is old school, typical classic so graphics are what they are.
Invincible?;-;The best game
k$;-;Best Old-School Fps Shooter~
mAGNUSwAKER;-;Counter Strike is a game that will be in the gaming history books for centuries to come. It IS VALVe's turn in the competitive scene and this is their weapon. Counter-Strike. Stupendous game which has proven to many gamers that gameplay, strategy and quick thinking comes first and graphics second. Unique because of the ability to completely control the recoil of your weapon. Astounding as pretty much all the maps are beautifully designed, even now I appreciate the creativity, the player and modding bases allowing for some of the best content by the people, you to create. The gun mechanics are by far the best seen in any game I have ever played. The way the guns fire and flow syngerize and play so well, it's almost mad why they never copied this to CSS and CSGO. Planning rather than rushing is another reason. You never know what terrors come across. Counter Strike is no longer updated but however is still alive and played by most of Europe, where small teams and clans are still existing to this day. Veterans also still play this game (I don't play comp on this but I have met and played with players totalling 3000 hours on it, which is insane, inspiring and completely awesome!) the game itself, is in no way glitchy or bugged and is in fact, for a better word for it, near-perfection. VALVe will be remembered in the glory that is Counter Strike.
n0talaMa.;-;Recomand!
Trench;-;Good game, strat and inv skills is a must to dev in game.
luosrevo;-;Was the best game ever:)
HeAd HuNt3R;-;Simply Awsome ;)
Roby. /A/;-;The best game 4ever
Ezerious. =];-;Legendary game! :)
Sinny;-;Almost 15 years old, 11th most played Steam game in 2015. Should already tell something.
wasted;-;You've never played Counter-Strike, you don't deserve your computer.
DimmmmmmmeX;-;The best game ever with the best gameplay.. :))))
ninos10;-;You are a pro gamer? Want to play against other pro players? This is for you!!!!!!!!!!!!! This game deserve a golden medal!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! Masterpiece!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! 10 out of 10 !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
BlazzEE';-;The Best Game
MbraY;-;After all this years playing on NS i finally bought it ! Good game worth the money. Totally recommended !
kev1n[A];-;Best Shooter ever. Buy it or regret it.
DahoooT;-;What can I say? It's just the best game I've ever played, and it's my favourite game. So simple, and loads of fun, many mods, exciting, entertaining, utterly exciting and "addictive", and there's always new maps. There's many new games with better graphics, but Counter-strike is the best, and will still the best first-person shooter ever. Oh, and I knew Steam by this game. +10/10
AnIs JaCoBuS x);-;old but legendary
Libuska [RO];-;This game remembers me my childhood :) Best fps ever :)
leadz;-;I was sitting in CT Spawn in de_dust2 after I found my entire team afk sitting right next to me. I decided to sneak up on cat when I heard "Bomb has been planted" by the terrorist opposition. I proceeded to act like a Slick Ninja by avoiding all terrorists. Only to find out most of them went to look for our team and killed them in ct spawn. I went around on Cat Walk, Threw a smoke, and went to cut the wire of the bomb the Terrorists had planted. I almost cut the Blue wire, and it could have cost us the round. 5 Seconds goes by, and it says, "Counter Terrorist wins". At that very moment, I just realized I had won the game. That is my story. Counter-Strike = Thumbs up!
Maxiibon;-;Just coz its old doesn't mean its good. Pros Skillfull Addictive Good maps Easy to learn Cons Need more players Losing players Hard on noobies You know what they say a game that looks good is impressive for a few months.... but a game that plays well is impressive forever. 10/10
WEKONE;-;Very good game, oldschool !
$WAG;-;Its my life
tr1p;-;14+ years and still the best FPS game ever made.
aLone.;-;It's old, but still verry popular.
~SoS~Fallen Legend;-;This Game would be the best game you will ever play and enjoy playing it 10/10
ACC FOR SALE!;-;I really like this game.It's old but so good!
pikachu;-;Cool Game
$kuLp;-;this game is fab.............. i lyk 2 play this game very much n for whole day i engaged in this game just b'coz from the enjoyment what u will got after playing this.... :)
Battle@DiamondGardens;-;Very Fun , fast-paced, first person shooter game. Very fun for new players and veterans alike. Lots of weapons to choose from . Great maps , lots of good servers , lots of regulars . All-around great game. 5 stars
[DFS] Hydro-V9;-;FIRE IN THE HOLE. i hear that so many times. 10/10 The game that revolutionized Multiplayer First Person Shooters.
A.Con^;-;I think we need more maps..
AVALS***KAMENSK***;-;best of the best online shooter!
Alogzi;-;The legend. <3
Toxic;-;10/10 The start of the greatest FPS Shooter ever
Telis Jok;-;I spent many hours playing this epic game and i won't ever regret it.
2014;-;If you like shooting the bad guys then this is one of the games for you. When Counter-Strike was originally released in 2000, I didn't play it because I was like 1 year old. I play it now because of the fast/slow paced actions and the guns. There are a bunch of guns in Counter-Strike that you can use. There are little guns that are cheap, and big guns that are expensive. But here lies the problem with Counter-Strike... people don't even use all of the guns! Whenever I find onto a server, all of the players are only using the black gun, the brown gun, the silver gun, and the green gun. Even though there is a bunch of weapons, they aren't really all used much of the time. In the end, I play Counter-Strike because my computer is afraid of Counter-Strike: Source.
xqR;-;old and legend egoshooter
llz;-;Old game, but realy fun to play with friend. :D
dfdfh;-;This Game Tells Us that Graphics does'nt Matter
Supershikarny;-;play hard go pro!
Tollefsen;-;Its Counter-Strike, why wouldn't you buy it?
bulkmeister;-;Classic and yet still the one of the most entertaining FPS-style shooters that has ever set foot on earth. Gameplay mechanics are fun and yet challenging. Game provides many different gamemodes from regular deathmatch-bomb plant mission to platformer style of gamemodes. Overall an awesome game and I recommend it to anyone who has any cs experience or has any interest in FPS-shooters :)
Sharky laFKl #ilysm;-;Best game ever. The joy it gives when playing with friends is unbelievable .
dudiU;-;Go to your library ; right click in Counter Strike ; Properties - Launch options -nomsaa -nofbo
stibi;-;The one and only!
-BFG-;-;The best game for ever .My favorite FPS. Game made in 2000 r , great in 2015 . ( : I Love
autism | #S;-;This is a classic, online action shooter, one of the best out there. 10/10
(*:*);-;Nice game!
knd27;-;lol, it came with the bundle
Ainsley Harriot;-;A very fun, addictive, awesome game, and it's still have a lot of player about 14 years!!
Leppyface;-;Simply a classic. If you have missed it, you have missed one of the greatest FPS of all time.
Spider;-;Old But Gold :)
grizzly;-;cheaternoob
Sound#InVacation;-;Oh,I remember the good times when I played CS withouth even knowing what to do but still having fun. Now we got CS:GO and CS:S and CS isnt getting so much love. If i would play CS i would not play it alone,just with a friend. Anyways gets 9/10 for making my childhood beatiful <3
CM Punk;-;Best online shooter ever!
mz00rel;-;Long live cs 1.6
Sheepy;-;The legend of func_vehicle is eternal, all bless Nipper, mapper of ages.
good camel, m.A.A.d cloud;-;Recommended for no-lifers.
H!cH3m;-;Great Game =D
Dali Llama;-;This old beauty I still play today. History is in your hands. Thank you for this amazing compettitive FPS VALvE <3 Gabe Bless you all!
- KAZHIX -;-;Old but gold. Nice movement and no ranking system. What more do u need ?
zexCS;-;Best.FPS.Ever. You may have noticed I have very little hours, that is because, as a young duck, I used to play this game 24/7 at cybercafes vs randoms who played it, basically a LAN there, brings tears to my eyes the experiences I shared with this game and the people at that 1 cybercafe :_(.
autism | #S;-;This is a classic, online action shooter, one of the best out there. 10/10
h3LLm0sS;-;THIS IS MADNESS!
Chaychan Maythan;-;Classical... online gaming started with this game =)
llu;-;I just love to play CS 1.6.. one of my favorites...
cherry;-;its like csgo but it isnt  and you can get away with micspam and wallhacks and all kinds of goofy mods without valve forcing you to use viewmodels so you can see their fancy skins
Zenfucius;-;The one that started it all... best FPS game of its time!
T4p{O}ut____-*;-;NIce game
HorseMask :D;-;As someone who played almost 3900 hours on this ing game, my life is ruined! 10/10 would ruin it again over and over!
Ruggarell;-;Even after over 16 years on the video game market, Counter Strike claims thousands of followers. Guns feel just right Maps feel just right Graphics look just right and isn't outdated at all(Youngsters not accustomed to late 1990s PC graphics might disagree). You will play CS 1.6 FOREVER. I'll probably play CS 1.6 zombie mode until the I have arthritis.
duk;-;FFS DUDE WTF HOW CAN U NOT OWN THIS GAME U PIECE OF  , IF U DONT OWN THIS GAME THEN UR NOT A REAL GAME U  SO U BETTER BUY IT QUICK BEFORE PEOPLE START LAUGHING AT U , U ING  , AND IF U DONT HAVE MONEY FOR IT GO ROB A ING BANK
aproch;-;Classic game, classic design, one of the best action games of counter-strike series where not only individual skill matters but teamplay aswell.
Colt;-;One of the best game which has ever been in the gaming industry
REtry;-;top game
Steffe.;-;I don't own this game, but i still can comment. 10/10
Quycks;-;Incredible game!
Fhrer;-;What CS Has taught me over the years... French:          Spanish:         Russain:       and many... many more.
daPPy;-;One of the best FPS ever. :X
GROOTI;-;The best FPS game ever made!
Nabe the Newb;-;it's like CS:GO....but losing isn't even that bad in this one. which makes it better. no ranks which is also nice
Mellow_Online1;-;good game, addictive gameplay what else do you want
SKORPAS;-;Best game ever try it out!
Tanoshi Shinto;-;this is a fun but old game will still make you amd like any other fps (this is alt account so i know what im saying)
montje^_^;-;The classic father of the Counter-Strike series.
Mr. Steel Balls;-;I liked it. Really nice game to spend some time here
SAMESHIT;-;This Counter-Strike 1.6 is really nice game but however it's dead right now because Counter-Strike Global Offensive is out. This game might still play little kids and russians because its cheap and good. In my opinion this game was really good, but try it out yourself.
edm;-;best game in the world
Sluggo;-;hope you payed attention is spanish class face because english is no longer spoken here fun tho
hn2 AFK @ 1 month;-;CS 1.6 is dead.
^bg:;-;Play the world's number 1 online action game. Engage in an incredibly realistic brand of terrorist warfare in this wildly popular team-based game. Ally with teammates to complete strategic missions. Take out enemy sites. Rescue hostages. Your role affects your team's success. Your team's success affects your role.
unon;-;Nice game...
LolFrampton;-;I still think this is the best version of any of the Counter-Strikes out there, and it's been a decade since it came out. Yeah, it's lacking graphics compared to the newer ones running newer versions of the engine. So what? Just got back on it recently and I'm realizing how much I've missed it.
FragadeLphiA[st];-;Awesome game been playing for years
Ken Setsu;-;Ahhh! The original masterpiece
Blvck;-;Admin will ban players and support hackers. Best game I've ever played.
!~vAsIlLi zAyTsEv~!;-;Pillar of Online FPS gaming. This game will never die no matter how many new versions are launched :)
hack;-;Memory 1.6 :'( .
Pirate xAI;-;A great FPS game for people without a good PC configuration ;)
Poppz.;-;One of the best action games in the world :|
vedski ved iz vedske;-;It's ing Counter-Strike. What are you reading this for? BUY IT ALREADY.
mumu the devil;-;Great game better then cs go to late its dieng help the community of cs 1.6 grow up again
*HGT* Deus GR;-;The best FPS game! A must have for every FPS fan.
SadLyF :'(;-;its isnt enought that i am paying since when i was 3 yer old :D ? this game is my Love <3
No.#1;-;legendary :)
Poppz.;-;One of the best action games in the world :|
freeki;-;the legend
Smile;-;Play with me :)
!~vAsIlLi zAyTsEv~!;-;Pillar of Online FPS gaming. This game will never die no matter how many new versions are launched :)
unon;-;Nice game...
CrazyOrangeHD;-;Hours played/10
fBHN1T0R;-;Decent game with low price!
forb41L;-;Awesome game, you can get easily addicted to it.
Serious_ua;-;IT'S THE BEST MULTIPLAYER GAME EVER!!! 10/10
Mohit;-;The best game.. ever!!!
m0dern;-;too fat too neckbear
El Malo;-;Hard as f***. Got destroyed by 12 year old korean children.
Vegeta.^.^;-;One of the most Vintage games... But one of the most loved ones too :D
Assassin1337;-;I played this game like 7 years, but it still hasn't boored me once, it's the best game form me and for the most people on this polanet. I sincerely recommend this game to anyone it's just that awesome. :)
sgt milk;-;Good Game, but if your new do NOT join the pugs you will get kicked like 100 times before you get accepted as "one of them"
W1ndQW;-;Oh, you are a bloody hacker and i cannot shoot you through your heart. 10/10
BatSwug;-;Best game ever created.
zL1.;-;cs is the best
edm;-;best game in the world
Mako | Doberman Lova';-;CS 1.6 \(*o*')/ Simply the best one !
Smile;-;Play with me :)
freeki;-;the legend
No.#1;-;legendary :)
Serious Cat;-;No killstreak . No regen. health . A real game that takes real skill thats has been out for 14+ years and pepole still play it. A lot. This game will live on forever as a classic. 10/10
SadLyF :'(;-;its isnt enought that i am paying since when i was 3 yer old :D ? this game is my Love <3
#sWeeXw0w?;-;Nice oldschool game! Counter-Strike is very cool game, but now we can play the CS series of games like CS:Source and CS:GO... I can't say which game is better, it's your choice. But i can't forget this game like my childhood, thanks to VaLVE for it!
Ev0LuTioN.mp3z;-;It will remain one of the best games in history of CS :) Pitty steam can't track hours from back in the day.
Stefan. c:;-;Good game. I got it thru family share. rip i can't play it anymore ;_;
Egg <on vacation>;-;Ohhh CS.16 i love you you was the beginning of a verry huge history in Gaming You are on of the best Mods you have made the best game (Half Life) better I LOVE YOU
[T]actical WulFe;-;After years, it`s still very fun to play with friends.
CrispOffensive;-;An Old damn game, but you know, Old is Gold. It's a whole lot of fun when you play decently but sometimes irritating on pubs, Servers with limted slots, like 15, and everything unlocked, trust me, with some basic understanding of the game, it will be more enjoyable than masturbating. **BEST THING ABOUT THE GAME** The netcode of this game is perfect, is very enjoyable and gives decent hitreg even with bad internet which gives you lag spikes upto 300ms.
Mata [Inactive For 3 Weeks :(];-;Still Best Game In The World xD Old school <3
seven.;-;you can't go wrong with counter-strike
a real human bean;-;Hackers ruin the game, but it's still fun af.
CSGOPoker.com - Gvazdas;-;literally the best multiplayer fps game in existence
massaS;-;Great Game, it still better then csgo in my opinion...
FragadeLphiA[st];-;Awesome game been playing for years
Ken Setsu;-;Ahhh! The original masterpiece
fBHN1T0R;-;Decent game with low price!
Hllahu Hackbar (Back 17th July);-;A Truely Great classic FPS
*SauroN41k (=;-;old school out of time ^_^
CrazyOrangeHD;-;Hours played/10
BirDd;-;Its freaking cs and 22000 people still play it. Need more reasons? Didnt have it on this "new" account and I felt th need to replay it. Worth it
forb41L;-;Awesome game, you can get easily addicted to it.
El Malo;-;Hard as f***. Got destroyed by 12 year old korean children.
#sWeeXw0w?;-;Nice oldschool game! Counter-Strike is very cool game, but now we can play the CS series of games like CS:Source and CS:GO... I can't say which game is better, it's your choice. But i can't forget this game like my childhood, thanks to VaLVE for it!
SAMESHIT;-;This Counter-Strike 1.6 is really nice game but however it's dead right now because Counter-Strike Global Offensive is out. This game might still play little kids and russians because its cheap and good. In my opinion this game was really good, but try it out yourself.
Mr. Steel Balls;-;I liked it. Really nice game to spend some time here
HotShotGG;-;Warning this game will prevent you from going outside :c
thunnuS;-;the best game for ever
CUENTA EN VENTA;-;My favorite game til now, just ruined my life 5/5 ~
ShoowN;-;Counter Strike is the best GAME!!!!!! I LOVE COUNTER-STRIKE THX ---> Minh Le (Gooseman) and Jess Cliffe (Cliffe) !!!!!!! Birthday: 19 June 1999
Fireflarey~<3 sleeps w/ Andrew;-;Fire in the Hole (   )
1337 | Afrikanu;-;Winners Train, Losers Complain.
1337 | Afrikanu;-;Winners Train, Losers Complain.
HOBO JONNY;-;Cheap Thrills. Fast Kills. Good Times.
Devsain;-;Yah its a gr8 game 8/8
do;-;this Game!!!
awfully;-;very nice game
Truffle Butter ISO KNIFE;-;This is a great game! I'd check out Source now, Im headed over to check out GO right now and see how it compares CS:S is legendary though, so its going to be tough to beat!
<MHDN.73>;-;The Best GAME ever! <3
$hakeR;-;This game is the best addict!!! Drugs, alcohol, they last only a few minutes, maybe hours but once You play this, you can never stop!!! Lots of great mods, maps. High self-control skill reqiured. 10/10 - Best game by Valve.
Dogge;-;Old school and awesome ;D
Ploogie;-;Classic FPS worth the price.
do;-;this Game!!!
HOBO JONNY;-;Cheap Thrills. Fast Kills. Good Times.
CrispOffensive;-;An Old damn game, but you know, Old is Gold. It's a whole lot of fun when you play decently but sometimes irritating on pubs, Servers with limted slots, like 15, and everything unlocked, trust me, with some basic understanding of the game, it will be more enjoyable than masturbating. **BEST THING ABOUT THE GAME** The netcode of this game is perfect, is very enjoyable and gives decent hitreg even with bad internet which gives you lag spikes upto 300ms.
ana;-;The good old classic <3 If you haven't played this allready there really is no point in playing it now honestly.
Ploogie;-;Classic FPS worth the price.
BurnedMan;-;Great game, a timeless classic. A gem of our childhood (born in the late 80s - early 90s)
IonziMon;-;Back in the days when Counter-Strike used to be about having fun.
<MHDN.73>;-;The Best GAME ever! <3
Truffle Butter ISO KNIFE;-;This is a great game! I'd check out Source now, Im headed over to check out GO right now and see how it compares CS:S is legendary though, so its going to be tough to beat!
FaN7a;-;CSGO will never move 1.6 !
Dogge;-;Old school and awesome ;D
Straat;-;Play it if you like mexicans who can't afford a computer to play csgo
Sinatra ^v^;-;One of the best games.
Carly Shay;-;This game changed gaming as a whole. One of the best FPS of all time, if not the best. But its all about the gameplay. Its how CS plays that will get you. Huge online community, thousands of mods, nostalgic graphics, excellent gameplay, nice sound effects even if they r outdated. CS 1.6 is my favorite FPS and is much better than Global Offensive in all aspects. I played this game so much before i got Steam, this game is just spetacular. Even in non-steam gaming, lan houses,competitive play, CS 1.6 is still incredibly popular. 10/10, congratulations to the developers.
ALTAIR;-;BEST CLASSIC GAME EVER
SLAM # SKILLEDG;-;A classic :)
DafaqPlays;-;awsome game
dagerGEMiiNi=D;-;Always in my heart ]
ALTAIR;-;BEST CLASSIC GAME EVER
Sinatra ^v^;-;One of the best games.
NatureSilence;-;one of the best games ever!
nocontrol. #MareBoier;-;Best Game Ever Played !
tpaio;-;very goo game.recomend for all people who want to pley a goo dgame,
RPGamer--I-------------;-;the BEST classic game !
NatureSilence;-;one of the best games ever!
nocontrol. #MareBoier;-;Best Game Ever Played !
'naidotsuC;-;1.6 is and forever will be the best game.
xyz;-;Classic.
PitziCat^;-;Played.
RPGamer--I-------------;-;the BEST classic game !
dagerGEMiiNi=D;-;Always in my heart ]
DespaiReid;-;what should i say? still the best FPS game on the world
MyC -IrC;-;Best game of all times.
Bionade;-;Frickin great game! 10/10
sprt;-;Still the best shooter out there, CS:GO has nothing on this.
NightVisioN;-;huge classic, everyone should own this
W D A;-;buy counter-strike 1,6
JJ;-;If this game were any more enticing, my  would be so hard it would take off and beat the russians too the moon!
Killy;-;This is a best game for me :)
HALLOWEENSK7;-;the king is here
S I C K Z;-;I love this game since 2006 when I played it first time. I'm playing it still and it's 2014! THIS GAME ROCKS!
hazza;-;fresh
Isn't that obvious enough?!;-;It's awesome
~ POPEYE |aFK| ~;-;LIFE IS 1 , BUT COUTER-STRIKE IS 1.6 CS 4 EVER
.L0GiC;-;very good game, you should try it :D
Mystogan;-;It's a good game but i got some kinda grapical bug and i need very much help and i can't see my grapical settings just cuz somthing makes me see a little bit of the menu screen would like some help :D
France;-;Cool
GuyOnAChair;-;You know a game is doing something right when after 15 years millions of people are still playing it.
Frnc;0 / cstrike products!;-;this is a amazing game but is adicted
RaheemR;-;Best action game
Gen ;x;-;Best FPS game I have ever played. ^^
Podolski;-;never forgot this game :')
sprt;-;Still the best shooter out there, CS:GO has nothing on this.
MINDBREAKER>;-;Pretty epic classic
~=NarC^()~ .::De@TH::.;-;Though The graphics suck the multiplayer is awsome... Largest in the world... a must-play game !!
PsyshodayP8.wQw;-;this game is awesome i know that's its getting old but old is good :D its my best game and i'll never unstall it from my computer even i get new shitly games :D
eraser;-;One of the most played games ever!
bl1tz - r1 barb inc;-;This many much good.
DarsA;-;Still Popular I think ;) ^_^
Lame_Ak;-;The game that i love the most no matter how old it gets....
HoooorrrrraaaaY;-;BEST shooter of my childhood ( Junior High School )
Hotdogish;-;simply the best game i have ever played :)
The Diddly Gorilla;-;Seriously Counter Strike is awesome all of them Go,Source,The original all amazing! So go on buy them...im serious....do it...NOW.
Psycho29388;-;Old but gold
Flip Phone Nokia!;-;Very Cool game
mytheus;-;better than csgo the bullets actually go ware u aim
TOC TOC TRABANDO;-;Best Games in The World :D
POKERFEjS!<3Dijanuu;-;I love this game
Jen;-;Virginia Tech Massacre Columbine High school massacre
Hi there m8 :D;-;Old but gold :)
Bezdak;-;One of best games in da world.. :)
tank1st <3 CR7;-;Nice Game.
The Diddly Gorilla;-;Seriously Counter Strike is awesome all of them Go,Source,The original all amazing! So go on buy them...im serious....do it...NOW.
Psycho29388;-;Old but gold
Killy;-;This is a best game for me :)
SteelSeries;-;Pretty cool game, old school
GldzyGoat;-;I can still make headshots so i still recommend this game to people out there! :D
.Mytic.;-;Old school, but my favourite game!!!
+CancelSelect;-;Nice Game LOL
SILVER 2;-;Good Game and i Loved it so much
m3webz;-;A classic that I have over 1000 hours on
TheFracturedButWhole;-;classic of classics
.cfg;-;Cool
_AlxM;-;The best game ever.
Giorno Giovanna;-;HAHAHA, you guys think that CSGO is hard? casual gamers
ScUzE';-;Finally i buy that game! Awesome! :D (i`m not a VALVE`r now) >:)
aKKi xD' exams till 30th :/;-;I love this game.....this game having best performence in online.....can't stop playing when i start it........:)
JJ;-;If this game were any more enticing, my  would be so hard it would take off and beat the russians too the moon!
NightVisioN;-;huge classic, everyone should own this
S I C K Z;-;I love this game since 2006 when I played it first time. I'm playing it still and it's 2014! THIS GAME ROCKS!
Playboy;-;Ruined my life. 10/10
nownz csg0.com;-;CS 1.6 NEVER DIE :)
W D A;-;buy counter-strike 1,6
SkySatan;-;Counter-strike(1.0 - 1.6 not source) is one of the greatest esport fps games(if not the greatest) in the gaming history and is still worth buying today. Graphics doesnt matter for a good gamer, gameplay does
Ba[R]aD`;-;Still better then COD.
fr4z;-;omg who play this game  graphics only graphics count in gaming jkjkz
Gloin;-;full skills this game ;D
Greenie;-;15 year old game @ $9.99 really how gready can you get valve.
thunder;-;Good memories, but i still prefer CS:GO.
SLY AFK;-;Probably the best game ever. Flawless.
BloxX*legenD;-;Best Shooting game :)
7cupsoftea.com, Now fuck off.;-;i was told to be done with it through Closed shutters, flooded floors, i wanted to sail out the front door. morning anew I'm counting the texts you sent me I'm trying hard to take this well, but the cradle has been rocked and my feelings are a stir. and I'm not really sure how to approach this landing despair and so many eyes on me, i felt like commiting suicide open the door, 40mph, dead forever more and so little time, we we kids just exploring, trying to find a way out of this surburban story And that my friends is an Emo song straight out of the state of New Jersey. Taking back sunday? Thursday? Pffftt this is way more garbage tier than that.
do0zy;-;Umm I guess this game is good? What to expect is trolls tryhards and bads and umm..nope that sums up all the people who play this 11 + year old game.
Sweg # voice_enable 0;-;Counter-Strike 1.6. Not One of the Best, Nor One of the Worst.  Good Gameplay   Bad Graphics, as it was Launched in 1999  If you're going to buy this Game at this time, I Suggest buy Counter-Strike: Global Offensive. (7/10)
KaaZ;-;Love this game to be honest, great game which has its ups and downs, base of my PC gaming career, best game franchise based off of Half-Life what can i say.
MrASSASSINo;-;You gotta have to love this game!
dementordapoke;-;steampowered urpok pachemu name etot?
Red;-;REW VYUUWS ARE F0ER P33PL WHO L1KE D1SNEY AND W3NT TH3RE TO BUY A MICKEY MOUSE DILD0
Ohrami;-;Get this game if you love repeatedly hearing sounds of "Fire in the hole!", not respawning after you die and having to deal with players hundreds of times better than you when you first begin playing. If you enjoy a game of frustration with a terrible community who will look down on you for not having reflexes like a cyborg, this is the right game for you. Also, if you don't already have this game, you are a . Please either buy it or leave Steam immediately.
ScatDan;-;Old school fun. LOVE IT. Reminds me of my first childhood PC games.
Zyph;-;It has been 2 years since i played counter-strike in my other account. I have at least 400+ hours in this game on another account as i loved it very much, As far as i know, I have CSGO now and i play that instead. I missed this game very much. I hope to get it again. This is just like the other CS games, You play as a Terrorist and Counter Terrorist. The objective of the Terrorist is to use the C4 and blow up 2 area's, Either one could do. A or B. While the Counter-Terrorist's objective is to Stop the bomb from being planted, If it is planted, They have to eliminate all Terrorist and Defuse the bomb. It takes around 5 second's or 10 to defuse, It depends if you have a defuse kit. It's a good game and i recommend it.
G.I.*JoE//Zaza;-;I like this Game :D
POSEUS;-;So nice game.
Pron*Tium;-;Cs 1.6 ... That Game!
THGM;-;Classic. One of the best and most competetive First Person Shooters ever made.
Han;-;Best fps game ever (better than CS:GO)
The rebel;-;One of the best shooter games ever ! You must buy it !
$.Heros5k;-;Old but Gold
Cpt Breakdance;-;Better than global offensive <3
Legitti;-;Great. Simply Great.
CHRISTMASDAY #PTGSTS;-;my frend borowed account and cheat, i play alot and can i have a new acount or maybe team can look into problem and not vac ban me anymore? cs is very good game please help :)
{M7aShSh}*;-;Classic, oldschool game, I recommend this game for everyone.
POTbIY LOVANDISH;-;(  )    Counter-Strike.      ,     ,  .  !!!     Warface ,    .
7 DAYS BAN;-;game of my life <3
hASTYwow;-;Literally the best game ever!
Elyx;-;F-FI-FIR-FI-FI-F-FIRE IN TH-FI-F-F-FIRE IN THE HOLE! 10/10
f0remaN;-;Cult team game!
Egg;-;Deaded</3
Darkknight;-;old cs source is better but it was a start to a generation
.::SpecialForces::. killer321455;-;This is a GOOD VIDEO GAME dont get me wrong its good but not greatest graficks. But stil buy it if you are a VALVe FAN!!!!!!
C3R3BrO;-;Awesome fps game. recommended.. ;)
SharkcpN -MAJ FRIEND;-;The good old Counterstrike never seems tiring and boring. I still play it till date alongwith Counterstrike : Global Offensive. Valve should release update for the remaining bugs and glitches and revamp the graphics keeping the gameplay same.
MarkoNNN;-;Old but good game !
MiRzAa;-;<3 <3 The Best Game <3 <3
==|Steel|==;-;Nice fps. Offers you to increase your skills.
zerkul;-;Not just a game ,that's more then game :)
boy;-;Yes turns you into a hs God that is all
OOO;-;great game
Egg;-;Deaded</3
Darkknight;-;old cs source is better but it was a start to a generation
.::SpecialForces::. killer321455;-;This is a GOOD VIDEO GAME dont get me wrong its good but not greatest graficks. But stil buy it if you are a VALVe FAN!!!!!!
C3R3BrO;-;Awesome fps game. recommended.. ;)
GaGaG ftw;-;THIS IS THE WORLD BEST GAME EVER I PLAYED :D
SugarPlumps;-;Great.
BIG EYEZ ULTIMATE FRAGN;-;First online shooter I played
wMw;-;Russians everywhere.
Dikius` R;-;Still better then cs:s and cs:go :)
Jey;-;Simply the best
cHoP #ArkhamLag;-;The Best Online Game.........It Never gets OLD!!!!
OmO;-;This is one of my favourite games. It is simply classic game. I really enjoy playing this game
SugarPlumps;-;Great.
<saba chilaia>;-;cool
Don't feed the troll;-;I just can't stop playing that game it control's my mind
Jey;-;Simply the best
cHoP #ArkhamLag;-;The Best Online Game.........It Never gets OLD!!!!
OmO;-;This is one of my favourite games. It is simply classic game. I really enjoy playing this game
Pat Magroin Official;-;i bought the counter-strike complete pack and i've never regreted buying it
Jenn;-;Classic Counter Strike <3
f0remaN;-;Cult team game!
!!HAMMER!!;-;the best game, play with friends online, put a bullet on their head
POTbIY LOVANDISH;-;(  )    Counter-Strike.      ,     ,  .  !!!     Warface ,    .
~;-;I think it's fun. Haven't aged very well, but still runs on modern computers without any problem. Worth picking up if you find a good price for it. Was also my first Steam game, so what can I say? This game gets 7/10. Still better than CS:GO
)00228;-;Cool game !!!
Pelikan;-;Wow, I Love Awp <3
[HDGM] BEM;-;Counter-Strike...a game which is a true FPS and is one of my favourite shooters
Le ziiLA^_^;-;very cool game!
Kereka|Bayramnz mbarek olsun!;-;Classic. 10/10
elfen lied;-;This game is a real classic and it's still in the top of the best first person shooters this day, the graphics aren't the best but they are still good. The community is nice and still active. this game is in the top10 for most played games. It's a really good game for a cheap price.
Koco1111;-;Classic! <3
DeNniS' - ndungi Romnia;-;The Best
Mr.HuNt^ ~bLoOdHuNtEr#wOw;-;best fps game ever in the history ,present and future of pc gaming
kiwi;-;Really nice game :X
Conor;-;This comes with expansion pack Condation Zero free! I didn't get the game years ago but it is still suprisinely one of the most played games on Steam despite coming out in 2000 and not getting updated anymore. It's about taking sides between the Counter Terriests and the Terriests and rescueing/keeping hostages, stoping/planting bombs or fighting in a deathmatch. It's about the community, a lot more play the newer version of this on a different engine and the more recent and updated a lot Global Offence new CS game. Most people on here have been playing for a lot longer. Since they are bought in pack together, here's review for Condation Zero: A free expanion you get along with Counter Strike when you buy CS on Steam. Adds single player missons and it updates Counter Strikes Multiplayer Content.
BastenKo;-;The best game
Mr.HuNt^ ~bLoOdHuNtEr#wOw;-;best fps game ever in the history ,present and future of pc gaming
kiwi;-;Really nice game :X
Conor;-;This comes with expansion pack Condation Zero free! I didn't get the game years ago but it is still suprisinely one of the most played games on Steam despite coming out in 2000 and not getting updated anymore. It's about taking sides between the Counter Terriests and the Terriests and rescueing/keeping hostages, stoping/planting bombs or fighting in a deathmatch. It's about the community, a lot more play the newer version of this on a different engine and the more recent and updated a lot Global Offence new CS game. Most people on here have been playing for a lot longer. Since they are bought in pack together, here's review for Condation Zero: A free expanion you get along with Counter Strike when you buy CS on Steam. Adds single player missons and it updates Counter Strikes Multiplayer Content.
x^The Rising Moon^x;-;Best ever in the century. No matter graphics, this game takes your gaming upto a higher level and brings you a better gaming sense. <3
JT-dA-MiGhTy;-;Legendary FPS Game!
dstr;-;Of course, very good game, only writing this to increase amount of positive reviews.
PP_elysiuM;-;Must Play (Y)
R@N(!D F!eND;-;the most awesome classic game <3
James Bond 007;-;Just one thing i would like to say is that i can live without my girl friend but not without counter strike. :) ;)
SelfRus;-;Very Good  :3
Vibes Vaibhav;-;Addictive :)
Cole Phelps;-;Just like WarCraft III, Diablo II, this is the game I'll never forget. HeatoN is my favorite PRO player, and Microsoft Intellimouse Explorer 3.0 is my favorite mouse. AH!!! Good old days.
Juusow0w;-;Played first time 13 years ago and got totally hooked up, awesum game.
Vaitiekus;-;!cool
Bruh-Chan;-;Greatest Hentai I've ever watched 1/10
HELL-BOY;-;to old,to good
Mulder;-;A classic, still among the most played game in existence.
Tecknoooo;-;1.6 is fun but try out CS:GO.
PlayeR;-;just love this game <3
n0f4k3;-;Uh.. probably the best game i have ever played. MUST HAVE, GO AND BUY IT, NOW!
Slick Tip the Ruler;-;played this for like 7 years before steam was even created. great game.
StealthDruid <3 Sadinu;-;DO NOT buy this game, if you do, you'll never see the sunlight again !
Apam;-;this game is the beginning of my gaming
TYG4N;-;counter strie is a good game ;)
housemaster;-;this game fun when i stuck in russian internet cafe in forest but now i live in glorious european i can play csgo!!!! ( only poor chinese and russia play this, sometimes a german))
vibrasphere;-;A wise man once told me "Maybe you should load up some Counter-Strike 1.6 and  around on some pub servers for a bit.". And that was what I did. And it was good. Then I entered a server with a bunch of  plebs. Sometimes there would be a player or two that could challenge me and we'd have fun little fights. We'd make jokes back and forth with the radio but when I started asking for nude  pics (no homo), the dude didn't respond ;_; . Two hours later, I noticed a player wouldn't stop trying to jump on a single ledge. Failing, he would back up and then try again and again and again without end and never shot back. I just sat there are watched him. That was when I realized the entire server was just bots and my conversations were with the rare amount of human players. Didn't know what to think.
JetRay;-;Best game for understanding your mouse!
Aquas';-;The most intoxicating, the most classic CS ever. Best for oldschool players! ;)
n0f4k3;-;Uh.. probably the best game i have ever played. MUST HAVE, GO AND BUY IT, NOW!
Slick Tip the Ruler;-;played this for like 7 years before steam was even created. great game.
Peetor pan?;-;A very good game you get a lot of cookies and potatoes
Brohbloh.;-;Bad grahpics. Still a good game though.
macAK-47;-;Try it! Best fps game ever.. :)
zAITZ;-;The true godly game.
Ivan Velev;-;The game is awesome. Old School game!!
ToX1c;-;Really Awesome Game <3
F_C__ALL   & DelpanoX <3;-;Awesome game GL HF
duces[DD];-;best game ever come back!
ThundeR;-;Classic FPS!!
Guilty97 - GameServers for rent;-;Awesome game... you guys should give it a try...
Strikey;-;Ruined my life.
Ernest Wolf;-;This will be more of a ''my experience with this game'' type of review, because saying things like ''great gameplay'' will not suit something I've experienced with Counter-Strike. Here you go: I remember back in 2002 I was at a friend's house and he was playing a game. I didn't know the name of the game nor I had internet to find it. A few weeks passed by and another friend came over and he didn't have a computer, so he brought a disc with a game in it. He told me that it was one of the best games and from that very moment I knew that it is going to be the game I saw at the other friend's house. When I saw the Counter-Strike logo I was filled with gamegasm (?) and I was so happy. I don't remember a day when I was so happy like back then. So, the journey started. I was playing it hardcore. Made friends, clans, was involved in communities and even made two myself. Counter-Strike is my first game which I played competitively and it was a whole experience. Playing public servers and maybe some servers with mods was very fun, but playing it competitively made it very intense and stressful. In a pleasant way, ofcourse. Shooters these days try to be different, advanced in a way. Sometimes the most simple games like Counter-Strike are the ones that live to this day. Also, there are plenty of mods to keep your attention to this game. The gameplay is very simple - defend as a Counter-Terrorist, attack as a Terrorist to plant the bomb or save the hostages as a CT. I am sure most of you already know this and I doubt there are gamers that haven't heard or know the gameplay of Counter-Strike, so I am sharing here more of my experience. I wish I could find my CS Anthology account which I've lost since 2008. So, I decided I am going to buy this game again and here you go - more than a thousand hours played. I still play it from time to time to this day and it brings back many great memories and I sometimes even stumble upon people I've played with years ago. I think Counter-Strike changed gaming in a major way and we wouldn't have many games like we have today, if this game wouldn't exist. I am sure many of people already have played games like CS:GO, but never the roots. I doubt any of you will play it for more than an hour, because it's much more simple and it differs a lot in my opinion from CS:GO and modern games.
Brig;-;Every server is spanish or french. I can now fluently swear in both languages 9/10
Hedroks;-;Still better than Call of Duty: Ghosts...
Mr.Mimi | Trade Knife;-;I met a lot of people who slept with my mother. 10/10
Rezej;-;I never played a better first person shooter. Graphics doesn't matter for gamer, gameplay only.
Eno Etukeno;-;When you crouch, you lift your feet in the air and fall to the ground. 10/10
safeoff';-;WARNING : DO NOT buy this game, if you do, you'll never see the sunlight again !
ManaF;-;CS is one of the greatest and undermined games in history. It is, in my opinion, the best game to ever have a crosshair. It is not a contact sport, so for the girly girls, it is an activity to indulge in. It starts off with a team trying to kill another team. I started playing cs when I noticed jacking off isn't the only activity to do on a computer. I started inviting a lot of friends out and getting drinks, as well as a boom box, to spend a nice summer day in the living room playing this wonderful game. I wanted to play every chance that i could. On my road of cs adventures, I encountered a couple of problems; those being that nobody was as fervent as I was about playing, and that when we did play, nobody was good enough, so it wasn't a lot of fun. Then I discovered that I could sign up for a class with dboorn. I was overly excited, and signed up, but with skepticism at how the class was going to be. Sure enough, I was proven wrong. We started off by practicing a little bit. Then we split off into teams and started playing almost everyday of class. I made some friends, and played with people who had built up their skill gradually over the period of the course. When I play counterstrike, the whole world disappears. Only I, the mouse, and my teammates remain. We are united in a common goal. We strive collectively towards an end we all desire. Each player has a spot to hold. They stand ready and waiting, eager for their chance to aid the team in what they hope will be a forthcoming victory. Thus, CS celebrates the unity of man, the indomitable spirit in all of us that pushes us and drives us towards excellence. When I play CS, I play until my veins pump battery acid, and then I play some more. CS is unique among the games because it teaches all of us that no matter where we are in life, there is a role for us to play, and we can help our fellow man by fulfilling that role, and thereby our destiny. What destiny might you ask? I spoke before of unity. And it is that unity that brings us all together like one big loving family. That is the nature of counter-strike; the many working as one. One machine made of well oiled cogs and wheels, moving in unison, happy to play their part in the production of something greater than themselves. Not that these small metal objects are actually animate, I'm of course speaking only metaphorically. Over the course of the years, I have increased in skill, but I have learned a greater lesson than how to be a better cs player. I have learned how to cooperate with a team to accomplish a goal that we all share. Even if that team is less than ideal. I have realized that cs is about more than just one's athletic ability. Instead, there is a deeper meaning behind the colt, the AK, the AWP, the deagle, the sands under my feet (in d2 or inferno). And more importantly, the teammates at my side. I love them. It is the human element of cs that gives cs its greatness. In conclusion, I love cs. I love to win. I love pushing myself to my physical limits. It's that feeling that first drove me to the computer. For every second that I am not playing cs, there is only an unquenchable thirst to play. A thirst that grows as every minute passes by when I am outside, sitting at the television, or playing sports. I had an extraordinary time playing this game, and I will return to look at the future students of this game to see that bright eager look on their faces to remind me of how I used to feel. This review may be over, this game may be dead, but I will never stop playing couner-strike (1.6).
DESTRUKT;-;It's... aight.
ShadoCapital;-;This is a game I've played with friends ever since I was very young, so it means a lot to me. It is the definition of classic games and fun to play with just friends where nobody is extremely good and everyone just have fun.
{-=!!$H0ckW@V3!!=-};-;Nothing U can say about this Addictive Game :D <3
Nigga_gtfo :3;-;Well , In Love With The Game :P
Tnt;-;Best. Game. Ever. 12/10. This game is near perfect.
Djape-035;-;Old Timer :)
coroTM87;-;best cs 4ever
Mt;-;old school
noob;-;The Best Ever
FragMasters|.Cy4n.wOw.;-;Hell yeah this is the holy grail of the FPS games! It takes quite a lot of time though to master this game and here, I'm talkin years. But totally worth it!
ifound1paypal;-;l like playing cs 1.6 it is a awsome classic game
ToX1c;-;Really Awesome Game <3
F_C__ALL   & DelpanoX <3;-;Awesome game GL HF
DeNniS' - ndungi Romnia;-;The Best
BAro;-;THE BEST GAME
STEREO GW;-;cs best <3
MrChaOs;-;I am a very old CS player but this one is a beast i am just ing loving this game GREAT ONE
Forbidden dA-k1nG -A-;-;Recomand .
Step-Three;-;This is a great game :D
BastenKo;-;The best game
SN1CKER1337 | I'm a fireball;-;The most popular online game :)
[AG] Vick;-;Classic. Never gets old. Great mods, Good times. Much wow.
Gafis;-;Pyf pof. hs hs. aim. banned
snot;-;outdated now but once was the most populer online game ever
Laden;-;Fantastic Game... I love this game very much
SK.FucK~WoW~ VAC BANNED :(;-;One And Only The BesT GamE EveR PlaYeD... Those Who Agree Please Like ThiS.... xD..... -GeT_RiGhT
rogerFTW;-;In memory forever!
Kalashinik0FF-;-;Just Shooot The Zombies
Barcode;-;MAN  THIS GAME IS HARD AND  8/10 WOULD NOT RECOMMEND -IGN
Lenny Jewberg;-;This game is basically just CoD with bad graphics. I rate it 10/10
Where's my Skill?;-;Best Shooter Ever!! Old School Baby
RIP Satoru Iwata;-;a great fps its a classic, Valve makes great games and this is one of their finest works
inactivuS-Da-Puternic;-;I love it! The old is the best!
Hataz;-;Few years ago, we first heard that CS 1.6 is dead, some organizations have dismissed their CS - team, people screaming that the game is dead and we need to move to CS: GO. It seems that now it is not so! If you pay attention to the broadcast with IEM 6 WC, we see that CS 1.6 By Views prevzashla SC 2, not only is this game broke all past their records. So why CS 1.6 is dead? I beg to differ. According to spectators IEM 6 CS was the best in the tournament. I think CS 1.6 hardly died, she would die only if we want to do! As for CS: GO it grows, developers even began to read the "Feedback", the game has changed a lot of things. Open Beta -version of the game was to be released after the new year, but I think the developers have not yet sufficiently satisfied with the result. As for the keys to the CS: GO, something I'm working on that would get a couple of the key for you guys! I will write how I succeed!
The Real Venova;-;Kicked for being american 11/10
NailgunJesus;-;This game is still awesome.
Let's get Ridiculous.;-;best addicting game.
'Khalil, D> GTA V;-;CS IS LOVE <3 CS IS HALF LIFE <3
G2A Xenil;-;This is the fantastic game ever, because i love Kill Terorist... :)
Staticerz;-;Nice game!
that spy was a cow;-;i dont like tactical shooters but counter strike is one of the best fps games there are tons of peple playing fun mods on servers it is hard for new peple if you played call of duty or tf2 you can go in as a one man army but in this game its not like that if you go by your self you will get killed one problem i have with the game is if you die your out for the round and if your new you will get killed alot overall 9/10 great fun game but HARD
{Mow};-;Good memories on this game get this game
Vinyl;-;It's the best starting point of all gamers.
GNX-603T;-;the legend FPS game
FatmanBennyS! To De Extreme >:);-;This is a great game, I have no problems with this game and it is fun and addictive. Also this is my favourite game and even tho it may be hard at first it is still constanlty fun :D
Manfa;-;I Playing this game so long its best game in my opionion, but counter strike global offencive is our time counter strike is still nice :)
bacon@soutpaw;-;Played this as a kid, now i bought it but played more cs:go cause it has more realistic although i still recomend this game with a 8/10
Blah146135;-;THIS GAME IS GOOD BECAUSE IT IS COUNTER-STRIKE. COUNTER-STRIKE IS ALWAYS GOOD.
DaBlinkkz;-;Nice game, Just nice
Flander;-;very nice game! Grew up with this! <3
dEEb;-;One of the best games everrr :3
magafe #Dust2Warrior;-;Chronos sucks at it
Hawk;-;Shooters these days try to be different, advanced in a way. Sometimes the most simple games like Counter-Strike are the ones that live to this day. Also, there are plenty of mods to keep your attention to this game. The gameplay is very simple - defend as a Counter-Terrorist, attack as a Terrorist to plant the bomb or save the hostages as a CT. I am sure most of you already know this and I doubt there are gamers that haven't heard or know the gameplay of Counter-Strike.
Robi King;-;1 of the best games i ever played :)
-A-;-;Best Game of ALL the Time
Lee;-;it takes reaction speed and accuracy to be good in order to achieve skill it takes practice which is the aspect that makes CS fun and competitive
Senzii;-;This was my first game who maked me love him. ! i love it !
msk;-;Nice game
V.I.P Gamer;-;I like This Game.... Also going to buy Cs GO
eotic;-;The best online game ever!!!! :D
KoCANE;-;How to be cs:go pro 1. Buy c-s 2. Launch it up and leave it on for 2 weeks straight 3. get over 100 hours of c-s and then brag about it on your next cs:go comp game how you played with the best pros back in the day 10/10 still best game and s better than cs:go
Chris_1_A;-;Really good old school shooter, If you love old fps games or youre pc is to slow i would recomend this game to you.
ZyReX;-;Very good game !
k3booL';-;Good Nice And Beautiful Game ^_^!
Qz3;-;Oldschool... But csgo still better :)
Osuka;-;a script kiddy made this mod for csgo. he obviously doesnt know how to use java
m-200;-;*joins a random half-full server *hears a bunch of foreigners yelling into their  mics *leaves server 10/10 would try and find an English player again.
<UGA> diM;-;Old but gold
Rxjcts.;-;Awesome game. check out Source, too
Sp00ky;-;This came out 14 years ago, and it still has better graphics than your average Call of Duty game.
Shotyyy  KQLY;-;Do you still remember this game xDD ?
THISain't [GE];-;The original.
R0V3R;-;A fun classic FPS game made by valve that takes strategy and teamwork.
Carl+;-;The game that started it all but past its time I only recently played CS (It's only been 16 year so maybe the hype is dead but staying optimistic here.... right?) I will say that I'm sure this game was huge during it time as it was the first of its kind but I played it for 2 hours and it didn't really interest me. This is the game that spawned an entire series such as CSS which had some very cool mods and CS:GO which has become a eSports standard for professional players so it deserves our respect. Bottom line This game is past its time and offers nothing that CSS or CS:GO could offer but it was the original that started the series but because of that I'd recommend it to any fans of the series. 6/10 - Game was the first of its kind and defined the series but offers nothing the newer titles don't already have
Kunickis;-;The best game ever. !
zearic;-;nearly noone plays it anymore but it is still the best!
Tmark;-;Property Rating Explanation Graphics 5.5 The graphics of Counter-strike 1.6 are very dated compared to the next installments, CS: Source and CS:GO. Not really strong here. Gameplay 10 This is maybe the best, most addictive FPS multiplayer game ever created for PC. The gameplay is stellar. Multiplayer 9 Really addicting multiplayer, from public matches to gathers, mixed teams and clan clashes. Also, Valve's anti-cheat is present. Story N/A Multiplayer only. Sound-Music 7 The sound effects are very convincing, from gunshots to grenades and running. Optimization 9 Optimization is great, this game can run even on the more weak laptops without any problems. Cons N/A No achievements. Also many cheaters on public matches. No automatic ranked mode like CS:GO has. Overall 9 Best multiplayer FPS game ever created.
Ojala;-;there is n0thing (see what I did there) better than this game.
skeleton jam;-;shoot at body = nothing shoot at head = dead before bullets hit
.;-;you will be missed
Gimmp;-;\o
Banter;-;Still better than CSGO, CS is rule, is free modable, it mean you can play online even ou modded it. CSGO cannot play online if modded, except map
.``;-;Better than source, or GO... <3 1.6!!!
32KB$;-;Since 2006.
LKD-Luke;-;Cool game.
haman62rus;-;Counter-Strike (. ; . CS  , . )     [13]       ,    GoldSrc,      Half-Life.        ,        Counter-Strike 1.6.    , , Counter-Strike: Condition Zero (   )  Condition Zero: Deleted Scenes ( ),    GoldSource,   Counter-Strike: Source,      Source. 14.08.11 Valve   Counter-Strike: Global Offensive,   21  2012 [14]. Counter-Strike    ,       ( ).   ,     Counter-Strike 1.6          ,           [15][16].  20072008        CS 1.6   [17][18].            Counter-Strike.        .          (Terrorist team, T)   (Counter-Terrorist team, CT).        ,     ,      Spectator       .         .         ,      . (    ,   )
maysion;-;yes good game go kill every player
"Leve " Sasuke;-;Best FPS game i have ever played since 2006.
TigazZz*;-;A classic. That is the best way i can describe this game, but if you only played CSGO or even CSS and then you decide to go on a nostalgia trip to test the game, prepare to feel like you are in a very alien environment. The 2 hours that i tried, yes tried, to play the game were filled with learning the controls, adapt to the different recoil and aiming system in geral and then dying over and over again by the more experienced players I recommend the game if you want to expand your gaming history horizons and give it a try, but you can expect frustration and rage. Its a piece of gaming history and it should be preserved as such, but new gamers will probably never get it.
Vegeta;-;best shooter of all times
vato loco [GE-S];-;CS 1.6 the best game of all times !!!
SPAAAAACE;-;>Never used green text before. >Used to hate this game. >Went to a cyber-cafe to meet some friends, they were playing this game. Couldn't wait for them to finish playing, so I decided I would join them, even though I never really played it. >Died 100+ times with 4 kills. >My ego got injured. >Got home, downloaded the game illegally then started playing. >Got good. >Bought good gaming hardware. >Got even better. >Got to my friends level (while they were getting better as well), then got better than them for a while. >Nothing else really. >Bought this and the other CS games, couldn't get into them, so I got back to this. Now I hate my friends for stealing my social life.
wburton72;-;CS is a awesome game with a friendly and mature online community. Its one of the best games out there, and its a classic!!
GaMePlaY;-;Old but good.
SmitHzZzz;-;best online game in this whole world :D <3 jst in love with it !!
Zebiekste;-;Realy Good game. =)
wburton72;-;CS is a awesome game with a friendly and mature online community. Its one of the best games out there, and its a classic!!
GaMePlaY;-;Old but good.
Nasty;-;Worlds best game, sad we're not able to play this game anymore. RIP 1.6 2003~2012
TheLastonerStanding420;-;old but new great game
PhaN_ToM;-;Probably that's been 7 years since the last time I played 1.6, and I'm glad that I made the decision to buy it again and have fun with the old gal. Everything is such a great and nostalgic experience. I don't even wanna touch the CS:GO right now unless my friends ask me for a pre-made team.
Cloud9's #1 adderall supplier.;-;Howdy partners, y all s need to grow da  up and play some GO.
CHakLI gUJjU_Bhai^_Sexy boy<3;-;2 addictive!!!!!! *_^
reflexe;-;the nostalgia is real 11/10
Darkness Rush;-;Cod rip off 0/10 just kidding best classic ever 100% worth worth buying <3
Gangsta Kitten;-;Not nearly as good, in the ways of graphics, compared to source, but in other ways, it's better in maps! 10/10!
IPGaius Iulius Caesar;-;Counter-Strike is a tactical first-person shooter video game which originated from a Half-Life modification and features real-world weapons. Counter-Strike pits a team of counter-terrorists against a team of terrorists in a series of rounds. Each round is won by either completing the mission objective or eliminating the opposing force. The game has both individual and multiplayer options. Bots can be added into the game. The online-multiplayer option is activated via Steam. Other than similarities in basic gameplay, Counter-Strike is not in any way related to Half-Life. The original version was marketed as a commercial mod, but since then it has grown into a separate game in itself.
twitch.tv/post4kost;-;Forever! My lovely game! Im start to play at this game when i was 6 years old!
LEO;-;1 of d best games ever released :D
NoriZ;-;Let's see... Where to start? I don't think there is a single person, who has ever played any FPS games and doesn't know CS 1.6. This is an epic game. An evergreen. A classic. This is where FPS gaming begins. Yea, it's a bit old, it's a bit buggy, the graphics are outdated, but that's how we love it. CS 1.6 is just perfect - well, on its own way. If you've never played it, buy it. 10/10
Roger;-;everythings fine...
KarimDz;-;awsome game (y) my first play on 2004 no steam :p
BMW ///M Power;-;One of the best FPS games :)
YousseF;-;This My favroite Game ! :D
viper99;-;this my beast game <3
Bhai;-;not good graphics but best gameplay (y)
Bao-Le-58;-;A great game of cat-and-mouse where you either play as a terrorist (plant bombs or hold hostages) or counter-terrorist (defend bombsites or rescue hostages). Either complete those objectives or kill all players of the opposing team to win the round. Counter-Strike is a fast-paced, realistic shooter that encourages teamwork so play with a friend (it's also more fun). The graphics hasn't aged well but the guns still looks authentic. One thing I hate about Counter-Strike is when you die, you have to sit and wait until the round ends. Even if the rounds are usually short, it's frustrating and it puts a ton of anxiety to your efforts of staying alive. Fortunately, Counter-Strike has tons of mods available so you're able to play the game in many different ways. This helps the game from becoming repetitive and keep the game fresh. There's also not a lot of detail in the sound, other than the guns, but that's a minor complaint. The mods, dedicated servers and competitive nature of the game is what holds this game together to this day and that's why millions of people still play this old-school game. Although there are many better shooters on the market now, Counter-Strike's unique gameplay is what keeps me coming back from time to time. 8/10 - GREAT GAME!
Tom3dJay;-;I recommend you this game if you're 12 years old who just discovered weed.
GusDeCooL;-;Classic but really love this game.
SANCHEZ-;-;number one
Fon;-;Sometime puke makes you excited
Vegeta^.^ |Trader;-;I Really enjoy playing cs 1.6 . This is a great game and i really enjoy . I recommend you all to play this game . Hence, this is one of the best games i have ever played .
hama.;-;Nice game
Unknown Mech;-;A classic and always will be! must get for classic game lovers!
justSyker;-;Old but still good.
Esco;-;CS 1.6 <3
TinkerBtch12013;-;After 14 years still a great game. Forget the console games computer rules....
LaNDsCaPeR;-;This is a good game i recommended to you. This game is old bath a good game for nolifers. If you play this i recommend a server Ladie.lt this is a good server. This server is of Lithuianian country.
PlzJustDie CSGOFAST.COM;-;Classical Fps still awesome after 15 years
Olivia Nalen;-;Rilly good game.
PyRo`cL;-;The best game I have ever played and will continue to play
StYhK;-;The best game I have play,it is very free in the game,it not only a fps game,we can add mod in it and we can drive.jumping kreedz do everything on this game: )nice old gold,but now a lot of people play csgo,that is nice too!
Julian Assange;-;this game sucks
DragonLore;-;Best Game availabe in Steam,love this game.
GusDeCooL;-;Classic but really love this game.
SANCHEZ-;-;number one
Bhai;-;not good graphics but best gameplay (y)
Noobie^=;-;its a bestest game frevr..love it
iAWPtoPro.;-;a game on which i can spend hrs :D
BMW ///M Power;-;One of the best FPS games :)
Fon;-;Sometime puke makes you excited
unique.;-;This MMORPG is off the chain! The story line is really intriguing and the in-game NPCs are just a delight! 2 thumbs WAY up ur butt
Zaert21;-;it's alright i mean it was one of best games of it's time and it's good if you don't have css
mid off please im noob cant supp;-;One of the best games ever made
Orange Penguin;-;The Classic, 1.6 was a great mod and IS a great Game
White Iverson;-;Best Game Ive Ever Purchased!
sprutt;-;This is the best game ever made. Everything about the game is awesome. Too bad its dying.
fL1cK -A-;-;Really a GOLD game, we will mis u <3 best game ever :)
ale3xdyo;-;Best shooter ever
Bread;-;NIce game
FuR!0u$ k@m4^^/-(Panda);-;Awesome game! Recommended by me :D
Spec;-;One of the best fps games EVER.buy it
omrih;-;My favorite game , alot of mods good game 10/10
0  [];-;cheat game :D
Gay Donut;-;can some one help me, i picked windowed mode, and now its very zoomed in. its so zoomed in i cant change it back. i also try to uninstall then install it again, but it wont show up in my control panel, plz help
bioX;-;My precious ;P
[Get High?] Tiki;-;Best game tbh :)
crynow;-;Was a pleasure ... while it lasted.
ezpzRANDOM!;-;This game is sooooooooooo fun special when u play the custom mods
ARGILA :3;-;It's the most multiplayer game in the world , and I love this game too much it's so beautiful
MrSiS;-;The best game ever!!!
DL;-;Precision FPS. You are rarely rewarded for spraying your weapon, its all about controlled firing for headshots; somthing that is unique to this release.
Nerdicus;-;The game is good, but not a lot of people play the original anymore. If you don't have any friends who play this one, stick to CS Source, because the few servers in the original that are populated are not exactly your standard modes usually. But a good competitive shooter none-the-less
Qenzoo;-;I like this GAME =]
abel1an;-;The best game ever
hyperboY *Razer;-;best of all (y)
SupeRMan [DC];-;excellent game one never gets bored of it addicted xD B|
Captain Toad;-;If you like shooting that is not just all run and gun and take a little thinking, then this is the game for you.
KevinS;-;if you like old shooters then this game is for you
710 #dabitfegget;-;The real OG, compare to others, and they aint .
Spook;-;best game on the worlds
tobiii;-;awesome sauce
LUCKY STRIKE;-;cool game
Wyjebambo;-;Just awesome.
Cheejyg;-;Play the world's number 1 online action game. Engage in an incredibly realistic brand of terrorist warfare in this wildly popular team-based game. Ally with teammates to complete strategic missions. Take out enemy sites. Rescue hostages. Your role affects your team's success. Your team's success affects your role.
Davey Darko;-;I've been playing the original CS for years, and its still one of my favorite multiplayergames.
Richii;-;Very good game, made my whole childhood.
Snooze^^;-;a classic, will be awesome forever :)
-[FaZe]- xX_w33d5c0p3r420_xXx;-;Lots of fun despite every player being pro old men that have been playing since the 90s.
Marni7x7;-;Bhop
Elite;-;Good ol' 1.6, many memories, not really. I haven't played it that much.
AtaKkeR;-;the best classic FPS in the world
magicarN;-;I recommend it!!! I like to play this game 10/10 :D
chiken;-;Nice game, i reccomend it to all
dank maymay;-;amazing i would make more snipers tho
Ablaze | khukri;-;I can't imagine my day without playing atleast for an hour !! :P
smaj #4;-;yes great game
Tandem;-;I love this game
BloodM3ss;-;As i got PC... I dont remember any other game that was so easy to just "click & play" :)
oyAnN;-;Best version of Counter Strike. For ME. :D
Jaunius;-;The game whos have not so strong hardware overall this game rocks gots many server, many mods like - Team death match, Zombie mod, Surf mod or just stay calm and play public servers.
nivek;-;great classic game! <less bugs than in the f new cs go>
Knight fokko of the Abyss!.-;-;Far, the best shooter ever, css and csgo aren't the same!
F34RME;-;classic game still playable
M0lnja;-;The best Game ever. Buy this legendary game and play the world's number 1 online action game. Engage in an incredibly realistic brand of terrorist warfare in this wildly popular team-based game. Ally with teammates to complete strategic missions. Take out enemy sites. Rescue hostages. Your role affects your team's success. Your team's success affects your role. Dont think twice BUY IT . You will not regread.
SyBeRNiDE__;-;Counter strike: Source is better... but I like the cover for this one better.....
MaZo;-;A classic. Fps history right here.
riwy;-;Very nice, people may disagreee because of its graphics but come on! it doesn't matter. :D
Vajo;-;Source > 1.6
RAEP TIEM pls.;-;I recommend it. Because of the skins. They are awesome.
`AbraXas|Ti10;-;Highly recommended for players who need to experience the grateful time of a shooting game . It is easy to play this game with no real difficulties and appropriate for newbies . If you will play this game for 2-3 months .... You will soon be a Pro !
Gpu  Cookie;-;Will always be better than GO! :]
BattleBunny;-;Who needs new call of duty or battlefield, when we got this? "The Legend" 10/10
`Andrey T. #SteelSeries.com =;-;CooL ! )
m4tik;-;Just "Counter-Strike" ! King of FPS games. Nothing more, nothing less ;]
Krishna;-;whenever i start the game there is a black screen...i can hear the noise but the screen remains black! why is thin happening tell me ASAP
n0thing  THE GLORY;-;The Best Game !
WaLLe;-;Great Game
TopGun #STEELSERIES;-;The best game of the world.
en neger;-;Great game
aget(cock) * Lenas Frisrer;-;Cannot emphasise on how great this game is. It's ridiculously fun with friends, mods and such. A tad old, but it's still functional. 9/10.
Gwyn Lord of Cinder;-;So Classic :)
Freaky Tah;-;everyone i know already owns this game. but for those that dont. i recommend counterstrike if you want a lesson in what it was like back when men liked women, and shooting games were not made for casuals.
Spoder Man;-;A must have,I love it,it has a lot of tactics. Childhood memories playing this on my old windows 98 computer. Come on it's only $9.99. It is worth it you know.
Noice;-;If CS:GO never came out, I'd probably be playing this all the time instead. Still fun to jump into once and a while, even for nostalgia's sake.
LEvi;-;It's a classic FPS, and given its reputation among other First Person Shooters it could be considered the grand daddy of them all
Jake;-;The best for all!!!!!!!
Grillo;-;CS 1.6 is the best FPS ever made. I call it the "the game that started it all" but you kids with your damn, new graphics and your Call of Duties....GO TO HELL!!! Buy this game and play you bunch of pansies!
<3;-;Sexy Game~~!!
Badshooter 270;-;If your on Steam, and over 18, get this game. It is where online FPS games really started.
FreXzOn;-;Nice game. :)
megamanX4;-;old but good
Terry;-;Very entertaining !
Awesomeguy02;-;I ING LOVE THIS GAME!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
majestic;-;The best
Millsy;-;So sad that there SOO many cheats on her now :/
sid;-;I guess it's the best shooter ever made!
H@CK;-;BEEST fps and action game ever
Hellsome #unranked;-;the best game in the Universe , no other game can be compared to this awesome game
fade!;-;Nice Online Game :D
RoTxTrEmE;-;Awesome...allways love playing this game
Scherz0 Bull' Live STRONG;-;IP : 176.57.128,40:27056 COME ON !!
Miroo;-;Soo much great memories with this, but who is telling this is not getting old is a liar cause today It's realy cumbersome and hard to take.
vExOus;-;Still owns..
zero;-;Excelent game. Old but still awesome!
TheAlmightyGooch;-;Classic FPS fun. Nothing beats the original. (Except maybe source) But you'll be happy to find that both 1.6 and Source still have thriving communities. The best thing about 1.6 is that it's requirements are a potato (lamp recommended) and chances are, it will run flawlessly on your system. I don't need to praise the gameplay because what else can be said that hasn't already? Deathmatch, gun game, bomb defuse and many more. And with what seems to be an endless amount of fun and creative maps at it's disposal, it's no wonder people still play it today. If you have steam CS 1.6 is ESSENTIAL. (I also recommend source)
Do u wnna build a SNOWMAN;-;I cant get the game to work it starts but i dont se the load screen i just see black
hack3d;-;this games so hot, i rub myself too it...
[Evo] Aleksandr;-;It's the best game.
(YR*)~Bermudagras~;-;boss
kadabra;-;its the best B|
KaziPloae;-;nice game and the graphic is awensome
BOBSENSEI-KG;-;the best game!
Madness~;-;The best game ever!
Inspector Gulok;-;A classic! Great game... literally hundreds over hours played since I acquired during initial release...*
Dreech\A\ #Pillz;-;Classic shooter. :)
Bao-Le-58;-;A great game of cat-and-mouse where you either play as a terrorist (plant bombs or hold hostages) or counter-terrorist (defend bombsites or rescue hostages). Either complete those objectives or kill all players of the opposing team to win the round. Counter-Strike is a fast-paced, realistic shooter that encourages teamwork so play with a friend (it's also more fun). The graphics hasn't aged well but the guns still looks authentic. One thing I hate about Counter-Strike is when you die, you have to sit and wait until the round ends. Even if the rounds are usually short, it's frustrating and it puts a ton of anxiety to your efforts of staying alive. Fortunately, Counter-Strike has tons of mods available so you're able to play the game in many different ways. This helps the game from becoming repetitive and keep the game fresh. There's also not a lot of detail in the sound, other than the guns, but that's a minor complaint. The mods, dedicated servers and competitive nature of the game is what holds this game together to this day and that's why millions of people still play this old-school game. Although there are many better shooters on the market now, Counter-Strike's unique gameplay is what keeps me coming back from time to time. 8/10 - GREAT GAME!
Tom3dJay;-;I recommend you this game if you're 12 years old who just discovered weed.
nexattack;-;great game
BloodM3ss;-;As i got PC... I dont remember any other game that was so easy to just "click & play" :)
Captain Toad;-;If you like shooting that is not just all run and gun and take a little thinking, then this is the game for you.
MaZo;-;A classic. Fps history right here.
justSyker;-;Old but still good.
Esco;-;CS 1.6 <3
SkeeNN * 1337;-;cool game :)
^ BiRDiE ^;-;Beyond words !! Addicted to 1.6 :)
TAKE IT!!;-;Classic game :)!
uNstopp1bl3;-;This game is FPS its soo cool
abe916;-;After not playing this game for almost a decade, honestly can say it is just as fun!
a.kim;-;Best competitive game of all time!
Tequila~;-;Nice game :)
sprutt;-;This is the best game ever made. Everything about the game is awesome. Too bad its dying.
fL1cK -A-;-;Really a GOLD game, we will mis u <3 best game ever :)
Nikshels;-;This game is oldschool. I'm always playing on HnS or Kreedz servers, so it's the thing i like here, the physics to play HNS here. I've played this game for like 5 or more years already, and it feels great. Feel free to play with me, have a good time! PEACE.
Larnaka mj lv ;;;;;;-;+- 2 500/3 000 Hours on this game but on this account just 250hours.This game ruined my life 10/10 Thanks VALVe
MrSiS;-;The best game ever!!!
DL;-;Precision FPS. You are rarely rewarded for spraying your weapon, its all about controlled firing for headshots; somthing that is unique to this release.
TyronasaurusRex;-;Tons of fun, but there's a couple newer versions now.
(JIMDAWGZ) jewpac;-;absolute classic, for only ten bucks why the hell not!
Tonnerre-RayonX;-;This is where the best FPS franchise started!
I No Pro. :|;-;Hell yeah!!
connerrocks09;-;Ok, I'll be honest when i first got this game i was a little uneasy but i just played it today and this game is astoundingly great for either nostalga or somebody who want a fun experiance when not haveing such a good pc so id buy it. Have fun
j$kyy *g2a.com;-;HIT GAME,VALVE SHOULD DELETE IT TO GET MORE SOURCE AND GO PLAYERS....!!!!!!!!!
Tonnerre-RayonX;-;This is where the best FPS franchise started!
Smart.;-;A classic example of "originals are often best". Much better than GO.
MCN "The GF30";-;Best FPS for Valve. I love this game. You should really buy this epic game and its franchise.
Cosminssen;-;the best
connerrocks09;-;Ok, I'll be honest when i first got this game i was a little uneasy but i just played it today and this game is astoundingly great for either nostalga or somebody who want a fun experiance when not haveing such a good pc so id buy it. Have fun
j$kyy *g2a.com;-;HIT GAME,VALVE SHOULD DELETE IT TO GET MORE SOURCE AND GO PLAYERS....!!!!!!!!!
Tequila~;-;Nice game :)
pupciks Flick@dA@BrokenWrist;-;Hello people, i would like to spread the world about this game. Graphics kinda bad, but its about the action, eh? So, it is mainly based as a game, terrorists vs counter-terrorists. Terrorists have to plant the bomb,(at de_maps) or secure the hostages (at cs_maps). Counter ones needs to do the opposite, defuse or deny the bomb (at de_maps) and get the hostages back (at cs_maps). There are a lot of mods, if you dont like the classic mode. But i really think that everyone knows about this game :). P.s. Im doing this for a steam badge :D
Qenzoo;-;I like this GAME =]
Vinni;-;The mother of FPSs!? CSGO is better now imo tho. But loads of great memories! <3
MikkisJESUS-;-;Awesome game, played for years, I recommend it for new players to improve their skills ;)
Diablo;-;The best old-school fps game in the world :D
Noobie^=;-;its a bestest game frevr..love it
Winnie the Pooh;-;This game is one of the most addicting games and the most fun games on steam.
Bboy Beam;-;1.6 is my life !! i still love 1.6 than GO... fukyeah
KnightShadow;-;Still the best game ever!!!!!!!!
Hey Blake wanna play;-;rob weeaboo "IS" a ing homo
I.R.B.Y.;-;It's iconic ...
ZeeshaN~;-;Awesome game But ended cuz of cheaters :(
Stuff;-;The origin of addiction... One of the most fun games I've had the pleasure of enjoying and the one who threw me to the vibrant world of FPS, my favorite genre 'til this day. Now, important information: do not be fooled by the amount of hours marked by Steam. There, when the beta versions were launched in 1999, when the game was free. Then 1.6 was launched until about 4 years ago, I had it in a different account, which I do not own anymore. Over a decade of gaming, several hours every day, which certainly have accumulated thousands of hours. By far the most played game throughout my life... You see, the first sentence that illustrates this review was not chosen at random. I had to stop playing completely, cold turkey, or I would fail high school. Just decided to buy it again and play for nostalgia sake. I'm not afraid, I'm much more self controlled now and the fact that I'm not even half as good as before, kinda takes away the compulsion to play. By far the longest relationship I have ever had and we are getting back together... this is a good day.
ale3xdyo;-;Best shooter ever
Orange Penguin;-;The Classic, 1.6 was a great mod and IS a great Game
DiCom;-;Pretty good, 9.6/10.
Kind.;-;one of the games everyone with a pc should own. this game reigned supreme in the early 2000's its runs perfectly on almost any computer.. its disputedly the best team based fps of all pc gaming history.. it probably is. if you have a pc and u dont own any counter-strike games.. where the hell have you been? welcome to online fps.
XxeoN;-;this game is the best game every ING - 10/10
MafiaK1;-;still the best cs out there... if valve would add matchmaking like cs:go got it i would pay for it again
OH SHIT! It's Bernie Sanders!;-;This game is dog S H I T
Just Call Me Asian <VACation >;-;My childhood in nutshells
proman;-;It's the best game i've ever played.
GeT_ShrekT;-;this is a ing shiti game....
SoylentGreen;-;"Like ISIS but from the past"-IGN
Cpt.Muffin Donutson McNugget;-;It's k for a gaem with low grphics. Lol 69 fps
Svyat;-;Well-known game physics and graphics. Based on famous Half-life 1998, not hardware damanding, Linux and Legacy Windows friendly (even Win98). Very consecutive like a chess or math, great game for competitions! Best FPS shooter IMO.
poltergeist;-;This game.. ohh, it's a legend. 16/10
DiCom;-;Pretty good, 9.6/10.
Kind.;-;one of the games everyone with a pc should own. this game reigned supreme in the early 2000's its runs perfectly on almost any computer.. its disputedly the best team based fps of all pc gaming history.. it probably is. if you have a pc and u dont own any counter-strike games.. where the hell have you been? welcome to online fps.
MafiaK1;-;still the best cs out there... if valve would add matchmaking like cs:go got it i would pay for it again
OH SHIT! It's Bernie Sanders!;-;This game is dog S H I T
Just Call Me Asian <VACation >;-;My childhood in nutshells
XxeoN;-;this game is the best game every ING - 10/10
GeT_LiFe;-;1 of my favorite games and the first game I bought on steam.Its worth buy u will never get bored of playing on the servers.
12d3;-;Nothing beats a classic.
skret;-;never grew up with this game, rip
J^0ker;-;One of the best FPS game.
drr131313;-;Killed everyone of enemy team in a round Died in 5 sec in the next 10/10 would do it again.
eL-Fr@ppachin[] #Hasta La Vista;-;Cs 1.6 ftw!
Megaman;-;This is the best First person shooter EVER. PERIOD.
GeT_sHoT;-;This Game is stupid its to easy to get Headshot
Wobbs;-;Swat is upset about the de_forge update because he's never played that map before :(
Ruzis0;-;One of the best shooter game i ever played.
Jesper Wecksell;-;Cool game, played few times. 420/10
Gabe Newell;-;Old, but Gold
SAY WHAAAT?!?! OCKEEEY!!!;-;old school
spoderman hates his team;-;Old school game :)
Aimbot.exe Me Gysta;-;I love this game. That was the first game where i was start and i love it forever <3
Danny Devito;-;I died... alot 4.8/10 to much water
gRINKE;-;193.192.58.53:27015 Zrenjanin Public | zrenjanin-hq.com 193.192.58.82:27091 JEGER Bar | De_Dust2 Only | zrenjanin-hq.com 193.104.68.40:27015 Barcelona De_Dust2 Only | zrenjanin-hq.com 193.192.58.34:27015 Zrenjanin De_Inferno Only | zrenjanin-hq.com 193.192.58.66:27015 Zrenjanin DeathMatch | zrenjanin-hq.com www.zrenjanin-hq.com Zrenjanin Community TS3 IP: ts3.zrenjanin-hq.com
iAWPtoPro.;-;a game on which i can spend hrs :D
VACation;-;Was one of the best FPS games ever made, surived for a very extended period of time as the #1 Comp FPS game of its time. Great game, but would now go with CSGO instead of course.
Jake The Dog;-;can someone help me i went to video clicked widescreen now i can't get to video plus why the  would they put this in the game
420gaysniperdadfgtkid;-;15 years later, still playing this game.
Lucrative Handsoap;-;Went on a spanish server and 10 minutes later my bank account was wiped.
Maklibexx;-;Best FPS game in 2000, still is today. Better than COD. 11/10
My Life.JPG;-;Perfect fps game
BDawg;-;Old but Gold! You gotta try this !
bull8h17;-;Great Game.
lingk /MU/;-;Just amazing. Many mods. Just fun.
zoi;-;how can i remove my vac ban i get steam with vac ban :S
Fr0mmi;-;Great game classic play! the only cs game that i still like!
MOVITS!;-;Still the most fun and nostalgic game out there.
Bloo;-;The best game ever!!<3
RaduPhantom;-;The most classic shooter you can find.
#sL;-;best fps-shooter ever ^^
barm^RGN;-;MULTIKILL, ULTRAKILL, MONSTER KILL, GODLIKE, H0LY  AND UNSTOPPABLE.
SawyStillLearnin;-;Hard at First, but once you get the hang of it its the most fun game!!! 10/10
nomischen;-;I has a plan
Ethan;-;Counter-Strike 1.6, what much is there to say? This is and will be the best Counter-Strike there has been. It is a classic shooter and will always be a favourite of mine.
Renken;-;Simply the best fps game ever !
GeneralPuff;-;WOW, this game, man. This freakin game!!! It's amazing! Valve made a good choice hiring the guys who made this. Praise Lord Gaben!
Towlie;-;Great Game i like the gameplay its just like source Rating: 10 out of 10
Redbreaker47;-;Waltz out of spawn in full kevlar and a helmet. Sniopeh. Shoot at sniopeh, get snioped. DERP
BossBK;-;very nice game
donKr;-;Best shooter :-)
aLL28;-;One of best game ever. 10/10
LuckeNw$w-;-;old but
Burn1nSun;-;The sniper scope looks exactly what it looks like in real life
I3u[R]n;-;Please unban my VAC ban... I'm sorry for hacking. I will never cheat
gorillaz145;-;dis gaem is run by romanians and hakkers and stolen copies of the game. lol pley a better gaem like kuntterstrik condishun ziro
ProtoGee;-;childhood game when cousins pirating this game lol good times now that i own it zombie mod anyone?
Colonel Fedora;-;Although I don't have many hours on this account, I have over 1000 hours in total. This game is the first ever game that set off counter strike... ON STEAM. Great FPS and strategy game!
Spr!nt^;-;The one the only.
pupsik;-;It's my first game! I very like it!
bloxman41;-;Would not really recomend because new players cant even get a single kill because everyones a pro but still can be fun at times.
C25HO.;-;Brilliant definetly worth the money!
- EdwYnNNN;-;CS1.6 BEST GAME IN THE WORLD
Spasyabrissobeautiful;-;Game for all times :D
I3u[R]n;-;Please unban my VAC ban... I'm sorry for hacking. I will never cheat
pupsik;-;It's my first game! I very like it!
Redbreaker47;-;Waltz out of spawn in full kevlar and a helmet. Sniopeh. Shoot at sniopeh, get snioped. DERP
saadthemonkey;-;The classic counter-strike! very fun and a nice game, I enjoy playing this and it is a great fps with friends!!
-> Sac<-;-;This is great game... Graphics is no good but it's great multiplayer.
Kaptin Bergsthor;-;It got at least 10 times better love story than Twilight and Counter-Strike: Global Offensive.
Mil'Bereth;-;This is the game that started it all...quite literally. This game's popularity spawned the very system you are reading this on. Steam would not exist if not for Counter Strike, and quite frankly the world would not be as good a place without it. If you don't have this...you should be questioning why you even have Steam. (Although its acceptable if you are younger and have a newer version like Source or GO).
DaNiLkA;-;Nice game
saadthemonkey;-;The classic counter-strike! very fun and a nice game, I enjoy playing this and it is a great fps with friends!!
Mil'Bereth;-;This is the game that started it all...quite literally. This game's popularity spawned the very system you are reading this on. Steam would not exist if not for Counter Strike, and quite frankly the world would not be as good a place without it. If you don't have this...you should be questioning why you even have Steam. (Although its acceptable if you are younger and have a newer version like Source or GO).
DaNiLkA;-;Nice game
Colt_0pz;-;Most think CS was released in 2000. It actually was released on june 19, 1999 (before HL: opposing force) as a GoldSrc mod for free. Later when Gooseman joined valve it was released as a retail game for about 10 dollars. Overall you cannot deny the fact that CS was one of the best games of all time and in my opinion it is slightly better than GO but that's my opinion.
btR.im;-;No words... Just awesome game!
Kaptin Bergsthor;-;It got at least 10 times better love story than Twilight and Counter-Strike: Global Offensive.
YakuzYah ^.^;-;Fire in the hole! PEW PEW PEW Storm the front! PEW PEW PEW Need backu--ughh... Counter terrorists win kappa
Finding Muchi;-;Great counter strike loved it. i used to play it in 2005 amazing 9/10 would play it again if i didnt have any games to finish
dannythebad;-;This game is really cool, it's one of the best Counter-Strikes, recommend playing this game! Its a fantastic game !!
MrSpeed;-;Counter-Strike is a classic game and it's the best , 1st online game played in my life.
littlemouse;-;Life is 1. CS is 1.6 :)
generalcondict;-;Can't find any people who speak english. That's okay, because I'm Osama.
Luffy;-;Since 8 years ago this game stays no. 1
Black_Knight[RIP Mr. Iwata];-;Spent 80% of my early life on this game 5% of the people i've met there were russians 100000/10
shao #Booter.net Owner;-;"As of August 2011, the Counter-Strike franchise has sold over 25 million units" from wiki :) That says it all.
NoisY_KillER;-;THIS IS THE BEST GAME ON EARTH !!!!!!!!!!!!
WhiteFool104;-;15 Years after release, still would rate 10/10. Having fun since 4 yr old, there was no competitive back then tho :P
z3eeK <Logitech>;-;By far the best first person shooter I've ever played.
Immortal;-;Classic great game, if you have not played it you should!
V70R Turbo p landet;-;best game ever made and the beginning of esport and after 17 years it still a very good game but dont much people play it that is very sad because its very good and the best game ever made. The graphics don't really matter or it looks like minecraft fps it's about the game how you play it, it still is the best game ever made and is the start of Counter-Strike series but not a single Counter-Strike that has been made after 1.6 is not comparable with 1.6. The game engine is so good are nice and the graphics arent good but that how i think cs should be, like the bad look and back in the days when you couldn't do very good 3D models of the map and the weapons etc now when csgo came the game looks very good and beautifal it look like cod and you dont get the counter-strike feeling.
[Cool_Guy]TBCR;-;there are more people playing on this 1.6 than Source
gordan freeman;-;"like skyrim with low res terrorists" 10/10 -IGN
UniversalCerealBus;-;(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole!(RADIO): Fire In The Hole! 11/10
Mr.Spookey;-;It's a good game. If only I could stay alive for more than 5 seconds to play the game.
Wolf;-;Old but Gold
Amoeba;-;This version of CS is obsolete. Your game can get hacked if you join the wrong server. It happened to me. Now when I try to join any server it just sends me to a foreign server with bots.
Chael Sonnen;-;greatest of all time
Randomguy7;-;just buy this  masterpiece and love every second of it.
Blingie;-;gurl i just got ma nailz done n dis  be like dayum gurl dem nailz holy  dem nailz *hyperventilating intensifies*
mazak;-;I hate this game...
Mr. UmeR*;-;Love It <3
CC;-;dont play it
Phenomenal Diesel;-;Well .. what can I say.. This game is very nice since CS:GO was developed thanks to this game.. A lot of memories when I was a kid :P and real fun to play
fudwud;-;It copied CS:GO
Divine.;-;I Love this game <3
Warr1or;-;good game for play
Warr1or;-;good game for play
Walter White;-;It's Counter-Strike. Sadly, with all the other good games that come out, this one is just... "That old game that you won't ever play again". The game just gets boring, BUT, it has a lot of different mods and server plug-ins which can make of this a decent game for a few hours. I have bought this, and I don't regret buying it, but if you have something else in mind, leave this one as the second choice. 6/10.
#LovaOne;-;The best online shooter i ever play, but after AVA :P
bL1zz;-;Best game ever. Counter strike of all counter strikes.
Krystal;-;Nothing to say But Best Classic FPS!
klen;-;old memoriesssss. 1.6 is always going to be the best fps shooter!
Daud;-;Badass game of the year 1999. 9/10 + weapons + mods (CTF, DM...) - Community (cheaters, cheaters everywhere)
[][7]_[0]xide_[7][];-;My old school tactical fps.Its still have a classic atmosfere and gameplay.My best game from 90s.
Nomine;-;Best FPS out there, no doubt. With so many different mods, maps and time it takes to get bored with this game, I just can't think of a better FPS game. Best of all, it's all fun usually - except when you get kicked from a lithuanian/polish server for speaking english or asking to ban a wallhacker. 9/10 ...because server list is so big and many of the servers are full of bots, only serving purpose to redirect players to join someone elses server. It can be hard to find a real server.
You Dummies;-;It's the original CS on Steam! You just can't go wrong with this one.
Intameable;-;and we've got the biggest nades of them all!
-=]BG[=-^~ SuP3[R]MaN^ <3usmr...;-;i love this game :)
Live $how;-;really awesome game and steam helped me to improve my cs 1.6 game thank you steam
INTESA;-;battle of psychics
GRENDIZER;-;Still better than BF3 . 1.6 4EVER <3
aSp1c;-;This is for the Steam Badges. Thnks
DORE;-;CRapp but i will play it more and more and more and will teach my kids to play in that crap more and more and more.
You Dummies;-;It's the original CS on Steam! You just can't go wrong with this one.
Intameable;-;and we've got the biggest nades of them all!
#difionex;-;"Worst game ever, worst graphics" The graphics are that bad because the game is older than your mothers fanny and the game is awesome itself. Brings all the good memories back. For example when I was 7, installing the cracked version of that game and then just shooting anyone who gets in my way without controlling the recoil. (  and lol traded this game for some crappy AK-47 in CS GO. Huehuehuehuehue. I give it 8/8 m8. pls liek no hate no homo tenks. Oh and btw the funniest thing about this game is brining your CS GO skills there, doing 1 hit kills and then getting banned from servers for "hacking" Like I've joined a sever once, done 7 headshots in a row without dying, then some speccy  is sayin': "wh and aim off or im banning you." So yea this game is fabulous 8/8 would rate again.
2Bit. * fragnet;-;Recomand!!
-Thund3r- | S> 13 unusuals;-;One of the best childhood games i have ever played! 10/10 !
Varexos;-;Graphics are crap, but its a good game.
[LP] CerealKiller;-;The graphics might be bad, but who cares? People said that Wind Waker was bad only for the graphics, but once you played it, it was AWESOME. Same with this game, the graphics might be bad, but what do you expect from a game that was amde in 2000? But once you play this, it's really fun.
some 1 gift me invo set :D;-;yea the best game .....
Asux;-;childhood
Senelis ...;-;nice game but needs a workshop.
retard;-;Wallbangs everywhere. 9/11 would buy again.
leggo;-;Wait, what is this? Counter-Strike?! Yes.. It's Counter-Strike.. the old FPS Game.. I've loved this game very much.. It's my Childhood Game.. This game doesn't have it's amazing duper 2014 graphics, but instead.. It's the gameplay we're talking about... So the Gameplay.. It's very fun but bit serious if you can ask me.. this game made me very serious at some period of time but the gameplay is still pretty fun.. and to derp around with it.. such as editing it's textures and etc.. I've seen people having troubles playing this game online because full of try-hards or any pros out there.. well there's no bots included in Counter-Strike but you can go practice at Counter-Strike Condition Zero, it has bots.. This game isn't free and you have to buy it. I'll only suggest people who really likes Old FPS or Competitive Gaming around here!~ Game on mates! I highly suggest you buy this game for the people who really likes FPS here..
CrYsis;-;this is most famous online game !! ;D
Sh0GuNNNNNN;-;This is the best multiplayer game. really its the best. :-)
GAMER;-;The Best First Person Game Ever
Dustin;-;I love Counter Strike, I should end it here. But I'll be honest and say I grew up with Source, wasn't old enough to experince 1.6 sadly. But giving it a try, it's very different, having to buy ammo, see what the original maps looked like before being changed in Source. And dealing with pros that somehow can deal with the game choppyness and inaccuracy. I'll stick with Source, but great game! 9/10
Putin;-;better than  go no cheats
Tatsuya Hiroki #Victoryisours;-;Its one of the best tactical team shooter game that is still played by masses even today. Do I really need to explain why? :)
ANGELKA  N;-;MISS THIS GAME SO MUCH :(
Free style gaming;-;Loved this game and i played it 7 years but now it has no scope.If you want to play, you can play for fun only~
eGGroLL';-;Cool game. I like it because of bhop, knife, and zombie mod on modded servers
psydex;-;I've spend bajilion hours on this one. Best game from the series IMO. Remember it's not all about the graphics - gameplay is what matters. 8/10
Tikhung;-;Classic....
Capti in Tartara;-;running this at 60fps doesn't really help seeing as how the animations are at about 15fps. gotta respect the classics though.
Nitro.;-;www.forffan.lv - CounterStrike Gaming Community!
huguera;-;This game just changed my life :) Playing since 2002.
throw;-;Owsome Game :)
kinnn;-;Old but gold !
GAZcool;-;This is a old version of counter strike, and i freaking love it! i know the graphics are awful, but that is usual with such an old game, only sad thing is there are no BOTS :( that is always fun. (8/10 because the game is so much fun to play, but there is not much to do :p)
Based_Wampy;-;I know 99.9 percent won't read this but i am a 5 year old and I play minecraft I wank furiously and snort massive amounts of cocaine when I'm home alone
el cinto;-;they should have just renamed this game to de_dust2
Thekings2468;-;This game is now overran by cracked  non-steam kids... i can't understand who plays this now
oasis;-;GREAT GAME BUT Wish they added vac theres so many hackers Down sides IF you want to play pugs .If your american and only understand english the majority of the players are mexican and speak spanish .Everyone is A BIG JERK they will kick you or voteban you for anything, if you dont get a kill, IF YOU SAVE, and if u team flash but not on purpose, even if u die and everyone else did they will still ban you .The Admins are TOXIC as hell, they are the biggest jerks ever they have all the power. Once i was on t side and we were going long and everyone died so i rotated to b but before i got there and i got banned for the reason "just because". .HACKERS SO MANY HACKERS Normal Casual games .The Admin arent as bad, sure you will get that one toxic admin but the majority are really cool .The Admins are very precaustion for hackers because they want everyone to have a great time .Majority of the new players are nice and the old one are friendly as well. The Game itself .The Best Reason why i dont want to recommend this game .The People on this game are toxic and the expect you to be the greatest, its just people that ruin it not saying everyone is but ALOT of them are realy jackasses.
MiG-21bis Fishbed-L;-;This is great if you like  things like bloated adminmods and wanna be CAL-i rejects
peetsa;-;I find it impossible to improve at this game in any way.
Mclane //TwilightVomit;-;it's basically just clicking on people until they die
Canesminior;-;I really would like to recommend this game, it's amazing, but this game is infected with hackers. The Valve Anti-Cheat in this game has gone wrong, it would never ban a cheater but bans innocent gamers. A friend of mine got banned from this game, five years ago, and he still can't play, even the prisoners IRL have second chances, but not in a game? Really Gabe Newell?
Night Fury;-;Was good... Now... Now it's full of hackers, non steam players with toaster computers that cant speak basic english, and bot servers.
Gumpyro;-;Be carefull on what server you are on, if you get in a romanian server you might have a big change on being hacked and destroys your cs 1.6.
Do i look like a fucking Link?;-;I used to love it when i was a kid, now i know how broken and  it is.
M00N #Back 20th August;-;During my Computer class in school after playing Cs on Steam i got this VAC ban about 9 yrs ago...so...still cant play it after 9 damn yrs...really Steam?
Ms. Minty;-;You must be legally required to own this game to apply for citizenship in Mexico.
Touchofdread;-;Spent nearly 2 years on this. Don't know why
GESTAPO;-;If u are bored and dont know what to do with your life play this. Good MP.. Alot of Cheaters.. And can be downloaded for free. Overall 3/10
Johnthebaptist;-;never even played this dumbass game
Hydraulx;-;Since this game obviously doesn't have a negative review section... I like to wear dresses sometimes and cuddle my dog whilst telling him, "Good Boy"
CHOCTAWIND1AN;-;The game is outdated and I don't think anyone plays it. It's better to get the newer ones.
Rainbow Trout;-;This reboot of the series fell flat just go back to CS:GO
Jalalabad Choirboy;-;Counter Strike is even fight between highly trained American anti-terrorist team using latest in military technology to battle a group of really  madmen possessing crude bomb and surplus from USSR 1980's army supplies. Despite all training and technology terrorists still have good chance of blowing up market therefore much like real life. Game is currently full of hackers who fly on top of map so unless you hack or like getting aerial teabag please play better Counter Strike Sauce or Counter Strike Go game. This game has had its day and only exists for historical purposes. I remember times when internet cafe and mosque full of this game. No more.
The Spanish Inquisition;-;It's so boring it'll put you to sleep! A must have gay game!.....NOT! Do you love spawning every 5 seconds and then dieing instantly? Then this game's for you! Do you love hackers? Then this game's for you! Do you love outdated graphics? Then this game's for you! ZZZzzz....
Will you remember me.;-;well i know its old school BUT no
THRILLHO;-;What was probably considered then to be the definitive shooter it has now become a boring somewhat empty game with either pros or trolls. 6/10
2pak rzyje;-;Got banned for using SuperSimpleWalls v 13.22182 by amidamaru, this game is obviously a  compared to others, I spent 49.99$ on this hack and still got banned  u all
Earth;-;No good quality servers, and most people are hackers or get a cracked version of the game and threaten to DDOS you. Get CS:CZ, CS:S, or CS:GO because they have bots to play with if you can't even find a server. Might have been good 15 years ago but now it has been left to rot.
Vault Boy;-;Like downloading Quake sounds over and over? THIS GAME IS FOR YOU!! Also hackers.
NOXIOUSVEGETA;-;full of veterans
sadboi;-;Installed the game Joined a server Server changed every button on the keyboard to a command to join this server Changed the menu screen to ads for this server uninstall.exe This game is 16 years old why isn't this fixed for s sake
Otakudancer;-;A fun walk down nostalgia lane. That being said, I haven't seen a reason to replay this game in some time.
cl_ogar0;-;wasted too much of my life on this one
Johnny Ionut;-;It was better before 2010 when there were not so many hackers. Now is full of hackers... in CS:GO are like 30%-50% of hackers but in cs 1.6 there are over 60% hackers. Poor game now.
Kampy*;-;Classic game. Very innovative at its time and it's fun to play. You should get its second remake Counter-Strike: Global Offensive though which is improved in almost every aspect of the game. Only get this if you're a nostalgic freak :-)
chezTaco;-;I recommend this game to anyone who is a  up sucmbag
Swagtus;-;you can shoot! ''69/10 -IGN'' ''420/weed - Snoop Dogg'' ''11/10 - Microsoft''
Swagtus;-;you can shoot! ''69/10 -IGN'' ''420/weed - Snoop Dogg'' ''11/10 - Microsoft''
mitos shit acc;-;This game has its ups and downs but I can't stand playing it because of this damn resolution. Damn. I suggest getting cs:s or cs:go. Counter Strike original is good but there are no active servers. If you're buying this game you should also go get a subscribtion for ESEA as well.
mike tyson;-;so many hours wasted on this , i don't recommend playing it.
jrj85vg;-;For Nostalgia only the game has aged horribly, not only the graphics, but also the gameplay, and the multiplayer is overrun with cheaters and nerds, ugh, some games are better left in the past, where they belong
-=]BG[=-^~SAUSAGE;-;i love this game,,,,,,,,,,,,,,, born to plat 1.6
m00^ #Zero-Gravity;-;This was one of the best first person shooter and fps games. After steam updated the fpsengine and made other changes to the game after more than 10 years of good gameplay, I would rather say that this is a now a rip-off. The game doesn't work properly and the developers isn't listening to the players when they're updating the game. If steam would roll back the game to before they update I would recommend this game because of the good gameplay. At the moment because of the update I just want my money back!
Hippo Turtle;-;I first played Counter-Strike back in 1999, when it was still just a mod. I went to it on a daily basis, for several hours, as my main source of entertainment and gathering of friends until about 2002, when other activities came along. I only went back to it now, in 2012. This unveiled the greatest disappointment and proof of destruction of a game I have ever experienced. As it is today, this is not Counter-Strike. It is a broken, unrecognizable, nearly useless form of the original game. Valve has let this game rot to death and still make an easy profit for nothing. The server browser is a joke. It is simply broken. The results it returns are completely inaccurate and all servers you will find are run by non-Steam users, with the game settings altered to who knows what, and 90% of them playing the Dust map. The other servers are running non-official maps and pointless game modes. In addition, you can not set your client to disallow the automatic download of custom server sounds or other trash that is force-fed through your connection to alter the game. Counter-Strike has been so blatantly abandoned, that it is shocking Valve still charges something for it. You will also see advertisements while you are connecting to the servers, and while you wait for the next round once you have been killed. Counter-Strike is the epitome of falling from grace and becoming an outright failure. It has become an embarrassment and a gaming tragedy. Counter-Strike is bad.
Pringles;-;No. Never. I hate this game and nothing is going to change that fact. If you want to start now just prepare for those who have 10,000+ hours of experiance in the game. You join a game. You instantly die. You then have to wait minutes till the next round. Then you die again and wait even more. If I wanted to play a doctor room simulator this would be it. Nothing says fun like sitting in spectator mode. Let the downvotes begin!
ThyCrusader;-;This game is overrated.
Help;-;no drops What a  game
i'd rather be gay than russian;-;Cheaters only trust me it's gross
Moosey;-;I got motion sick
Rat | g2a.com;-;Let me start off by saying this. Back when this game was new, popular and all, i would reccomend it hands down. But the fact that you cant play with bots is devastating if you are playing this game right now. So that means you will have to play on servers! But right now most of the servers are completely empty and that renders the game almost impossible to play. So i reccommend you get any of the other 3 CS games. This game is just too dead to reccomend.
Xenix;-;its glitchy
B4zz.Ba IS BACK;-;90% cheaters. :)
ohmahgawd.;-;Can't join any servers, I only play alone :(
Kush;-;yuck don't make me sick
DemBoyz;-;With this new CS 1.6 you can't play.Lag as f*ck.Got an awesome PC but this CS don't mind that,just keep lagging. My internet con. its great too but this CS ain't giving sh*t.Just keep on lagging!
puppyboy;-;But I hate this game even more  THIS GAME
chimpz;-;Best FPS team-play game ever made untill CS:GO was out. There are too many cheaters and cracked players that are spoiling all of the fun out of the game. Besides, the game itself is way too old for me.
Dede ;3;-;It was my favorite game, but since steam tried so much to screw this game with all that useless updates that ruied it...and it dosen't work on windows 8, plus they got out D3D the only option that you had if you have windows 8, now...its a piece of crap, if we are talking about cs 1.6 when steam gived a **** about it, then its a 10/10 but now its just a 5/10 or 4/10 RIP cs 1.6 THANKS A LOT STEAM! :(
k1k0;-;i've god VAC BAN and i dont use cheats ,if u can help me send me an email to 60centx@gmail.com Thanks
Jag24;-;This game sucks for 4 reasons: 1. Its now outdated, and there are better/newer ones. 2. Its purely multiplayer, not even bots to practice. 3. Its super boring even if you play with people you know. 4. People complain if you loose. Chill, its just a ing game! Thats about it. I dont suggest this to anyone unless they want to waste their money.
MJRRR LGUE;-;i love this game
Franky124144;-;I really thought this game would have counters and stikes... it doesn't. I mean I don't know about you but when I hear strike I think baseball or bowling not a gun game. I will be calling my congressmen I am fed up with the corporations keeping the little guy down. I was looking forward to a nice counting strike game i guess i have to wait for a real game to come out not this BS shooter. i would still give it an 8 out of A HUNDRED!
nd;-;its alright
Carbon14;-;Servers and frequented with hackers.
ZarbonFever;-;This game sucks cant hit
Newbster;-;in 2011, I would have recomended this game, but sadly, it has degenerated beyond recognition. its sad to see such a great game fall. you need only join a server once to see that cs 1.6 is no more. get cs cz or cs source as theyre better choices these days.
HaD^eS;-;That's a good game
AlphaBlaster;-;Not sure why people prefer this over CSS. Why play an older and clunkier version of a game when a bigger, better version of it with improved graphics and no real downsides is available?
Mr. Chao;-;this game is not uncut in germany!!!
Snak3 ^_^;-;im love counter strike im myth counter strike
Shidapu/Aedra (Kenny);-;I wouldn't recommend CS to anyone, not even my worst enemy.
Twoskie;-;In my toddler times I spent a great deal of time playing this. Many sequels have come and gone, but so far I still think of this as one, if not the best version. However it did not aged well. Most servers are filled with hackers or oblige you to install shady protection solutions on your computer. So nowadays you're better of following one of the following options: - Turn around and check TF2; - Turn around and check CS:GO;
Soxerino Cappuccino;-;All I see when I play this game is bots. I never liked Counter Strike very much, because I wasnt into the way the game was played, and also the money system kind of confused me. It seemed to me like if one team won two or three matches in a row, they were able to have complete domination over the other team and that just isnt fun. and maybe its because I wasnt there for this games glory days, but Source and Global Offensive just seem so much more superior. So I'm gonna say pass on this game in favor of the two newer versions that have all of the same content but with more.
Hide on Bush;-;I can't ing start this game, its not even loading....
BISTDM;-;i love counter-strike and all the others but the only problem with it is that it doesnt have a bot system for offline
PLayer;-;How do u play this game more than 15min ? i still confused how people playing it such a old and bore game. cs go bit better than cs.
TerribleTurtle;-;i bought this in a sale but i shouldn't have bothered. the only gameplay is multiplayer and all the servers are prettymuch empty. Also when i got into a server it was all glitchy. Don't bother buying this game
discoboy;-;in this game u shoot and its sucks
aD!x;-;200 servers? rly?
KrekZ;-;This game sure is interesting although to start of i have a few things that really make a reason for such a bad review First of all the graphics are really... disgusting. The game looks like it was made with clay-mation. So really, for people judgy (like me) about gaming graphics i do not recommend purchasing. And second: The trailer you see really makes the game look great. Although the events that you see in the video are rare to come upon, especially the great scoping, aiming, and trick-shots. If anything that looks as if the trailer creator turned on their own personal auto-aim. So don't go getting "too" excited over the trailer. Third: When in gameplay, if you die, you wont be able to respawn until all other players of your team or the other team are dead. So, you could be sitting there for up to 10 minutes watching a bad quality cam of some one else playing. Fourth: The game looks like there wasn't that much effort put into it, like it's home made. when spectating, when zooming out.. the exterior goes completely black, as if all the map is is just a boxed maze. In addition: NO SPRINT!!! So for anyone looking for a good first-person shooter, I surely do not recommend this game.
furihata;-;it's a great game, but i don't recommend because nowadays there is a map rotativity of just two or three maps
() rrcd;-;Writing this review because of Valve's paid mod policy
Shambo;-;Won the game in less than an hour. 10/10
CrazyBull;-;After you play Counter-Strike:Global Offensive you cannot play this game any more.Is garbage beside Counter-Strike:Global Offensive.Don't buy this game.It was great game at is time but now is too old.Buy Counter-Strike:Global Offensive.
Accelerate.deterritorialization;-;I keep getting owned all the time and I am bad
my steaks were made;-;This game was cool up untill 2010, if you are still playing this I would reccomend dumping that old Ford model T and moving on, innundated with hackers and bot servers, just as 1.5 in 04. Move along nothing to see here unless you are from brazil or maybe mexico, a hackers paradise.
theAssasin.sh;-;death
Foxysen;-;Counter-Strike, this one also known as Counter-Strike 1.6, is a team-based multiplayer realistical/military shooter. And a very well known one at that. It was first available as a free mod for Half-Life 1, being patched regulary up to version 1.6, until recently it got it's way onto Steam, as a serapately sold title. So, how is the player base? Counter-strike 1.6, being popular self, has an active player base. You will see many servers, up to 32 players. At very least there are many Russian servers, as it had a cult following over there, can't really see past them. On bad side, most seems to prefer "Terrorist plant C4" mode and then De_Dust2 is the most played map. A lot of servers run small mods, that may alter balance or other small things. And most of it, playerbase had a lot of time to play and master this game, so new players will be more frustated than having fun learning. Counter-Strike is a very well known realistical FPS. It gained it's popularity while being free mod for popular Half-Life, because it provided something else what wasn't overused yet - realistical shootouts (using models of real weapons, you know) in team multiplayer. Unforgiving and furious. Or unbalanced and twitchy one-shot kills with headshots. Whichever one you prefer. Counter-Strike has two types of map. First, "de", is a mode where counter-terrorists have do defends few market spots on map from terrorist. One of the terrorists spawns with C4 in inventrory and has to bring it to one of the marked spots to plant it adn start to countdown of T's victory. Roles change as Terrorists will have now to defend this place from CTs, who's aim now are to defuse the bomb, in which case CTs will win the round, no matter how many more Ts are left. Pretty interesting mode and most played, otherwise this game would have been camping fest. And if one site is too well defended, Ts can go to another one. And then there is a second type, "cs", in which CTs have to to rescue hostages by bringing them back to base. The problem there, is that hostage NPCs aren't perfect (though good enough) and since CTs have to rescue them all, Terrorist can camp in one of the spots around them, since CTs will have no choice but to come to win. Much less played and even if it does, it goes like your everyday Team Deathmatch, just killing all of opposite team. Much simpler anyway. Now, the core gameplay... There are few rounds. Each round starts with each team spawning on their side of map. There is no respawning during round, once person is dead he is out, so you will have to worry much more about getting insta-killed. There are no items placed on map itself either (on correct, official maps), no kind of medikits. In spawn place, you have 15 seconds to press "b" button (or whichever you set) to bring up "buy menu", where you purchase weapons and equipment for the round witht he money that you earned so far. Yep, when round ends everybody gets some sum of money to spend, with winning team getting more, an ingenius design decision that helps losing team to get steamrolled even harder. What you can buy there is a pistol, primary weapon and any of the equipment. (Yep, if it doesn't smell like prototype of modern military shooters) Once past purchase screen, you are free to run and shoot. And here comes the art of recoil and aiming. For you see, one of the more important thing that is used in this game is accuaricy of your weapon. If you move it drops. if you jump, it drops. It drops while you are shooting too. Thus it becomes more importanly to get good position, making assaults more compilated, and you often have to relearn to shoot, making few clicks instead of just holding down mouse button. You will have to be often walking instead of running, to keep accuaricy while moving (it also makes you silent, so do it often), or just stand and crouch sometimes. Burst shooting is better there and for long range targets you want to be just click few times. Another important thing is that you can shoot through some walls with more powerful primary weapons. So don't be surprised for people shooting through door, walls and even just over the corner, it indeed does small damage to whoever is behind. The game also emphasises aiming because it supports headshots and they do a MASSIVE damage. And you also got three kinds of grenades. Explosive (HE), which explodes, good for throwing into chokepoints. Flashbang, which blinds whoever looked at it when it blows for few seconds, quite annoying but good for stroming into room. And Smoke Grenade, when you don't want enemies to see you coming and don't want to be under direct fire, good for open spaces with snipers (who instakill you when you peek around corner). Protip: You run slightly faster with knife out. And well, while on theory it sounds interesting, as well as empashises teamwork. here comes the downfall of the game. The weapons, while make people with gun fetish happy, are badly balanced around each other. There are just best and bad weapons. From pistols Desert Eagle is the best, they behave as backup when you got no time to reload primary weapon. Shotguns are theorically good for close range but in this game they are useless and Assault Rifles can kill even better at close range. Sub-Machine Guns category had advantage of no accuaricy drops while moving, but are still inferior to Rifles. Rifles category has two best guns: all-range assault rifle like AK-47 and all-range sniper rifle like AWP (which doesn't even require headshot to one-hit kill), exactly what majority of people use. The only Machine Gun is "pew pew pew can't hit". And all-range is all-range, random is random. You may run and shoot in general direction of enemy and pull off a headshot from your AK-47 by luck. Or you may walk around corner, thinking of your next grandious tactical plan, just to get headshotted in insta-second by guy with sniper rifle from close range. It's just so full of cheap and frustating, the rage is probably the main thing that keeps players coming back for more, not honest fun, as well as luck of possibly pulling few magical headshots. Slow-down when being hit doesn't seem to be good idea either, making it harder to get away from the choke points. And random spread is not actually random, it just randomly follows one of the pre-set pattern. And yes, if you will learn them, you will be able to control your shooting better and get on top. Exactly what puts apart newbiews and elites, and exactly what elites seem to boast about when they want to say that Counter-Strike 1.6 is the best because it takes more skills and time to learn, with artifical challenges like this one that makes little sense. And well, once you spend your time to learn them, you will still find out on top that it didn't make the game any more amazing. But you know, it's not too bad. It does teamwork well. Sometimes the game just works. When you work along the team, round the corners and storming the next room, where you follow teammates, supporting each other. Provide covering fire to the corner. When upon entering next place, each one covers his own direction, as some of the rooms just have too many places from which enemies can shoot you (smoke grenade and flashbangs help in these cases). And it's pretty damn nice at those moments, until they get ruined by something stupid, something you don't feel like could be prevented. Yea, getting shot by sniper. And yes, this game has good enough sounds. No music, sadly. The graphics are quite HL1 high-definition era, but otherwise are fine enough. The levels are a bit of bland though. Can't really recommend it. Because everybody who will like such games are already playing it. And player base of this game had too much time by now, that they will be just way too skilled for new players, who will just get destroyed and it will take a long time to get onto same level. It's not like there aren't enough military/realistical shooters anyway.
SuperYente;-;Counter-Strike: Global Offensive is the current iteration of Valves top-in-class competitive shooter, and the first to be maintained in the very modern way it has been. Learning from its experience with Team Fortress 2, Valve has a miniature economy in CS: GO that revolves entirely around gun decals. Players get a few drops a week after matches, which can be a gun decal or a weapon crate  the latter of which cost 1.49 to unlock with a one-use key from the store. Obviously this economy is tailor-made, and so there are extraordinarily rare and mysteriously fantastic-looking gun and knife skins (with prices in the hundreds of pounds), then a large range of other skins tapering down to the common-as-muck variety that trades for pennies. I dont pay much attention to the CS: GO economy as a whole, though its interesting enough, but its important for a non-player to understand that a big chunk of the games audience takes it very seriously indeed. In the days after a new Operation launches countless forum threads are launched about the value of the new goods, whether someone should sell this new rare drop they got or hold it for a while, Twitch streams with giveaways and 50 crates being unlocked and so on. You get the picture. I give such context on CS: GOs economy because  even though it is a subsidiary part of the game to many including myself  it is the molten core of Operation Vanguard. CS: GO is a regularly-patched game but the major updates come in the form of Operations that introduce new maps and new skins, at the price of around 3 for an access pass  with the nice touch that maps are available to all players regardless, or made so shortly afterwards. To give an exhaustive history of Operations would be no more useful than a general overview. If you play Counter-Strike then the chances are you play a lot of Counter-Strike. What the Operations do is freshen things up a bit  naturally they dont disrupt the regular Dust-Mirage-Inferno cycle of competitive play, but you get some unfamiliar environments to tool about in, the chance to score some fancy new weapons, and in the context of a game you play almost daily, 3 a few times a year is chicken feed. Operation Vanguard is different, and the changes are not for the better. The first problem I have with it is major: the way its sold seems to skirt the borderline of deception. To participate in Operation Breakout you bought an All-Access Pass for 2.39. To participate in Operation Vanguard I bought an Access Pass for 2.39. The difference is obvious side-by-side, but of course when OV popped up in Counter-Strikes home menu I bought it more or less instantly, thinking this was the same thing. OVs selling point is two campaigns, a series of missions with three branching paths. The missions are things like Win 16 rounds on map X and Kill 20 chickens in Deathmatch mode, and completing one bags a pre-determined award  either a weapon crate or a random weapon from a specified collection. So far, so OK. But in fact OV has two more campaigns, both of which cost 1.79 to access  which follow more or less the same pattern. To be crystal-clear about this, the money is not the problem. Im happy to pay for Operations, and OVs combined total of around 6 in the context of the time I put into Counter-Strike is really not an issue. But that switch from All-Access Pass to Access Pass (with the right to buy more access), just  me right off. First of all I felt conned. I bought the OV pass in the same way Id bought all the previous Operation passes, expected it to be the same deal, and realised Id been fooled by the removal of All. Secondly, what the two extra purchases offer is basically a re-skinned version of OVs mission book. But thirdly, and this is the real killer, youre encouraged to buy them to self-medicate the most egregious, enormous, climactically wrong and frankly offensive design decision in Vanguard. There are multi-day cooldowns on missions. Thats right Rambo, you may have thought you were buying another set of missions and drops to liven up day-to-day business in CS: GO, but in fact Vanguard is a campaign designed to play out over a set period of time, with the only limiting factor a bald external one: cooldown timers. Let me set the scene for you. I love Counter-Strike. I saw Vanguard was out on a Thursday, and cleared Friday night. Got in a few beers. Booted it up and bought the pass. I played the first mission, cleared it in about 15 minutes. Chose a second, the killing chickens one, and that was another 15 mins. So around half an hour into my evening of joy I was given a four-day cooldown for the next mission. You can slice this any way you want, but its . The sad thing is I get the thought process behind it. Consider: youre Valve, in charge of a game where players (a) want new content but (b) put in so many hours that theyll rush through anything almost instantly. For example, mission chains. Operation Breakout introduced missions in the form of random drops, which parcelled them out over time but had no larger arc. It was fine but the missions never felt important. So Operation Vanguards missions are in structured patterns, with defined rewards, and are given the desired longevity through simple brute force of timing. You will not complete this content before we say so, because you cant. Oh, except that if you buy the extra mission packs, your cooldowns decrease across the board, because now youre allowed to do more missions in a set period. Thats right. Youre basically paying to reduce cooldowns. In a Valve game. The thing is that Operation Vanguard is only a campaign in the same way that a pile of biscuits is lunch. The missions are basic objectives like Win 16 competitive rounds on Season or Get 100 FAMAS kills in Deathmatch mode. And what do you get for completing them? Either a drop from an existing collection of guns, with a minor chance of a rare gun, or a weapon crate. The first is fair enough, but the second I mean, at this point I already felt pretty rinsed by Operation Vanguard, and now its rewarding me with crates that I need to pay more money to open. There is a school of thought that says Valve has done this in order that a flood of new crates and mission rewards doesnt flood the in-game economy, instead trickling them in over the coming months. To that argument the only appropriate response is  who cares? I play Counter-Strike: GO because its a great game, I dont play it because of the economy, and while I accept the latter is how Valve makes money, the moment it starts intruding into the game  if indeed this explanation holds water  then the economy is not acting in the way that it should. That is, it should be improving the experience rather than throttling it. The sad thing is that Operation Vanguard comes with my favourite selection of community maps yet, including two in Season and Back Alley that feel like potential classics. Yeah theyre all over the place in terms of favouring one side or the other, but this is par for the course with CS: GO and will be tweaked over the coming months. Every CS: GO operation freshens the game up with some new environments if nothing else, and the point of Operation Vanguards structure is to elongate this beyond a few days  to really showcase these excellent maps by forcing people to play on them semi-regularly for missions. It at least manages this. I want to emphasise that Im an enormous fan and c
Sonny101;-;Don't buy this . At least, buy something that is less , called "Global Offensive". Never even think about buying this, not even just for collection. It may have been pretty good game when it came out, but now, it's a pile of . I don't understand those 20,000 people who are still playing this. Why dont they buy CS:GO instead? It's BETTER in EVERYTHING. It's one of the worst games now. For me - 5/100
[USMC] timothy mcveigh;-;I hate counter-strike.
FnZzz' #2;-;its time for cs go
mega;-;Very boring, played it a few times, and never played it again. Waste of money.
COYI;-;Waste of money - old fashioned nonsense
ch.charbel;-;can any one help me please, i download the counter strike when i start it , it will give me a black screen and it is not working
mkarasinski;-;My mouse sucks with this game it keeps teleporting
Piccolo;-;It doesn't load, if it does I'll change this.
Burger Buns;-;eh.....its ok cs go is better
Killerbanana999;-;I just bought Counter-Strike and I can't play it because the mouse aiming doesn't work. I really want my money back.
x3cyclonero;-;If you like this old game then you must spend wayyyy too much time on Xbox Live or something.
onanera;-;the graphics are terrible and there's no aim assist why play game? why
booboo;-;completly oudated
Dr Seb Wilkes;-;FOR THOSE FROM CS:GO I'm sorry but it feels very strange, and doesn't make much sense. Given its differences in handling sensitivity, and just everything really, unless you're commited, you'll just got 40 to 160 on a DM like I did. Not the best experience, especially since there was nothing I knew to even improve.
G   I\I G;-;Outdated graphics, and my bullets wont hit ever except when im really close. Why would anyone buy this when there are free games like battlefield:heroes that have better graphics and control better. Also, the amount of hacking in this game is tremendous, i join a server and about 30% of the people playing are using some form of hacx. The biggest rip-of off my life.
farted;-;i don't care if it's old, i can't play it because it looks like sit
Daniel <3 CsGo 80 dollar;-;this game sux
RennieDude ExFall;-;Yes I have only played ten minutes. TEN MINUTES IS ENOUGH! Case closed
Fred;-;What if you couldn't even move more than one step from spawn without getting one shotted? What if you got kicked for no apparent reason from a server?? WHAT IF YOU WOULDN'T EVEN BOTHER TO BUY THIS BULLCRAP, SINCE IT'S EXACTLEY LIKE OTHER CS GAMES??????!???! THIS GAME SUCKS HARDER THAN MONKEYBALLS GETTING SUCKED INTO A VACUUM CLEANER Or not. I just don't like it.
ryusenshi;-;one of the worst games i ever played and the most corrupted with cheats ... i would never recommend such crap garbage to anyone
dolan;-;wrost gaem i evre prayed
Haru Natsu;-;Personally it was an awesome game in its day, but with greater versions like CS: Source and CS:GO, why would you bother playing the original. It just turned 15 years old now, but nothing special is being done with it. If Valve could at least add some achievements and maybe trading cards to the game, it would have a reason for me to play the game again.
Kei;-;WORST GAME EVER. WHY NOT SOURCE? WHY ? THIS GAME IS SO ING
Philip;-;This game is old for now we have the "Counter Strike - Global Offensive" it's really better and very nice game the CS1.6 is really old sucks texture but old times it was great.
Prostate Puncher;-;Terrible game. 1/10 WOULD NOT PLAY.
Kei;-;WORST GAME EVER. WHY NOT SOURCE? WHY ? THIS GAME IS SO ING
MAD KNY;-;VOLVO DELETE THIS GAME PLS!!!!!!! THE EST GAME I"VE EVER PLAYED
g-tsiaris;-;i can't even open it waste of money completely i want my money back
roCkman1;-;because of the worst updates that valve made for this old and beautifull game i wont recommand it anymore
BonsaiKitten;-;When you play Counter Strike, the terrorists win.
IceCream;-;I cant play this game anymore. I liked it before. The game is good. Funny to plsy.
Lord Hen;-;Never liked old games. And I was right.
Ahri;-;Shoots at guy 1 health I die CS Unistalled Installs Farming simulator Lives life as a farmer The End
BEZQ;-;This game would be great, if hit registration wasn't that bad.
* SHADOW FOX *;-;was disappointed with the low graphics technology. i made the mistake of purchasing the whole CS game pack. only decent CS game is CS GO
rasta.vanhelmont;-;Boring !Poor grafics .
lumi;-;This game destroyd my life, I ing hate it.
Hec;-;-Strike is a lame game where you tell scrubz ''LOL I  YOUR MOM LAST NIGHT I PWN YOU NOOB XD'', and by thou words, you fornicate the offspring's mothers, hence the title ''-Strike''. This game is really gay, even the title shows two dudes. WOW, THERE'S NO WOMEN IN THIS GAME, IT'S SEXIST AS WELL. I also hate the bugged aiming mechanic where you can't use your iron sights, it's like the gay soldier's jacked each others peepee's so hard that their arm muscles can't move their guns, ing gay game, only turbonerds play this turd.
Crymson;-;Addictive, dull, and repetitive, Counter-Strike will eat up hours that you'll want to have back. There are two newer iterations of this game now, both of which are similarly wasteful of time. While one might argue that any game is not a productive use of one's days, Counter-Strike ranks one step above almost anything out there: unless you're freakishly good or an inveterate camper, you'll spend the lion's share of your gameplay idly waiting to respawn. More, you'll inevitably (especially in 1.6) run into players so good that you'll be unsure whether they're superlative gamers or superlative cheaters. And in Counter-Strike, there's really no way of telling. Prepare yourself for frustration, either way. Avoid.
randy bobandy;-;what is this a cod ripoff
yung master the pussy blaster;-;Worst game ever, bad graphics and only Mexicans play it.
.Swag;-;Graphic rly bad
Oldtimes:);-;Bad effects , it's like mario .
Defenestration;-;This game did a lot of neat things for its time. But don't get it now. There's no reason to buy something that isn't an M4 or an AK-47, and if you are a CT that just got a kill, you drop your M4 and take his AK, unless you memorize the recoil pattern on the gun you're firing you will lose every time, not that it helps because anyone still playing this game has been playing for 13 years and will know where you are at all times and be able to AWP you a new ventilation shaft in your forehead from 400 yards the same second your arm moves into visibility from behind a door. Just hold your horses, and let's hope they save Counter-Strike's from itself with CS:GO
michigandj;-;If you are looking for a straight-forward shooter with confusing controls, this is it.
El Prannet;-;Not enough 1v1 QS servers. 2/10 would not buy again.
Hermann-senpai~;-;Cant play this game on my dedicated graphic card thanks to valves brilliant update. :) Edit: And now my game is cut again. What the actual frak.
Powell;-;WOW 1.6 IS SO PURE BEST COUNTER STRIKE AM IRITE US OLD  HUHHUHHUHH LELELELELLEELLELE XDDDDDDDDD god 1.6 s are so elitist don't play this unless you use esea go play source THE BEST COUNTER STRIKE
Uniseals;-;This game used to be good, but that was back in 1999-2005. Now, it's just filled with  children and people who don't have jobs and live in their mothers basement playing cracked copies of this game, while screaming at other people in Russian and Lithuanian, and there's cheaters galore. I recommend buying CS:CZ or CS:S, or even better, CS:GO.
sumtgk;-;lol this game is hella dumb there isn't even camos or killstreaks idk why anywould would even make a game like this if these key assets aren't even going to be added 0/10 not even worth looking at
Tech-Nein;-;boring
I.M. "Kobas";-;big piece of
Mensenvriend;-;cs source is better
AUNT JEMIMA;-;game cod ghosts is better
gabrielcapote;-;it does not works with joystick.
bobert awful (F+);-;I cheated a student in a class in my high school out of ten bucks for a boxed copy that didn't register on Steam. He literally begged me for two days to buy it. I finally relented and sold it to him. He then spent the next day bugging me to give him a refund because he is an idiot. Also my true life story has single handedly brought down the community around this mod, so you shouldn't buy it. Take that, Valve!
Erander;-;Sorry all lovers of this game but no, i dont recommend this game because it is too old better buy global offensive this game is only if you want feel old times
MrNoms;-;Ehhh... this game is kinda dumb honestly... but what can I do? It was made a long time ago! I have a huge problem with charecter details, I dont know who's a ct or t... MY CHARACTER DETAILS ARE ON HIGH!!!! I wouldn't recommend this game, but I would in 2000!
Donnie Yen;-;OLD. Don't play it unless You WANT TO GET STUCK IN A DOOR AND LET IT SING THE SONG OF IT'S ING PEOPLE!!!!
Ichbad Von Nutsack;-;ing terrible. Waste of 10 bucks. CSGO is much better
Hoblit;-;A game that was released when i was a couple of months old, I dont play it that offend that means i will give it a big -, buy counterstirke global offensive.
LUKENZI;-;I am not recommend for this game! :)!
Baja;-;This game sux
StaRychOk;-;its nice game,buy it and make sure
#1 Bad Rats Fan;-;The graphics are awfull! Looks like it was made in 1999 or something like that!
ScarJoLover;-;This Game Sucks So Much It Makes COD Look Beast. Screw You Gaben You Fat Piece Of Sh*t
Tofflad Turk;-;Theres nothing like some good old cs 1,6 <3
ruBii;-;There is only one thing I would like to know about this game. Why is there an Auto-aim option in the mouse section of options. I have never tried it and I don't know if it works but I just think it is strange.
PaChu`a;-;Servers are too far fps and are not :'(
JUSTINtime;-;VALVE HAS PATCHED CS 1.6 GO BUY IT NOW!
RagingBunny;-;Great addictive game.
T.Hanks;-;I do recommend this game heartily! Great feel of the gameplay and classic maps that makes it for an unforgivable experience!
LoeJZe;-;Nc game but old
Bebaaaaa;-;CS
L!0N$||$@$;-;i dont like this game i love it n nothing can match cs 1.6 :D
-;-;Hello. I play this game for more than 14 years and still happy and would be grateful for your gift to me in the new year game Counter-Strike 1.6 thanks :)
Gestapo101;-;addictive!!!
=Eule= CitizenSnips;-;one of the first pc shooters i've every played and died constantly
Slasher;-;This is the best Counter-Strike ever, ruined my life. 5 stars <3
Caffy;-;great game
xzzion;-;The grandfather of all modern First Person Shooters! This is the game where i learned the fundamentals to being a good team player.
eLement;-;One of the best game EVER!
q3.railgun;-;Counter Strike 1.6 : In order to be good at this game you will need to either do research on how the guns work or put plenty of time practicing. If you spam a lot, take note of exactly how the bullet spread goes.
1NIQ*MASTER**Make The Difference;-;Best Shooter!
BLFL.-=_B3aSt_=-;-;The best "Never get bored of it" game.....
Unreal;-;Great Game... Enough said!
EviaN;-;Buy it. Play it. Enjoy it. Lose your life to it. Eat. Sleep. CS. Now i should have a job, i should have a girlfriend, i should have a freaking life. But no, CS 1.6 ruined my life. 100/10 definately playin' again. Recommend to all noobs and pros. Dont have a friend? Play it and make friends. Have a friend? Play with him. Dont have a server? Play on a random one. Have a server? Install plugins and play it. Want to be a progamer? I guess you will never then. If you attempt to be one? I guess you are a pro then. Buy it and play it. If you dont have money? Get a job. If you dont have a job? Rob a bank. If you got caught? Oh at least you tried. Or just get in a payday gang, get a nickname, design a mask and go on with your life. If you get enough money, get this game, CS source and CSGO.
Bouncing Ballsy Ball;-;It has some history for old gamers. Solid gameplay.
d3vil;-;Nice game. 10 of 10.
HuviZ;-;Cool :)
#4;-;No other game can match the simplicity of this game. Easy to play; hard to master. Just love it from the age of 8. Best game ever for me.
nAte-;-;A brilliant game.
Psychos;-;Counter-strike- ,        .    ,    Free2play "c"   .  , ,  ,    *   Counter-strike
Rayox;-;Old but Gold!!
Devil - www.devilx.ro;-;The best game Ever :)
Notorious;-;CLASSIC AND A MUST HAVE GAME!!! I highly recommend this game to everyone who enjoys killing games! It a rather simple game with simple onjectives either to deactivate the bomb, kill the other players, or rescue hostages. In my opinion its worth every dollar! :D
name of the game;-;_cl_autowepswitch 0 hud_fastswitch 1
SafePlane911;-;Pretty good.
Real;-;what its a classic
ZeneX;-;Classic. I and much of the community moved on to Source or CS:GO, but this game will always be fun. Back when this game wasn't on Steam, a couple of friends and I played this on LANs. I still revisit this game from time to time, half of it for the fun, and half of it for the nostalgia. There is still a very active multiplayer community so you'll definitely get your money's worth. Get some mod's, make some friends, have a blast!
Killer;-;One of the best games of all times.
Hard Drive;-;They should just rename this AWP and Deagle game, because those are the only two ing weapons that you will ever use in it.
WipeOut | [L!];-;Like this :*
EvilRiverRat;-;This year , 99 is make a best Multyplayer shooter ever , realy , good job VALVE ! :D
Da_Viking;-;It's a very nice game. If you play with friends.
Story;-;We all now Why? xD
Trusybee125;-;A Game in which you Counter somebody's Strike
FeNg;-;Legendary game with absoludly fantastic gameplay :) I spent about 2000h on nonsteam version of this game and then i bought it, becose i got a respect to the developers and becose i loved and i still love this game. 11/10 there wont be any same and great game as 1.6.
Walepwnz;-;<3 this game
Cheese;-;Good stuff. Yep.
NagAzZz;-;Just the best game ever, im glad i spended thousand and thousand of hours playing this game <3
[S]cOrPioN[!]^;-;Best shooting game ever played
CaptainRamen;-;Welcome to the worlds most fun over rated pile of . Since I first got a PC nearly 3 years ago all I have ever heard is counter strike, counter strike, counter strike. And, after about 15 hours of play time I see why. Right away I can see that when counter strike came out it was the magnum opus of the fps/multiplayer genre and I can respect that but that also explains the largest problem with counter strike, its nonexistent learning curve. For the first maybe 3 hours I played on a few different servers and never killed a single person. I figured Im new to this and it seems as thoe these guys/girls have been playing much longer than I have been so I began to brush it off and then 2 hours and may servers later I had killed maybe 6 people, not much had changed. And then remembered that thats stupid, I shouldnt be playing against people that have 150 hours clocked while I have 5. Another problem is the weapons I can understand the weird names, Valve would have been a smaller company then and saved a buck by naming them weird stuff but that doesnt mean I wont still make fun of them. The damaged ratio is also complete . The sniper rifle is a one hit kill the subs are useless and I was once hit across the map with a shot gun blast. The knife is a bit under powered but Thats better than it being a light saber. And For some reason the only guns that are ever used are the AK look alike the M16 look alike and the sniper rifle. I should say that counter strike is not a bad a game. It's for sure a sextillion times better than any Call of Duty ever made. And I will confess that this game is more fun giving your friends ADHD kid a gram of cocaine and telling him his dad is made of candy. But its also as frustrating as trying to put that same kid in a car seat.
LOVE FPS;-;Best oldschool FPS shooting game ever, we never forget you :)
Junz;-;still the best game ever!
sergiorpacheco;-;Great game.... buy.
i punch babies;-;this game is the
1998 honda civic;-;One of the best games I've ever played, having spent more than 1/3 of my gaming time easily on cs 1.5/1.6 alone.
ToXiC#VACed;-;Just aaaaaawesome!!!!!! must try it out guyz 5/5 stars though valve has moved to go which i do not support :( gg guys i hope a day comes when valve again supports 1.6 as it does to GO
crvenkapica;-;Great game
50 euro;-;Still a lot of people playing 1.6, Lots of fun with a good community.
Bit664;-;I played a lot of games.I tried games with advanced mechanics,fancy graphics.I tried mods and all guides.Still,I never catch the feeling I get with Counter Strike.It is plain and fair.I love the purity of it.It's also absolutely fair.No skillpoints,no classes,no glamour-only gloss.It is the ultimate first person shooter.Simply the best ever.
tate;-;This not Game This is My Life )))
-FsN- DarksysS;-;Try it! Is an incredible game. Action everywhere!
pufpuf => cs.pons.ro;-;Best cs ever.
bdN_;-;Great game
Asmar | !N$@N3;-;Great game
(_(_____();-;Best game ever in the world
d3b;-;One of the best FPS games i've ever played, still doesn't compare to many games out there for me. Just hate the fact that it's pretty much dead here.
hArsh !`;-;One of the most Online favourite Games :D
andrew;-;Nice game
Paul Andrew;-;the game of a generation
Cloudyy;-;It's the original CS. What could be wrong with it?
paRa;-;This game gave me a serious addiction until recently. It's like a drug. Don't play it :D!
NoOb FrOm ThE WeSt;-;one of the best fps games
Parasite;-;The original mod from half life 2, I grabbed this when it was free way back, been playing ever since, with tons of user made content, a large community to play with this game is still a great buy. Wheter your camping or lobbing nades, skill and teamwork are a must to succeed, mic's are even better, this game can be as serious as you want it to be, just don't get mad bro, lol.
Lego;-;CONNECT 46.174.50.29:27211
SHADOW of The DeaTH;-;This is "The Best game ever on Earth"
Illuminati;-;We all know one thing. This games kicks call of duty's !
Spooty;-;great classic fps
Jebaka<3;-;One of the best counter strikes...old but gold.
NaGa_AlakaZam;-;i am die hard fan of this game.. !!
hypz;-;Best game of all time...
AlexaBlain!;-;You'll never accomplish anything if you don't believe that you can do it.
Harifaka;-;I grow up on CS 1.6, but now it is unplayable. a lot of garbage on servers a lot of music and useless things. low download speed, and everybody hack everywhere. Please make something with this game, just need some patch, for disable downloadable contetn, and useless things...
kisame;-;classic counterstrike you haven't experienced any cs until you have played this
B1XXjr.;-;CEL MAI TARE JOC!!!
whiplash.;-;I play Counter Strike for 6 years, this game is great ! Pros: -Gameplay -Lot of Mods -Great Menu Soundtrack -Epic Headshot Animation Cons: -Community
D1nT3;-;COUNTER-STRIKE 1.6 and FIFA 15
WalkingTaco;-;Spent so many hours on this game during high school! Now that "GO" is out, I'm playig Counter Strike more.
S[h]oW^^TiM3 #12th ClAsS;-;Amazing game..kind of a drug :D <3
_firefOx^ #BuRNNNNNNNNNNN*;-;best game (y)
FOx;-;Classic, 11/10
duduia;-;Addictive
Onlinezigeuner;-;For like 10 Years the No. 1 Ego-Shooter in the E-Sport Scene, Best Mod of Half-Life and (sadly) scapegoat for many killing frenzys. Was one of the most innovative Games that time.
Kurwaaaa;-;Classic, it is!
DiGiTal_Bl00D;-;Underestimated it I never really liked CS. Perhaps, because I was a COD player. COD games have descent graphics, better movement and alot more features than in CS and keeping this in mind, I always kept myself away from CS. Trust me, don't do the same mistake! Though both these games are FPS, yet they are completely different in terms of gameplay. CS is a game only for serious gamers (That's what I think) and the level of difficulty is way higher than COD. Seeing this game was relesed in 1990s, it cannot and shouldn't be compared to the newer FPSes. It's a legend in its own!
EXTREME;-;Cool game
nebis;-;best tho :^D
SkullCrack3r;-;My best game of my childhood
Generalissimus;-;Old But Gold !
leoN;-;Best Game ever. I hope people will play it for another 15 years
wwwwwwwwwwwww;-;Most rage inducing game of all time 10/100
OMG WHY;-;LOve This
mjc_1964;-;Cool
G@boN3;-;Best game 10/10 . If you have time you should play it :) Worth it's money,even for an old game,still rocking the shooters market.
OverLord;-;Wery cool!!!
Brandon L. is amused [UK];-;Godfather of Counter-Strike. Great game.
niel_deokar;-;very awesome!! must play! woth it!
GeT_RiGhT-A-;-;Must have!
Irum;-;beast game eva
juliojungle;-;CRAZY
Dr Gaben;-;This is a classic! <3
GET REKT BITCH;-;Old is gold. <3
zempron;-;Really good game!
pRo zEus!;-;the besttttttt
Silmi$HA <7-DAY CD TRAIN!>;-;One of the games I've played the most since year 2006.
--pLayhd--;-;old shool game... brings back memories
AsasinCreed#VACation;-;this game is still alive
zEz #Rekt!;-;Some glitches but Good.
$@|/|DY   - Ki||3R;-;my fav game ever... unlimited gameplay options... continuously improving skills.....
wowzer;-;Possibly one of the greatest first person shooting games ever made. Try it out and see how you like it. Too bad that numerous number of hackers are around these days, but not a probem if server admins are present. You can try maps like dust/dust2, assault, or even fy maps like snow and iceworld. Awp maps are also great if you like scoping and killing opponents with one shot. Maybe even go for some of the fun surfing maps that are still around. Lastly, fyi it does take some time to find the optimal sensitivity setting that you play the best with.
Majin_Zed;-;Cool game!
bubbles;-;This game is so good
K!113R.* /z/;-;Very nice game!
[25th]Excelsior Eventide;-;This game will never get old!
lundavKiNG;-;Sick game, enjoy it alot
o_QcK_o#Kitteh;-;Don't..... :P
robinho;-;Great game.
one_arm_bandit;-;THIS WAS THE START TO ESPORTS
the law;-;This game is so fun. I have almost 150 hours in it. 10/10
JenkywOw??;-;The real pillar of all FPS games ever to sprout out into the competitive scene. It's been around for as long as I can remember and has literally changed the eSports scene. Very balanced and runs on one of the smoothest engines every made for a first person shooter. The game is outdated now and its successor CS:GO is doing a good job at satisfying the professional scene while maintaining a very challenging and exciting gameplay
X.ca;-;14 years at still playing. If they drop supporting this game, I am going to lose my mind! Best server ever (64.74.97.108:27015) friendly people NO cheaters located in the US join now
MiLinDEVIL;-;Awesomly Fantastic game
x3.Amy-May;-;Still a great game after many years!
S-HI-T;-;Old classic, fantastic game :) A lot of servers with mods
IN A GADDA DA FLAVORTOWN;-;I'm awful at this game. 11/10.
MaJaKa;-;Classic.
TR Flygern;-;Simply the best fps game.
Stainfree;-;CLASSIC
Shinichi Izumi;-;The game is good. :)
gromit;-;great game
n9ne@Autism;-;Best FPS in my opinion :3 Old but gold
Equilibrium^;-;By far the best FPS game ever
They Call Him Bullet!;-;DO NOT BUY! Steam is up to their old tricks again. I thought this had some sort of controller support but it doesn't. Steaming Pile of Crap. I Promised myself I would never buy another Steam game again but couldn't resist the prices. Un-Playable.
Pller<3;-;best cs ever :D
Adeptus Ineptus;-;Take yourself back to the good ol' days with Counterstrike 1.6. FPS Multiplayer over the net, simple and easy to play, though not complex. Choose to host or join servers on different maps in either Hostage Rescue or Plant the Bomb scenarios. There's no class distinction, how well you play is based on your skill level, choice of weapon/gear and a lot of being in the right place at the right time. Good, quick fun. ***
RasseS;-;IN  I CAN'T FIND ANY HACKS TO THIS GAME
PoOKiE;-;This is the greatest FPS of all times !
Adrian13sk;-;It's game from my child times. Better fps then this you can't find. 10/10
Fidget;-;Great game that spawned a great franchise
GaZZyLow;-;Oldest shooter game. We're in 2014 and this game is very played.
rusija;-;This game is the best <3
[iHak] Fancy Pants;-;If you're on Steam and you haven't played, or own this game, just kill yourself.
Noobshotty Warrior;-;Best game ever..... so many fun times, great fps, worth way more than it costs! its just great!
Drohas;-;Laggy, unoptimized, no online solutions work. Absolutely shocked such an old game is so  its not even optimized to be played. Waste of money. Do not recommend.
slycly101;-;Counter strike one of the best multiplayer first person shooters out there even though it came out 14 years ago it still has outstanding graphics a good level design and alright player models i would recomend this game to anyone with a spirit to play oldschool shooters
[BADCAMPER] SyNoptiC (^.^);-;no.1 Game in the World :)
Sgt. Ghosts;-;It is the Still World's No1 Best Multiplayer Game! Love it!
[LoG] wEzZy BaBy FuCkEr,cOm;-;the best game in the world
MAVERICK;-;This Game Is Just Awsome..
3milEU;-;The classic counter-strike 1.6! Gives alot of memories, not mutch for an awesome game like in the old days! :D
riotrooper;-;One of the first few games that had introduced me to PC gaming (and love for first-person shooters). This game is timeless.
11barto11;-;From this a lot started, all counter-strike games :P
LEON ZAWODOWIEC;-;Old the best game ever :)
Miller;-;Wish they updated the graphics like CSGO but kept the game play like 1.5 :(
kirilloff;-;Only skill important in this game. I liked this game :>
Bot Bob;-;Probably the best game EVER!
Stanislov Markov;-;It is good.
Johnny|Bl@ze;-;What is there left to say about this great game,it's simply classics and part of any kid born past 1990 childhood :D I really love the fact it is so wide spread around the world,and just keep it up like this !
Atrito;-;THE BEST GAME EVER!!! THE FREAKING BEST GAME EVAAAA BROOO!!
JaSiO;-;Nice game ;]
KrAzEd;-;Best game. Period.
cock;-;fun, hot man on man action. who cares that it looks terrible.
W00K1EEEE;-;The first Counter-Strike game that started it all!! Amazing game and also tacticle at the same time.
BearEX;-;it's the best game ever people who say that it sucks they are just noobs who can't even kill a weak bot this is very great game even if it is very old game people prefer to play it instead of CS:GO or CS:S anyways this is one of my favourite games!!!
Bubai;-;thumbs up
~Gunslinger~;-;Awesome game. Have enjoyed it for years, and will continue to enjoy it!
Twisted;-;The Game for all gamer to play atleast once...
Az A Ridah;-;very good game i enyoied this game but i changed my crosshair and the game crashed :)
Kmoxy;-;Best childhood game. I wish they would bring back the silly maps like Nipper made.
GeLash;-;COOOL
XtincT.Smith;-;Mannn fantastic game, hopefully the game keeps getting better and helps younger generations to enjoy the gaming scene.
rebelia | mega giga pRO gamer;-;The best game of 2000.
Basu11;-;Counter strike is a game that teaches you how to use your eyes to there full potential. You must be a fast thinker and good at stratigic thought. I have NEVER enjoyed a game as much as i do with cs.
zKe.;-;Very nice game
Wilson;-;You just can't hate this game <3 nostalgic
Wiz;-;old school
MrAltamente;-;Good'ol Counter-Strike
JR =DDD;-;Best game of all times, i don't even have words for it.
Garydos;-;only romanians play this anymore
Angel @ZZZ@ M;-;A classic. Superior to CSGO in many sense IMO.
LiviuYOO;-;Old but gold. :)
Tajiri;-;Very old cool game! I playing in it without GPU :( TY ValvE for super CS!!!
PancaKe.evEN;-;Awesome game, +100 waiting to buy the CS:GO!
Nimble Mule;-;The game that started it
Silver Here;-;when i start the game i only see the menu and when i try to open settings cant acces anything please help
ShawnGrandeKemp;-;Bought this game on sale for 3 bucks. Never thought I would go back outside again. 69/10
JokerJon00;-;Counter-Strike is defiantly dated, so I recommend getting the newer ones, but you are not going wrong with this one if you decide to pick it up. 7/10
Ruby;-;this is top Game (Y)
Barrett_killz;-;Obviously the best game ever made. Was, is, and will be the best.
werhu;-;cs 1.6 is still the best
Just_relaXx;-;THE BEST GAME EVER
lucas;-;This one here is a winner.
#B00M BiTcH! "GeT 0u' o dA WaY"x;-;Play hArd Go Pro ... \m/
Frank Tourette;-;A nice game which requires cooperative playing because of objective like placing/defusing the bomb or killing Terrorists/CTs
KQLY;-;This is the "Rosemary's Baby" of video games, a video-offspring of demonic potential...the best multi-player game of 2000, bar none.
D3|V|!G0D;-;Old is still Gold. Best online action game ever!
HEA7;-;The best ever
Mr. Chaos AKA Glockoma;-;This game is not only the best game of the fps gender ever made but it is also the best game ever PERIOD. It is literally hundreds of games in one. You can drive cars, fly helicopters, fly planes, fly tie fighters, shoot lasers, play volleyball, play soccer, play football, play hide and go seek, ride bicycles, play dodgeball, immerse yourself in the warcraft world, be a superhero, be a surfer, be a rock climber. Oh yeah, you could also be a terrorist or counter-terrorist and plant/defuse bombs on dust 1 or dust 2. There are other maps but you don't really discover them until 10,000 hours in. But once you do it opens you up to a whole new world of wonders. This game gets a 10/10. The only games that compete are other version of counter-strike, Team Fortress Classic, and Day of Defeat. I would give it an 11/10 but there are no killstreaks.
I pray for God to my kids;-;I am king of the bots!
-----------Lefty----------------;-;+This game still have appeal - Runs slightly higher cpu then TF2 does (Edit: V-sync on can reduce load by half)
Pouchon514tokyodrift;-;/thread
F R 3 3 d-_-b;-;The years have mold this game very nicely for the past 14 years this game has gone down as the FPS that started the series off with bang this game has everything from tatical game play to zombie infection modes. The game is made for all the FPS junkies out there its 14 yrs old but still puts smiles on all the gamers faces as they play this forever great series of games from the gaben overlord all hail the valve group for giving us this amazing game!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
kH4NN :>;-;Cool game!
RAKU;-;The old games its the best!!!!
fearless;-;awesome game u should give it for free to pro players :)
H A T R E D ^,-;-;Addictive,But...Awesome!
Mircea [;x];-;Buy it! Best shooter game! -For Me-..
RiK;-;The best
Apex;-;this is a old classic and i love it and its all around funn
Ridhhima;-;ABOUT --Counter Strike-- 1. Amazing Gaming Experience. 2. Your game play will surely change with Proper Original Steam version. 3. Its an ORIGINAL GAME. Don't even do a second guess before purchasing it. Couldn't Have Expected more
Ax!m Rud! -.^ *;-;<3 this game :p XD :D
[Shibe] zmaymay;-;Mexicans, more Mexicans, and even more Mexicans!
Fanatique;-;A simple 3D shooter game. Needs a lot of skill, some strategy and some brain of course.
Rist Umahali #rockchalk;-;Awesome Game! If you don't have it, you should!
N3><T;-;This game is so awesome because you play it like an strategy game and it is very good game shooting online game I'l recomend it
ELFASi /A/;-;really good game guys i recommend it.
special_force;-;The Best game
EHx LoCo;-;This game is such an original classic, its graphics were ahead of its time back in 2000 and still dont look that bad, the gameplay is what that makes this game such a hit, the gameplay is straight to the point for a shooter. The gamemodes are addictive and i think all of them are just as good as the other
BL4CK_H4WK;-;Still be awesome :D
chewyz;-;better than csgo
-=|[K[G]C]|=- |~LikeAPro*;-;Hey Steam Community... This Is Pawan, I'm Facing Some Problem to Play Cs, Could u help me out ? When i go to start playing cs online, the VAC Anti Cheat is not leaving me to play, and do no why, The VAC Anti Cheat has bean banned me, now i couldn't enter into cs. Plz Help me out Of this... W8ing fr yr replay.!!
WHX | Orange Gum;-;Counter - Strike 1.6 is the most original first person shooter I played in my life. Counter - Strike is an absolute fun game with action - packed maps full of different varieties to choose from. There are tons of weapons from automatic to semi - automatic, shotguns, handguns, and etc. It will definitely give you a blast of fun memories and it's a good game to enjoy for a long time. Check it out !
Jharkhand-be back in 1.5 years;-;One of the best games ever <3
iamhoff;-;Some of the best and worst nights of my life were spent on this game. Long live long A.
Smile13IG;-;what better way to play an fps than the original? this game paved the way for all modern day fps with out this we wouldnt have things like call of duty. i have been playing this since i was a child and still love it 100/10
crAzyfists;-;The game that started it all! CS 1.6 will always be my favourite multiplayer game. This game has been played by millions of gamers and it still holds a special place in our hearts!
$tOrM # jinX;-;10/10 nothing more nothing less. :)
Kirito-kun;-;this game although old still is very good game and it takes actrually some skill in it to
Sweet Crap;-;THIS IS THE BEST GAME EVER LIKE EVER COME ON THIS DARN PLANET!
Freddy K. <3 E;-;1.6 will laways have a place in my heart <3
odiboT.se;-;Still one of the better FPS-games!
Mumbling Cobra;-;Though the tournaments may be over for this game, its still crazy fun to play... its really hard to explain it but youll know that this here is own of the greatests FPS games of all time.
Don Reggae;-;Old but gold
Rao;-;Great Game
Doctor [];-;Old school game. This game change the wolrd.
WeedTime;-;Shooting game Very good
SlipKnoT;-;Old Game But Still The Best and Favourite fps Shooting Games to All The Gamers :)
FOR THE TWENTY;-;1.6 4 life.
ERIIK;-;dont buy this game .... download .... anyway this game is ok . :D
HeaD$hoT;-;iTS rEallY a fAntastic gAmE to PLay
MattiE;-;Best for the Best!!
Gizmo;-;I can have 14 years old, 30 years old, have even 90 years old, and it wont get bored play Counter - Strike, the best part, that every PC can run CS, and it is pretty good, even with the time that got created, i love CS, you basiclly, can play everything, CTF, Normal, Warzone, etc. I highly recommend to buy Counter Strike.
James;-;Do you ever feel that nostalgic feeling when you played the game and you remembered how it felt the first time you played it?
Hyper;-;Nice game, try it!
S0m3Th1nG_AwFul!;-;Simply classics.
pepe meme;-;each individual frame is rendered in powerpoint. nice
tequila;-;I love this game!
Kenoxn;-;The first version of Counter-Strike... play it, you'll know later why it was the world's number 1 online action game.
left4halfportalfortress3;-;Potatoes have skin, I have skin, therefore i am a potato
RapToZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZ;-;nice game..too cool to play
TigerX.;-;Worth every penny! Great game!
The Forgotten Architect;-;The classic. Although the graphics are an eyesore to some, they have a charm to them for me. Beyond that, I would say this about it: Pros: Nice community Nice mods func_vehicle Excellent maps Great server variety Good gunplay Nostalgia Riot Shield Cons: Graphics may bother some No official servers No bots No source engine: This runs on goldsrc, resulting in some missing features compared to CS:S or GO, both graphics and gameplay wise.
Zora Gamer;-;Still better than any other Call of Duty.
NoCtuRnaL;-;classic!
#Fatal`;-;If you haven't played it yet your not really a gamer!
FEAR;-;Best game i ever played in my life! Recommend this game!!!
.:^/|/!$@|^g.oo7^:.;-;Evergreen game .Still play it with friends
-BaBa aK47#RaMaDaN <3;-;Seriously Luv This Game....
AndroKN;-;Nice game :D
L O R D V A D E R K U S H;-;wish i played this a few years ago tbh
CoY;-;Best of game!
PunisheR;-;Classic is always a classic, I smell this one will never die. Counter-Strike 4 life.
mYktm | Hell_Raiser;-;Got to love this game man. Counter Strike 1.6 Forever :D
Frankie;-;Best fps game before csgo :)
Misho;-;nothing to say 1.6 - classic
xLokki;-;Still great game after these years!
ERS;-;Must play game.
Laniakea;-;Although most of the servers are full of all-caps spamming people from foreign countries talking smack to one another, the game is still excellent. You should be learning how to play on this before making the switch to CSGO.
//mnojj//;-;Harder Than Cs:Go !
anuragmishra1591;-;the best fps game ever...everything about this game is awesome. real addictive.....love this one
smitty werbenjaegermanjensen;-;Counter-Strike is one of the most nostalgiac experiences i've had. With that being said I enjoyed the steam version for my 24 hours playing it. However there is a great bit of lag on most servers in this game although I shouldn't have any. Putting that aside however Counter-Strike is still one of the most revolutionary games for its time. The multiplayer may be dying down and I have yet to convert to go which I dont know if I will. If you got this with Half Life you remember getting this with it. This is still the same fun game from that period that has come to be a cult classic. It plays very well and is fun to play with friends. Although I may find Team Fortress 2 more enjoyable from my short time playing that game, I shall still enjoy Counter-Strike for what it was.
RYAN @ TS.CS1.RO # WN;-;Counter-Strike 1.6 is game best for action.
Phon3x;-;I just <3 this game !
w33;-;Nice game
DedMaw5;-;cool game 8.5/10
CN# G3nocider;-;This game is the best!!! Come and play
meowcenaries;-;10/10. It's fun. Play it.
Norex;-;Why are you reading reviews?
Sowa raper I stop play cs:go bb;-;Nice game
snoWhite;-;Good one !
deadpool;-;Nice game!
Mr. White;-;Best game ever, the graphics may not be the best, BUT WHO CARES, I still love it as hell!
ZaTyRa;-;thumbs up !!
DOOMGUY;-;Best FPS game of all the time,the one that started it all aswell with the competitive scene.
SK|Chardakov <Zinnoc>;-;Really? Do I really need to comment that?
<::[D]are[D]evil::> [D.D];-;I have been playing this game since 4-5 years now... not bored even now... the mods present in the game . the different models that can be downloaded.. its competitiveness... make it a game worth buying eve now after this many years of its release... WARNING.. dont buy thios game u wont see sunlight again.. :p
Springtrap;-;I highly recommend this game if you are into FPS games. This is the legendary game that started it all. Trust me, if you buy this game you won't regret it. It's graphics for 17 or more year old game, are pretty good. It has good servers and alot fun mini-games to them. ;)
I am the one who knocks.;-;One of the most groundbreaking and legendary Multiplayer games in the history of video games. All created by 1 guy in his college dorm, in this spare time. It doesn't get any more awesome than that.
AE86;-;Best game in the history of ever <3
VieW.Capone;-;I like the game
figardo [scrap2unusual2kniive];-;It's a fun game that used to be a top multiplayer game, but got overshadowed by it's source remake and CS:GO
eMSi;-;This is not a game. This is a life. I'm so sorry that there are too much cheaters on servers, but if Valve can make it better , it would be great :D Remember old good times, waiting to start a new match between Na'Vi and fNatic <3 And all other teams... Then somebody made a cheat, and destroyed a game. This game changed many lives, many people. I think this game become the world best game ever. For me, it's the best game. I play it every day, but it isn't like sometimes. Now graphic is important. Well, it isn't. I know that this game is dead already... I want to get it back, but there is no way to do that. Cheaters are everywhere now. In every single game. You can buy cheat for CS:GO for 5$ I think... My friend bought it. I asked him : " Why did you bought that ? Isn't it better to enjoy playing the game without cheats? " He told me: " I want to beat everyone. I want to be the best. No one can stop me now. " I don't know why are you doing it, this is beautiful game. When I played it for the first time, it was awesome :D Finally a game that I can play with my friends on LAN. And, till today, I'm playing it. I never downloaded a cheat. I don't need that. I want to learn how to play, to be the beast in the world... Now everyone is wanting money, money money... I heard about CS:GO Lounge aka CS GO betting site. Now everyone is watching matches because of skins, to get free money... Well, when I was young, in 2005. I waited with my friends a CS 1.6 match. It was beautiful. Now i sit here, and watch this CS:GO matches... So many people watch matches... But 90% watch them because of f***ing bet... It will never be like sometimes... Or we can change everything... Valve please, get this game back to life <3 Thanks.
Clonecc45;-;10/10! Best CS yet! I wish you could aim though...
kenny;-;Best version of the Counter-Strike series! No doubt!
majkeloOoo;-;Nice game :D
^-RoYaL-^SsKCobra;-;Is a good game....I love him !
Airhead;-;1 of the bestest game to be played !
Tomoko <3;-;great game 100/10
Apex;-;what can u say it is osm <3
urbanowl;-;The stripped-down FPS that delivers raw competition and insane replayability. My childhood wouldn't be the same without this game. Too bad i'm old now. I should have kept up.
DreaMz.;-;ISIS tried to recruit me. 10/10
FiZz iZ BaD;-;Its aight, not the best tbh.
kJuinn * Kinguin;-;really nice and smooth game
Vladimir;-;One of the Best First Person Shooters Ever the thing that makes this game so awesome is that you will always have competition and theres no excuse for losing or winning because the only thing that can make you good in it is experience there are no in-game purchases and its really hard to get pro or even decent as it doesnt have auto-recovery as many FPS nowdays Highly Recommended
NeoSploit;-;So sad that the activity of such a great game has seriously decreased over the last few months. The gameplay still reminds me of so many memories...
TAKE ME TO THE HOSPITAL;-;Best game, i playing CS for 8 years, and i never stop playing the game. memories
|waffle|cozasawrus;-;like the other CS games but can run on any potato
slinny/10/;-;Love this game :)
kraft_*;-;Best game ever...spent more than 10 happy years playing it. Beware of cheaters tho. GL & HF
Xenside | +NEXsus`<3 ESL;-;Hii , Why do not I see the publication of the counter I play .. and I see the table several killed up no picture .. Why ? Ndirr this game .. and someone could help me please?
JNTE;-;history, best cs ever
SuRv!v0R - z 1 k#happinessatpeak;-;THIS IS A NICE GAME
SaPsA;-;This games is a very fun and compettive. At first you gonna a be a noob but if you play it for some wile. You will get used to it and be unstopable
e u  x  v;-;(2005-2012)Legendary game, regular online. (2012-2014)Dying soldier. (Today)Oldschools' carousel. You can get some old feelings, but not much more. So, that's not a useless waste of money.
COS Raven;-;Its a nice Game
Ace;-;Counter-Strike is a game that haz wepons,,, Duh
| Chrome | BenQ;-;Cs 1.6 is an good game and its still fun to play.
Hodor;-;never gets bored of this game :)
Som@lien;-;10/10 nothing i disliked at all!!! Happy with it sens i got it and all ever play really!!!!
-_-PaYnE-_-;-;Best Action Game While Multiplayer Gaming.
N!kusHAAA;-;Steal good game
Lejfi;-;Best game in the history! Join HidenSeek today and be awesome!
Bot Juan de Spray&pray;-;most relaxing&fun.
H. N1- ;A;-;This is the best game!
BuckNasty The_Grinder_vets2vets;-;pretty good game hopefully they will get the pro mod out.....other then that a badass game for sure
WINNER S/S 2014;-;I love this game
Shadgrimgrvy;-;People have been playing this since, like, 1992. There's got to be SOMETHING appealing if it's been around that long.
Pakman;-;Many games will come and go but the love for CS 1.6 will never ever fade away. BEST. GAME. EVER. CS 1.6 4 LIFE <3 Need I say more?
FAOURE;-;Nice Game <33333333 But i want cs go :(( :\
IviKo;-;This game is just a classic. If you think you are a gamer you should know
xEqt^ #AfterALongTym;-;best introductory FPS game ever :D
..;-;Very NiCe
Mihanow;-;Playing it on LAN with friends was great.
Get RekT #Smurfer ;-;;-;thankx valve laaV this cs pack and 1.6 <3 my liFe :)
TuiK.;-;I have fun playing it :D
Chocolatez;-;love this game
Snoopie;-;Great Game^^ 10/10
Beejay Simpson#12Days Till Birth;-;the graphics make me
Carry me senpi;-;Pathron
returpack;-;Great and cheap multiplayer awesomeness!
MagikMuzik-;-;Great!
Farman Daniel;-;If you dont take into account that this game is 14 years old... IT IS AWESOME!
KocurekCZ;-;Nice game ..!
iNtenzo;-;Perfect game :)
WILLIAM K;-;prdy great
HultPower|FaqieFPS;-;Much better then the new counter strike games.
LV~||PrIMe||~;-;Great game..
Ultragamer21;-;One Word. Amazing.
Pex;-;Best game ever made... Domination of movemenet, shooting mechanics - recoil... Exaclty what a FPS game need... When developers of this game genre learn that this 2 things are the most inportant for good FPS, they will make a game as good as CS 1.6 is... CS:GO does not have these major aspects, and doesn't deserve name of Counter-Strike (IMO). As a third very important thing for FPS game, I would say the animations... The animations of player models such as runnig, walking, crouching, gun holding/fireing/reloading etc... Graphics isn't so important, doesn't need to be sooo good, but decent due to visibility...
cBR `icLicK;-;Oh yes this is the best game to play with friends!!
Gangler;-;BEST steam game, EVER!
RambO;-;I love this game!
JP;-;Still the most epic game ever created. Yes CS:GO is great, and is a definite CS reviver, BUT, 1.6 will forever be the game that ruined our lives! Commited thousands of hours to 1.6, 1.5 and all previous iterations. Started way way back when it was still a mod for HL1. Growing up and watching the game grow and turn into what it has become has been a truly great experience. This game is still alive, and you can still have hundreds of hours of fun on it, so give it a go :)
SabaoNegao;-;Still beter than CoD:Goats...
TeCci;-;Absolutly the best work from valve in the last years. Source and CZ were not really good but GO is just on the right way.
^Sky-C0D3R.;-;everything is good
"$KoTeYkA"$;-;cool
FAKIN LAUS  gather??;-;The best game ! :)
fD. AdN - /A/ -;-;Its the most ultimate game a person can ever play !!! Love Everything about it !!!
2@;-;The best miltuplayer game ever. Love it always.
P.Bergman;-;Good game, but keep in mind its hard to find pcw now when cs go came out!
Duke of Judea;-;A Classic shooter that everyone still play and enjoy, A game that almost any male person in my country has played.
FreddY_;-;classic!
Mod;-;Lot of mods. Good game.
Dalieux;-;A classic that never gets old. Perfect action, tons of game modes and hours of fun fun fun fun fun fun. Buy. Just buy.
Hi-Volt;-;Probably The Best FPS game since 1999.
ERobz;-;good game but can be frustrated! :D
dOnee';-;blow  up 10/10
Gustavo R;-;Great game
JAcK SpARroW;-;fun to play with friends :D
egnilS;-;Can't get enough of this game, even after 12 years!
SamiWami<33;-;The legendary 1.6. Worth all the money, eventhough there is cs:go and css. BRILLIANT!
looney;-;-noforcemaccel -noforcemspd -noforcemparms -noforcesmping -noforcesmpdacc -noforcemspeed -numericping -w 640 -h 480 -32bpp -heapsize 524288 -freq 75 -dxlevel 70 -nojoy -applaunch 10 -gl -full -noipx -nofbo
TheGamingPie;-;Great game and what I suggest is getting it on steam because it comes with condition zero and it's better like that because condition zero has a campaign and normal counter-strike is great with multiplayer so get this game
SaTaN;-;played 75 Hours
Rask;-;Nice game :D
HyperLapse;-;Classic awesomeness. Thats it. No need to say anymore
Topovak;-;I really liked this game because it's very good, Many Many servers and players you can play with I have some experience,but more memories when i first started to play this game. So i recommend it!!!!! to all it's not some strong game that you will be in lag or your computer is weak and you cant on this game,so this game is very small and everyone can play it!
Rev;-;So this game was released when i was still a sperm and still it has a huge popularity wich is insane no other game can do this EVER. counter-strike ha totally changed all gamers lifes amazing.
jNIwOw;-;Classic CS doesn't get any better than that.
Astr0. * Intel;-;Best game EVER made in history of the world
Ebenezer;-;One of the best online multiplayer games of all time.
matthewzz [145K@$2USD];-;Oldschool and possibly the best in the series
wuJu;-;Best game ever , I played it since 2004
FelixFTW;-;This game is the game that started the Counter-Strike series. It started as a mod for the game that started it ALL, Half-Life. Like Team Fortress, Counter-Strike became a standalone game after its' popularity as a mod. If you enjoy the old Half-Life engine, GoldSrc, and want to play a shooter that doesn't have a complicated story and chapters, Counter-Strike is the game for you. Condition Zero is the same game but with a "campaign mode" that allows you to play with bots and unlock maps as you go.
Mr.Saim;-;Really nice game!!!
zeromant;-;The most popular FPS ever- (After UT/Q)
Veltyn;-;No bots if you suck at online or have crappy wifi connection tho
GrandmaTITMilk[!]^;-;i recommended this game for all players
Diabl0;-;Terrific...and best FPS Free Gun Game :)
kennyS;-;This Game is ''Old But Gold'' ;D
Player v2.1;-;Game is good for any lower spec PCs, but may have a little lag. Overall a decent game.
Omg;-;Still ppl play this game... 10/10
ESPA 04;-;very cool game :D
powellwell;-;very cool game :D
Io Asakura;-;very cool game XD
zeb0w~;-;The only one game which could be named like sports event.
xTranziTx;-;One of the best fps's ever made. Simply put it like that makes it seem super epic and awesome. Well if you want fast pased action this is not your'e slice of cake but it's definantly worth buying anyway. If you want more modern graphics i would reccomend cs:go.
Kalvelijonas;-;The best FPS shooter ever.
SWEDUHA .;-;It's cool classic!
PG13;-;I'M A DIRTY IGN CHEATER!
Robbie Belmont;-;probably the first game on my account ever (well the whole goldsrc pack but ya know)
dMo;-;They broke the mold with this one.
marK // clan search;-;this is a MUST if you want to get better at CS GO! cs series has improved so much over the years now :)
bryaNNN;-;only game worth playing.
junkE mewt;-;the bomb-diggy.
ftp.get_0ut;-;great game........
inff;-;the best
xXx_Acey_MLG_xXx;-;I have wasted my life on this game, They might as well call it cocaine-strike with how addictive it is. I would strongly recommend getting this game
See you on VACation!;-;I can think back to the days when I had this game on CD, It was amazing. This game IS still amazing. The game is refreshing to play and is jam packed filled with fun! It is my favourite game from the series due to the fact that this game relates back to the times when I first started computer gaming and is a classic which everyone will enjoy! Pick this game up now!
frs;-;This was the most awesome game I played for the first time, and still badass!
Rin;-;I've played this game since I was around 6 years old back in 2002 and it still makes me laugh and have fun whenever I launch it to this very day. Over 12 years of endless entertainment. No other game on this planet has given me more entertainment and enjoyment than Counter-Strike 1.6 has and I doubt no game ever will. Reason i've only got 38 hours here is because I no longer use the account I originally played cs 1.6 on. func_vehicle is what makes this Counter Strike game the best out of all the others in the franchise.
Mandataru';-;Nice game
BabOOM ` Road to SILVER;-;Best fps game ever played
Hellhound;-;Counter-Strike 1.6: the very first game I played using steam... I used to play it alot... Now there are Counter-Strike games with better graffix. But the original is still damn good!
Has science gone too far?;-;best game ever played :D
shad0w;-;In my opinion: CS is the best game ever made! CS 1.3 was my personal favorite update, but 1.6 is and always will be amazing. I still pub a de_dust2 server daily.
DrDrake;-;Very addictive game once you get used to it :)
FanarioT.;-;hardest game ever appeared
ez;-;best game but dead!
PJimenez08;-;Really nice FPS game. of the best
Edw;-;Old, but good!
_  Den Hemmelige Agent;-;well.. its a okay game,
bossy;-;Counter Stike 1.6 gets boring sometimes. But it's still a good game!
Archangel Gabriel;-;True good memories , couldnt forget it ~
DuctTaped [NEW PC];-;I deeply enjoy this game.
#Fatal`;-;If you haven't played it yet your not really a gamer!
FEAR;-;Best game i ever played in my life! Recommend this game!!!
|DRAGNEEL|DragnKing;-;:p love tis classic cs
Brave;-;great game
Mr. Gepardas;-;Dated, but still playable and addictive.
rodrigo$$$;-;cheated
b[i[]etch uiui;-;I've played this game for years never forget
FireBlueDragon;-;:o
Speck You Late;-;good game classic :-)
mYktm | Hell_Raiser;-;Got to love this game man. Counter Strike 1.6 Forever :D
Mr. Hero;-;how can a game this old still be so fun? a great community!
K;-;The one and only. Back when games had simple mechanics and very little nonsense. Remember when a bullet would go where you actually fired it? Remember when recoil patterns were easy to understand? Remember when it was possible to take a game seriously and become ridiculously good at it? The Counter-Strike franchise is very much like Super Smash Bros -- they had Brawl, we had CS:Source and CS:GO. Let's hope VALVe decides to play a proper homage to this game in the future much like Nintendo did with the New Smash Bros.
XmrHacKeR;-;It is one of the best FPS game available online. Even today its craze has not ended. From a NaVi player i heard that steam version provides very low lag due to which i purchased the game and for sure i was 100% satisfied. You would not believe my ping dropped to 19~21 from 200~1500.
SABAS;-;the best
pVVch;-;the most best play!!!!!nice game
0zeNegus^G;-;Amazing game shows that graphics don't matter! Buy the #1 or #2 fps game of all time!
Costy;-;Great game ,nothing can be changed !
nudgedj;-;Great game!
Ruatdika WizZy;-;i wont get off from this game..... EVER!!
MEG v.2;-;where it all started, best tactical pc fps.
King *Messi*;-;This game is just 11/10
S W A G G E R;-;Great Game...
PUNJABI'S DOTA MODE;-;Best Online Games played in ma life
iMax;-;Counter Strike 1.6             .      ,         ,    .     -  .     - ,    .. -     ,     bf4. ...        ",    , ".  ,     . ()  ,   ,  ,  ,    ,    fast cup, overpro   ;)
a nevem?;-;The greatest FPS game ever played.
Kolio Ficheto;-;Just CS
Wabc0;-;this is the one
Don;-;best game of all time
xAIM;-;great game!
ADDREN;-;one of the best first-person game that exist
Nedy sILLa;-;You need to have this game !! :) really enjoy it
SharceuS;-;Although it has poor animations and graphics, it is still one of the most played games, and it's still running. This game is created to test out players reflexes. With great skills, comes great VICTORIES. Put your skills to the test with this Counter Strike, one of the best first player shooting game ever released, with more than 1000 of servers online 24/7.
VladislavPlay;-;Nice game
[DDH] - F.r.e.a.K;-;Cool Game! :D
SILVER;-;Better Than Global Offensive. 10/10
Yarr;-;cool game
!nFaMouS | NaRuTo;-;too much skills n efforts needed to become a pro.
^BlackWolf^;-;Counter-Strike is very nice old school game! Ofcourse graphic side is very old and looks very primitive, but gameplay is not repeatable. Gamers which once played this game will play it over and over. Phisics in game is developed very nice, all objects can be shooted through. I rate this game 7 of 10. One of the best shooters game ever.
ed3291;-;if you never played counter strike before get ready to be scrubed on you nub
A little seal;-;Can PLEASE ADD BOTS?!?!
AXATAX;-;The legacy speaks for itself. One of the greatest mod--games ever.
cant kill gold;-;top
GameScore.eu | -Awake;-;the best multiplayer game ever :) . .. .
viliussto;-;Counter-Strike 1.6 is most popular game i think, i like community of players , simple game, definetly recommending to play it, more joy :)
gun1_Green;-;Kreedz for life yo
V!etStyLeZ;-;whats life lol
bugijugi;-;1.6 is love, 1.6 is life.
xEqt^ #AfterALongTym;-;best introductory FPS game ever :D
Mihanow;-;Playing it on LAN with friends was great.
Get RekT #Smurfer ;-;;-;thankx valve laaV this cs pack and 1.6 <3 my liFe :)
cYbEr MaNiAc;-;Can't express it in words. The Best Game ever played in my life. Have soo much memories. Must play. The best online multiplayer game ever. :D
JimP;-;Great Addictive Game. This is the ultimate 1st first person shooter! Did you get my pun :)
Cop;-;awesome game i love it <3
Lucky;-;I always find myself coming back to play this game. A true classic
Kingkings;-;WonerFul and interresting game
Kingkings;-;WonerFul and interresting game
Hallo iedereen;-;In my opinion this is the forefather of all fps games, it's been the most succesful and popular fps game of alltime. I remember when Counter-Strike was just a mod, but later it was made into a standalone game. This game is not about the graphics, it's about the gameplay, the unique feeling you get while playing it. It's nothing like a Call of Duty game or even Battlefield, this game has something in it I just can't describe. I would give this game 5 of 5 stars.
jbx (deathman77);-;Classic game I still like it. It should be cheaper.
drunk_man666;-;like my source review, this is one of the most highly played FPS for a reason. the game that changed it all. if you don't have it, you do not know shooters.
krux;-;Awesome game to play still after so many years
I Tank Blood;-;Counter-Strike is a good FPS and you should totally check it out if you don't have!
D!NOCO~~;-;This is quite an enjoyable game and one of my fav ,,,
Swum;-;Its so ing cool.
Dangioffre;-;1.6 will always be my fav. <3
GEHD;-;It's Counter Strike.
Derank ez :D;-;:D .. Still An Awesome Game In the Market :) <3
milkyguy;-;Best FPS of all time
raghu9972;-;Just go for it.. U gonna love it! Best LAN/online multiplayer game.
raghu9972;-;Just go for it.. U gonna love it! Best LAN/online multiplayer game.
Chinmoy;-;One of the best multiplayer games out there :D 10/10
gLkaoS;-;Old but gold
[Fatshark]Blondie;-;A classic that everyone needs to have played at least once.
beer enabler;-;Everybody get up, it's time to slam now We got a real jam goin' down Welcome to the Space Jam Here's your chance, do your dance at the Space Jam, alright
I am Groot !;-;Mother of all FPSs!
nereslays;-;Epic-super-awsome box game thing
SwiftScope;-;i did a mlg 420 noscop and 2 qiukscops and my gf br0k3 up wif me cux of this gam3 10/10 wont reccomend
Pypsiaus Corner Camp;-;I like this very much!
krllemeister;-;Best competitive game ever. R.I.P
BigBerthaBen;-;This game was initially launched in the year 1999, this being the first shooter of it's kind;competitive and challenging in a new manner. Although the game is outdated--updated a bit by Valve on their Steam release in late 2000--it is still extremely fun to play. The initial game experience is (The casual feel of CS:GO when you defuse and plants bombs with others) still very fun to play but the game has evolved with the community of CS. Some of the most fun things I do is the KZ maps, and other new and different game modes that are best on the original Counter-Strike. If you enjoyed any modern shooter you should play Counter-Strike for it's nostalgic feel and rewarding game modes.
Kadim | born to flame;-;The best game ever played :) enjoing abou 12 years :) thanks valve
{MasterIIYogi} Dondarrion Man;-;Not B + R Friendly. Came for the dusters, stayed for the rats. 11/10
RshoT(WORST PLAYER NA);-;pew pew hip fire headshot best competitive fps ever made bar none 11/10
toro777;-;Best FPS competitive shooter on steam. Better than CS Source and CS Global Offensive. A lot of cool mods to. Idk if they have leagues still but make a team with friends and have fun, or meet new people in public servers.
MR.JOSH;-;Will always be the best game ever created.
Discockel;-;Probably the best game in the world.
\/\/ /\ \/\/;-;that's classic
SuRv!v0R - z 1 k#happinessatpeak;-;THIS IS A NICE GAME
SaPsA;-;This games is a very fun and compettive. At first you gonna a be a noob but if you play it for some wile. You will get used to it and be unstopable
e u  x  v;-;(2005-2012)Legendary game, regular online. (2012-2014)Dying soldier. (Today)Oldschools' carousel. You can get some old feelings, but not much more. So, that's not a useless waste of money.
COS Raven;-;Its a nice Game
kenny;-;Best version of the Counter-Strike series! No doubt!
[FoaB]ATI;-;One of my first FPS game shame that now is somewhat filled with mod and hackers this game is still fun and double Sin mind I spent with that crap out of call of duty on this game people spent years of their lives becoming stronger but even if you don't and the height of certain people you're still awesome
Nate;-;No doubt this is the best online game
EP;-;The Predecessor of all FPS games! Try it out today!
w0nderz; -SUPER^SAIYAJIN-;-;most favorite game of all time , most played game , never get's old , at least for me :) ....
$nowFlake-->;-;Good old times
ScreenShotsGG;-;CS  555555555
*mTr;-;worth playing ;)
| Ryan.;-;A classic. If you're here because it's on sale, grab it.
TooQuicK]MC[;-;If you buy this game you will get 1d by me..
Dr. Magic !@X!@=!$$;-;The best game ever made.
Dr. Magic !@X!@=!$$;-;The best game ever made.
Manav;-;Awesome !!! I enjoy a lot playing it! :)
DL - VaZ[I]R <3 Purge Gamers !;-;Best of the bEst
FUNKYCHERRY;-;AHHH this is best game number 1 in a world!
hAwK;-;Best online game :D......
marK // clan search;-;this is a MUST if you want to get better at CS GO! cs series has improved so much over the years now :)
bryaNNN;-;only game worth playing.
junkE mewt;-;the bomb-diggy.
ftp.get_0ut;-;great game........
inff;-;the best
xXx_Acey_MLG_xXx;-;I have wasted my life on this game, They might as well call it cocaine-strike with how addictive it is. I would strongly recommend getting this game
See you on VACation!;-;I can think back to the days when I had this game on CD, It was amazing. This game IS still amazing. The game is refreshing to play and is jam packed filled with fun! It is my favourite game from the series due to the fact that this game relates back to the times when I first started computer gaming and is a classic which everyone will enjoy! Pick this game up now!
Sandrex;-;Legendary game
Ayush Garg Head Hunter;-;Old is Gold :)
SPIKEoEE# CAUT CLAN !;-;This is Counter Strike 1.6 Recomanded !
SmOkewOw~;-;This is my fav game and i like it so much .. its so good .. u should try it
Konafa;-;Great
mad munchies n fantasies;-;The game.
Bad Astronaut;-;Fun classic game involiving alot of strategy and team tactics. Hard to get used to.
kNNNNNNE ^;-;i love this game <3
BlitzWithGuns;-;It's a great game, that's all I can say. But honestly, how much you actually enjoy this game depends on where you live. Good servers are very scarce on where I live..
anuragmishra1591;-;the best fps game ever...everything about this game is awesome. real addictive.....love this one
smitty werbenjaegermanjensen;-;Counter-Strike is one of the most nostalgiac experiences i've had. With that being said I enjoyed the steam version for my 24 hours playing it. However there is a great bit of lag on most servers in this game although I shouldn't have any. Putting that aside however Counter-Strike is still one of the most revolutionary games for its time. The multiplayer may be dying down and I have yet to convert to go which I dont know if I will. If you got this with Half Life you remember getting this with it. This is still the same fun game from that period that has come to be a cult classic. It plays very well and is fun to play with friends. Although I may find Team Fortress 2 more enjoyable from my short time playing that game, I shall still enjoy Counter-Strike for what it was.
RYAN @ TS.CS1.RO # WN;-;Counter-Strike 1.6 is game best for action.
Phon3x;-;I just <3 this game !
w33;-;Nice game
(;-;Aah memories, definately recommend this game!
{Youtuber}{Mihai};-;have a bug
AIM-54-Phoenix;-;Check out the real one! Not the ones, where they increased movement speed. The Hardcore-game.
Peacemaker;-;Play the game.
Masterix;-;CS :)
FrozenSilent;-;Bored of CS:GO? Nothing beats the original!
blvke;-;alongside unreal tournament 1999, quake 2/3 and natural selection as the greatest shooters of all time 10/10 i got one clicked through a wall
NUZEA;-;stay classic!
Edgarins*;-;The Best for Ever.
safet;-;nice game, great gameplay, graphics is poor as hell
R a h i_;-;FUn ANd Awsum Game :)
xtreme edDicTed;-;Game of the millenium!!!!
Toxic- 37.221.209.99:27250;-;This Game is a 2. Best FPS. The 1. is a Half-Life
pencil;-;counter strike online     VACCS    STEAM !!
cesko99;-;little problem, there should be 3 options when u click new game, server server settings or server info and game, i have the first (server) and the second (game) i cant add bots and i cant change the settings, how do i fix this?
-= ChampioN =- LLIHEJIbMAH.;-;Perfect
maximohipp;-;Very Fun and Simple Killing
Jankovic;-;Perfect
DeRkKOO;-;This is the beggining of what we call "modern FPS". This game is pure skill. If u are a CoD "aim down the sight" fanboy, don't try it, you're wasting your time. This game is for skilled players only. No aim. No help. Just your and your target.
youva;-;The best fps ever made!
W3reWwOlf;-;This is game is :) best Fps Online :)
KEL;-;Best game ever, no need to talk too much.
n[A]de;-;Awesome! This is a game that i had played just for the sake of "Play with friends" but now i "Makes friends while playing" . The game is Solid , enjoyable , and yes.. A must have :D
Tim;-;Best game in the world.
juliojungle;-;CRAZY
uklit;-;Played once and uninstalled, but it was alright.
Sub-Zero;-;Better than the Entire CoD, BF, and any other team based FPS franchise.
Twitch.tv/mjolnirvbstar;-;CS1.6 in my top 10 all time favorite games including it's previous versions of which ive played 1.3-1.5 without a doubt the keystone in FPS gaming history and a must for all who claim to be hardcore gamer's 10/10
The Punisher;-;Really Addictive Game With Great Players
[PSG] velo;-;Fifty years later people will remember this game. It is timeless, just as super smash bros. melee is, dota1/2, and starcraft, etc. At the competitive level no other game tops this as a team based esports fps. So many mechanics to learn, bhopping, ladders, russian walks, spamming crouch to short hop, grenades are 1 pixel width, floaty nade physics, flashes, smokes, all these raise the skill ceiling. Too much to say for what I have experienced, try it yourself, and goodluck finding the niche gametype you prefer.
Cornul12;-;It's wasting to much of your free time.
Strikey;-;Ruined my life.
Ernest Wolf;-;This will be more of a ''my experience with this game'' type of review, because saying things like ''great gameplay'' will not suit something I've experienced with Counter-Strike. Here you go: I remember back in 2002 I was at a friend's house and he was playing a game. I didn't know the name of the game nor I had internet to find it. A few weeks passed by and another friend came over and he didn't have a computer, so he brought a disc with a game in it. He told me that it was one of the best games and from that very moment I knew that it is going to be the game I saw at the other friend's house. When I saw the Counter-Strike logo I was filled with gamegasm (?) and I was so happy. I don't remember a day when I was so happy like back then. So, the journey started. I was playing it hardcore. Made friends, clans, was involved in communities and even made two myself. Counter-Strike is my first game which I played competitively and it was a whole experience. Playing public servers and maybe some servers with mods was very fun, but playing it competitively made it very intense and stressful. In a pleasant way, ofcourse. Shooters these days try to be different, advanced in a way. Sometimes the most simple games like Counter-Strike are the ones that live to this day. Also, there are plenty of mods to keep your attention to this game. The gameplay is very simple - defend as a Counter-Terrorist, attack as a Terrorist to plant the bomb or save the hostages as a CT. I am sure most of you already know this and I doubt there are gamers that haven't heard or know the gameplay of Counter-Strike, so I am sharing here more of my experience. I wish I could find my CS Anthology account which I've lost since 2008. So, I decided I am going to buy this game again and here you go - more than a thousand hours played. I still play it from time to time to this day and it brings back many great memories and I sometimes even stumble upon people I've played with years ago. I think Counter-Strike changed gaming in a major way and we wouldn't have many games like we have today, if this game wouldn't exist. I am sure many of people already have played games like CS:GO, but never the roots. I doubt any of you will play it for more than an hour, because it's much more simple and it differs a lot in my opinion from CS:GO and modern games.
Brig;-;Every server is spanish or french. I can now fluently swear in both languages 9/10
Hedroks;-;Still better than Call of Duty: Ghosts...
Mr.Mimi | Trade Knife;-;I met a lot of people who slept with my mother. 10/10
Rezej;-;I never played a better first person shooter. Graphics doesn't matter for gamer, gameplay only.
Eno Etukeno;-;When you crouch, you lift your feet in the air and fall to the ground. 10/10
safeoff';-;WARNING : DO NOT buy this game, if you do, you'll never see the sunlight again !
ManaF;-;CS is one of the greatest and undermined games in history. It is, in my opinion, the best game to ever have a crosshair. It is not a contact sport, so for the girly girls, it is an activity to indulge in. It starts off with a team trying to kill another team. I started playing cs when I noticed jacking off isn't the only activity to do on a computer. I started inviting a lot of friends out and getting drinks, as well as a boom box, to spend a nice summer day in the living room playing this wonderful game. I wanted to play every chance that i could. On my road of cs adventures, I encountered a couple of problems; those being that nobody was as fervent as I was about playing, and that when we did play, nobody was good enough, so it wasn't a lot of fun. Then I discovered that I could sign up for a class with dboorn. I was overly excited, and signed up, but with skepticism at how the class was going to be. Sure enough, I was proven wrong. We started off by practicing a little bit. Then we split off into teams and started playing almost everyday of class. I made some friends, and played with people who had built up their skill gradually over the period of the course. When I play counterstrike, the whole world disappears. Only I, the mouse, and my teammates remain. We are united in a common goal. We strive collectively towards an end we all desire. Each player has a spot to hold. They stand ready and waiting, eager for their chance to aid the team in what they hope will be a forthcoming victory. Thus, CS celebrates the unity of man, the indomitable spirit in all of us that pushes us and drives us towards excellence. When I play CS, I play until my veins pump battery acid, and then I play some more. CS is unique among the games because it teaches all of us that no matter where we are in life, there is a role for us to play, and we can help our fellow man by fulfilling that role, and thereby our destiny. What destiny might you ask? I spoke before of unity. And it is that unity that brings us all together like one big loving family. That is the nature of counter-strike; the many working as one. One machine made of well oiled cogs and wheels, moving in unison, happy to play their part in the production of something greater than themselves. Not that these small metal objects are actually animate, I'm of course speaking only metaphorically. Over the course of the years, I have increased in skill, but I have learned a greater lesson than how to be a better cs player. I have learned how to cooperate with a team to accomplish a goal that we all share. Even if that team is less than ideal. I have realized that cs is about more than just one's athletic ability. Instead, there is a deeper meaning behind the colt, the AK, the AWP, the deagle, the sands under my feet (in d2 or inferno). And more importantly, the teammates at my side. I love them. It is the human element of cs that gives cs its greatness. In conclusion, I love cs. I love to win. I love pushing myself to my physical limits. It's that feeling that first drove me to the computer. For every second that I am not playing cs, there is only an unquenchable thirst to play. A thirst that grows as every minute passes by when I am outside, sitting at the television, or playing sports. I had an extraordinary time playing this game, and I will return to look at the future students of this game to see that bright eager look on their faces to remind me of how I used to feel. This review may be over, this game may be dead, but I will never stop playing couner-strike (1.6).
DESTRUKT;-;It's... aight.
Blargman;-;Like Half Life 1, Counterstrike is an undeniable classic.
Blaze;-;Even though i was VAC Banned (seriously don't remember hacking or anything). This game is still better that CS GO and CSS in my opinion. I don't know how to explain it, i honestly think it's just nostalgia. But i don't think i will ever hate this game... As the other games. Counter Strike has ALOT of gamemodes (Zombie , Deathrun , Hide 'n' Seek , etc.) I would suggest you buy this game if you like CS GO or CSS
fizyk;-;Best online FPS ever. Warning: Highly addictive game. Hail to the King baby.
WackySnake;-;COUNTER TERRORISTS WIN
ruk jao!!reload kr rha hu -_-.-;-;most addictive game ever made!
Ulster <(o.o<);-;Classic game with lots of fun mods.
Audiooooo;-;Great Game
Moldo #Road To S1;-;Is very good game
f0Rg1VENNNN;;-;Game is really the best game
Elysium #LowFps;-;A Hell Of a Game :D (Y) .. This Game proves that Graphics does not Matter . 10/10
iotkas Geniukas Vudis ;D;-;Old school love this game ;P
Avesta;-;This game has eaten half of my life, don't know how to review this.
Mad_FraGGer  <3 FNATIC;-;This Game wat 2 say dis Is d bst game In d world for all the plyrs from India it Was a Hit game it will Be and it should nVr end dis Game
Manhattan;-;Without a doubt, in my top 10 games ever. Without CS, my life would've been a LOT different. This game is freaking amazing, and I remember playing hundreds, and hundreds of hours in the 1.6 version. Playing dust2, dust, aztec, inferno.... man those were the good days. If you're even checking the reviews out, you should buy it. Not because you will be playing it for hundreds of hours now that its old, but just so you can get that vintage feel. Like the smell of a vintage t-shirt. 10/10 Must have for anyone calling themselves a gamer.
MANUZX9;-;the best shooter with friends
expect me;-;tHE BEST GAME EVER ;D
Poupa;-;oldschool game!
the cheat police;-;Graphics not always matter and this is an example! Awesome game since 2000! Rating 9/10 because of losers cheaters.
Rizul #ToX!C;-;very awsome game
SUBHAN*;-;It's a good game :D
SK | victor;-;6,7CS completeCSThe Best Game in the world !!!
poheemi;-;Too much better than CS GO ;)
Edward;-;VERY NICE GAME ,low graphis
[SF]Sinsinatti;-;Nice game. but some cheated.
[S T R G Y W R Y];-;I love this GAme More than my life :-*
Ravangard;-;The game that started it all for me. Simple and to the point is how i would discribe it. Bad guys vs good guys, eliminate the team and take your place in the CS hall of fame. I ended up playing this game for a professional team in the CPL tournaments.
ConstantinOFF;-;recomand .
KhAdKa Ke ThOkDe;-;addictive
Meemo;-;Just simply the best game ever <3
ISoDuhAsian;-;this game should have a game search, i have a hard time finding a game i like. This game is Awsome i would recommend this game. :D
HE@TB|@$T;-;This game is really awesome. This made my childhood awesome!
Spartul;-;Old school shooter.
Dvine;-;plant the bomb
Saggy Naggy;-;This takes me back to my childhoof, had to re-buy it cause its that good, Recommend it if you want to see the Half Life mod CS not CS source or GO, still a very good game.
!Papo;-;OldSchool ! ! ! Yeah
st0nEd <3 buD #mF'D;-;Legendary game .. will never ever see death
Rahrah;-;An old classic. Always enjoyed playing this for no other reason than it's fun.
1k1g.;-;Best tactical fps shooter in the world and the best game valve has ever released i think most people will agree with me and if u dont agree that means you havnt played it yet :) 11/10
CyborgCS;-;Awesome OLD Schoooool Game :) I hop on to this when im sick on CS:GO
The Mosjoo;-;The popularity of this game had suprised me Yeasterday i were watching a finnish document, which shows a normal life of poor peoples, one episode told about Nenetsi tribes who lives in northen Siberia. There were also a episode that showed deleted scenes of this document show. This episode showed that there were a small power generator in one of the nenetsi tents and there were one nenetsi guy who had get  laptop from someone. Even this guy played counter strike. and in norther siberia!!!!. if you have a computer whith internet connection you must have cs it is so populargame. and good game also
KIRTAN #WillBeBackSomeday :);-;Too awesome game Still the No1 game in the world!
Zux;-;Best shooter oldschool game. A must have.
Viktor;-;Really good game, it brings back the feelings"
godssuccess;-;LIKE IT !
D.G/Nj/.B0`/.xD #~;-;Brilliant game. Excellent for team strategy, accuracy and reflexes.
MagTyro;-;Nice Game, Most Enjoyed with all friends and Barbique :D
Doriel;-;better then all the other Counter Strike versions available on Steam. If you want to experience the classic CS, get it!
TheWarrior943;-;This will be more of a ''my experience with this game'' type of review, because saying things like ''great gameplay'' will not suit something I've experienced with Counter-Strike. Here you go: I remember back in 2002 I was at a friend's house and he was playing a game. I didn't know the name of the game nor I had internet to find it. A few weeks passed by and another friend came over and he didn't have a computer, so he brought a disc with a game in it. He told me that it was one of the best games and from that very moment I knew that it is going to be the game I saw at the other friend's house. When I saw the Counter-Strike logo I was filled with gamegasm (?) and I was so happy. I don't remember a day when I was so happy like back then. So, the journey started. I was playing it hardcore. Made friends, clans, was involved in communities and even made two myself. Counter-Strike is my first game which I played competitively and it was a whole experience. Playing public servers and maybe some servers with mods was very fun, but playing it competitively made it very intense and stressful. In a pleasant way, ofcourse. Shooters these days try to be different, advanced in a way. Sometimes the most simple games like Counter-Strike are the ones that live to this day. Also, there are plenty of mods to keep your attention to this game. The gameplay is very simple - defend as a Counter-Terrorist, attack as a Terrorist to plant the bomb or save the hostages as a CT. I am sure most of you already know this and I doubt there are gamers that haven't heard or know the gameplay of Counter-Strike, so I am sharing here more of my experience. I wish I could find my CS Anthology account which I've lost since 2008. So, I decided I am going to buy this game again and here you go - more than a thousand hours played. I still play it from time to time to this day and it brings back many great memories and I sometimes even stumble upon people I've played with years ago. I think Counter-Strike changed gaming in a major way and we wouldn't have many games like we have today, if this game wouldn't exist. I am sure many of people already have played games like CS:GO, but never the roots. I doubt any of you will play it for more than an hour, because it's much more simple and it differs a lot in my opinion from CS:GO and modern games. I am glad that I lived through the golden era of shooters and if I'd have to rate it, it'd 10/10 ofcourse,
RoiKaS'' RIP Hussein Fatal;-;Old but Gold
jdn-dp-;-;WHERE IT ALL STARTED.
,3raa8i ;;-;Fail Game , Just Give Me The Money :)
mr.brown;-;Nice , and very addicted ;c
SilenT_ Ch4n;-;THE REAL CLASSIC!!!
El.Grande|El.Poods;-;its super awesome  yeah
SklepMeister;-;Old game, but I never get tired of.
ThePineapple1337;-;Lock n' Load! This is the game that marked an era. Indeed it did. And it's not very bad today either, in fact some people prefer this than the newest addition to the CS franchise. Well what do you know. It is highly unlikely that you, dear reader, has never heard about Counter-Strike. In case you haven't, the gameplay is very simple. There are two teams, Counter-Terrorists (the good guys) and the Terrorists (the bad guys, to the general public). In addition there are two official gamemodes, Hostage Rescue and Defuse. In hostage rescue, the T's (Terrorists) have captured a few gentlemen and are holding them hostage. The CTs (Counter-Terrorists) have to go in and shoot the bad guys and save the day. Meanwhile, the Ts have to kill the CTs, but not the hostages. No, hurting a hostage will cost you money. Quite alot of it, well, almost all of it. The second gamemode is called Defuse and is the most popular. The Ts have to plant an explosive device, also known as bomb in two select areas of the current map, called bombsites. They go by the name of A and B, respectively. The choice of where to plant the bomb is down to personal preference. Meanwhile, the CTs have to shoot the Ts and defuse the bomb (preferably both, but the CTs will still win the round if all Ts are dead). If the CTs die or run out of time, the Ts win. The rounds last about 5 minutes each and is divided into 30 rounds until map change (which is very rare since all the servers just play on de_dust2). In Counter-Strike you have a money system. You start the first round with 800$, which is enough to buy an improved pistol or body armour. The winning team will receive a set amount of money while the losing team will recieve notably less. Once you advance the second round, most of your teammates will switch to automatic rifles, but investing in sub-machine guns and shotguns can be a sensible choice albeit not the most popular for some reason. Mainly becuase you need more skill to master SMGs than what is needed for a rifle. There is a good amount of weapons to purchase, each divided in their own category (Pistols, Shotguns, SMGs, Rifles, Machine guns and equipment). It is not advisable to buy the most expensive weapon you can buy when you are losing, it's best to hold on to your money and buy a cheaper option (this is commonly known as "eco round", economic round). You might be outgunned, but at the start of the next round you will have sufficient funds to buy a better weapon and so on. As you can see, the gameplay is very simple. The communication consist of commands over the radio (Cover Me, Enemy Spotted and the most used "Fire in the hole"). You of course have the global and team text chat and normal voice chat using your own microphone. Once you get into the game you will probably be the first one to die. Expect that to be outcome of every round. Yes, Counter-Strike is easy to learn, but very difficult to master. To make it worse, in Counter-Strike there is no option to play offline with bots (this only applies to 1.6, the "first" CS) so you're probably going to get harassed verbally by your fellow teammates (quite ironic, don't you think?). Good thing there are many guides in the Internet available for you to read about how to improve yourself in CS. We're almost done here, except for a few things. The Counter-Strike community to begin with. I wouldn't call it cancerous, but the community isn't very friendly or welcoming so to speak. If you decide to hide instead of killing the enemies even though they've outnumbered you your teammates will make great use of their very rude vocabulary, or you will get votekicked off the game. Same thing goes for weapon choice, tactic choice etc etc Do keep in mind that yelling at someone for something in a video game isn't really a sign of strength. More like the opposite, if you spend all day screaming at people in a video game you shouldn't take people seriously. Ignore them or change server. Also the map rotation on all the servers. If the server isn't playing some poorly made custom map you will be playing de_dust2. That's it. Even though there are more maps (even a map called de_dust) you will always end up in dust2. Few servers play on cs_italy or de_nuke. Yes, dust2 is the most popular map but people play on it so much I could make a fully detailed sketch of it in my head if I was woken up in the middle of the night! So in the end, if you are looking for a fun shooter that will present you a great challenge look no further. Gameplay doesn't change much but you will get better and better at it so it never gets boring. And it's very fast paced, what you'll need it two minutes and you got yourself a great dose of entertainment. Also it's suprisingly compatible with Windows 8 although this was released at the time when Windows 98 was the huge hit. And it doesn't take up much space really, so a low end PC can handle this really good (well, depends on your graphics card and other stuff, but you don't need military grade hardware). I hope my review has come to great help in deciding whether you should spen money on this or not. Thanks for reading! Counter-Terrorists Win!
Dante XXI;-;ZAMBIES ! 2spooky4me zombie mod 2/10 Esport 2/10 Fun 2/10 Teamwork ??? THER IS NO TEAMWORK
50 days to my suicide;-;This game is a legend. Such a game will not be ever. It will never die, will live on forever!
{-THE NE-};-;Best in the Counter Strike series, have been playing this mostly since 2004. Sadly, there are only fewer players and servers now...
FockinUppity;-;Skeet shooting at its finest
UN1V3RZUM;-;Most Popular Online Shooter Of All Time.
cel.money;-;!!PLEASE GUYS I NEED HELP !! After purchasing CS 1.6 and after ,,playing,,in settings i mistakely clicked on something (probably run on a window or something like that ) and now i have just small window showing left down corner and i cant change it back because of small window . Here are screens what i see .... Please add me throught steam and help me .... For help is reward sure ..... Screens showing what exactly and what just i see : http://gyazo.com/c783ce4c5d9a04cfcb0666e0dfaea662 , http://gyazo.com/1ffd8973fb8ca4537937b1a823cd9301
mzai;-;SO OLDSCHOOL ONLY S CAN UNDERSTAND THAT
N1GHTTHUNDER;-;It is one of the shooters of my life.I do not like this game , i respect this game!
ArcheNNNNNNNNNNN # aim.ru;-;The best game ever
|VEX| kyle | trade.tf|;-;learn spanish before playing this game
Ov1C;-;this is the best aim game i have played ever
Zerro;-;3D    .      (Old school).     ,       Counter-Strike   ,      !   ,    ,    (  no steam). ,        .             Public(),     .  !
owlnerf;-;Stabbed in the back while jumping and trying to quickscope the police 10/10
mao;-;The best online shooter ever!
WailedCashew;-;it's Cs What do you want!? 10/10
Bane;-;Hours of gameplay, tons of fun, amazing when played with a great team that uses communication to it's fullest. I recommend this to anyone who likes FPS games and team-based games.
zmeul.norului.rosu;-;A fantastic classic game! :D
= BullsEye =;-;the best game ever :)
GeCu(B);-;Good old times :D
Tobix;-;Just classic, for me it is better than other CS games.
ZERO | e2k^^^;-;nice Game forever~~~~~ =DD
tck~;-;the best
ZEEEEEEEEW # TOT zRM va ramane !;-;Recommend!
Vtrasputns;-;I bought the whole CS 1 anthology.Great time-terrible decision. Lets get to the point-When you start,you..well get blasted in the face.Honsetly when i started on the scoreboard it was 1:15 so yeah. Glock,usp,deagle,mp5,famas,galil,cv-47,m4 and Awp that is going to kill ye most of the time. Have fun buying and playing :)
L0giK;-;The Greastest game ever made in history.
Streekz;-;Classic.
ZnIIp;-;What to say...? BUT THE GREATES GAME EVER!
KEiMZ];-;Super Games professional.
Doge;-;Such play. Very shooter.wow. Doge recommends
i.Karma;-;classic.. but guys go play csgo :D
JORDAN;-;Recomand :D
SoKKa;-;Old Style :D
Z.WhiteSkull.7;-;i love thes game
12yz12ab;-;Good game. Figure out the camera for me. Looking around doesn't work.
SpaceGhost;-;This game truly has changed and as much as i wish i still enjoyed it, all the changes have turned me away. I will always recommend this game but for myself, i will stick with GO.
==DocToR //--\\;-;Its A superb game doesnt lags normally via steam i recommend to hav more plugins in this defaut game
KuroT1k;-;This game will always be my favorite counter-strike and it's a game from my younger years that I enjoyed. Not alot of people play it anymore but it's still good. I'd just get a bunch of friends to buy it and have a 5v5 lan. c: :3 <3
AM_ZIS_JE;-;Very God
optical;-;Still one of the best!!!
aaxeLsabb;-;Very nice game, play it!
RasseS;-;IN  I CAN'T FIND ANY HACKS TO THIS GAME
PoOKiE;-;This is the greatest FPS of all times !
Adrian13sk;-;It's game from my child times. Better fps then this you can't find. 10/10
McMillanFixXxeR;-;I must have put 200 hours in this game, oh man those were the days. I miss you 1.3, lmao.
Hiddenn;-;This is no1 FPS game in the world, King of Esport game.
ZinsteiN_.;-;PlAy hArD g0 pr0__ achieve eternal gaminG*
n0 s0un!];-;Best multiplayer FPS in the history, and today one of the best PC game. But good days of this game are permanently away. Valve destroying this game every day, but community is stronger, as they think. People played this game years ago and will play further. VIVA CS
Sni;-;Best cs ever ^^
Mind Distortio.;-;"In D2 camping in T spawn with awp is so 2005..."
nastynate.;-;the
maranello;-;Very good game ! Best ! :)
8bit;-;It is a game that has been played before, is still played now and it will be played in the future !
Cospii;-;The Best !!! <3
TIR;-;Game what i play over 10 years :)
Wheat;-;The original Cunter Snipe! The only nonsource game actualy played by people!
Short Girls With Nice Butts.jpg;-;A friggen classic in shooters, play it and love it
poop;-;Greatest Game Ever
Arlas;-;Ok, this is an internet classic; it's been the butt of many meme jokes, but you just can't help getting past the fact that it became an internet classic. With Terrorist versus CT matches, weapons that would make your head spin and a variety of game modes and community based maps, CS is just one of those games you can't pass up.
Hs (Spidy);-;Awesome Game ever played.... |m|
momther;-;Great game. A lot of people still playing, full/modded servers. Its easy to get into, and its cheap
Hwarang;-;A real classic game. I lost track about how many time I've spent playing CS
Curtis Kobainis;-;i would strike the counter hard if i could return this bad game
MagillaGorillaThaKillaFoSkrilla;-;you should play this because i made a lot of maps for it. if you would like a copy i will buy it for you.
Zaihum;-;This game is a legend !
WhiteNero;-;9/10 Great Game, Worth having in your steam account!
systemrider;-;The original hard core multiplayer shooter, still played to this day, steep learning curve but nothin can replace the classics, simple, quick paced and unforgiving, just what you'd expect from the CS series. 9/10
David aka Gadi;-;Old but gold.
Axel;-;i never played it
TunaDogg;-;Better than CS:S and CS:GO
dancingbaby.gif [2gay2live];-;Whenever I play this game I have the urge to go back to high school then smoke some dank buds and tell my mom to go to hell. Linkin Park 4 ever.
sammitch :;-;One of the best games of all time. A staple in competitive and casual gaming. It pretty much paved the way for competitive team esports.
KROMPIRKO;-;Very good online game !
Secret Noob Agent;-;Awesome game ! Really Addicting ! A classic game that should never be put down !
barda;-;Very fun
192.168.1.1;-;Pretty much set the bar for modern day FPS
BlackStrike - Road To 2K;-;the best FPS in the world forever!!!
Annie T. Mood;-;1.6 hipster fest
DarKnight;-;I spent 10 years playing this game. What more can be said?
RekkIT7;-;CS 1.6))
Winterion;-;The most important FPS in competitive gaming history. Respect.
machoTS;-;Good for netbooks.
Beli Xepoj;-;Great!
AIM;-;Still playing..
woozylv;-;Game on!
abderrahman;-;my counter strike 1.6 doesn t work why???
Cheese;-;Good stuff. Yep.
NagAzZz;-;Just the best game ever, im glad i spended thousand and thousand of hours playing this game <3
[S]cOrPioN[!]^;-;Best shooting game ever played
CaptainRamen;-;Welcome to the worlds most fun over rated pile of . Since I first got a PC nearly 3 years ago all I have ever heard is counter strike, counter strike, counter strike. And, after about 15 hours of play time I see why. Right away I can see that when counter strike came out it was the magnum opus of the fps/multiplayer genre and I can respect that but that also explains the largest problem with counter strike, its nonexistent learning curve. For the first maybe 3 hours I played on a few different servers and never killed a single person. I figured Im new to this and it seems as thoe these guys/girls have been playing much longer than I have been so I began to brush it off and then 2 hours and may servers later I had killed maybe 6 people, not much had changed. And then remembered that thats stupid, I shouldnt be playing against people that have 150 hours clocked while I have 5. Another problem is the weapons I can understand the weird names, Valve would have been a smaller company then and saved a buck by naming them weird stuff but that doesnt mean I wont still make fun of them. The damaged ratio is also complete . The sniper rifle is a one hit kill the subs are useless and I was once hit across the map with a shot gun blast. The knife is a bit under powered but Thats better than it being a light saber. And For some reason the only guns that are ever used are the AK look alike the M16 look alike and the sniper rifle. I should say that counter strike is not a bad a game. It's for sure a sextillion times better than any Call of Duty ever made. And I will confess that this game is more fun giving your friends ADHD kid a gram of cocaine and telling him his dad is made of candy. But its also as frustrating as trying to put that same kid in a car seat.
LOVE FPS;-;Best oldschool FPS shooting game ever, we never forget you :)
Junz;-;still the best game ever!
EvanJam506;-;The Most Aggressive, Awesome,Shooter That dated back then when it was made.It Was the best shooter ever since Halo Combat Evolved Came Out. And It's still popular today.So I,personally think you should buy it.It's Only 10.00,And then,if you have kids let them play it when there older,And then let their kids,kids play it,And so on and so on... So Really Buy This Game To Experience What The Gameplay Feels Like.
Eat you alive ^_^;-;You get kinda bored after a while..... it's interesting until you meet players with cheats and so on..... this game was a good RPS but his time has passed ;x
sEwa;-;Alive CS 1.6
dEoN;-;great way to spend some down time
Jebaka<3;-;One of the best counter strikes...old but gold.
dreamy;-;best multiplayer fps title of all time. nuff said.
LadyWolf;-;The game may be old, but it still gives hours of fun.
Masky;-;Father of FPS!
Jokerman;-;Best FPS game in my opinion. Definitely a must buy. This review goes to all CS Series.
.DCE-;-;Great game! 5*
_pdk^;-;Its a Multiplayer Game can be played on LAN or NET IP ADDRESS Its simple and strategy, one of most played games!
GONE UNTIL MID MONTH JULY;-;This game is amazing if you like any counter strike try this one out the recoil is diffrent but oh well
'Raph-;-;If you like classics, here is something you should probably get. A mod from half-life released one year after half-life it is still one of the most played games in the world bringing players from all over the place to enjoy together. It has a rather simple gameplay and you're able to get most of it in a few minutes but at the same time it requires training if you want to be able to play well.
uiaeqkz g2a.com;-;Perfect BAD GAME
Compton Crip;-;I don't need to say anything about this masterpiece. CS:GO has been out for 2 years now. As a long time CS fan (Yes the hours on STEAM are short but if they logged the data on my game disk there would be at least 3000 hours on it) Counter-Strike 1.6 just gives me a certain feeling none of the later CS games give me. Listen, if you happen to be reading this because you are thinking of buying it, get it. It will be one of the most action-packed amazing $10 you'll ever spend.
Google Chrome;-;This will be more of a ''my experience with this game'' type of review, because saying things like ''great gameplay'' will not suit something I've experienced with Counter-Strike. Here you go: I remember back in 2002 I was at a friend's house and he was playing a game. I didn't know the name of the game nor I had internet to find it. A few weeks passed by and another friend came over and he didn't have a computer, so he brought a disc with a game in it. He told me that it was one of the best games and from that very moment I knew that it is going to be the game I saw at the other friend's house. When I saw the Counter-Strike logo I was filled with gamegasm (?) and I was so happy. I don't remember a day when I was so happy like back then. So, the journey started. I was playing it hardcore. Made friends, clans, was involved in communities and even made two myself. Counter-Strike is my first game which I played competitively and it was a whole experience. Playing public servers and maybe some servers with mods was very fun, but playing it competitively made it very intense and stressful. In a pleasant way, ofcourse. Shooters these days try to be different, advanced in a way. Sometimes the most simple games like Counter-Strike are the ones that live to this day. Also, there are plenty of mods to keep your attention to this game. The gameplay is very simple - defend as a Counter-Terrorist, attack as a Terrorist to plant the bomb or save the hostages as a CT. I am sure most of you already know this and I doubt there are gamers that haven't heard or know the gameplay of Counter-Strike, so I am sharing here more of my experience. I wish I could find my CS Anthology account which I've lost since 2008. So, I decided I am going to buy this game again and here you go - more than a thousand hours played. I still play it from time to time to this day and it brings back many great memories and I sometimes even stumble upon people I've played with years ago. I think Counter-Strike changed gaming in a major way and we wouldn't have many games like we have today, if this game wouldn't exist. I am sure many of people already have played games like CS:GO, but never the roots. I doubt any of you will play it for more than an hour, because it's much more simple and it differs a lot in my opinion from CS:GO and modern games. I am glad that I lived through the golden era of shooters and if I'd have to rate it, it'd 10/10 ofcourse,
Tasty;-;Best classic game
Meowcow;-;A game of skill. Master this game and you'll be able to dominate in any other FPS games.
SEVEN;-;The game that started it all (well, almost)... simply a classic
Sansotrm_Darude_apextwins.ogg;-;I shot you;re head with awp, why u no die?!
Major_Tom;-;Well, this is the one that basically started it all... An entertaining game that despite being old, its gold! Cheap and a whole lot of fun.
Chupa;-;Cool old Game!
Four Aces;-;This is the best and always willbe the best cs ever i would never stop playing it till i die i love it so much.
Cow64;-;Great game? Or Greatest Game?
AlisonG;-;BEST GAME EVER  CSGO
Fweaky;-;Video of me :) http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=HqlapB-cLAk
lb[9];-;Still the shooter ever.
Comrade ( );-;+nostalgic game +best game modes of multiplayer +best maps +so much fun recommend for all peoples who like nostalgic video games - 9.8/10
De_n00bWOLF;-;The game that started it all, good for slower PCs.
Tribeman;-;Ahhhh CS 1.6 it is kind of dead now, but I couldn't begin to tell you how much time I ahve spent just playing this game. It is fun and takes actual skill, unlike that easy-mode CS:Source.
Ruins;-;still want to play 24*7 ..
ViecheN;-;pretty good
boCa #ACAB;-;Good one
rNAV;-;Counter Strike 1.6  What else their is to say?
NightmareStea-m;-;This is Counter-Strike 1.6, the latest version of the original Counter-Strike. The graphics are far inferior to the source version but the gameplay is considered better by most Counter-Strike veterans. This has some maps not found in the source verison and has the riot shield which is not in the source version either. The riot shield allows you to avoid bullets but you cannot have a primary weapon if you have it equiped so you can only use your sidearm. This version also features a gamemode not available in the source version. The gamemode is where you must protect a player controlling a VIP while they make their way to the rescue vehicle. If you want to see how different this is from the source version then go right ahead, it's only $5.00 on steam so you have nothing to lose.
men1kmati;-;Best FPS of all time
Bear;-;- One of the best games FPS games ever made, Counter-Strike 1.6 left it's mark on the FPS genera. The Community. - The once prospering community has now reduced the number of adepts, simply because the time for Counter-Strike (1.0-1.6) has passed by a little bit and more and more of the once players of Counter-Strike are attracted now to these new big FPS's, and they are right to do that because we need to move and and progress. The Graphics. - Not so astonishing if you put it against the today graphics, we must remember that, it is an old game, the graphics we look at today for this game were some hits back in 2000 and personally I still enjoy the graphics a little, because they are bringing that simplicity, not an eye heavy graphics style. The Sounds. - Well, for me, I still love the sounds in this game, the guns sound like proper powerfull weapons, when you press the button to fire you really feel like you are engaging somebody and you really feel like you are wielding a firearm that could take someones life, not like some of today's FPS's where guns sound more like the pops of the popcorn put in your microwave. So here Counter-Strike still takes the point from some of the new FPS's. - Even with the fact that's Counter-Strike's 1.6 time passed by a little bit, i still recommend it and me too, i still come back to it from time to time to enjoy this nice, simple and clean graphics style, the still impressive gun sounds and sometimes just to see where have we started from and where have we come with the FPS genera. Note. This is a personal opinnion, you may agree or disagree with it, but on whatever side you are, you can leave a nice criticising comment instead of some hateful messages. Thank you.
[-420-24/7-]FatherTyme;-;This game is one of the best games i have ever played!!!!
nnqt;-;This is just a classics.
;:-cruck::-;-;THe best game ever played!
Jarhead;-;Best fps game in my opinnion
DJ;-;If you're looking for fast-paced action, this game is for you.
Lionheart;-;For more than 10 years this game still has billions of players playing it including me. Possibility to create and customize your own game arena. The textures may not seem the best, but the gameplay and strategy really sucks you in. My first shooter game I've bought, only because of respect to developers.
Supreme NTM;-;as
Pizza Migoo;-;Ya can't play it on windows 8, wow fail #windows8fail #geezewindows8beabetterperson #CStho #JailbreakTho #Memories #mems #windows7 ##.
CoCoNO;-;Its a all time classics
Catt Lauer;-;nothing can beat Cs
croce -,..,-;-;Classic game very fun.. everyone should own this game
DopePhizh;-;IT'S F***ING CS!!!
mistermojo;-;Easily the best American Football game I've ever played
Liquidsnakehpks-joa;-;bomb has been planted , go go go Hehe The best counter strike to play with , The newer ones may have new features and better graphics but this the version to start counter strike gaming with , Extremely simple to get used to the mechanics and well balanced . Go on find a Dust 2 24/7 32 players public server and enjoy the game
Mx.rowe;-;the best game ever!!!
Limpetz;-;Valve has taken a large selection of the maps from Counter-Strike 1.6 - Office, Havana, Italy, Aztec, Chateau, Cobble, Piranesi and of course eternal favourites Dust and Dust 2, and recreated them...
/var/usr;-;A game, every gamer plays and should play.
Snort Cannon;-;This game is a an amazing game and at the beggining your going to suck hard but you get good at this game and iti really fun
Tombom;-;I used to love this game. Now I love TF2.
LEEDLELEEDLELE;-;Even though it is old, this game sure lives to today, and is still great!
.Slush`;-;This is a classic. Much better since they added Widescreen and HD reions.
Felix Revenge;-;good game but complicated story
Tr3b0r_UK;-;Everyone should have played Counter-Strike 1.6. This game defined online MP shooters, and is still played to this day.
88888888888888;-;This will be your best friend when your awesome pc/laptop breaks down.
Erin Go Bragh @<);*);-;Best fps of all time, was in 1999 and still is in 2011
Nice Puppies;-;This game is pretty much just as good as Counter Strike Source just with older and outdated graphics and sound. You can play Counter Strike 1.6 with bots by getting Podbot MM: http://podbotmm.bots-united.com/main_pb_page/index.htm. A great game!
goat:est of alltime;-;Who hasn't played CS? Come on.
WANTED  | CZE |;-;The best version of Counter-Strike!
sG| schi-scha-schepperAtze;-;Classic, classic, classic. Will this game ever die? :)
Campo;-;What can I say, nostalgia and a great childhood. This was one of my first games back on my old steam account when I was around 8. I hardly remember my first experiances but I remember staying up and playing this all night once(first all nighter :3). Of course not just because of nostalgia but excelent gameplay, excelent movement, and perfect balance. 10/10
Atrito;-;THE BEST GAME EVER!!! THE FREAKING BEST GAME EVAAAA BROOO!!
JaSiO;-;Nice game ;]
KrAzEd;-;Best game. Period.
aL;-;play hard go pro
=GSI= Kampf-Dackel;-;The best oldschool tactic Shooter :P
teoferrazzi;-;the community is harsh. I suck at this game. supplies running low hope crumbling
Michael Bot;-;Get the complete pack when it's on sale and you can play some fun maps with your friends !
Aestoc [RU];-;Best online shooter of last years, old but damn good
ugh;-;Best game ever. Love it.
Hipstercreations;-;its good
CandyCat;-;This game is really good ;)
DontBeMadBro;-;Steam has been born on this game, few years later still one of the best FPS game n ofc graphic doesnt matter in this case.
LikeS;-;Destroyed Gaming/Avadis
riley;-;it be fun?
para dude;-;BEST VERSION OF ALL COUNTER-STRIKE!!!!!!!!!!
MossPimp;-;Very cool game. Lately the book club has been trying to learn to communicate with Mexicans and Spanish people so this game really opened a new world for us, letting us dive into the daily lives of a Mexicano and their struggles in the virtual world of Counter Strike. I will be recommending this to my book club and spanish class.
aznpineapple;-;its super hard to play if you have played csgo before it
X-CeLeRaTe, A-peX;-;If you dont own it your missing out.
B|ack|ce;-;My First Loved Game and still is awesome
Sleepy.Shaman;-;play this its badass
gez;-;The best shooter ever made <3
<=[ Bilbolainen;-;Counter-strike 1.6 is absolutely one of the best games ever made - ALL PLATFORMS. Soon to be 14 year old game, this game is still the most popular game in CS-franchise. I would recommend any new player to CS, to actually first buy CS 1.6/Anthology, because this game is golden.
HiiiPower;-;Most Addicting FPS of all time
Disabled Hitman;-;old school game :)
The B@$her;-;Life changing game; gives birth to a new, game changing life!
coPyKiLL0r;-;Totally awesome. It was. It is. And it will ever be.
b3sT-;-;This is the most beautiful game I ever played!
Whealy *Plankan;-;This is awesome!
Vinyl Hipsternator;-;this is really fun
TuTuN10;-;The best game.
El_Bristow;-;This was one of the first pvp first person shooters i played online back in the days of 56k modems, when a ping of 200 or lower was considered very good. I played this game for about 5 years, i even made some of my own levels for the community. Those were fun times.
G|F Chicobarron;-;best ever - classic
Zigiss;-;Nice game.:)
rhyzor25;-;THIS IS THE BEST GAME EVER MADE IN THE WORLD[like the song]
Tony;-;Good Classic! Nice to play this game!
piqeta;-;Well easy gameplay, hard online. It still continues to be one of the first cs. Price: Good Gameplay: Easy Overall: 8/10
xeno;-;great game, i miss it competetively
Control;-;Who can not love the good old classic Counter-Strike? I played this  religiously when I was younger, had some good times. The game has gotten pretty outdated, and there's large traces of hacker s. Regardless, still a monumentally epic game.
Bellerophon;-;This is simply a legend. Who never played and enjoyed this game, cannot call himself a gamer.
rip;-;Classic)
RYM4N;-;The best FPS team based tact shooter on the market hands down. if you dont believe me just check its history.
Merica;-;Although this game was made 100 years ago, it still retains its core value being a great FPS shooter that requires team work and not just 360 no scoping. This game wouldn't mean anything to a 13 year old because the graphics aren't great but to a person my age this game holds many hours in my heart. 8.5/10
Tra^^;-;That's a very nice game and it's a pleasure to have it
Kazuya;-;13 years play this game and i never get bored.
ezekiel_49;-;An old timing classic. But gets quite bored in the end...
SB;-;counter-strike is a good game for the most part, adding characters and stuff to the half life franchise and universe... there are several canon discrepencies, but they can be ignored for the gameplay and overall storyline (and even how that fits into the orignal half life game :D) overall its worth paying for and playing...
uG | Fragen;-;Very nice game :)
Yudzhin;-;One of the best games ever.
[n00b]SaVage|Lockdown;-;The quintessential modern combat FPS multiplayer. Often imitated, never duplicated. I spent the greater part of a decade enjoying this game. Much of the fun however came from the great friendships developed over years of online play.
david;-;play for funn
Joker.brn #SemSom;-;just the best of the all games in the world
King Slumlord;-;You're not a true PC gamer until you own this game.
[CHECK PROFILE];-;Great FPS game.Yes, it has not the best graphics, but if you want to have a nice aim, nice game collection and etc. you should buy this game. It doesn't have any achievements, but i gurantee that you will have fun there!
#Adamkafly.;-;there's kinda 50% of them players are cheater... but if ya' go a great team, friends n' stuff, this old game can show you some "coolness"!
SnK.;-;: 1. Hostage Rescue ( )     ( CT)    ( )    . CT ,            ,         . 2. VIP Assassination ( VIP)         VIP- (       ),       CT. 3. Escape () -       escape-         beta 7.0 (es_trinity).      escape-  .  CT   .              .      CT.          .      ,   . 4. Bomb / Defuse (/)                     .           (. , ),      .       (bomber),       .       ;  ,       (       ),       (   ).  ,  ,    ,         .          .          The bomb has been planted.  CT   Counter-Strike          .
...;-;Cool game ;)
The Great Galloping Snail;-;A true classic multiplayer FPS. Difficult for beginners.
KeyNaughtyBoi;-;Counter -Strike is a great FPS simply about terrorists doing things like bombing supplies or keeping people hostage while the Counter-Terrorist try to defuse the bombs or save the hostages. This game has many great mods and maps that make it fun to come back to. No wonder this game used to be the world's number 1 online action game. If that isn't enough you get Counter-Strike: Condition Zero with it. I would give this game a 9 out of 10.
h4mm32;-;a cult classic of culminating counter-terror camaraderie
Andr !;-;filete la wia !
k1deNNN*;-;The Best Game Ever Seen .
CROOOOW;-;Still the greatest shooter of all times
locasiopeean;-;Great game, would play again 10/10.
majmunina;-;Simply the best online FPS video game out there.
waszaT #boosting for skins;-;very cool game.
king!;-;Very good game, but that russians people so  :S
Koba;-;Its CS 'nough said
m1g;-;Great game
[AkG]Ninjuar;-;No matter what, hands down my favorite PC game. All-time best shooter, in my opinion, and I'm always hoping for the comeback.
Deez Nutz;-;still the best counter-strike out there to date.
The Annoying Seagull;-;An amazing old shooter that is really great fun with friends after you get some experience.
Cyrus;-;Fat Albert seal of approval
-;Z1N~';-;Simple Adictive and Elegant !
dorniX;-;Since 2002,since it appeard in Romania,it's the greatest and the funnest game i've ever played.
Raven;-;Addictive ;)
heaT;-;A must buy game for old school FPS gamers. It's tons of fun when you get into it. Like people say - old, but gold.
jIRI;-;The only one game that holding me for more then ten years.
Abomni;-;Great game! The BESt cs ever made!
Constantine;-;Best Classic Action Shooter Ever Was Created!
andrew0scar1;-;the beest <3
pelii;-;cs 1.6 is probably the best yet team based fps game, go is a step up from source but its a very debatable topic that it is AS good as 1.6. Definately not better though.
.TWB | uB3R_r3D;-;Wait... you don't own this game already!? What's WRONG WITH YOU!? How have you not owned this since its' release!? For shame! You might as well just wait for Counter-Strike: Global Offensive to come out, since you waited this long to even get Counter-Strike. I'm ashamed of you.
X>DoreX #';-;Just the best
kametou;-;Good game!! Very nice!!
CommyMist;-;HD Graphics, better than Battlefield 5
PAULKING;-;I really like the game, but I couldnt find the stupid cake.
CocainnE;-;A very good game!
Unexpected Bananas;-;Over a decade later and this game is still the most-played game on Steam and for good reason; solid gameplay, controls, user-generated maps and mods; the list goes on. This FPS personally serves as a model of comparison whenever I play any other first-person games.
R Y 0 * `---;-;Play the world's number 1 online action game. Engage in an incredibly realistic brand of terrorist warfare in this wildly popular team-based game. Ally with teammates to complete strategic missions. Take out enemy sites. Rescue hostages. Your role affects your team's success. Your team's success affects your role.
MONS7AH;-;One of the greatest games ever made. Not active now, but in its prime this game was amazing.
Singularity_Bubble;-;Did anyone not play this game at some point or another. As elusive to me as football and stock car racing in it's ability to transfix the lives and minds of some shall we say, unenlightened "gamers" out there.
}{3ll Br34k3r d-_^b;-;This game is just awesome!
Furkan Coban;-;How bots are taking?
IvanX_X;-;verry old but verry good game this is the gold game of steam
Nico-Kun!;-;The simple fact that this 10+ years old game still shows up in the top played games on Steam clearly says something about its quality. I feel like I shouldn't even recommend it, as its name speaks for itself. Easy to pick up, difficult to master, Counter-Strike is one, if not the best multiplayer FPS out there, and it'll probably remain that way for many years to come. The fact that this game rivals it sequels in number of players worldwide only shows how great this game is. So, do yourself a favour and get it.
uus acc arre_007@hotmail.com;-;Yes, i do recommend this game!
poundkek;-;Counter-Strike 1.6 is much more difficult to get used to over CSS, but it is much more satisfying to succeed in. Recommended!
-=[T<$>K]=- | Di3H@rd K!LL3r;-;THI IS THE BEST GAME GUYS OWN !T
Deki[t]itan;-;The best game ever :)
obsizdfw;-;Still the best imo :)
- Syndicate [;-;This game of the best <3
KOD # VIGONI;-;Boom! Here comes the Boom! Ready or not, here comes the boys from the South Boom! Here comes the Boom! How you like me now?
autismspeaks.org/signs;-;one of the alltime CLASSICS. the only reason we have steam. still a damn fine game. looks like  nowadays but still hella fun. recommended.
PathofWrath;-;Game is great bro... too great
Wozz;-;Either everyone uses Aimbots or I really suck. Probably the second one.
iHaveAFaceNow says No TalenT;-;i cant live without counter-strike ..
azimcz;-;Time proven classic that will always be most fun us born in 80' last century !!!
Lnop #k1nGuin;-;Tactical and Strategic game and a lot of team work :) Nice game...... I Love to play CS 1.6 every time I open steam. n1 :D
[WPC]GHoSTDoG;-;dopest, most skillful game out there.... harkens back to a day when the internet was simpler place and people put time and effort into games. the community was/is the best (minus the hackers, of course). evolved into what all shooters try to emulate and fail at today.
Senpai Edward;-;Great game, lots of hours of fun!
SkArFeR;-;Old School :)
ThE_MarD;-;Heyyo, The FPS multiplayer game that amazed billions of players around the world... and it's easy to see why. Just play it and see how intense some of the fights can be. Still has a very strong player base even though it's a very old game.
#3R1KSS :?;-;Cool game ;]
psyk0tic;-;The team based multiplayer FPS game that started it all, in my opinion. Classic game.
Virse;-;This game is legendary HANDS DOWN
&nbsp;;-;A game when you can play with you best friends :)
Vatari;-;Best Shooter
WhO;-;Great game! Addicted to it! Gives you skills!
krishmeister;-;Good stuff
fce  -SaiyajiN-;-;Very Good game the Best!
PeleN;-;the leggend.
Mek- adicionem Mekito123;-;very good fps
n1das;-;Never gets old.. Classic shooter with great gameplay.
dat CSGO-RAFFLE.COM;-;One of the best shooters.
sage;-;Old school player ! Love this game.
at0mic;-;New into CS?? Counter-Strike is In!!.. Well Actually, Counter-Strike is a good game incase you're starting new carrier of gaming. Counter-Strike is the best in my opinion. Before playing Counter-Strike: Globle Offensive, I chose to go in line.. Counter-Strike > Counter-Strike: Source > Counter-Strike:Globle Offensive. I've been playing CS:GO from a pretty long time but, I loved Counter-Strike. This Counter Strike is Counter Strike 1.6.. So, I'd like to recommend this game:)
RiFt #RoadToInsanity...;-;The Best of his kind.
NickToon;-;CS 1.5 or 1.6 was the birth place for me, to be a PC Gamer - 10/10 !!
Marcy;-;The Best Multiplayer game ever!
j00k;-;Play tomorrow, Play today! @_@
nooblike;-;Just 4 statistics ! =D There's not too much to say, epic game will never die .
Tony Montana;-;old but gold
I am Snatchy . ~ MIX?!;-;A very good and classic game! I think it's the most played game since publish...Counter-Strike 1.6 is for those players, who love competition! It's not so easy to be the best in this game, so you must spend some time learning techniques, map-controlling, weapons and so on...it's a very nice game to spend your time on! I recommend it to all of my friends and for anybody else!
The Black PC Gamer;-;good for players looking for a good fps starter
NoobMonster;-;Go 10 years back and this was the first FPS game I came across, and the first game I ever spent tons of hours on. I keep coming back to it even in my adult years. Perfect game for kids. Great at teaching essential values regarding life. Some of the best voice-acting and most memeroable quotes in any form of media. "Fire hole" is a classic.
PhYz';-;top!
ClownFish;-;Classic CS (Counter-Strike) never gets old, Ka_ maps were the best game type for me, loved round after round dodging blade swings and countering with a sweet headshot, no game mode more tense than Knife Arena, getting stormed at by several opposing team members hungry for frags, using all skill and wit at a 5:1 ratio and coming out victor.. EPIC!
HellHunter;-;The next best version of Counter-Strike after the now defunct CS 1.5.
MiiniiK;-;Nice Old Game :)
Tazy;-;Best Call of Duty Community Simulator with old outdated graphics so far.
Kokosbollen;-;One of the best FPS games ever made :D
blue3ffect;-;Back in high school I used to live and die by this game -- then got a girlfriend and my gaming time diminished to an almost non-existent level for a couple of years and I just fell away from CS. Still, it was great fun. Ran a clan, competed in OGL team matches, etc. Great game especially if you get a group of friends together to run with.
headgaar;-;It has 13 years since it came out and a lot of people still play it. As you can see, gameplay is more important than graphics.
|MONKEY|D|LUFFY|;-;Perhaps one of the best games every created. If there is a balance between simplicity and complexity, it is this game.
Mr.NooB;-;Superb Game ...... xD must have it :D
J8mess;-;The best shooter.   =)
K4Rt1k #SaiyajiN;-;Well what to say about this game..legendary.. =)
JK;-;PlayHardGoPro
Scrabble;-;This game as its released a long time ago, but it still carries the compitive sense, unlike the new versions of counter strike (source and Go), playing this game is fun and i think it would remain as a favourite game as much as i play anymore games.
potato.v1;-;Just awsome !
eX. | statiK;-;revolutionized first person shooters
Kel_;-;cs 1.6, gameplay is good, good fps shooter game, enjoy it. BUY IT
Czemowy2;-;You just must play this game if you're fan of FPS games.
books;-;wtf, how is this game still $5?
\_( O__O)_/;-;Old.
Trouble Maker #GameLife.Ro#;-;It's a good game.
Carlos;-;Very nice game. Most addicted multiplayer game of all time!!
[SnK] Wanryu;-;Well, what can I say? You know what to do.
You gonE!;-;Great game.
ip0000h;-;It's just a classic.
xnd;-;The best ever.
DanteDDL[UA];-;Is there really necessary to say something about CS? I dont think so. Legendary multiplayer action game that lives for decades!
Risontek;-;The best game on Steam store :3
Altanay?!! #we dem boyz !;-;This is the BEST !
Ass@ssin;-;It's just classic game :) I love it :)
Nairo.;-;All-time classic game. Will always be my number one counter strike version.
John dean;-;the original fire in the hole
RESPECT POSTENIM LJUDIMA!;-;its ing good game for old school players!
HELLRAISERS* BAMBUTU;-;I like this game.It is very good game.
abbez. xddd;-;This is the most best shooter game ever made! Brings back the good ol' times and i just love it! Great to buy now when its autumn sale :) 9.5/10
Adam.;-;preety much the best game of all time
VeZy;-;Awesome game always worth it
Pneumatic;-;One old, but good thing :)
Liami;-;Still better then Call Of Duty: Ghosts
ntarpa Pratipaddarin;-;I recommend this game if you play with your friends or at least on Only steam servers.
Andrei;-;Best of old school!
The Unknown;-;The great classic. This is my favorite FPS of all time next to Team Fortress.
MeteoR;-;The greatest game ever invented.
Jorgen;-;This is a classic, would recommend. Its okay 10/10
D3AD GH0$T;-;Always a classic.
FamE; Lil Okie!;-;Very nice shooter game many things you can play:)) BUY IT!
Charlie Fernndez;-;the boss!
scr3w;-;A classic, still good to this day
Rijst;-;Hands down the most addictive team-play based game out there.
daz one;-;"...forever in our heart."
St|cK;-;Pretty much the best FPS evar!
Erin;-;I played this for 2 hours back when I was 15 or something. I sucked at it and people yelled at me. I think if I had spoke on the in-game vent thing they would have treated me differently, but I'm no .
Carkasjak;-;Without a doubt the best multiplayer game in the universe! Will probably stay that way for at least 10 more years!
Flamingo Flamengo;-;I love this game
N.A.P.A.L.M.;-;The best shooter of all time
BattyrFly;-;OldSchool
cxN;-;This is my latest account so i don't have many hours on this, but this game genuinely is one of the best games ever made and it's the source of many beautiful games.
Mitchell;-;Great classic. I prefer it over CS:S. Ten out of ten easily no matter how dated it is.
domoKING;-;Basically my childhood. I spent hours and hours late into the night playing this. Very fun competitive fps with great maps and great gameplay. 10/10 PS. Hit me up if you want to play this.
bones;-;It combines the best of team based gaming with an authentic and therefore exciting approach to tactical ops.
Atola;-;best game i playing cs from 2007
GreedyBastard;-;You can't describe CS. It's CS!
ACM RJ;-;Good Game!!! Epic!
CrYsTAiT #OnePlusTwo -HYPE;-;GET ON MY LEVEL.... One of the best FPS Games, the 1.6 Version will stay always in our hearts. I recommend it for everyone who wants a tactical/action shooter Games!! :)
Sonnenchain;-;loshedo
Ultra eZ';-;Awsome game
The Boy Wonder;-;BACK in the dayy!...
Asgard;-;Probably this game doesn't need any introduction, old and good, still played by a large number of gamers, on of the best online shooter that was created. Still remember my first days finding a good version of the game and playing with bots.
[PlazMa] Red Bullet;-;this game is simply great and skill based the problem though is that most people who still play it are super experts litterly shooting through walls and kiling you when you spawn also the population is not to high but still there for the price i think it's worth a buy
fandelost + jes <3;-;Good ol' CS 1.6, best played on LAN.
WeeWulf;-;Good old counter strike :) a lot of good memories
HACKED HAHA bitch;-;awesome game love it best in the whole world
Ice_Man;-;classic but great
Natsuki;-;Childhood.
jezqhiel;-;classic fps game, everyone knowing this game "Counter-Strike" since 2000 until now this game still famous !!!
_r-;-;coool game :D
peanutbutterjellyPIE;-;atleast you dont die from getting shot in the foot instantly
JordDenham;-;Jumped into a game, got shot, respawned got shot, respawned got shot. Although this happened i probably should of looked at controls and realised i could buy other guns and stuff. still a good game 6/10
KAMPFCHWEIN;-;CS1.6 so much good remembering and still better then BF4 and CoD Ghost
du_rezende;-;Really nice game!
hypz;-;Best game of all time...
AlexaBlain!;-;You'll never accomplish anything if you don't believe that you can do it.
Harifaka;-;I grow up on CS 1.6, but now it is unplayable. a lot of garbage on servers a lot of music and useless things. low download speed, and everybody hack everywhere. Please make something with this game, just need some patch, for disable downloadable contetn, and useless things...
kisame;-;classic counterstrike you haven't experienced any cs until you have played this
B1XXjr.;-;CEL MAI TARE JOC!!!
Fubko;-;must be on all steam acounts
ChunN;-;Nice game!
_firefOx^ #BuRNNNNNNNNNNN*;-;best game (y)
FOx;-;Classic, 11/10
duduia;-;Addictive
Onlinezigeuner;-;For like 10 Years the No. 1 Ego-Shooter in the E-Sport Scene, Best Mod of Half-Life and (sadly) scapegoat for many killing frenzys. Was one of the most innovative Games that time.
// ^.^ Siggy <3 Nike;-;Nice Game (Y)
Mellow;-;Old game but still good for weak computers
G3nt.G4shi #;-;One of the best game of all time :D
im not here;-;best game evaaahh! buut, CS:GO can be the same enjoyable and fun! :D
Ha!der.Fragg !!;-;I'm a player FPS Games i can't find anouther game fps like counter-strike 1.6 or globale offansive i think this is my best game i play it in my life i wish can find anouther game bcz the cheaters are stuped when he use that  Stop using cheat plz and thank you
Lt.MajorBones;-;this game is so.....ESSY!
Shyko;-;The Game Of Life 1.6
|Team Noob| Wot?;-;pretty cool
J.C.2-3-FTW_The Smo0th;-;Awesome game! Excellent variety of weapons and maps. Great feel. Not like any other FPS i have ever played. 100/10!
emsee;-;This game passed the test of time
Lighto;-;The legandary game
krrish;-;Cs is awesome, its a game that only requieres skill and not ranks and that crap.
PigFace :8;-;Best game of all time
cuibul catre vultur !;-;Simply THE BEst :D POWAH !!!
Cepera;-;Oldschool, nice mechanic, pro game phisics. Forget about nice graphic, drop out cool free to play systems with donations for hats. This game is really for ninja maniacs.
Crayola;-;I recommend this game
Vizable;-;Nearly comes close to Call of Duty, oh wait it doesn't.
Nebula Prophecy;-;This is game was good ten years ago...and still is
raze;-;Defeat the market economy. Make this game free. Raise the communism  the capitalism. Communists unite.
NTSC;-;I Love It
Top Tier Waifu;-;I'd give this game a 65 because of the outstanding gameplay and because i am a great teacher who gives fair grades
BiG ShT  BaD A!MeR;-;best game ever ctreated (Y)
Scarface;-;Very good game the mother of all FPS games !
Blue Jae;-;Very fun and addictive game
BlackJack;-;Nice to all who like a Classic online shooter in which u can play against good others. Allthough like all other online games there are some idiots. but if u dont care about them its really nice to play
_drifter5;-;I spent countless of hours on this game back in my youth. I had a late start and started 1.5 but I remember trying to play competitively by requesting scrimmages with clans in my PUG. My  got completed handed to me but it was fun times. Staying up late and playin awp_map. I really hope that CS:GO is part of the steam sale this year. I missed the chances to pick it up in the past but I hope I can pick it up this time.
SynysterBear;-;One of the all time greatest FPS ever made.
Bramble;-;Great game and classic FPS game! Should play if you like shooting and..shooting :D
Tony;-;The one that started it all.
Jae;-;Great game
raven;-;Oldie, but far more than goldie!
SkitZ_;-;So good, Classic FPS game. Alive for decades!
Rabbit;-;I Love it...!!!
ZEN IS PULL ONESELF TOGETHER!;-;The counter strike 1.6 game can't be quit. Easy to get used to the people so that he is unable to switch to CS: S, or CS: GO. Maybe the reason I think my favorite FPS game.
TKO | Snoop^Dogg;-;I left my Xbox 360, FB just because of this game.
BoPuNk;-;For OldSchools!
LoeJZe;-;Nc game but old
Fapmaster2k;-;Most classic game of all time?
Armadilo.;-;Great game
AmY;-;i love this game
Gestapo101;-;addictive!!!
=Eule= CitizenSnips;-;one of the first pc shooters i've every played and died constantly
Slasher;-;This is the best Counter-Strike ever, ruined my life. 5 stars <3
lolman115117;-;great game so fun get it if u love cs and want to see what the first is like
Mad_FraGGer  <3 FNATIC;-;This Game wat 2 say dis Is d bst game In d world for all the plyrs from India it Was a Hit game it will Be and it should nVr end dis Game
Manhattan;-;Without a doubt, in my top 10 games ever. Without CS, my life would've been a LOT different. This game is freaking amazing, and I remember playing hundreds, and hundreds of hours in the 1.6 version. Playing dust2, dust, aztec, inferno.... man those were the good days. If you're even checking the reviews out, you should buy it. Not because you will be playing it for hundreds of hours now that its old, but just so you can get that vintage feel. Like the smell of a vintage t-shirt. 10/10 Must have for anyone calling themselves a gamer.
MANUZX9;-;the best shooter with friends
ANGEl;;;-;tHE BEST GAME EVER ;D
Cryptic;-;Best online game ever
the cheat police;-;Graphics not always matter and this is an example! Awesome game since 2000! Rating 9/10 because of losers cheaters.
Rizul #ToX!C;-;very awsome game
SUBHAN*;-;It's a good game :D
SK | victor;-;6,7CS completeCSThe Best Game in the world !!!
poheemi;-;Too much better than CS GO ;)
Edward;-;VERY NICE GAME ,low graphis
[SF]Sinsinatti;-;Nice game. but some cheated.
Good Guy;-;Classic.
nAte-;-;A brilliant game.
Psychos;-;Counter-strike- ,        .    ,    Free2play "c"   .  , ,  ,    *   Counter-strike
McCunt;-;Old school , legendary
Rayox;-;Old but Gold!!
Devil - www.devilx.ro;-;The best game Ever :)
Notorious;-;CLASSIC AND A MUST HAVE GAME!!! I highly recommend this game to everyone who enjoys killing games! It a rather simple game with simple onjectives either to deactivate the bomb, kill the other players, or rescue hostages. In my opinion its worth every dollar! :D
name of the game;-;_cl_autowepswitch 0 hud_fastswitch 1
ecent rix;-;The classic which is Counter-Strike. A game that has been a platform for many competitive FPS games. Also a platform to E-Sports becoming prevalent in popular culture. Buy this game and reminisce of what CS once was. It is perfect and it works every time.
Technobreaker;-;Classic & Awesome. Still too many cheaters but pay attention to play VAC Secured servers.
TurboAcid;-;Its counterstrike. 'Nuff said.
AP Shinryu;-;An amazing classic! It excels from killing zombies with a violin to flying around a knife map using a Pidgeot!
Tenico;-;old classic
im going to put my penis in you;-;EPIC Game Better than all other fps games exept CSGO but If you dont care about graphics and love the competitive scene then play this game :)
dewst3r;-;Playing all counter strike from the date it was released. Still one of the best games ever made.
Cristy;-;Play this game
ShaKhiD;-;Classic never dies!
ManiaCKilleR;-;best fps ever.the best counter strike game(following GO on 2nd place).the hardest tactical fps out there where the guns have actual recoil and you need real teamplay and cooperation to win
Zemon{Gamer};-;cs is the best
kyokkeN^.^;-;probably the best game ever
buttflattery;-;none of the games out there on lan have facinated to the extent this game has, hats of to creator of counter strike 1.6 the best ever build
Ghostz;-;Hackers everywhere,every server.Do I recommend this Game? Yes and No. If your going to play Competively your out of luck because of this games VAC. If your buying this game for offline play I recomend the Zbot and The Offical CS Bot mods.Fix this game Valve it was perfect in 2001
Kluber;-;Best FPS of all times, nothing can beat this game.
WalKeR;-;BEST GAME TheDoctorE
Dan;-;Very good game love it!
TurboYoyo;-;respawn simulator
Coward;-;If your reading this, that means you have a steam account. Which means there's no reason you shouldn't have this game in your library already. Btw dont waste your time with CS Zero
Sig6;-;The game that started it all. I have been playing the Counter-Strike series for as long as I have owned a PC. The name is even known to non-gamers around the world. If you haven't tried your skills in this peice of history you are missing out.
=[rEco!L]= Ds;-;Cs for life
Emc0x g2a.com;-;great game :D
LIRAAAAAAA;-;Best and most played FPS of all time! What else do i need to say? Give it a try if you're not already addicted :-P
Fidget;-;Great game that spawned a great franchise
GaZZyLow;-;Oldest shooter game. We're in 2014 and this game is very played.
rusija;-;This game is the best <3
o_Ocrazygamero_O;-;What are you waiting for!! Go Play!!
RkS /M/;-;Cs Go time
Vpn^ [Vip's];-;Mesmerizing passion for real gamers!
Happyappy15K;-;A classic that you don't wanna pass by
sky[RO];-;Very Nice!
ReeGomes;-;the best game ever!
NO RUSSIANS ON EUROPE SV;-;Nice game !
Mr. Chapel;-;One of the best games ever made.
-Syko- 2me compte ._.;-;Great Game
titmuska;-;Bralgh
|-=P[$]K=-| magg baba;-;love this game
B R O C O L L I B O Y Z;-;Where it all started
robben;-;This is an interesting game. It is incredibly difficult to rate it either "yes" or "no." There are far too many points to consider. Counter-Strike was released nearly fourteen years ago, yet it is still difficult to find an open server. It is incredibly fun and can make you laugh or tear your hair out. This game can be excellent for fans of strategy games and shooters, but it's very rare to be able to enjoy it fully. Unless you play on competitive servers, most everyone goes "rogue" and does not work as a team. There are frequent cheaters using programs to increase movement speed, look through walls, or assist in aiming. If you look through the community page, many of the posts are pictures of cats or pornography. When joining a new game, you always feel paranoid about what the server is downloading. The community can be very scary; you must play on servers you trust with people you respect. If you can do this, you will have a blast. Counter-Strike is still played by a huge number of people; you can find great servers with great communities in nearly every language imaginable. There's a wide variety of weapons to choose from, and it is simple to get in on the action. There are no pay-to-win or customization featuresonly action. Counter-Strike can be a fantastic game if you know how to use it properly. Things to note:  There are no bots in CS. However, the Counter-Strike: Condition Zero package (probably the best way to purchase the game) includes Condition Zero, which has support for bots and can be played without an Internet connection.  This is not 1.6 (to my knowledge); there are no shields and a few things are different (the difference is negligible). However, Counter-Strike: Condition Zero still has these features.  This is considered a mod for Half-Life. However, it can be downloaded independently. Note that Counter-Strike will be saved inside the "Half-Life" folder on your computer.
FuckBullet * www.k1ck.com;-;Very good game, i think more people should be playing it ;:)
AshleyEatsCorn;-;This game FFS. The bans are ing dumb jesus. BANNED cuz of to many recent kicked matches . But i was kicked from 1 match at 1 game and i didn't play it for 2 WEEKS.  YOU VALVE.
NOT MY FUCKING TEMPO!;-;Nicest game ever!
Sara Awpkins;-;The game that started it all...I love it better than global should be more popular... Don't want this game to die...
- STyLa;-;Sakaifo igraa = ))) Best of the bests...
FMT XerxesModzV2;-;One of the BEST FPS Multiplayer of all TIME!!!
MuSty_RusTaNg;-;The start of it all if you dont already have it dont even try because you are not a pro like me :)
Brave;-;great game
Mr. Gepardas;-;Dated, but still playable and addictive.
rodrigo$$$;-;cheated
b[i[]etch uiui;-;I've played this game for years never forget
FireBlueDragon;-;:o
Speck You Late;-;good game classic :-)
XSTI8];-;the
Wings;-;play hard go pro
N3XZR;-;THIS IS SPARTAAAAAAAAAAAAA!!!!!!!!!
XANDER;-;Well what can i say best game on the planet
pVVch;-;the most best play!!!!!nice game
Trane209;-;really awsome game really recomend it
oxyuranus;-;The Greatest Game of All Time
Y(U)OTHA;-;Pretty Dope
Esqueleto#RoadToSilver2;-;One of the best FPS multi-player games out there, a must buy
Toxic- 37.221.209.99:27250;-;This Game is a 2. Best FPS. The 1. is a Half-Life
pencil;-;counter strike online     VACCS    STEAM !!
cesko99;-;little problem, there should be 3 options when u click new game, server server settings or server info and game, i have the first (server) and the second (game) i cant add bots and i cant change the settings, how do i fix this?
-= ChampioN =- LLIHEJIbMAH.;-;Perfect
maximohipp;-;Very Fun and Simple Killing
Jankovic;-;Perfect
DeRkKOO;-;This is the beggining of what we call "modern FPS". This game is pure skill. If u are a CoD "aim down the sight" fanboy, don't try it, you're wasting your time. This game is for skilled players only. No aim. No help. Just your and your target.
youva;-;The best fps ever made!
kr[M] DS[H];-;Cs 1.6 is the base of cs :D The best Ever
Jae;-;Great game
raven;-;Oldie, but far more than goldie!
SkitZ_;-;So good, Classic FPS game. Alive for decades!
Gotenks;-;If you pick up this game now, you will most probably get wrecked by people who have mastered the game. Just a warning. Bloody good game though.
The Punisher;-;Really Addictive Game With Great Players
[PSG] velo;-;Fifty years later people will remember this game. It is timeless, just as super smash bros. melee is, dota1/2, and starcraft, etc. At the competitive level no other game tops this as a team based esports fps. So many mechanics to learn, bhopping, ladders, russian walks, spamming crouch to short hop, grenades are 1 pixel width, floaty nade physics, flashes, smokes, all these raise the skill ceiling. Too much to say for what I have experienced, try it yourself, and goodluck finding the niche gametype you prefer.
Cornul12;-;It's wasting to much of your free time.
PAAPII;-;My Favourite game
do_the_gonzy;-;Best Counter Vs. Terro game
pre;-;Can't wait for Counter-Strike 2.0
Squazz - Who else?;-;Enough said ;) BUY IT!
PURPLOYD;-;Pew pew. Grew up with this pew pew so I can't say anything bad about it. I do think it has aged a bit and that CS:S has preceded it but I also know there are people who think that there ain't no better CS than 1.6.. or 1.5... or 1.3... well to each his own. Pew pew with a ROUGH difficulty curve. If you come from the casual CoD MP crowd you quite possibly will hit a wall straight away. But this game is far more rewarding to get into. The better you get at it, the more enjoyable it gets.
starlord;-;10/10 would play again!
THe JoK3R;-;wow one of the best game created ever in the world recomend to friends and ++++===+++++ iovvvvoi
.;-;The game that got me into PC gaming. A classic and must play for any fan of fps games
G. Lee;-;GAME IS OP
[error];-;Nothing like good old CS 1.6 old game, will never be booring, show me the server you play, and I'll show you how pro's play... :D
WackySnake;-;COUNTER TERRORISTS WIN
ruk jao!!reload kr rha hu -_-.-;-;most addictive game ever made!
Ulster (='.'=);-;Classic game with lots of fun mods.
is now playing Dota 2;-;ITS NOT WORKING >.<
funkyfresh;-;This is one of the greatest games I have ever played, full of modifications, active and cool!! Can't say more.
S W A G G E R;-;Great Game...
PUNJABI'S DOTA MODE;-;Best Online Games played in ma life
iMax;-;Counter Strike 1.6             .      ,         ,    .     -  .     - ,    .. -     ,     bf4. ...        ",    , ".  ,     . ()  ,   ,  ,  ,    ,    fast cup, overpro   ;)
a nevem?;-;The greatest FPS game ever played.
Kolio Ficheto;-;Just CS
Sparkymalarkey;-;Who doesn't love CS?
jayjay;-;its good
LeXuS^;-;1.6 is just the best CS ever
LORD DRAGON;-;Old but still entertaining :)
-=]BG[=-^~God Slayer -:D;-;In love with this game <3 #GodSlayer
mR.MustaChEe<3;-;Just amAzing <3.. most complete first person shooter game :D
Roku;-;On steam i have played cs 1.6 2 hours only .... i think almost every gamer have played this game LAN ! When i say LAN i mean with friends ! Cs 1.6 its a proof the graphics dont make a good game , there are thousands of people still playing it at 2014 , if you are young play this one first ( not Cs go ) . Nowdays kids might not being impressed with the graphics but back in my days it was the best and the most popular FPS we had !
Brate Mili;-;the best game ever
L7;-;Best fps for life! Have been playing it since 2002. Never gets old!
PringleSSSSSSSS;-;what a game
Brate Mili;-;the best game ever
L7;-;Best fps for life! Have been playing it since 2002. Never gets old!
PringleSSSSSSSS;-;what a game
nicolicious;-;awsome classic game changing shooter
nicolicious;-;awsome classic game changing shooter
Tommy||Tman;-;It's ight.
Yoh;-;Classic of classics.
Marshall;-;Listen, this game may be old, but it still has it's charms, I mean sure, the quality was low but the game was still awesome just like it's sequels (including Global Offensive).
LOzzA..AZUS;-;my best game of all the time <3
TBear <3;-;Classic! One of the most fun older games that I own. The community is still large and thriving! Give it a try!!!! :)
==[HellYea];-;k this game i love it :c
JokerJon00;-;Counter-Strike is defiantly dated, so I recommend getting the newer ones, but you are not going wrong with this one if you decide to pick it up. 7/10
Ruby;-;this is top Game (Y)
Barrett_killz;-;Obviously the best game ever made. Was, is, and will be the best.
werhu;-;cs 1.6 is still the best
Just_relaXx;-;THE BEST GAME EVER
lucas;-;This one here is a winner.
#B00M BiTcH! "GeT 0u' o dA WaY"x;-;Play hArd Go Pro ... \m/
Frank Tourette;-;A nice game which requires cooperative playing because of objective like placing/defusing the bomb or killing Terrorists/CTs
KQLY;-;This is the "Rosemary's Baby" of video games, a video-offspring of demonic potential...the best multi-player game of 2000, bar none.
GrimVenomReaver;-;Ah, Counter-Strike. What can I say about you that hasn't been said already by your millions of fans. As one of the most popular Half-Life mods to become into a full retail game by Valve, I surely can say this... Counter-Strike 1.6 started it all. As an original mod from Valve's game: Half-Life, Counter-Strike grew increasely popular til' this day, spawning updated verisons such as Source & Global Offensive. Even the overly repetitive Call of Duty has been influenced by Counter-Strike, even thou Activision's changed it's view after Modern Warfare 1, but now I'm getting off topic... In conclusion, there really is no explaination from me to describe this popular game. Counter-Strike's gameplay explains it's self to the community. 10/10.
LazaS #MakeOregairuSeason3;-;The one of my favourite games of all time i played it since 2000 so it was a lot of fun for me to play if u dont have it buy it now!! Ruined my social life too 11/10
-=]BG[=-^~|)3F3CT!v3;-;great game !
Karashi;-;One of the best games ever created !
fr0zZ3n;-;Old but gold ;)
krux;-;Awesome game to play still after so many years
mLw* Luffy[x];-;You Kill Someone They Die. You Get Killed You Die. Heart breaking story
MzLi;-;Classical, if you looking for the basics you should start with this game. Good community and lots of fun. The gameplay is easy but can be repetitive after a few hours, but there are so many servers with so many modes that it can't be boring for more than 10 minutes.
==DocToR //--\\;-;Its A superb game doesnt lags normally via steam i recommend to hav more plugins in this defaut game
FLEXX;-;Love this game
CHEATER;-;cs always and forver
Isse Senpai;-;old game but when it comes to gameplay it great maybe it doesn't have that well graphics and has lots of bugs but it fun to play and competative
Frank Yang Sexypack Shortcut;-;Officially endorsed by Seung-Hui Cho
Balboa;-;game of the year 2014
Wingiee77;-;i could play this game forever! *_* ...and not get bored.
nivEH;-;Awesome game 2358 Hours :P
lorans_bidi;-;i keep on crashing....
jumba180;-;this is game is awesome and a classic
Zux;-;Best shooter oldschool game. A must have.
Viktor;-;Really good game, it brings back the feelings"
godssuccess;-;LIKE IT !
D.G/Nj/.B0`/.xD #~;-;Brilliant game. Excellent for team strategy, accuracy and reflexes.
KOD # VIGONI;-;Boom! Here comes the Boom! Ready or not, here comes the boys from the South Boom! Here comes the Boom! How you like me now?
autismspeaks.org/signs;-;one of the alltime CLASSICS. the only reason we have steam. still a damn fine game. looks like  nowadays but still hella fun. recommended.
samuervas!!;-;i love this game!! the best game ever !!
|-->|E/\!L !N<|<--|^KoJja*AnnA;-;gud game but not at all adictive game
_;-;The only thing I've spent time on cybercafes playing while others where watching porn.
iGank| NooB|;-;Counter Strike is the best FPS Multiplayer Action(Shooting) game i have played till now...
m3tla;-;Oldschool FPS, Beats all the newer Counter-Strike's.... 10/10
That One Guy;-;Gameplay: 10/10 LAN Fun: 3/3 Good Servers: 2/7 Counter-Strike, perhaps the most competitive game of it's time, hasn't aged well graphics-wise, but the gameplay remains more precise and consistent than most FPS games today. This game is a great LAN game for get-togethers, but otherwise you may have come too late on perhaps one of the greatest games of all time. Servers that I have connected to show that I have horrible ping, and the lag assures me of that. I have come across a server or two that I can connect to and enjoy, as well as being vanilla-CS, considering all the servers that mainly run modded games (which is about 4/5 of the servers). So here are the reasons to buy the original Counter-Strike: Pros -Can run on a potato -Plays smoothly no matter the settings. (However, you can connect to a server somewhere in Latin America or the Middle East, and lag like heck.) -Great fun to play with friends, as it can get really competitive, but at the same time your friends may not have this ancient gem, so this is dependent on the situation. -Solid gameplay. Nothing else really compares to the precision that went into it over the years. -Large map selection, as well as custom-maps found all over the internet. -Mods, but many are not as good as some of the others. You have to dig through garbage to find the fun ones. Cons -Very few good servers -Hard to convince people that don't already know how great this game is to buy it, considering it's more than a decade old. -So...many...sound...file...downloads...from...servers... -Custom maps are very rarely as balanced as maps packed in with the game. Verdict If you've got the money, and are curious as to what this legendary game is like, then it wouldn't be a complete waste, but if you are coming here from the latest CS or CoD or Battlefield, without having played other older FPS games, then you might regret the buy because this is a game that is quite outdated in terms of UI and such, and might not be appealing. Overall 7/10 now, after more than a decade since release.
Snow;-;Clasic but outdated game, great tacticle gameplay with the best shity graphics. This game had a solid decade as the best fps out there and still rates one of the most famous and highest rated and most played fps of all time. This game is still fully playable and hella fun although with newer versions of this game out its just outdated. 2 Point: Game play 1.5 Point: Quality 2 Point: Technical 2 Point: Value 2 Point: Fun 9.5/10 I rate the games I play out of 5 points of interest
Dante XXI;-;ZAMBIES ! 2spooky4me zombie mod 2/10 Esport 2/10 Fun 2/10 Teamwork ??? THER IS NO TEAMWORK
50 days to my suicide;-;This game is a legend. Such a game will not be ever. It will never die, will live on forever!
Sergeant Sarcasm;-;One of the best games ever developed.
visine''';-;I recommend playing it !
Joker.brn #SemSom;-;just the best of the all games in the world
King Slumlord;-;You're not a true PC gamer until you own this game.
[CHECK PROFILE];-;Great FPS game.Yes, it has not the best graphics, but if you want to have a nice aim, nice game collection and etc. you should buy this game. It doesn't have any achievements, but i gurantee that you will have fun there!
#Adamkafly.;-;there's kinda 50% of them players are cheater... but if ya' go a great team, friends n' stuff, this old game can show you some "coolness"!
FREDO SANTANA;-;the one and only
Los Angeles Nope;-;If you want to play an fps that will slaughter your butt and make you rage so hard you can punch a tiger in the face, this game is for you. Only the best can survive this game, you'll be playing against people who's reflexes are faster than Bruce Lee hyped up on red bull. If you are a person who thinks he/she is good at fps's and want a challenge, buy this game. Your self esteem will drop further than an emo in prison after dropping the soap. I highly recommend this game!
Rusty Shackleford;-;horrible gfx
sNL;-;POLECAM CS 1 ANTHOLOGY!
surrenderdorothy;-;Old but still gold! Amazing how people keep playing this! Still a fun game c: Happy to be able to play it again ^^
PD Twister;-;This game is SUPER
Spankdatmonkey;-;Counter-Strike is one of those games that I can play for only 2 minutes. Seriously, the graphics suck big chicken nuggets. The thumbnail for this game makes it seem like it's graphically in tents, but it is not. I'd say wait for sale then buy because this game sucks.
ApPLe;-;Go go go , play the game.
MyUname *LFT;-;"Old but gold!"
GamerDeibos|Dart;-;Well, the graphics hurt the eyes, but the gameplay is still pretty decent.
Epic Tits;-;One of a kind.
MESSY*- Razvan Olar :3;-;The best game ever
csgorage.com;-;wish u comeback!!! =/
bader;-;hi >> where the d3d mode??? i dont have it ?? only open gl and sofrware???
Jenny;-;this will always be one of my favorite shooters, great fun game.
G O L U;-;my cs is not working properly as it shows a black screen on opening
Oliver Queen;-;awesome strategic game
S.A.M. ^KFJ;-;Best game ever created! I may not play anymore, but this game will always have a place in my heart...
wixx3/\/ #sixabs;-;Wohohooh
tck~;-;the best
ZEEEEEEEEW # TOT zRM va ramane !;-;Recommend!
Vtrasputns;-;I bought the whole CS 1 anthology.Great time-terrible decision. Lets get to the point-When you start,you..well get blasted in the face.Honsetly when i started on the scoreboard it was 1:15 so yeah. Glock,usp,deagle,mp5,famas,galil,cv-47,m4 and Awp that is going to kill ye most of the time. Have fun buying and playing :)
L0giK;-;The Greastest game ever made in history.
Streekz;-;Classic.
ZnIIp;-;What to say...? BUT THE GREATES GAME EVER!
I'm not gay but $20 is $20;-;"'PEOPLE STILL PLAY THIS?' -"
KEiMZ];-;Super Games professional.
Doge;-;Such play. Very shooter.wow. Doge recommends
i.Karma;-;classic.. but guys go play csgo :D
JORDAN;-;Recomand :D
SoKKa;-;Old Style :D
Z.WhiteSkull.7;-;i love thes game
12yz12ab;-;Good game. Figure out the camera for me. Looking around doesn't work.
SpaceGhost;-;This game truly has changed and as much as i wish i still enjoyed it, all the changes have turned me away. I will always recommend this game but for myself, i will stick with GO.
pre;-;Can't wait for Counter-Strike 2.0
Squazz - Who else?;-;Enough said ;) BUY IT!
PURPLOYD;-;Pew pew. Grew up with this pew pew so I can't say anything bad about it. I do think it has aged a bit and that CS:S has preceded it but I also know there are people who think that there ain't no better CS than 1.6.. or 1.5... or 1.3... well to each his own. Pew pew with a ROUGH difficulty curve. If you come from the casual CoD MP crowd you quite possibly will hit a wall straight away. But this game is far more rewarding to get into. The better you get at it, the more enjoyable it gets.
ITS BIGGER THAN HIP HOP;-;Old but still an amazing game
3sT<>MarCiii<;-;I LOVE THIS OLDSQL GAME - MY BROTHER PLAYS I MORE THEN MYSELF, BUT IT WOULDNT BE BORING :P:P
AFTERMATH;-;Cant fight it, best game I ever played. No further information needed. <3
RuleS Of GurdiaN;-;I LIKED THE GAME BEST OF BEST IN CS
JordDenham;-;Jumped into a game, got shot, respawned got shot, respawned got shot. Although this happened i probably should of looked at controls and realised i could buy other guns and stuff. still a good game 6/10
KAMPFCHWEIN;-;CS1.6 so much good remembering and still better then BF4 and CoD Ghost
Jashadow;-;One of the first First-person shooter games I ever played, and I'm so glad it was. This game was amazing and I easily clocked 1000 hours over the years of playing. For it's price now, you should definitely buy it. Source is good and all, but the original of the series is the best, by far.
`ceenik;-;Oh the countless memories... and countless hours sitting down. Oh well. Best FPS shooter ever and best game ever. 11/10
rts.empire;-;C.S. has got to be one of the best FPS of all time. It really was the game that made gaming what it is today. I still remember at high school everyone going to the internet cafe and paying to book out the whole place to just play C.S with all our friends. A great game which will always be an epic part of FPS history.
Lock;-;Awesome game.. A must play FPS
El Inferno;-;Great game, proving graphics aren't everything. Recommend buying the game and enjoying the PRO experience!
my hands dirty with a cocaine;-;wish c.s. 1.6 will be back!!!
Bo3;-;Please come back 1.6! :(
Dest Dado;-;Didn't spend much time on this game,at all.
M0sh1ko - JIHAD TRAP IS AMAZING;-;The best FPS game ever,from 1999 to now...
`BlaD3^^;-;Nice Gamer
DUUCKOO1337!;-;The game is very fun and I recommend it to everyone
Punto cL | Adr[sA];-;a:D
ANTiCHEATERx;-;Will always be the #1 FPS game.
Odyssey;-;Nice game!
Bernix;-;CS 1.6 STEAM!!!!!!!!!!!!
Dam0N.;-;Nice Game.The Best First Person Shooter Game! <3
sage;-;Old school player ! Love this game.
at0mic;-;New into CS?? Counter-Strike is In!!.. Well Actually, Counter-Strike is a good game incase you're starting new carrier of gaming. Counter-Strike is the best in my opinion. Before playing Counter-Strike: Globle Offensive, I chose to go in line.. Counter-Strike > Counter-Strike: Source > Counter-Strike:Globle Offensive. I've been playing CS:GO from a pretty long time but, I loved Counter-Strike. This Counter Strike is Counter Strike 1.6.. So, I'd like to recommend this game:)
RiFt #RoadToInsanity...;-;The Best of his kind.
NickToon;-;CS 1.5 or 1.6 was the birth place for me, to be a PC Gamer - 10/10 !!
foxie *Kinguin;-;Cool game
dimnimrod;-;Counter-Strike can join in with Golden Eye in taking credit for defining the comman FPS game as we know it today. It's servers are still active over a decade of entertainment. You customize your gear then choose to either use tactics to disarm the bomb, or you can JUST RUSH IN LIKE AN INSANE PERSON, GRIP THE HOSTAGES BY THE ARM AS YOU SAY "FOLLOW ME NOW!!!", and get them to safety. It is pure greatness. And the system requirements are not demanding, so virtualy any computer nowadays can run it.
REC;-;cool game
BoWie;-;Best game! In my <3 4ever :)
aznwilson01;-;great game
JuQu;-;Simply the best FPS game ever! --- Played since 2001 ---
FlexonBa;-;Best game on world OLD SCHOOL :)
Nairo.;-;All-time classic game. Will always be my number one counter strike version.
PRODIGY;-;Very cool and balanced game. Superb gameplay and unbelievably good for tournaments. Once you've played it you'll never regret it. The only bad thing about this game is the community. It's full of scrubs, lamers, scammers, spammers and hackers. Its very hard to find a good and clean from all those dudes server, but when you do find it, you will forget all about them and will enjoy all your hours of play.
I'm here to fuck your wife;-;The best and most original FPS of all time. Bow down to what has overtaken over 10 years of my life. GG
nabmatic;-;The quentissential competitve FPS. Get it you won't regret it, unless you suck balls.
ynt0;-;Rating: 10/10 The game which basically brought me to the world of gaming. From 1.05 to 1.6 I have spent enormous number of hours playing this game and even it's now getting old and pushed out by CS:GO, I still have nostalgy. Best non-story FPS at that time and still better than many modern FPS movie-based games.
tudz;-;It's 1.6, nuff said.
Delinquente;-;Why did I buy this game in 2014?
Fernando Baccon;-;Same old CS... Good game, one of the best shooters of all time. Nowadays it's graphics seems a little outdated. But HL engine still works pretty nice. Still better and less robotic than CS:GO.
AlderWars;-;May be old but still worth it to get it.
monte;-;wasted almost all of my free time on it when growing up.. 11/10 would play again
qutti;-;Good game, no comment :) 10/10
Rykushai;-;It's just Counter-Strike, i don't know what to say...
Brockenstein;-;The best "realism" Half-Life mod as it's the one everyone remembers. Causing incalculable rage in dialup users for years and years. If you're bad you're a nub, if you're good you're a hacker, if you're just mediocre then you're just right.
The Boy Wonder;-;BACK in the dayy!...
Asgard;-;Probably this game doesn't need any introduction, old and good, still played by a large number of gamers, on of the best online shooter that was created. Still remember my first days finding a good version of the game and playing with bots.
Strikey;-;Ruined my life.
Ernest Wolf;-;This will be more of a ''my experience with this game'' type of review, because saying things like ''great gameplay'' will not suit something I've experienced with Counter-Strike. Here you go: I remember back in 2002 I was at a friend's house and he was playing a game. I didn't know the name of the game nor I had internet to find it. A few weeks passed by and another friend came over and he didn't have a computer, so he brought a disc with a game in it. He told me that it was one of the best games and from that very moment I knew that it is going to be the game I saw at the other friend's house. When I saw the Counter-Strike logo I was filled with gamegasm (?) and I was so happy. I don't remember a day when I was so happy like back then. So, the journey started. I was playing it hardcore. Made friends, clans, was involved in communities and even made two myself. Counter-Strike is my first game which I played competitively and it was a whole experience. Playing public servers and maybe some servers with mods was very fun, but playing it competitively made it very intense and stressful. In a pleasant way, ofcourse. Shooters these days try to be different, advanced in a way. Sometimes the most simple games like Counter-Strike are the ones that live to this day. Also, there are plenty of mods to keep your attention to this game. The gameplay is very simple - defend as a Counter-Terrorist, attack as a Terrorist to plant the bomb or save the hostages as a CT. I am sure most of you already know this and I doubt there are gamers that haven't heard or know the gameplay of Counter-Strike, so I am sharing here more of my experience. I wish I could find my CS Anthology account which I've lost since 2008. So, I decided I am going to buy this game again and here you go - more than a thousand hours played. I still play it from time to time to this day and it brings back many great memories and I sometimes even stumble upon people I've played with years ago. I think Counter-Strike changed gaming in a major way and we wouldn't have many games like we have today, if this game wouldn't exist. I am sure many of people already have played games like CS:GO, but never the roots. I doubt any of you will play it for more than an hour, because it's much more simple and it differs a lot in my opinion from CS:GO and modern games.
Brig;-;Every server is spanish or french. I can now fluently swear in both languages 9/10
Hedroks;-;Still better than Call of Duty: Ghosts...
Mr.Mimi | Trade Knife;-;I met a lot of people who slept with my mother. 10/10
Rezej;-;I never played a better first person shooter. Graphics doesn't matter for gamer, gameplay only.
Eno Etukeno;-;When you crouch, you lift your feet in the air and fall to the ground. 10/10
safeoff';-;WARNING : DO NOT buy this game, if you do, you'll never see the sunlight again !
ManaF;-;CS is one of the greatest and undermined games in history. It is, in my opinion, the best game to ever have a crosshair. It is not a contact sport, so for the girly girls, it is an activity to indulge in. It starts off with a team trying to kill another team. I started playing cs when I noticed jacking off isn't the only activity to do on a computer. I started inviting a lot of friends out and getting drinks, as well as a boom box, to spend a nice summer day in the living room playing this wonderful game. I wanted to play every chance that i could. On my road of cs adventures, I encountered a couple of problems; those being that nobody was as fervent as I was about playing, and that when we did play, nobody was good enough, so it wasn't a lot of fun. Then I discovered that I could sign up for a class with dboorn. I was overly excited, and signed up, but with skepticism at how the class was going to be. Sure enough, I was proven wrong. We started off by practicing a little bit. Then we split off into teams and started playing almost everyday of class. I made some friends, and played with people who had built up their skill gradually over the period of the course. When I play counterstrike, the whole world disappears. Only I, the mouse, and my teammates remain. We are united in a common goal. We strive collectively towards an end we all desire. Each player has a spot to hold. They stand ready and waiting, eager for their chance to aid the team in what they hope will be a forthcoming victory. Thus, CS celebrates the unity of man, the indomitable spirit in all of us that pushes us and drives us towards excellence. When I play CS, I play until my veins pump battery acid, and then I play some more. CS is unique among the games because it teaches all of us that no matter where we are in life, there is a role for us to play, and we can help our fellow man by fulfilling that role, and thereby our destiny. What destiny might you ask? I spoke before of unity. And it is that unity that brings us all together like one big loving family. That is the nature of counter-strike; the many working as one. One machine made of well oiled cogs and wheels, moving in unison, happy to play their part in the production of something greater than themselves. Not that these small metal objects are actually animate, I'm of course speaking only metaphorically. Over the course of the years, I have increased in skill, but I have learned a greater lesson than how to be a better cs player. I have learned how to cooperate with a team to accomplish a goal that we all share. Even if that team is less than ideal. I have realized that cs is about more than just one's athletic ability. Instead, there is a deeper meaning behind the colt, the AK, the AWP, the deagle, the sands under my feet (in d2 or inferno). And more importantly, the teammates at my side. I love them. It is the human element of cs that gives cs its greatness. In conclusion, I love cs. I love to win. I love pushing myself to my physical limits. It's that feeling that first drove me to the computer. For every second that I am not playing cs, there is only an unquenchable thirst to play. A thirst that grows as every minute passes by when I am outside, sitting at the television, or playing sports. I had an extraordinary time playing this game, and I will return to look at the future students of this game to see that bright eager look on their faces to remind me of how I used to feel. This review may be over, this game may be dead, but I will never stop playing couner-strike (1.6).
DESTRUKT;-;It's... aight.
-=]BG[=-^~HellAngel;-;for me it's the BEST ever online game played all through the world...... :)
Tubr0;-;Counter Strike is one of the best first person shooter in the whole world, its so funny to play hns and other gamemodes! Yes i recommend this awesome game! 10/10 little cats!
Kauczukowe_Jajo;-;ing epic!!!
Mur[D]eRer =;-;Looking for online gaming.. This is the best solution.. :) .... I have CSGO still prefer to play this..
XiZT;-;Oh maaaaaan this game.. what can i say for this master piece for only 8euros ? if you didnt triyed yet i don't know in what universe are you living
Qrome;-;9/11 would eat this
DRiFT;-;Best Multiplayer Game ever played!
vitorpacheco;-;Nice game
Wo ist mein Bier?;-;I have been playing this game since I was very young. Now, I'm still playing it. I still remember the times when I was playing with my friends on our own server; such great days back then. 11/10 without any doubt.
SilentM4;-;This is a really awesome classic game! If anyone ever played it, she/he will never forget about it! Deservers the 8 euros, and also you will get Condition Zero!
?. StopWrieR`;-;why icant play?
1987! <3;-;Old,but awesome game.I play HNS.Hide 'n Seek.I recommend it you can try to buy it.
Rubax;-;Great game.
SpaceAleksey;-;plz delete my cfg of CS16 in cloud can't do nothing black screen
GhostZ;-;This game is legendary!!! Any online fps fan should play it.
PMW  pony-;-;Good game, very fun. : 3
DaaG0;-;how to fix bullet lagg
LITTLE ASS KICKER;-;a good game to enjoy with all your friends.
BBL;-;better then cs go
WhiteWalker;-;CS1.6<3
N!hqD#;-;Old school game !
NuocMan;-;I love this game. I think it's way better than the others CSS or GO.
SilencedGhost;-;The game that started the Counter Strike franchise and probably one of the best. Counter Strike didn't have the graphics but it had the gameplay we all know to love in a CS game.
BrokenTV101;-;Very Very amazing game it wasent voted for most popular online shooter for no reason.
Agil;-;cs is gud
Viarr;-;Fond memories, but get CS:GO now-a-days.
TobbLeRoNa;-;CS 1.6 It will search for you. It will find you. And someone in the game will probably kill you. If you are noob that is. 10/10 Would kill noobs again.
BISCUITS;-;Happy Birthday Counter Strike!
Twitter.;-;the best games
Rico;-;Counter-Strike is an almost perfectly balanced mix of teamwork and individual skill with enough depth and nuance to inspire countless esports competitions.
awd;-;Counter Strike changed the landscape of multiplayer first person shooter. Ruthless gameplay, perfect balance contributed towards the creation of a very competitive scene. Years later it still stands as one the giants among games. Loved and still played by thousands, it has shaped lives and destinies.
BirdyBrainz;-;This is a classic game. It still to this day has a huge player base. Yet the ones that still play are true die hard CS fans. Most are very skilled and have been playing the game sense day one. Still one of the best CS I have ever played. Before anyone asks I run this game on windows 8 and it works like a charm. I HIGHLY recommend this game to anyone looking for a classic FPS experience.
DeathStalkerSid;-;Old is Gold.
mead0w;-;nice game ever
L1miter;-;Its a great FPS game
Alesh;-;Like a baws !
Poindexter;-;Probably the best online FPS out there to date. Still a large playerbase after all these years should make it clear. The best part is probably how even if you have a crappy, very low budget computer you should be able to run this old game without any issues and have a load of fun. If this isn't in your steam library and you enjoy playing online FPS games then give this jem a go.
candy slug;-;Awesome classic.
Sweetie Belle;-;its the best FPS there is, Just a tip if you a kid. If you buy this game, its really hard....
Balle Rappe;-;Such 1.6 very wow such high FPS wow smooth
--;-;Great game
Jochen Frhlich;-;Top Game, it's one of those games you must own.
!Nv!Nc!_#SwAG mErA dES!;-;AweSOmE gaME anD no dOUbT wHY iTS woRLdS nO.1 onLiNE mULtipLaYEr gAmE. :D
KIBE;-;Best game ever created.
uaz95;-;my mouse is stuck while playing counter strike i can use the arrows button only to turn left or right its only with this game , there is no problems with counter strike source or other games .. please help thanks .
Zeratul;-;Buy it, but get PODbot
j02uke;-;Counter Strike is a classic game. Fun, addictive, and customizable. It's incredibly easy to mod, texture and map for so you could expect a whole lotta mods. Pros: -Great gameplay, bit of a learning curve but it'll become second instinct soon enough -Servers are still up, even for such an old game it still has a whole crap-ton of servers. -Modding community is GREAT -Cheap, as in really freakin cheap, not indie game cheap, but still very cheap Cons -Most people who you will play with have been playing for longer than I have been alive. Expect to get pwned very very often -Netcode is a , adjusting settings using the console takes a hell of a while -People are sometimes way too serious when playing -For Graphics junkies: Graphics are pretty damn old-looking (what the hell do you expect it's GoldSrc) While it's not a perfect game it still provided me with tons of fun and I love playing it. It's a bit slower than CSGO and the weapons behave differently. Conclusion: If you want a nice classic shooter that's light on the pocket and the computer then this along with Half-Life should be in your library
br0nx;-;cool game
GloryGladius;-;The nostalgia... This game is classic.
Tukano;-;Old school Counter-Strike, it's just the best.
maquenaut;-;Classic oldschool
NeX | Anup <Kumar>;-;lot of hackers ....bt gg!!!
ncp;-;The original just simply can't be beaten
giuzete mercrio;-;MANO, AQUI A BALA COME, ALTOS HS, NAO SABE BRINCA NAO DESCE PRO PLAY, NINGUEM CLICA. CHORA NA PITANGA, SKILL DDN, SDDS FURIAH$.VISA, TEAMGO, ETC. NOIS MLKADA,  SDDS CS1.6 VLW
Human-Fish Coexistence;-;Rumored to be a CS:GO clone.
Nimit Mehta;-;awesome game guys must buy :D
Roger Wilco;-;This is what an FPS game should be. Nothing else to say.
Danbo_BLR;-;It's just a classic:)
Waleed # hsCorp.de;-;All time best game! Must play it
Fragetecken #hashtag;-;Reason why im on steam.
- C!Rc|3^;-;PROUD TO BE A CS PLAYER,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,
ReaGioN;-;best game that i ever played , recommend to all
Looser008;-;Always a pleasure to kill you :)
qShi<3;-;Cool game.
Sinuce;-;You have to own Counter-Strike if you even have the slightest interested in First Person Shooters.
Chiken;-;Nice game!
Trouble Maker #GameLife.Ro#;-;It's a good game.
Carlos;-;Very nice game. Most addicted multiplayer game of all time!!
John dean;-;the original fire in the hole
RESPECT POSTENIM LJUDIMA!;-;its ing good game for old school players!
HELLRAISERS* BAMBUTU;-;I like this game.It is very good game.
The Suspect;-;Great game!
OxeN;-;Great game to spind late nights with. The time just flies into space and you wake up in another time the future. excelent game then and certainly is now.
Bart Allen;-;This is the game that ruined my childhood ! I literally was playing it all day long ( previously was playing on non steam) It was one of the best games back then, but now CS:GO has taken its lead, so i recommend you buying Global Offensive.
SynVicious;-;When _orange_ maps were but a far off concept and NIPPER ruled the world. Seriously, get all the NIPPER maps. Especially the crazytanks. 9/10
Liami;-;Still better then Call Of Duty: Ghosts
ntarpa Pratipaddarin;-;I recommend this game if you play with your friends or at least on Only steam servers.
Andrei;-;Best of old school!
The Unknown;-;The great classic. This is my favorite FPS of all time next to Team Fortress.
MeteoR;-;The greatest game ever invented.
Jorgen;-;This is a classic, would recommend. Its okay 10/10
D3AD GH0$T;-;Always a classic.
FamE; Lil Okie!;-;Very nice shooter game many things you can play:)) BUY IT!
Charlie Fernndez;-;the boss!
scr3w;-;A classic, still good to this day
GoldSpark;-;This game is still popular ! I recommend it to everyone!
Obi_Wan_Shinobi;-;Probably the greatest team FPS that there ever was, Was way ahead of its time in all departments. Still to this day has full servers full of dedicated players 24-7. To think that it was originally just a half life mod shows that you don't need to spend a fortune to make a great game
*BesTeD;-;best online action GAME!!
KiLLeR Z;-;its a good game all should play it :)
Falcon;-;A really nice game :D
HJ;-;Bets In the world!
41488;-;for some reason running Counter Strike Source and exiting makes the computer think it's playing CS but other than that good game although I probably only played for 533 seconds rather than 533 hours
actual csgo profile on comment;-;since 2k8, lovely game.
Thorns;-;Ahhh, the old faithful. Work of Art, timeless classic, masterpiece, timless work masterpiece of classic art. They say several things will survive a global nuclear meltdown... Cockroaches, the Sun, and Counter-Strike. !!!COCKROACH FIVE MAN, COMING TO A TOURNAMENT NEAR YOU!!! COCKROACH/10... (8/10)
.:W!ll) Bl_0oD $uC{K}eR:.;-;why did u took my game from steam
K4J | ^_^<<::Toe Cutter::>>^_^;-;always the best !
!@#$;-;Play the world's number 1 online action game. Engage in an incredibly realistic brand of terrorist warfare in this wildly popular team-based game. Ally with teammates to complete strategic missions. Take out enemy sites. Rescue hostages. Your role affects your team's success. Your team's success affects your role. Also zombies HnS (jumping) kreedz jumping ) deathrun run through obstacles and crap
DarKxD;-;Download It . It's a very good shooting game :D
MaJIuIU;-;CooL
ONYX;-;Good Game for lan/pub/automix/clan
GaCeZor - NeW sTyLe 2015;-;Do NoT PLaY THiS GaMe MoRe THaN 4 HouRs ...
fRoZeN;-;Best online fps ever
[Shine]Serafina Esser;-;the classic. the feels.
OLX NE\/\/ /\/\IC /\/O /\|/\/\;-;awesome play from long time but always seems new new new
Jewbacca;-;Good game to learn how to aim :)
Shreyansh;-;very nice game.. :)
Nishikino Maki;-;Its realy fun to play.
RYNO MAN;-;The classic. The original. The first and last of its kind. The beginning of a legacy. Or just hours upon hours of time wasted while your brain controversially shouts to you "Just one more round!" The excitement of a firefight is a standard of most First-Person Shooters but Counter-Strike is different. The game tries to focus on communication and teamwork coincided with skilled aim and complex maneuvers rather than just free-for-all deathmatch game. Failure to comply with the games train of thought winds you up in the lovely thing we gamers call "Spectator Mode." Gotta love that! Although becoming proficient at the game will take a lot longer than most games it is worth the time put into it! Gamers that are looking for a game that requires teamwork, skill, time, practice, and communication will not be disappointed! Presentation: 8/10 Gameplay: 10/10 Graphics: 5/10 Sound: 6.5/10 Difficulty: 8/10 Lasting Appeal: 10/10 Overall Rating: 8.5/10
Solander;-;In the '80s my tape-mate Richard D. Reynalds disappeared down my extra 8-track speakers clutching opiate presciptions and blues mixtapes. I remembered his parting words: "FUc k John Coltrane's Newphew -- I'd tear my Pseudo Goldfish in that Flyinglotus-eater. Take my Taxi-card, I'm off." But three avenues deep, I regarded his winter jackettas nothing more than a Sony stance. My first-draft redeemer is a real VB! Wow!! And don't pose me a steam, you neglector Flying Aphex! True Macho What did we teach?ageispolis is famous for its slow-burning ziggurat. Check it, mountain-chair gig at 2!!!
Joelo;-;better than the original!
Toast;-;I miss the countless nights we'd play this together, Chris.
neT #;-;In past: 10/10 Now: 10/10 Future: 10/10
Mike;-;Simply addictive!
Surgical;-;What can you say? The best FPS game out there, even to this day.
freezypuff;-;Its a fun old game with flaws but worthy of a buy
Blueroni;-;Original game will always be number 1 !! before cod and after cod ! 100/100
-merRklYs-;-;Awesome, old-school, easy!
Aero;-;Best MP of all times!
Leo Long[e];-;best game in the world
flpko;-;my favorit game!
[RTS]BigV;-;I like this game.
REAPER;-;ok game but not good HD GRapics
Lov3R;-;The one and only :D
Van1ty;-;Graphics don't matter. Just play the game.
Anti;-;The one true CS.
wodzt321;-;Very addictive game
$k8eR.ftw `;-;This game really proves that graphic does not matter but gameplay does...cs 1.6 <3
WEIRDO 72R;-;I like it! Recommended for all ! :)
Cristi #Heker.Eu;-;The best fps game ever and the most addicted ! XD
AghiFortress | trade.tf;-;I love this game:))
SCUMBAG;-;The best
Outlander;-;Fun times in the good old days.
Hooplehead;-;only 11 hours listed on my account, I played hundreds if not thousands of hours before they started tracking game time.
houdini-da-k1ng;-;This game is the best Counter Strike game EVER!
Toast;-;I miss the countless nights we'd play this together, Chris.
neT #;-;In past: 10/10 Now: 10/10 Future: 10/10
Mike;-;Simply addictive!
Surgical;-;What can you say? The best FPS game out there, even to this day.
Wick3d;-;Great old game to play
2eZ4Trz;-;GG game, always love
ComposedFR;-;The one
Jaded;-;Was good while it lasted but CS GO is taking over!!!
No Shit?;-;Verry nice game :)
Edy';-;Old School if you see what i mean :)
Dawe;-;One of the best games ever!
kREJZIKIC.;-;Old but GOLD
Flippy #250 keys;-;Oh i miss the good ol days
Krave;-;Loved the original CS, actually quit playin when csSource came out, wasnt as hooked to it and missed it ever since. Came back to try csGo
H@wkEyE.#NiP;-;Awesome game for a multiplayer experience where you are competing with several other skilled players. Really awesome.
[t]!geR;-;Really awesome game.. CS is my life.. :D PLAY HARD... BE PRO.. <3
NorreN;-;old but still a nice game... I miss the old days when you could wallbang :p
!mp^ <3 PansY;-;best online first person game ever. (y)
RaPiD*m@d@n;-;A very goob game that lasts for years and years. Keep on the good work.
JAnders;-;Its the original
xu - I Love rochii;-;Counter-Strike it's really amazing, but today really it's bad we can't play good, just before are good. Server are Sh~# PPL are Sh%$ really it's BAD People Play free, Play Clean, Play to your mode, and OFF HACK, OFF cheating , OFF Scripting, OFF ALL Play Fun :)
Krts;-;The Best FPS ever :D
Jack *steelseries*;-;When you left click, you shoot. 5 stars
Maverick;-;After so many years the game is still playable and enjoyable, it's one of the first most competitive fps game that I known and it still have pretty good player base.
Insanity Mania;-;It is one of the best games i've ever played.
Rantti;-;Why should I even recommend this game to anyone new to this if they get their asses kicked by the real Counter-Strike professionals who have been playing this little bad boy since it was released. I think they're the only ones who actually play this game anymore. It's not even played in many e-Sports tournaments anymore since there are newer games out there (sad tho').
Ode;-;This is a good game if you like fps shooters.....
jerree;-;all time favourite game till this day.
30minss;-;Addictive.
Grimmjow;-;Yes , this is awsome game
JoKeR;-;Play this game now! Join us!
Werewolf;-;Very nice game .
Aenoxys;-;Great game! I started with source, and felt that this was going to be a downgrade. After playing for about four minutes, I learned how competitive the game was. I learned I wasn't good at the game, and trained for once. That was something I had never done on Counter-Strike: source. Now it's time to talk about the bad things: First of all, although there are more servers than TFC has, there is still hardly any servers. You can find a server and join it, but most of the servers have custom maps and free guns. Obviously the graphics are a downgrade, but who plays games for graphics? I sure as hell don't. And for the year 2000 the graphics are great! There is a misconception with this game where people think that Bunnyhopping is still in the game. It's not. They removed it in 1.4 and it is now 1.6. Overall, BUY THIS GAME!
insiDious---;-;I love counter strike. I have played it since my cousin nickname: Mafia Al Capone showed me. I now have played Counter Strike off and on for about 8 years now. Keep it going Valve and Steam.
[SH] nicereddy;-;If your computer is a toaster, this game is for you. While challenging, you can still pick up and play this game despite the assumption that you're 10 times worse than literally everyone else.
uperparky;-;The first and possibly the best Counter Stirke. Over a decade later and still thousands play it a day? Other than Nintendo nobody has been able to master something like this as well as it is here. With a huge install base, small game but wonderful gameplay, this is worth your $10
S I E G H E I L;-;I really like th1s game!!!
Gejgalos;-;game even if not played by as many people as before (not played at tournaments, and releasing "updated" version of it) still has this something, that surely would catch eyes of many people interested in that sort of games. dynamic gameplay and not too bad graphic are for sure advantages of cs 1.6
hEELIK THOR;-;high community game, simple and easy shooting :)
KNig;-;A pretty good fps. Poorly to graphics compared to Counter-Strike: Source or Global Offensive. I recommend.
S N K;-;I'll love this game ever!
Gabriel #h ;k ;s;-;Replaced by CSGO
skN;-;One game one love CS 1.6
tresistance314;-;i always love counter strike
Nimit Mehta;-;awesome game guys must buy :D
Roger Wilco;-;This is what an FPS game should be. Nothing else to say.
Danbo_BLR;-;It's just a classic:)
Waleed # hsCorp.de;-;All time best game! Must play it
Fragetecken #hashtag;-;Reason why im on steam.
- C!Rc|3^;-;PROUD TO BE A CS PLAYER,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,,
AndreA;-;great game!
doodlleus;-;perfect in every way
Rocky;-;full of kiwi's
BIZZAR;-;Old But Gold
HaRe;-;Great :)
Marshmallows;-;i love this game
I AM DEVIL;-;The coolest game i`m ever played !!! :)
BoY FrOm DONBASS;-;game of the century
topkek43512;-;ITS COUNTER STRIKE, THE WHOLE REASON STEAM EVEN EXISTS!
blint.exe;-;I will ing kill myself if I end up playing it
You Aint Got No Pancake Mix;-;1 of my favorite fps games
EL DAD;-;This game is awesome. Shoot face and impress the girls.
Rex;-;It's good to be back in Counter-Strike 1.6
The_Fru;-;Best of the CS series, many a good time spraying people in the dome.
DeuceKaboose;-;Excellent way to learn Spanish
Anything For A Smile;-;This Game Makes You Addictive to it :) and believe me this addiction is much better than all those drugs and other addiction :D
Toza;-;Some old school shooting :D
Loolcooldeo;-;Why would anyone stop playing the greatest multiplayer game ever?
AttiTuDe Killer;-;best in the world
MrWolfie;-;Original game that has progressed over the years. Has diverse population that has grown outside the box. Now coders not affiliated with Steam/Valve coding new mods for Counter-Strike 1.6 After over 10+years, this game is still on strong. Come join us while you still can.
Soutik " H3X " DEY;-;One Of The Favourite Games Of My Life .. :)
K4J | ^_^<<::Toe Cutter::>>^_^;-;always the best !
strugart;-;the best multiplayer game of them all!
Ryanisagordonfreeman;-;THIS GAME IS SO AWESOME. BUY IT
iHacK;-;The Best Multiplayer FPS Game Ever Made.
V![c]kY d[o.O]b;-;Very Good Game
DZ;-;Half-Life.        . 9.9/10.
Thunder;-;Old but gold.
DO;-;This is my very first game that I played on Steam, Counter-Strike. This game brings back good memories. Very addicting. It's probably the only game that people are playing today on that isn't running off from a source engine. If you never played Counter-Strike 1.6 before, try it out. It's one of the best FPS game of all time. If you don't like it, well, you didn't paid alot of money for it.......or did you?
{TSG} Shootin Putin;-;A classic game, still good and played to this day, though I'm not pro enough to use the AWP
ReeferMadman;-;Best game ever, ever. Destroyed by hackers(cheaters).
rEd_tOtem [nEwBie];-;great game..
kimi POWER !;-;Is a nice game !
fraxxz;-;Classic, a must have for shooter fans.
Zimon;-;Best game on Steam Store!
R i z z l e;-;Counter-Strike 1.6 is a wicked fps Multiplayer game to play on. very much fun. played this when i was a young kid. and well still do at this day now :) very great game! one of the best pc games if i must say. :)
Vilkas Pilkas;-;Old school pew pew pew.
flack;-;Best game ever after 1.5, which is best game after 1.3
sTeFH__;-;This game is legend
ChoiChoi;-;BEST GAME!!
FishWow*;-;Try Badges :P
Gili;-;thats a very good game
hype-.-divine;-;The good game,in my life!
RAY&N1CE;-;best FPS game ever !!!!!!!! and ill be the best
Hyzzle;-;this game is a classic! great normal multiplayer, and even better custom games with an almost unlimited number of different formats to customize it.
nukecola;-;one of the best valve games
lasha13;-;The Legend !
Lauris`;-;cool
Herp Derp;-;This is a fun game if you are an older CS player. I'm stuck in CSGO though!
Monkey D. Luffy #only D2;-;yes a good game if played in a good computers, awesome experience at 100 fps. Will suggest a gaming mouse and a pad for best aiming
MeRcuRy;-;Its really a one of the fabulous game i have ever played
tYRANT. | SoStonK;-;yes...i have done it...and at last i wana say this game is like a drug addiction.many ways to play in this game clan,pub,gungame,base bulding abd all kind of zombie games...simply i like clan play...its not enough to give your 100% in game..you have to do more better...this game is really awsm...i have no words to describe the game cs 1.6 specially
Noblesan;-;This is the OG game. #Classic. #Oldschool. The godfather of FPS shooters. There's a reason why it still has a strong playerbase, even stronger than it's successor CS:Source. Even with CS:GO out, it still has a healthy number of players. The gameplay and balance is still unrivaled. This was the platform Valve used to become the powerhouse it is today. Highly recommend even in 2014.
Ari;-;First game I ever played online and worked hard at becoming a pro at. <3 CS. My last id was ari1911386. #oldmemories #loveforthegame #respectplayers #donotcheat #playhardgopro #rusher #onlyheadshots #nostalgic
Maxeek;-;arhhhhhhhhhhhhh best game ever
Qrome;-;9/11 would eat this
Shiny Gengar;-;Good Stuff.
DRiFT;-;Best Multiplayer Game ever played!
Fall3;-;Short and sweet: An fps classic, shame on you if you don't own it...
Acido;-;this is the best game ever
Mladen;-;Best online multiplayer competitive game ever made. A game with such masterful dynamics where both brilliant individual skill and team strategic ingenuity play equally important role in the final goal of triumph. Perfect in all aspects. Definitely won't get a decent successor in near future.
DoomGoD;-;It's the best game i have 3000 hours on it!!!
_ [N]ox _;-;Hi, I have a problem with the game counter strike 1.6 st ofcourse, what happens is that when I'm playing I get problem connecting
aa;-;Great!
GeT_RiGhT;-;Just nothing to say, than thank you.
u wot m8;-;Great FPS game.Yes, it has not the best graphics, but if you want to have a nice aim,  1337 , nice game collection and etc. you should buy this game. It doesn't have any achievements, but i gurantee that you will have fun there!
AttiTuDe Killer;-;best in the world
MrWolfie;-;Original game that has progressed over the years. Has diverse population that has grown outside the box. Now coders not affiliated with Steam/Valve coding new mods for Counter-Strike 1.6 After over 10+years, this game is still on strong. Come join us while you still can.
Soutik " ViX " DEY;-;One Of The Favourite Games Of My Life .. :)
Youngturks;-;CS!
Nordkvist =DD;-;Best Game Ever And this Game Proves Graphics Doesn't Matter!<3
TeamFeed;-;A Game For All Professional Counter-Strike Players!!
bRo;-;try an see!!
Igor;-;i play dis game for about what? 6 years? well yes i do, and i absoltely love it. its amazing, it doenst have singleplayer but the multiplayer is what keeps me here. i can play the same map over and over again, but it will be still fun because ur playing with friends or playing with different guns or strategis, thats what makes it amazing
AlphaWing222;-;It truly was one of the best first person shooter games at the time. I still play it to me graphics dont matter, the playing of the game matters.
Kptn Ktaka;-;the best game ever ....
Arcantos^;-;The best
4DR3N4L1N;-;The best fps game in the world.
CUMBIRD;-;This is the best game ever made. EVER.
Miracled;-;Wasted tons of my time. 10/10.
Mr.Rie;-;The best FPS ever!
h1pNo.- #DA BEAST;-;coool game :)
thesandwich;-;Best FPS in history. Enough said.
_sky_;-;Hands down the best multiplayer FPS ever. Even 12 years after its official 1.0 release, its still the most played action game online. While other big online multiplayer FPS's have come on gone with a lot of fanfair(i.e. Battlefield 1942, COD 2, Battlefield 2, UT 2004, Counter-Strike:Source, Quake Live, COD 4, etc etc etc) this game has remained a constant favorite in E-Sports and amonst FPS fans. Lets hope CS:GO can continue the CS tradition of teamplay, great maps, competitivness, and unmatched gunplay. LONG LIVE CS!
cock;-;fun, hot man on man action. who cares that it looks terrible.
W00K1EEEE;-;The first Counter-Strike game that started it all!! Amazing game and also tacticle at the same time.
BearEX;-;it's the best game ever people who say that it sucks they are just noobs who can't even kill a weak bot this is very great game even if it is very old game people prefer to play it instead of CS:GO or CS:S anyways this is one of my favourite games!!!
Potato Ghost;-;Best oldschool game, I love it!!! :D
Hps;-;Good game.. (rofl)
Gursimran Pandher;-;My fav and best game till now :D <3
JennyF;-;first game i played competetive, enjoyed, good watching the professionals play
K!kZ;-;Very fun game, graphics are disappointing and just not nice, I personally live in Israel, Israel has a lot of multiplayer servers and their sons loads admit most enjoyable so it makes up for the graphics ... Also has the option to fight against bots you can practice with it or simply pass the time, I wish there was such a nice single player. So in short, if you are looking for a game with many Indians, multiplayer servers, easy and fun then this is the game for you!
Jay Preemo;-;EPICNESS! Ummm, You might get addicted xD This game is just awesome.. ~Falx
mousesportz# donatello;-;Perfect game ;)
Villari;-;Anyone who had a PC in 2000 played this game. Best FPS ever made. (Here come the CoD ....)
Tufas;-;Have been playing since 6.5 and there are still 12 year olds flaming me in voicechat 10/10 for tryhard authenticity
TINO |;-;Nice game :D
n e b;-;endless replayability with mods, surfing, gun game and just the core game itself. It has a difficult learning curve but its worth the time to practice. Since so many people still play it its still extremely active and worth trying out
!@#$;-;Play the world's number 1 online action game. Engage in an incredibly realistic brand of terrorist warfare in this wildly popular team-based game. Ally with teammates to complete strategic missions. Take out enemy sites. Rescue hostages. Your role affects your team's success. Your team's success affects your role. Also zombies HnS (jumping) kreedz jumping ) deathrun run through obstacles and crap
DarKxD;-;Download It . It's a very good shooting game :D
MaJIuIU;-;CooL
carson;-;The greatest fps in the world....
Ki;-;This is the worst star wars game I have ever played. There's no force powers, lightsabers, clones, droids, NOTHING. It's like they took out every element that would be in a star wars games. This would only be the best game if they later renamed it to counter strike or something along those lines.
TETAPOSE;-;Love this game....
Bonifacius von Mllesser;-;Old good classic!
F R 3 3 d-_-b;-;The years have mold this game very nicely for the past 14 years this game has gone down as the FPS that started the series off with bang this game has everything from tatical game play to zombie infection modes. The game is made for all the FPS junkies out there its 14 yrs old but still puts smiles on all the gamers faces as they play this forever great series of games from the gaben overlord all hail the valve group for giving us this amazing game!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
kH4NN :>;-;Cool game!
RAKU;-;The old games its the best!!!!
fearless;-;awesome game u should give it for free to pro players :)
H A T R E D ^,-;-;Addictive,But...Awesome!
Simona Halep;-;Good Optimization.
BAYO;-;Best game ever, too bad there many cheaters on it.. R.I.P.
Rist Umahali #rockchalk;-;Awesome Game! If you don't have it, you should!
N3><T;-;This game is so awesome because you play it like an strategy game and it is very good game shooting online game I'l recomend it
ELFASi /A/;-;really good game guys i recommend it.
special_force;-;The Best game
b6i;-;Nice Game.
EHx LoCo;-;This game is such an original classic, its graphics were ahead of its time back in 2000 and still dont look that bad, the gameplay is what that makes this game such a hit, the gameplay is straight to the point for a shooter. The gamemodes are addictive and i think all of them are just as good as the other
uG | poetiK;-;This game is still going strong after 15 years. What more is there to say? It has never been done better than this. Easy to learn, but can take years to really master.
Sharkz;-;why it! wruth me : ''failed to initazile authentication interface. Exiting... ''
!;-;Classic!
Spike;-;I have so much memories of this game. FUN!
Bad Blood;-;It is impossible to play this. Gl if you try, I even tried noob servers and still got owned. Any Fps looks like an EZ pz game compared to Counterstrike.
Stelf;-;Recommended 10/10. Everything , i really mean everything in this game is great. (except for the graphics , but if im not wrong this game is from 1999 ,sooooo... yeah , just buy it)
NarCoM;-;THE BEST GAME EVER ...
Gotti24;-;The Classic Counter Strike , this is the old !
$tOrM # jinX;-;10/10 nothing more nothing less. :)
Kirito-kun;-;this game although old still is very good game and it takes actrually some skill in it to
Rk_underdog;-;doesnt matter how old it is .. still a very good n entertaining game...
Trusybee125;-;A Game in which you Counter somebody's Strike
DaFrekkinNoob ` =];-;The game is very fun for its age and I have had a lot of fun playing this. This game means a lot to me and to some of my friends. This game was my first ever multiplayer game when I started playing it in 2007, when I didnt have steam and had to pirate it, sadly. I'm fairly sad that it is dying, but it had a good run. 10/10
Like;-;Nice game!
S1nGl3 #WillBeBack ;);-;Best Game in The world essssssss!
BlackTW;-;CLASSIC
1NIQ*MASTER**Make The Difference;-;Best Shooter!
BLFL.-=_B3aSt_=-;-;The best "Never get bored of it" game.....
Unreal;-;Great Game... Enough said!
EviaN;-;Buy it. Play it. Enjoy it. Lose your life to it. Eat. Sleep. CS. Now i should have a job, i should have a girlfriend, i should have a freaking life. But no, CS 1.6 ruined my life. 100/10 definately playin' again. Recommend to all noobs and pros. Dont have a friend? Play it and make friends. Have a friend? Play with him. Dont have a server? Play on a random one. Have a server? Install plugins and play it. Want to be a progamer? I guess you will never then. If you attempt to be one? I guess you are a pro then. Buy it and play it. If you dont have money? Get a job. If you dont have a job? Rob a bank. If you got caught? Oh at least you tried. Or just get in a payday gang, get a nickname, design a mask and go on with your life. If you get enough money, get this game, CS source and CSGO.
Bouncing Ballsy Ball;-;It has some history for old gamers. Solid gameplay.
d3vil;-;Nice game. 10 of 10.
HuviZ;-;Cool :)
#4;-;No other game can match the simplicity of this game. Easy to play; hard to master. Just love it from the age of 8. Best game ever for me.
Lovelocke;-;Old game, still played by many, still ok, but time to move on to CS:GO.
(_) You!;-;Since 2000 making history
Jsses Amalia!;-;there is no better game ;)
BORSITU;-;nice shooter
Gexsssss.;-;Good, and old game ;)
Sooki;-;Excellent game, thoroughly enjoyed it back in the day.
Zeus;-;Okey,Good story.
ImJustiiV;-;Fun And Highly Addictive Game. If You Like FPS's, Then This Game Is For You.
KUZCO*MVP;-;This is a good game!
blute;-;cool
zAAz;-;its awsm
BB.Arthmael;-;This game owns.ieeez
Damn13k7;-;3 Words , Old but Gold !
n8tr#Z-;-;this is my favorit game. got best moments <3
f0rce#;-;Classic action! One of my best games ever.
HAX-1337;-;cs go player must have skills from this game! :)
BlanC;-;What could I say about this that hasnt been said already. Im glad I have this in my collection and 11/10 for the memories of playing this game!!!
ebox;-;awesome online game
-=]BG[=-^~BACKsTabbeR;-;The most popular and best Game. Simply love it. May there be a series of Games with better Graphics and Gameplay, but this will always be like the First Love <3
[SMRF2] Ultra Chun-li 720;-;source is better still fun tho
!!!!CaMpEr!!!!;-;Awesome Game Play Thsi Game Friends
NPN Transistor;-;This is the classic and the best iteration of cs by some metrics, personally I really liked it I highly recommend if your pc is slightly less powerful.
afifazzazel;-;Play Counter-Strike and be convinced that Counter-Strike is the best game ever.
KMD The Graduate;-;Instant Classic
;-##############################;-;play hard go pro! :D
`MR.ReBel.eXe;-;Awesome game.FPS lovers must try it
redheadsoldier;-;A must-have. This is the granddaddy of online shooters. GET IT.
redheadsoldier;-;A must-have. This is the granddaddy of online shooters. GET IT.
-xjayz-;-;Classic Forever
RadRoach!;-;og as  Write a review for Counter-Strike You need to have used this product for at least 5 minutes before posting a review for it (4 minutes on record).
Assassin;-;cHeaters cheaters every where xD
|K|L$H`;-;The best game ever <3
Broken Ninja;-;Cant beat a Classic... unless you just kill it with a bunch of bot servers. Still the king of the online fps. For the record CS1.4 on the WON ID system (Way before SteamId's) was the best version.
mdxs2bea;-;the best fps , zan <3
Gabriel helken;-;The best FPS game in the world!
Z3R0W1LL;-;cool
kalasH;-;The best competetive FPS game ever.
aB1s;-;Actually retired
Tiger;-;Classic.
Jordan;-;If i could find out how to play this game it would be awesome i click on cs and then i see a black screen and then steam main menu is there ?
#Tankers;-;absolutely !!!
Homer Svetomir;-;Absolutely fabulous. Just buy it, if you like true FPS games, that require practice bur never get boring, here is one excellent for you.
Judge_Dredd;-;One of the best multiplayer shooters
GOLDY;-;Game that makes you skilled.
Shagi_Dawg [.ca];-;1.0-1.6 was my life lol
Oath;-;Revolutionized FPS gaming & pretty much made it what it is today. Literally was the greatest FPS games back in the day.
MARKOHOHO !;-;Old School :D
Iedara;-;pewpew shuuuuuuuuuuuu bbudubudbudbudbubudu PFOOOOOOOOM headshot Counter strike 1.6, one of the games i played the most that's for sure. From my own experience, as most of the gamaes, counter strike is best played in team, with friends, it makes things more fun and interesting. But you can have fun playing alone too ofcourse, just not as much (only my opinion here). It may be annoying in the beginning, but as you start to get the hang of it you'll start to enjoy it too.
Alex;-;steam, wtf... cd update screw my fps ... really? why? al least an answer...
Silence is better than bullshit.;-;Its old game but for me best game ever :)
hobo kitty;-;wtf.. why isnt it working?!!!!!!!!
Frozen Siox;-;Why can't I run Counter Strike 1.6? It's running half-life and gives me some kind of error message, and then I press OK on that, and it closes down...WHAT THE HELL?!
brokenmind;-;the game doesnt start after updating wtf!!!
SkY|!^N#E::;-;THIS UPDATE SUCKS ON STEAM.NOT LAUNCH CS 1.6
uncle08;-;counter strike could not load in the libary pls help.
^_*$p!DeR-_-(v)aN*_^;-;I Have Deleted the game after theat i installed it and then it become don't work
Luksis;-;Some stupid update, cannot even load the game, what is this crap? I've been playing it for 1 year and no problems, now i just done this update and i cannot even load it? what is this
foXXXXXXXXX;-;cool 1 <3
chriscampos42;-;Wow. WHAT THE !!!! Game doesn't work now.
Minato;-;cs 1.6 is crashing after the update... please fix asap!
Minato;-;cs 1.6 is crashing after the update... please fix asap!
| Hustlelelelelelelele;-;You screwed us up with this new update :(
BTCHimHIGH;-;what's wrong with counter strike ? if i want to play it's says "couldn't load library"
masterking.mix on;-;NU IMI MAI MERGE COUNTER STRIKE CS 1.6 INTRU IN JOC SI IMI APARE HALF LIVE MA POATE AJUTA CINEVA?
Lawless;-;I recommend this game because the great gift pile asked me to. Also because it's still the best ing shooter out there. That's right,  Call of Duty,  Battlefied,  Halo. 1.6 peoples.
Dings be inios;-;Good old game.. Stil alive! Gathers, or other servers.. MIX'es, IRC chaneels... Good memories :)
@furlance THE@K!LLER;-;CANT PLAY GAME COUNTER STRIKE PLZZZ HELP FATAL ERROR :(
uperparky;-;The first and possibly the best Counter Stirke. Over a decade later and still thousands play it a day? Other than Nintendo nobody has been able to master something like this as well as it is here. With a huge install base, small game but wonderful gameplay, this is worth your $10
FeniXSauruS 1c 1d;-;best game of counter strike by far nothing ever compares to it
CLOSED;-;yeah marvallous game..!!
fragman;-;There's not much to say. This is just one of the best online FPS games!
[GiRT] Professor Wizard;-;One of the best mods ever became such a legendary game!
JAnders;-;Its the original
xu - I Love rochii;-;Counter-Strike it's really amazing, but today really it's bad we can't play good, just before are good. Server are Sh~# PPL are Sh%$ really it's BAD People Play free, Play Clean, Play to your mode, and OFF HACK, OFF cheating , OFF Scripting, OFF ALL Play Fun :)
Krts;-;The Best FPS ever :D
Jack *steelseries*;-;When you left click, you shoot. 5 stars
Maverick;-;After so many years the game is still playable and enjoyable, it's one of the first most competitive fps game that I known and it still have pretty good player base.
new player;-;Itz A Superb Game Since 1999.......................................................................................JUSt enjoy Playing This
Holiday Mode [ON];-;Very Nice Game :) !
-=ASSAULT-KILLER=-;-;Nice game,love to play it, best online gaming experience ever i had with it :)
Teeray;-;Good old game , Altough its old , we still love it , and we still play it. Its counter stike :D ! Give a thumbs up if you agree with me
Goku;-;Amazing game from my past and present. It's a classic that I will always love.
Hackmed;-;I dont know why im reccomending this, since this is probably the reason you have steam in the first place.
da_bg2k_276;-;This game is fkin awesum. Just bought it and already hav 4 hrs on it >:). its addicting dudes
|\/| Alex |_|;-;Still one of the best shooters ever.
lickmyashe;-;ok im not amazing at this game but it the best out of all of them. i think it takes A LOT pratice to get decent lol well to me im not great but if you got a couple of friends, hey might as well play this game
schizo;-;The first time i've played Counter-Strike, i remember i was just 11 years old, back in 2001! Since then it had me nailed, its just so awesome, you come home, turn on your Teamspeak / Ventrilo, form a Party, play 5v5 just for fun, train and become better, step by step. For anyone new to Action-Shooter genre i highly recommend playing Counter-Strike, its just a must-have!
Bloodypro;-;Great
thissentryisaspy12000;-;Well I guess since I have 117 hours clocked into this game *cough cough* steam bug *cough cough* I am obligated to write a review for this game. So this game is most definetly timeless as it is basically super smash bros melee to Counter-Strike:Source/Counter-Strike Global Offensive's super smash bros brawl. This game is unique as when you die you don't respawn until the next round meaning that your team can lose by having all of it's members die. As well, you need to buy your weapons or take them from the bodies of your enemies instead of just finding them scattered across the battlefield like other games of it's time did. Today the game can seem a bit outdated with a lack of ragdoll physics making aerial deaths look weird and unnatural as well as the obvious outdated graphics which can be "fixed" with a hd patch that just looks weird and unnatural compaired to games made at the time of the patch's creation (2003). Overall I would recommend this game if you buy the retail copy or if they fixed the bug that is the only reason why I have logged 117 hours into the game.
THIRUMAL;-;my non steam no lag but steam lag . FOS IS ONNI 4!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! HELP!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
asd;-;i love it...awesome game...play hard go pro....:P
Sockbum;-;yea! the counterstrike superhero mod is fun
rA!d<HACKMODE>;-;nice game better than go XD
JH0N;-;Best FPS of decade!
Nicht Nicer Dicer Fusion Red;-;THIS GAME IS A MUST HAVE!
Water, air and the horizon;-;Probably the best game in its series...
-Ez._.^-;-;Addicted <3
HeyManNiceShot;-;The one, the ORIGINAL: Call of Duty. Do you suffer from irregularity? Borderlands will fix that for you. This game, called Garry's Mode, will blow your  through your mouth and make you suck it. If you're already not good, it'll turn you into a in' dinosaur. The possibilities are LIMITLESS. NOW you're thinking with Portals, jerk.
Mexuverse;-;Counter-Strike has always been the best FPS. Global Offensive goes back to the roots and Is a great game for anyone.
WTTeam ' pgZ . Sky =*;-;I like this game!
Monkey D. Luffy #only D2;-;yes a good game if played in a good computers, awesome experience at 100 fps. Will suggest a gaming mouse and a pad for best aiming
MeRcuRy;-;Its really a one of the fabulous game i have ever played
Lost in the abyss;-;I've spent over 5000hours on this game, how can I hate it? 10/10 best cs ever made hl1 :3
Trane209;-;really awsome game really recomend it
oxyuranus;-;The Greatest Game of All Time
Y(U)OTHA;-;Pretty Dope
Esqueleto#RoadToSilver2;-;One of the best FPS multi-player games out there, a must buy
MIKE Candys JR .;-;CS:GO IS THE BEST <3.
PRODIGY;-;Very cool and balanced game. Superb gameplay and unbelievably good for tournaments. Once you've played it you'll never regret it. The only bad thing about this game is the community. It's full of scrubs, lamers, scammers, spammers and hackers. Its very hard to find a good and clean from all those dudes server, but when you do find it, you will forget all about them and will enjoy all your hours of play.
Mayonnaise :D;-;The best and most original FPS of all time. Bow down to what has overtaken over 10 years of my life. GG
nabmatic;-;The quentissential competitve FPS. Get it you won't regret it, unless you suck balls.
Uranium_;-;nice game i love it best game absolutely best
Robert;-;the GOAT.
JoKeR;-;This is Great Game Let"s play Togeter
!h@B;-;simply nice
AlderWars;-;May be old but still worth it to get it.
n e b;-;endless replayability with mods, surfing, gun game and just the core game itself. It has a difficult learning curve but its worth the time to practice. Since so many people still play it its still extremely active and worth trying out
ReeGomes;-;the best game ever!
NO RUSSIANS ON EUROPE SV;-;Nice game !
Wassila;-;What can I say about it ? It was my first love, we spent countless together... This game is for sure the best game of all the time!!!! It's been 13 years since the first headshot, and still got the same excitation!!!!!
#Nighthawk#;-;the best game that has ever been
DoubleNine|5| -UNITY-;-;it is my
ae;-;This game is awesome, thanks valve for making it. I know its very old tho =D
MentalJack cK;-;Highly recommend, the hardest CS to play due to a unique way of aiming which was new when the game came out, and the dodgy rego.
Criss;-;The granddaddy of FPS!!!!
i;-;LOve THIS GAme!!
gh0st;-;Very good old classic game. This game was my childhood and i growned up with this game. I still play cs and for me it is the most revolutionary game of game history
m$;-;part of me <3
Sagace;-;Recomand  :P
92 | Widd3rshins.co;-;Good game, highly recomended
LuciFer;-;This game is perfect and awesome!!!
GunNut;-;Addictive... Probably the best replay value of any game ever.
Malone.j2;-;Simple? Yes Outdated? Yes Fun? Yes This is a classic FPS must-have. Although most of my enjoyment in this game comes from the nostalgia of playing this back in the mid to late 2000's, newcomers will also find enjoyment in this trigger-happy gem. This is the original Counter-Strike, and it is a 10/10 good time.
linkgonzo;-;A classic pioneer fps game, fun to play
Misho;-;nothing to say 1.6 - classic
xLokki;-;Still great game after these years!
ERS;-;Must play game.
Lovelocke;-;Old game, still played by many, still ok, but time to move on to CS:GO.
(_) You!;-;Since 2000 making history
Jsses Amalia!;-;there is no better game ;)
BORSITU;-;nice shooter
Gexsssss.;-;Good, and old game ;)
Foxxie;-;old school.
SMiLe_8|;-;15 years old. Still best shooter ever made.
yulsuf.nzl QUEENSLAND;-;fy_iceworld, cs_bloodstrike, de_rats, fy_poolday, awp_map, wc3mod, surf, dodgeball, ahh the memories
Dev;-;Cs for life, 10 years playin cant find a replacement.
ataritm2;-;this is a good game for kids as it's not real life graficts. and servers with mods are sometimes good.
IMmObILiZeR;-;This game is super!!!!
DonCaramello;-;this is cs. nuff said. no review needed. if you have steam and dont know cs, there is something wrong
-SpoileRFFF. <3 -ScreaM.;-;Awesome Game (Y)
zeromant;-;The most popular FPS ever- (After UT/Q)
Veltyn;-;No bots if you suck at online or have crappy wifi connection tho
GrandmaTITMilk[!]^;-;i recommended this game for all players
Diabl0;-;Terrific...and best FPS Free Gun Game :)
Kolozs bitch;-;This Game is ''Old But Gold'' ;D
Player v2.1;-;Game is good for any lower spec PCs, but may have a little lag. Overall a decent game.
T.A.R.F.U.;-;still one of the best games i've played on the computer
[HEAT]Trixas997;-;The mother of all.....
kayzorguariGG;-;the best game
QEREK;-;Better then Battlefield or Call of duty
Toxicz;-;It's ok I guess
Macke;-;Very recomended.
s0kin;-;The best FPS I have ever played. From the original beta versions in 1999 up untill version 1.6 I all love. Some more than others but the basic gameplay is just awesome. It is highly addictive and frustration levels can rise to highest possible but the fun of teaming up and achieving the kills / goals is just a rush ;) Okay, the graphics are not the greatest anymore, but the fact that after all these years I still pick up the game and play it says enough for me. http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=_FiGwvCZ1X0&feature=related Check it out! :P
kk;-;The godfather of fps games.
LARI;-;click click booooom!
keynes;-;Great game!
StanZa_;-;Old school game was playing this game when i was a child :)
Paulieeeee;-;CS
BlitzWithGuns;-;It's a great game, that's all I can say. But honestly, how much you actually enjoy this game depends on where you live. Good servers are very scarce on where I live..
Twerk;-;yay steam forced me to write this, ARE YOU HAPPY NOW STEAM!?
stARVINg;-;Best version of CS made.
krs;-;The best FPS.
The Troller #Touchpad;-;Addictive! (y)
apoLLo[N];-;Cs 1.6 FOREVER!
pHametic;-;Best of the best.
diNkK[K*MTZ];-;the best game!
Karton;-;Can enter only original, new mode surf ski server manages a unique mode Who publishes a candidate for Admin Ielhhh join now =] 84.94.214.173:20889 $$$$$$ Cs 1.6 $$$$$$
Raxpone.g2a;-;Cool game bro ! :)
DHIcGOM;-;An absolute classic which is a must have for any young boy starting his gaming life.
SanJek;-;its a cool game
Brett Pitt;-;top
kroT;-;Amazing game, I dont care about the quality of the game, its still amazing.
Switchbl@de;-;Over 1000 Hours and still playing!
Sunshine;-;It's decent.
M1cKeY ^_^;-;Nice Game :)
[FoaB]ATI;-;One of my first FPS game shame that now is somewhat filled with mod and hackers this game is still fun and double Sin mind I spent with that crap out of call of duty on this game people spent years of their lives becoming stronger but even if you don't and the height of certain people you're still awesome
Nate;-;No doubt this is the best online game
EP;-;The Predecessor of all FPS games! Try it out today!
nima;-;i Recommend this game because is the besssssst game evaaaaa|
Potato Masher;-;The most Amazing FPS EVAR!!!!
R3cul;-;Excellent action packed dynamic game, where you get to test your reflexes and meet and play online with your friends!
Gnaw;-;The best FPS shooter ever.
TraiN;-;CS 1.6 For Life :-)
DallaS- *Kinguin;-;get it tons of fun
$panner [Adam];-;technically the 2nd in its franchise, its one of the best online shooters even to this day, i personally dont like CS franchise not cause i suck  at them but i dont see the fun in it, i want to have FUN playing a game, and this just does not deliver it for me, but....i do recommend it highly
-off;-;recommended game to start as first person shooter.
Ahlakabeid;-;Simply full of nostalgia xD
Braz;-;Its CS... enough said!
kreeg;-;That one game where a bullet can pass through a 2 foot thick concrete wall and a 5 foot long crate, and the assault rifles have 12 random recoil patterns each.
Hipsta.;-;1021 Hours played, no-life Bruv! :)
^The-End^;-;the best online fps game ever :)
Brian Cox;-;This is game caused the revolution of FPS games so it gets 5 out of 5 but be warned if you are not MLG you will be mocked and called a noob.
Uncle Bans;-;Hands down the most addictive team-play based game out there.
shad0w;-;In my opinion: CS is the best game ever made! CS 1.3 was my personal favorite update, but 1.6 is and always will be amazing. I still pub a de_dust2 server daily.
DrDrake;-;Very addictive game once you get used to it :)
Tombom;-;I used to love this game. Now I love TF2.
LEEDLELEEDLELE;-;Even though it is old, this game sure lives to today, and is still great!
.Slush`;-;This is a classic. Much better since they added Widescreen and HD reions.
Felix Revenge;-;good game but complicated story
Tr3b0r_UK;-;Everyone should have played Counter-Strike 1.6. This game defined online MP shooters, and is still played to this day.
Wario;-;This will be your best friend when your awesome pc/laptop breaks down.
Erin Go Bragh @<);*);-;Best fps of all time, was in 1999 and still is in 2011
Nice Puppies;-;This game is pretty much just as good as Counter Strike Source just with older and outdated graphics and sound. You can play Counter Strike 1.6 with bots by getting Podbot MM: http://podbotmm.bots-united.com/main_pb_page/index.htm. A great game!
blodsidkare #goat:estofalltime;-;Who hasn't played CS? Come on.
WANTED  | CZE |;-;The best version of Counter-Strike!
sG| schi-scha-schepperAtze;-;Classic, classic, classic. Will this game ever die? :)
quebec520;-;Counter-Strike is a FPS/Tactical Shooter where two teams are fighting; Terrorists and Counter-Terrorists. Multiple game modes like: Save Hostage or Explode/Defuse the bomb. The action is very fast. It is one of the most played game from gaming championship.
-|c0x|-7uP^;-;the 1 !
mnszch;-;not as good as offensive but is classics. no hat T_T
Disc0 #Getting good;-;not enough bats
HappyLemon;-;great game
Sonia;-;old but classic
gorginhanson;-;It's a staple and a classic.
EnvyusDraGz CSGO-RAFFLE.COM;-;Its Old But Fun
TUKKER;-;i think this games a piece of , cuz my game froze up and crashed, so i restarted my comp, and loaded cs go, come to find out i am banned from competitive play for a week....... ty steam for having such in great laggy servers..... ers...
D V O @ work;-;Still playing this rather than CS:S or CS:GO
defiance5050;-;The classic orginal that started one of the best FPS MP games of all time! This game is still really good, and a classic now, but there are not as many servers as there used to be. It is great to go back and visit though.
hb.reel_zach;-;This game is really fun, and I reccomend it to people with computers of any speed, and are just looking for a fun FPS.
sam;-;There simply is nothing like this game. Whether its the nostalgia from years past, or the fact that i still have fun playing it 14 years after its release, it is one of a kind. They will keep releasing newer versions of the game (Condition Zero, Source, Global Offensive), and not that these are not good games, they just do not do for me what the original has always done. Even coming back to the game after not being able to play for years I still find the fun that i had in the very beginning. If you are into cutting edge high graphics and realism, it probably isnt for you. If you have a taste for the classics, however, then cs 1.6 is for you.
Raww;-;This is a best game ! ever !
k.;-;Best gave what i ever player xx
JADE WAS NA HAXACH;-;It's a quite good game. I play from time to time when I have nothing to do. Definetely the best FPS of the whole CS series. RECOMMEND!
Richard McBride;-;out dated i only weedhop in it. turbad game
shadow man;-;i have problem with cs 1.6 when i open cs 1.6 show to me black screen "black screen" :(
Douyu-CommanderInChiefGG;-;if you are an fps gamer aged 25 and up, then chances are you played counterstrike 1.6 excelled at it and was able to relate to it with pride this game paved the ground for so many shooters, crossfire, alliance of valiant arms, left 4 dead
fandelost + jes <3;-;Good ol' CS 1.6, best played on LAN.
esuom7x;-;im the best bro
Aradhya;-;The best FPS game I have ever played. Many people are leaving this version of game saying that it is not upto the mark, but this is best base for all FPS games for which I respect this game and will play it forever.
"^No-MerCy^";-;NIce much better than valve!
peanutbutterjellyPIE;-;atleast you dont die from getting shot in the foot instantly
FoXStyle;-;Play to Mutilate..
LuXor;-;Come play then rage quit because of mexicans and hackers
RuSSiAN wOLF;-;Best shooter game :) I love it ! :D
mart1n88;-;Just love it :)
Hikage;-;I'm really bad, please feed me kills so I can buy the AWP.
Herrera;-;old school
Hulk_Cut;-;getting 6-7 FPS .....lagging like hell....-_-....steam sucks......ma config is 1 gb ram , cor 2 deo, 1 gb graphic card
angie;-;great game
SageTheNightMage;-;This game is not the average shooter, It's a fast paced Terrorist~vs~Counter terrorist type of game. If you like classics and shooters than this is your game
pr3fire;-;yo this game rox
Definitely Not Zsokker;-;The best :>
zohn;-;It's Counter Strike.
OhMyGot;-;great game!
dangg;-;great game!
DaCookie;-;So many good memories
[S]ky[L]ine 7;-;The best game shooting online in the world :)
RikeN;-;One of the best games, i've ever played. I will recommend it to everybody, who wants experience some oldschool gameplay. <3 Have played it about 2000+ hours together including all my accounts. Sadly, there are not that much lans and tournaments anymore. If you have any questions, than make sure to add me on Steam. ;)
Jobear;-;My hours says it all. 10/10
WTFMan...;-;This is a very fun online shooter! No matter how much time passes, it's always fun to hop on and spend a few hours playing.
Themole2114;-;This game is one of the main reasons that Steam exists. At first, you might take a look at the graphics and buy CS:S or CS:GO instead, but I say get this one first. Hours of fun, especially with custom maps.
jasonb8419;-;just a good first person shooter. nothing great but for its time its good
sNt ^;-;The Best and the Legend among MP games :) <3
rohlfoh;-;great game
Lost in the abyss;-;I've spent over 5000hours on this game, how can I hate it? 10/10 best cs ever made hl1 :3
[SnK] Wanryu;-;Well, what can I say? You know what to do.
You gonE!;-;Great game.
ip0000h;-;It's just a classic.
ip0000h;-;It's just a classic.
xnd;-;The best ever.
Pulber (estgaming.eu);-;188.92.161.27:27020 Eesti War3FT New IP
JuGo;-;What's good it's good and it's the best !
S> GTA V;-;I am not a Pro But yea 10 years ago i bought it and I <3 d it so much , I still do
EvanJam506;-;The Most Aggressive, Awesome,Shooter That dated back then when it was made.It Was the best shooter ever since Halo Combat Evolved Came Out. And It's still popular today.So I,personally think you should buy it.It's Only 10.00,And then,if you have kids let them play it when there older,And then let their kids,kids play it,And so on and so on... So Really Buy This Game To Experience What The Gameplay Feels Like.
Eat you alive ^_^;-;You get kinda bored after a while..... it's interesting until you meet players with cheats and so on..... this game was a good RPS but his time has passed ;x
sEwa;-;Alive CS 1.6
dEoN;-;great way to spend some down time
Xenophobian;-;Classic FPS after Quake and Half-Life. This was the game that brought PC gaming to mainstream light (Behind Starcraft). Professional tournaments sponsored by large tech companies was the tip of the iceberg. Strong community-ran servers proved to be invaluable when considering how easy it was to find a place to play without hackers. Purest First Person Shooter game I have ever played.
Kobrickzhino CSGORage.com;-;Very Nice Game
that 6 dig though;-;best cs ever
Terrorize;-;Old school FPS. The one that started it all when it comes to modern shooters. Still fun, fluid game play. I cut my teeth playing CS, my first fps game I played. Takes a bit more skill. Many, many good times!
frozenshade;-;this game was unusual of its kind. Now its has its era gone, don't know why. Its an awsum game, i am quite unhappy for it as its been officially removed from e-sports gaming. Its a must play online game.
Envy;-;CS 1.6        ,      .    -    .
enticing^butter;-;NYC GAME :p
Afghanistan__;-;lOve It ..... My All Time FavoUrite
Clowndog;-;Its a great classic first person shooter for its time
PRO*gamer;-;say notthing it just awesome!
ravenCry;-;Classic counter-strike, what else needs to be said?
sCanien #radoxz;-;Please stay alivee <3 :)
Dzintars;-;I really liked this game!
XioD;-;Old School 10/10 Shooter, Good mods, Goods maps, Good fun, Runs on all PC specs.
takuu  urkki;-;6 points out of 5
Yelrix;-;Very fun! i would reccomend this to people that like firstperson shooters.its addicting and a great timewaster!it doesnt have that good of graphics but i would tell any friend to buy this!have fun and reccomend this to all of your friends.
-=]BG[=-^~Wolf man;-;what to say abt this game u already know enuf abt CS :P :P
Fire Flame Sniper;-;The first Counter-Strike Mod for Half-Life is here, and it is pretty fun to play the mod that started it all!
Raven.;-;Great gameplay. First played during Counter-Strike 1.4, was awesome then, still awesome now. Highly reccomended. The Counter-Strike series is fantastic.
10519 modesto place;-;awesome classic.
TheDentist;-;Greatest game ever
Elena ! <3;-;Play and keep calm.
D/\RK|SS;-;grow up with this game
#5Five [MavRck-mK.^];-;aWsM :D
ZutaRRR~;-;Low graphic game but still recommended (Y)
Gabo;-;Mother off all first person shooters. You have to buy this game to show respect to valve and shooters. It`s ORDER!!!!!
Milicematik;-;I grew up playing Cs 1.6, this is one of the best games late 90's !
[GoD] Goku;-;One of the best FPS out there!
Garcian Smith;-;check out this hot game!
UNKNWN;-;Nice Game.
LudaCrisp;-;Good ol' school CS 1.6
vRtuzo ^_^;-;great game <3
Sorin;-;A verry good and old game . Actually is verry populated , considering the age .
Namika;-;i have played this since i was 10 years old, what a classic game !!, always enjoyed the Lans and clans involved, very enjoyable, shame its gone downhill so much though!
aferist;-;Awesome to the max =]
Sl33pW4lk3R.wOW^;-;this game is a legend! CS 1.6 For Life!
awakenedheathen;-;The Granddaddy of all FPS Multiplayer Games, CS is unapolgetic and based on skill alone! Its a game that not afraid make you feel like you really suck.....but you keep coming back for more everytime!
entity * [EXILED];-;Good old 1.6, excellent game.
Luda / BAWS;-;If you haven't got this game yet, then you're totally missing out! Get it ASAP!
Adolf Hitler;-;Its an old game but really enjoyable i reccomend this really
-jennaroo;-;It's fun when you know how to play because this game takes skill, but a little less skill than CS:GO.
Erika;-;Nice game
kaTsicKneSS;-;Hell yeaah :) I love this game :) You all should get this :P It is one of mah favourite games in da whole wide world :3
Munir GO;-;Reomand :)
Mysterysauce;-;I played this game back in 1.5 before shields and before VAC before steam had the GUI overlay. I'm a OG CS'er. Had alot of fun scriming using MirC, CAL Leagues, CEVO. Retired team aG and clan SKj. I blame this game for getting me into a computer profession. haha
Gambhir;-;one of the best multiplayer game must buy if u buy it even buy for me lol cause even i dont own it xD
seb100172;-;Still fun. Steep learning curve though.
-=Lethal=- Electro;-;hell yeah!
Stri;-;I lost years (I'm really not exaggerating here) to this game. There are better games out there now but for it's day this was a trailblazer. Still a lot of fun now.
hydro;-;Greatest FPS of all time. Nothing else needs to be said. 5/5
Gwee;-;most fun on an FPS ever. scrims, cal league, 32 man pubs when it was a fresh thing, kz climb levels, surf maps, bunny jump maps, hide and seek. The hours I've spent on this game from 2003 to 2009 gave me some of my best stomach-twisting laughs and let me meet some good, bad, and memorable people on and offline. Some that I still see and talk to
Cake;-;I never played a better first person shooter.
|Isuzu Sento|;-;One Of the BEST Multi-Player game.Have every kind of MOD giving a special touch in it Strongly Recommended and Its CHEAP as well :P
Mir4cle;-;Please remember about how many emotions give you cs 1.6 .Please stay alive
Weed Haide Zambeste!!;-;It's a good game
kid0;-;i like counter stricke
bloodY mix?;-;Oh God I love this game :D
Pulido;-;Simply the Best!
Cristi G. (wAzzAp-.-);-;For many, the original Counter-Strike remains the definitive online shooter. Tens of thousands hop onto servers every day to continue the eternal battle between terrorists and counter-terrorists. CS is an almost perfectly balanced mix of teamwork and individual skill with enough depth and nuance to inspire countless esports competitions. Valve have attempted to improve on the formula with Counter-Strike: Source and Counter-Strike: Global Offensive, but the original remains the go-to choice for online action gamers with top twitch skills.
Jedi-Sy;-;the game speaks for its self ! ONE OV THE ALLTIME BEST FPS GAMES ON THE PLANET #FACT! this was the game that got me in to pc gaming meny yrs ago.
jewbakka the jihadi warrior;-;old but nice
[RG] ViNyL-Stabby,Stabby!;-;Jucam Un Ce Se :)?
R A N S O M;-;Recomendo Counter Strike 1.6
BLG_Bryceman461a;-;This will serve as a recommendation to all games in the CS series. THEY ARE ALL BETTER THAN CALL OF DUTY. JUST GO GET IT!
iDriveS4;-;It does not get better than this game... No matter how many more CS come out.
~Mr.H;-;only for pro :P
12345678910;-;addictive! I'm going to flunk all of my classes!
DarwinAtWork;-;Probably the best shooter ever made (and it will probably stay that way). This game literally changed the way how shooter games are today. Well done Valve, well done !
Demonicsheikh;-;This game is the best shooter game and the game that i liked the most! But There is nothing for non steam players that hack in the servers!
Demonicsheikh;-;This game is the best shooter game and the game that i liked the most! But There is nothing for non steam players that hack in the servers!
KEEEKZ #EASTMODE;-;It's a very awsome game!
Bobinho k0k0$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$;-;Nice game!
.falc0n H [<3 n0thing];-;Good, old Counter Strike! One of the "must play" games.
cope;-;Fun game. Worth the buy.
UchaNa;-;My favorite FPS shooter, I think I will never stop zooming because aim is not for me at all =] p.s I'm awper...
Drama;-;One of my most favorite games. 10/10
_AllShameNoWow_;-;good game but i cant play with bots :(
Machete;-;For many, the original Counter-Strike remains the definitive online shooter. Tens of thousands hop onto servers every day to continue the eternal battle between terrorists and counter-terrorists. CS is an almost perfectly balanced mix of teamwork and individual skill with enough depth and nuance to inspire countless esports competitions. Valve have attempted to improve on the formula with Counter-Strike: Source and Counter-Strike: Global Offensive, but the original remains the go-to choice for online action gamers with top twitch skills.
DJ_BAYONET_FADE;-;Here we are 14 years after the game Relase.... And tull this very they i still pick up the game and play hours a day. For 9 dollers this games is a great buy.
GoldenDeagle;-;Cool game. ;)
gmL, quit;-;still the best game ever
Kakka Krabby Patty;-;The Granddad of all shooters! This game is the definition of "Excellent". This game may be old, but it's still a great game to play. Also, its really cheap!
m@t;-;A clasic. Tied with Source as the best game of all time.
jfx.;-;It is one of the best FPS games ever made. Graphics does not matter, it is all about the gameplay :)
I<aNNNiBaL;-;The best Game !
I AM DEVIL;-;The coolest game i`m ever played !!! :)
BoY FrOm DONBASS;-;game of the century
topkek43512;-;ITS COUNTER STRIKE, THE WHOLE REASON STEAM EVEN EXISTS!
THE Strongest?;-;the best first person shooter game ever.
Obi-Wan;-;Working on Debian as a charm, even with Xorg's radeon driver! :-)
Bezdzione;-;epic first person shooter! Its the basic game for gamers who like first person shooter
Here For Beer (cR7);-;Great game :D
Old Acc;-;One of the best shooter games ever .
xXCrazyXx;-;Can't get much better than the original!!!!
Blakath;-;The game is pretty realistic but valve isn't updating it like it used to do !
CatmanCSGO *-YouTube-*;-;Very Nice!
robber. //'---';-;Cool !
ECTM. Tomy;-;This is the best game ever!
Zyaan "lyrical Zishu.92k" Shaikh;-;play cs 1.6
E$LI@N _KrYpToN_;-;GREAT GAME! MUST TRY!
Harmonica;-;Check out those 2 hardcore s on the cover. That should tell you all you need to know about the game. And what kind of name is Counter Strike? Did they name it COunter Attack and realise that sounded too genreic and decided to name it something off? Or maybe this game is about the strike of counter-tops? We may never lnow. Like i said, look at those two hardcore GSG9 and GIGN operators and that should tell you all you need to know Money and time sink, like the Philadelphia Experiment only with less GOvernment coverups. I should be studying SS what is this 0/10 struck too hard would not counter
NeoDymium;-;Best off
VieraDidnos;-;Classic game. Great shooter even today! 7/10
butnut;-;Pretty cool game if you're into killing  and being leet
Tuze;-;Very good game, the movement is fantastic is fantastic.
Little Bro;-;Very nice game. That's it.
Furious Styles;-;The King Will Never Die.
Shurk;-;CS
{ D A V I D };-;I have played this long ago. It was good. "Virtual reality, whoa!"
10v5m1ch9n5;-;So you think your good at FPS games...? well let's see if you are with this game. :D -Keep smiling!
krea|T|iv;-;its nice
Wilbo & Co.;-;still the best CS
rayanspawn1;-;the best game ever, since 6 years ago playing this game.
gg;-;This is the first game I grew up with and i had awesome experience since now so i higly recomend it to everyone so try it out
DBucky1;-;Classic Oldschool Game!
AfroApe;-;Throwing grenade in doors will open 'em 10/10 for realistic experiance
CycloneInAmes;-;Classic, interesting and also a good way to make friends. LIKE IT!!!
Your Wifes GF;-;Always have been one of my favorite games, I endup coming back to it.
Philip J. Fry;-;I haven't played too much Counter-Strike, but I've played CS:S, CS:GO, and CS:CZ a lot more. CS:CZ is basically CS, but with bots... and I really enjoyed it. I got this when I got the counter-strike 1 anthology bundle, but mainly played CS:CZ and some DoD. I decided to try out the original, and I loved it. I'd say the only con to this game is the fact that not too many people play it as much as people used to do. CS is a great game, and will still be one of the best FPS shooters ever made. 10/10
gametime;-;this is the best game i ever played
Macbright;-;This game is a classic and it is highly competitive. It is recommended for all who are new to the FPS genre or just want to improve their skills. It even tops many FPS today. I rate it 9.5/10
Tomi - G@D;-;This was, is and will be the most popular First Person Shot game ever. I rly dont like the new one GO version of Counter Strike. This is legengary game and it will be active and popular for many years from now on.
LeX!e-;-;... just play the game! (Without cheats plz?...)
ninjai;-;This game played a huge role in my childhood :D Still the best fps for competitive play, but unfortunately steam ruined this game with the latest updates :(
Just 10 Dads;-;Literally inspired Sandy Hook.
S.A.;-;The best on the world
Scream junior;-;Nice game))
agent oo7 4 Russia.;-;GREATEST GAME OF ALL TIME!
cuzc0;-;This game started the FPS franchise. Well technically it didn't, but it started it for me dammit.
Xtreeme;-;Very Good Game !
Hladan;-;#Community_Recommend_Link
The Zipe;-;Call of Duty is back again with another smashing hit, but it's not called Call Of Duty. You can shoot guns in this one too, and that's swell.
Xeno;-;There's nothing about Counter-Strike 1.6 that hasn't be said already, the game will always remain flawless in many gamers eyes throughout the world. Tactiacl shooter at its finest, Cs 1.6 offers not only perfectly balanced matches and good maps but intense sneaking, real quick scoping, amazing weaponry, strategies and SO much more! It is the easiest game to just pick up and play, and it would totaly fit in "Things any human beings should try atleast once." list.
Agre$$ivene$$ K!LL$;-;I have some problems with this cs I have added many servers to my favourites but none of them are coming in "Find Servers" tab + my connection is working fine. My humble request please fix this issue.
R Y 0 * `---;-;Play the world's number 1 online action game. Engage in an incredibly realistic brand of terrorist warfare in this wildly popular team-based game. Ally with teammates to complete strategic missions. Take out enemy sites. Rescue hostages. Your role affects your team's success. Your team's success affects your role.
z0ks_;-;Steam is what it is today because of this game! 10/10
darkz;-;da grafics r bad but dis game is still good
rorymc99;-;Every Counter-Strike is a must buy. Not only are they all really fun, but it is really interesting to see the progression of them. 1.6 is the start of the series, and I thoroughly recommend looking up and downloading the original BETA maps from 1999 like Docks as they were originally part of the game (although most of them removed due to unfair map design [except Docks]). CS 1.6 is a fun game, but if you aren't interested in playing older games then I wouldn't bother, Source and Global Offensive are newer and more replay-friendly games.
Jinarchy;-;Old but Gold! Simple mechanics, lots of mods, and a great game to blow off some steam.
Mercy Shot - Happy Eid;-;the best
Emil;-;It's my favorite game and the best game
_J3ff;-;Ehh, its ok I guess
ScaredOfClocks;-;Valve please make sequels to this game. Maybe try the source engine.
xgamerms999;-;Classic FPS
Jofa :-DD;-;Its ok
Ozonski Omotac;-;nice best game of the world <3
Butter-Balls;-;doesnt need a recommendation, if youve played you know its the best FPS of decades
Klajda;-;Best gameplay, the biggest base of players and modders. Exlusively modes like Alien, Zombies, Jumps, Football or JailBreaks! Simple but legendary! Who didnt play this game, he can't call himself a "gamer"!
nooblike;-;Just 4 statistics ! =D There's not too much to say, epic game will never die .
I am Snatchy . ~ MIX?!;-;A very good and classic game! I think it's the most played game since publish...Counter-Strike 1.6 is for those players, who love competition! It's not so easy to be the best in this game, so you must spend some time learning techniques, map-controlling, weapons and so on...it's a very nice game to spend your time on! I recommend it to all of my friends and for anybody else!
The Black PC Gamer;-;good for players looking for a good fps starter
NoobMonster;-;Go 10 years back and this was the first FPS game I came across, and the first game I ever spent tons of hours on. I keep coming back to it even in my adult years. Perfect game for kids. Great at teaching essential values regarding life. Some of the best voice-acting and most memeroable quotes in any form of media. "Fire hole" is a classic.
PhYz';-;top!
Moshi;-;A game in which you can always come back too. With CS GO and Source also being great games, Counter-Strike 1.6 is always a classic in my book
Logan;-;1.6 is still goin strong!
FraG/DenDi;-;bad file consistency a rha h cnt play :/
eksfz;-;I really love this game. It's one of my favourites. The game mode, those oldish graphics, the fun you can have with it... I met a lot of nice people because of this game, and it's sad that most of the servers are full of cheaters now, but you will always find out some good servers even if there's no admins around. One of the best FPS ever. 10/10
draco patat;-;Great game. Bring back memories
UnKn0wN at VACation;-;One of the best games ever!
Vic#don'tplaywithme;-;the best game in word
sheen;-;, * ! best game in the world.
FreeMooCow;-;Great fps game because it was made in 2000 the graphics aren't anything close to todays but it doesn't take away from the game at all. Has some issues with windows 7 just have to tinker around to get it to work but works just fine on windows xp.
3.141592653589793238462643383279;-;Movements much more better than the new fancy schmancy CS:GO movement!
Hardpee789;-;Still the best.
Enki;-;Why are yo playing a game over a decade old?
CLASSiCK NZ;-;Still the best Counter-Strike, original, most realistic. 1.6 All Day
arpacolla;-;Legendary...
Jofa :-DD;-;Its ok
Ozonski Omotac;-;nice best game of the world <3
Butter-Balls;-;doesnt need a recommendation, if youve played you know its the best FPS of decades
Klajda;-;Best gameplay, the biggest base of players and modders. Exlusively modes like Alien, Zombies, Jumps, Football or JailBreaks! Simple but legendary! Who didnt play this game, he can't call himself a "gamer"!
Taco_Human;-;For the love of god, let a newbie at least get a few kills before headshotting him with the pistol from a few miles away...sheesh...
HYPEDD;-;Toomates 4 U, enough for me ! :O
zxz_regular;-;coooool and awesome game! worth the money!
tom01;-;the graphics aren't as good at cs:s but I'm not too upset about that
emp;-;Spent many years playing this game and it was amazing. Console commands and the simplistic gameplay makes it a great game. Mods such as WC3, UWC3, SHERO make the game half fps half rpg which I loved :). However, like most fps', hackers ruin the game and is probably the main reason for the low population aside from the repetitiveness.
averydx;-;fun fps but there is a high learning curve. Suprisingly fun after 15 years.
Aziz S;-;This game is sux i cant quit playing it :)
[ROU]*Gabi;-;This is the best game I ever played
c k N;-;best of the best.
butters;-;great game
trash;-;This game is a must buy. If you don't care about graphics and such, this game is a gem. The community is pretty.. died. Atleast the competitive community. Anyways, this game is a must buy!
arD;-;Old but the best !
endless updates;-;legendary shooter
deactivated;-;If you are not into achievements, unlocks, stats and all that bs then this is the best fps out there to date. Pure tactics and aim skills are what matters. Too bad it's been dropped from esports and overtaken by GO and it's awesome weapon skins, and soon to be TF2 hats.
FreeMooCow;-;Great fps game because it was made in 2000 the graphics aren't anything close to todays but it doesn't take away from the game at all. Has some issues with windows 7 just have to tinker around to get it to work but works just fine on windows xp.
3.141592653589793238462643383279;-;Movements much more better than the new fancy schmancy CS:GO movement!
Hardpee789;-;Still the best.
Enki;-;Why are yo playing a game over a decade old?
CLASSiCK NZ;-;Still the best Counter-Strike, original, most realistic. 1.6 All Day
arpacolla;-;Legendary...
Dirty Doug;-;COD IS JUST A BETTER VERSION LOL
******;-;I actually never payed attention to this game due it's so old. But some days ago I installed it just to see if it's still active and it actually is! That's amazing. Nearly 20k still playing this game even though it's pretty old. For the time I am playing this game I am in love with it. The community is so nice. You don't get matched-up against  loads of hackers like it is in CS:GO atm, it's a very fun game to play and I probably will play some hours too.
Sad Larry;-;classic best game
DecE. #;-;Nice game. :)
E3rie;-;Best online gungame...no words to describe how gud it is ....i wil simply say do play it once in a life time...:)
tlg;-;Play this game
Meiman;-;Probably one of the best works of Valve Co.
ExxY "?" (You get... NOTHING :D);-;hmpf...
ganja re ganja;-;awsome game just loved the gameplay :)
pHL;-;!!! OLD BUT NICE !!!
DruMManiaC[SRB]99;-;awsome game too old :D it have nice settings :D and more players who loved this game :D 10+
s3.# ^.-!!;-;ULtimate game Ever got adiccted to it!!!!
H8-BIT;-;I played this for 6 years and still have to say that it is the best FPS game ever made. It dosen't need pretty graphics to be thrilling and entertaining at the same time. Okay it has a very high learning curve but when your done with that its way to awesome :D
xSe;-;I fully recommend this game to any FPS player who wants a challenge and a fast paced shooting experience.
koekienator;-;Still the master of all tactical shooters out there! <3
Cyber.;-;The best game :)
2 2 3 4;-;Always in my heart. An all time classic that I can never forget. I still love to play the eagle catch the chicken on de_dust 2. This game is just FUN! I don't give a  about the graphics but this is better than all of the other.
Tetsuo{mrdrakecola};-;What built to CSGO and made it into one of my favorite game
EMvique;-;Best FPS game ever! Legendary... a lot of fun!
Eswar;-;One of the best FPS games!!!
angelpro-;-;Pretty much the best game ever. period.
oTac*;-;Long played counter :) what to say just CS !
[GK] Profit;-;this is the best game i have ever played :p lol
>ROMA<;-;cs.wargods.ro
KevinF;-;After many years of being out. By far one of my favorite games. I've purchased it many times for myself and friends. Even tho the graphics are shakey. With a decent modern computer and recent HD features this game looks remarkable. The physics in this game are remarkable, relastic and complicated. Its a hard game to get a grasp off, but now that you cannot just spray at ones head and get head shots. This game alongside dota, and starcraft. Were Pioneers in online competitive play and this game should recieve high acolades for its contribution to esports.
JoJoNe;-;The best game :X
Fisker;-;olldd but golldd the best game ever!!!!
Legola$[OLs];-;Ehmm you know ;)
Sad Larry;-;classic best game
DecE. #;-;Nice game. :)
E3rie;-;Best online gungame...no words to describe how gud it is ....i wil simply say do play it once in a life time...:)
tlg;-;Play this game
Meiman;-;Probably one of the best works of Valve Co.
DragonOnZap23;-;This game i got from my brother its fun to play and it has plenty of lag free servers.I recommend it!
Jepppe Leet;-;Its a great game first version of counterstrike and the best of them all, 1,6 ftw pro game
A Salty Baby Rhino;-;Most fun i've ever had playing an fps game on pc. So much better than call of duty, and probably has better graphics too.
xSe;-;I fully recommend this game to any FPS player who wants a challenge and a fast paced shooting experience.
koekienator;-;Still the master of all tactical shooters out there! <3
Cyber.;-;The best game :)
2 2 3 4;-;Always in my heart. An all time classic that I can never forget. I still love to play the eagle catch the chicken on de_dust 2. This game is just FUN! I don't give a  about the graphics but this is better than all of the other.
Tetsuo{mrdrakecola};-;What built to CSGO and made it into one of my favorite game
EMvique;-;Best FPS game ever! Legendary... a lot of fun!
Eswar;-;One of the best FPS games!!!
angelpro-;-;Pretty much the best game ever. period.
veRGe;-;simply the best game i've ever played (and possibly will ever)
kc;-;Joined steam just for this game. THE best multiplayer FPS experience you can get! UPDATE: shifted to CS GO :D ~#CS Fan
forK|tg.Ja~S;-;So addictive, an all-time great.
i-OniK.;-;Most played multiplayer game !
SEXUAL LOBSTER;-;Best FPS in human history. Source and GO is volvo  scam.
El'Boss;-;Man Simply Awesome Game <33333333333
DarkCity;-;can never go wrong with this. ever....
Markov;-;My First Counter-Strike game if my memory doesnt fail. Must have ha hours of fun with it!
Dextroit;-;Classic.
Anaphax;-;Counter-Strike 1.6? Classy. Play it.
mym1Uq:sick~loverboy taz;-;A very good game! Maybe it's a bit old but it's still good. If you don't care about the graphics or have a crappy computer and you want to play a really good fps - This game is for you
f3[n]!x.!$h.w0w~;-;The Best game ever made!!
fajar;-;Cool game ;3
Pre$h;-;GOTTA PLAY. May seem old, BUT CLASSIC. HIGHLY RECOMMEND.
Yasin :3 # RAGE ?;-;The Best CS Game in my childhood
SHARINGAN;-;this game prove that graphic dosen't matter!!! Game play matter!!!!
Strikey;-;Ruined my life.
Ernest Wolf;-;This will be more of a ''my experience with this game'' type of review, because saying things like ''great gameplay'' will not suit something I've experienced with Counter-Strike. Here you go: I remember back in 2002 I was at a friend's house and he was playing a game. I didn't know the name of the game nor I had internet to find it. A few weeks passed by and another friend came over and he didn't have a computer, so he brought a disc with a game in it. He told me that it was one of the best games and from that very moment I knew that it is going to be the game I saw at the other friend's house. When I saw the Counter-Strike logo I was filled with gamegasm (?) and I was so happy. I don't remember a day when I was so happy like back then. So, the journey started. I was playing it hardcore. Made friends, clans, was involved in communities and even made two myself. Counter-Strike is my first game which I played competitively and it was a whole experience. Playing public servers and maybe some servers with mods was very fun, but playing it competitively made it very intense and stressful. In a pleasant way, ofcourse. Shooters these days try to be different, advanced in a way. Sometimes the most simple games like Counter-Strike are the ones that live to this day. Also, there are plenty of mods to keep your attention to this game. The gameplay is very simple - defend as a Counter-Terrorist, attack as a Terrorist to plant the bomb or save the hostages as a CT. I am sure most of you already know this and I doubt there are gamers that haven't heard or know the gameplay of Counter-Strike, so I am sharing here more of my experience. I wish I could find my CS Anthology account which I've lost since 2008. So, I decided I am going to buy this game again and here you go - more than a thousand hours played. I still play it from time to time to this day and it brings back many great memories and I sometimes even stumble upon people I've played with years ago. I think Counter-Strike changed gaming in a major way and we wouldn't have many games like we have today, if this game wouldn't exist. I am sure many of people already have played games like CS:GO, but never the roots. I doubt any of you will play it for more than an hour, because it's much more simple and it differs a lot in my opinion from CS:GO and modern games.
Brig;-;Every server is spanish or french. I can now fluently swear in both languages 9/10
Hedroks;-;Still better than Call of Duty: Ghosts...
Mr.Mimi | Trade Knife;-;I met a lot of people who slept with my mother. 10/10
Rezej;-;I never played a better first person shooter. Graphics doesn't matter for gamer, gameplay only.
Eno Etukeno;-;When you crouch, you lift your feet in the air and fall to the ground. 10/10
safeoff';-;WARNING : DO NOT buy this game, if you do, you'll never see the sunlight again !
ManaF;-;CS is one of the greatest and undermined games in history. It is, in my opinion, the best game to ever have a crosshair. It is not a contact sport, so for the girly girls, it is an activity to indulge in. It starts off with a team trying to kill another team. I started playing cs when I noticed jacking off isn't the only activity to do on a computer. I started inviting a lot of friends out and getting drinks, as well as a boom box, to spend a nice summer day in the living room playing this wonderful game. I wanted to play every chance that i could. On my road of cs adventures, I encountered a couple of problems; those being that nobody was as fervent as I was about playing, and that when we did play, nobody was good enough, so it wasn't a lot of fun. Then I discovered that I could sign up for a class with dboorn. I was overly excited, and signed up, but with skepticism at how the class was going to be. Sure enough, I was proven wrong. We started off by practicing a little bit. Then we split off into teams and started playing almost everyday of class. I made some friends, and played with people who had built up their skill gradually over the period of the course. When I play counterstrike, the whole world disappears. Only I, the mouse, and my teammates remain. We are united in a common goal. We strive collectively towards an end we all desire. Each player has a spot to hold. They stand ready and waiting, eager for their chance to aid the team in what they hope will be a forthcoming victory. Thus, CS celebrates the unity of man, the indomitable spirit in all of us that pushes us and drives us towards excellence. When I play CS, I play until my veins pump battery acid, and then I play some more. CS is unique among the games because it teaches all of us that no matter where we are in life, there is a role for us to play, and we can help our fellow man by fulfilling that role, and thereby our destiny. What destiny might you ask? I spoke before of unity. And it is that unity that brings us all together like one big loving family. That is the nature of counter-strike; the many working as one. One machine made of well oiled cogs and wheels, moving in unison, happy to play their part in the production of something greater than themselves. Not that these small metal objects are actually animate, I'm of course speaking only metaphorically. Over the course of the years, I have increased in skill, but I have learned a greater lesson than how to be a better cs player. I have learned how to cooperate with a team to accomplish a goal that we all share. Even if that team is less than ideal. I have realized that cs is about more than just one's athletic ability. Instead, there is a deeper meaning behind the colt, the AK, the AWP, the deagle, the sands under my feet (in d2 or inferno). And more importantly, the teammates at my side. I love them. It is the human element of cs that gives cs its greatness. In conclusion, I love cs. I love to win. I love pushing myself to my physical limits. It's that feeling that first drove me to the computer. For every second that I am not playing cs, there is only an unquenchable thirst to play. A thirst that grows as every minute passes by when I am outside, sitting at the television, or playing sports. I had an extraordinary time playing this game, and I will return to look at the future students of this game to see that bright eager look on their faces to remind me of how I used to feel. This review may be over, this game may be dead, but I will never stop playing couner-strike (1.6).
DESTRUKT;-;It's... aight.
Slim_pickins;-;All of those highschool feels
KayBeeOtch;-;upgraded to mac os x 10.9 and it broke it.. the mouse dsnt work anymore. ive tried uninstalling and reinstalling :(
Just 10 Dads;-;Literally inspired Sandy Hook.
S.A.;-;The best on the world
Scream junior;-;Nice game))
Knyazev;-;I'm playing in this game since 2000! (CS Beta 7.1) It's my 1st favorite game!
hundredzZz;-;Umm been playing it for 10+ years i like it
Lemon - De vnzare -;-;recomand ))
pedrosanta;-;Probably the game that kick-started the Steam success, Counter Strike still is a game of choice of the Top Worldwide Electronic Sports Leagues and Championships with a vibrant and huge community of players and tournaments. No one gets called a true gamer until it plays it.
DAWENIS;-;Classic Game. nuff said
sealz;-;Great Game No Dought About It, But If Ypur Going To Play Online Make Sure There is Alot Of People Or it will Get Bored Fast
Cant_Aim;-;A classic from the heyday of Quake, Warcraft 3, and Brood Wars. The game that gave e-sports a face and a true legend in its own right. Still rocking 13 years later with one of the biggest communities on steam. The One, The Only, COUNNNNNNTERRR-STRIKKKKKKKEEEEEE!
RED FOGSX;-;Classic superb multyplayer game, But till STEAM the hot air is out. Is it the servers? the players? The stupid fan-mods? I dont know....
|LDJ| Texer;-;OH! The classic Counter-Strike... the first and best FPS I've played. It just brings sooo many memories playing with friends, so many laughs, etc.. If you've never played CS, please, just quit life!
krOKodilu;-;Nice game !
InviC;-;One of the best FPS game.. Every FPS gamer needs to try this game !
EliteSadsda (Cod);-;I'ts old ! But still the best game !!! :3
I LOVE BNT <3;-;The best game! <3
Shadowking58;-;A friend of mine just gave me his Xbox, with a copy of this game. I was happy!
()Juan325;-;Best online Shooter ive played also because you can mod it for fun. This game takes more skill than a multitude of other games and for anyone to ever miss out on this game is doing a complete disservice to onesself note to get the original onscreen multiplayer skins set the game models to not be HD in the video options menu
Slim_pickins;-;All of those highschool feels
KayBeeOtch;-;upgraded to mac os x 10.9 and it broke it.. the mouse dsnt work anymore. ive tried uninstalling and reinstalling :(
Rayleigh;-;Nice game! Addictive as hell and you never will be tired playing this awesome game!
BOAZ;-;That's game that will never die
Ellis_Dee;-;4th world graphics with a free spririted romp through illustrious landscapes makes this game a thumb that's shaking around and about to fall off after being shot with a glock so it's still there but it hurts so good
DOGE;-;Classic.
z0ks_;-;Steam is what it is today because of this game! 10/10
darkz;-;da grafics r bad but dis game is still good
rorymc99;-;Every Counter-Strike is a must buy. Not only are they all really fun, but it is really interesting to see the progression of them. 1.6 is the start of the series, and I thoroughly recommend looking up and downloading the original BETA maps from 1999 like Docks as they were originally part of the game (although most of them removed due to unfair map design [except Docks]). CS 1.6 is a fun game, but if you aren't interested in playing older games then I wouldn't bother, Source and Global Offensive are newer and more replay-friendly games.
Jinarchy;-;Old but Gold! Simple mechanics, lots of mods, and a great game to blow off some steam.
Mercy Shot - Happy Eid;-;the best
gateman;-;an oldie but still a goodie
Emil;-;It's my favorite game and the best game
_J3ff;-;Ehh, its ok I guess
ScaredOfClocks;-;Valve please make sequels to this game. Maybe try the source engine.
xgamerms999;-;Classic FPS
JALAL.Happy EiD To ALL;-;its Awesome
Amupka;-;You can also play ping only at the beginning of a great
Angry.ftw~;-;superb Game must try !
Mr_Gizmodo;-;This is one my favorite games of all time. Everybody should play this game
Arion HD.;-;This game was saved because of the AMX Mod X scripting, otherwise I believe it would have been dead years ago.
mR # AliN;-;"The Best" for his time !! :)
gig;-;This game is massive time killer. It manages to be both simple and addictive, while having no customization, no unlocks, no achievements, nothing to distract you. This game will have tens of thousands of players from all over the world for all eternity. Those players are generally silent, but trolling and griefing is not at all unknown. This game is also very well known for cheaters. Several admins have bizarre rules that only make sense to them on their servers, so expect to be banned from a few. There are a few popular mods for this game, one being the Warcraft mod. You are generally required to read the notes on how to use these mods, but there are plenty of vanilla servers.
Scorpio_gamer;-;One of the most popular online Shooters!! Your Role affects your Team success and Your Team Success affects your Role!!!
jeyem;-;In some cases a multiplayer game/component gets just about everything right. This is one of those cases.
QUAKE;-;I'm gonna let you finish but. CS 1.6 is still the #1 PLAYED FPS OF ALL TIME!!
:This World Shall Know Pain:;-;The Game Is ing awsm:!
kirby4211;-;this game is verry good as I am a HUGE fan of the counter strike series. Only the bad thing was it took me ages to actualy get the hl1 games to work as of a compatibility glitch
The Suspect;-;No life ;)
Hymox;-;I put probably 5,000+ hours into this game between the ages of 12 and 14.
Xenophobian;-;Classic FPS after Quake and Half-Life. This was the game that brought PC gaming to mainstream light (Behind Starcraft). Professional tournaments sponsored by large tech companies was the tip of the iceberg. Strong community-ran servers proved to be invaluable when considering how easy it was to find a place to play without hackers. Purest First Person Shooter game I have ever played.
Kobrickzhino CSGORage.com;-;Very Nice Game
=Stinky=;-;Counter Strike rocks! its the only game I can hop on and jump right into action in 5 minutes.
Like a Boss;-;This is the best game ever!!
f*cker;-;this game is old
enticing^butter;-;NYC GAME :p
Afghanistan__;-;lOve It ..... My All Time FavoUrite
Clowndog;-;Its a great classic first person shooter for its time
PRO*gamer;-;say notthing it just awesome!
ravenCry;-;Classic counter-strike, what else needs to be said?
radoxzzzzzzzz #nip;-;Please stay alivee <3 :)
Dzintars;-;I really liked this game!
XioD;-;Old School 10/10 Shooter, Good mods, Goods maps, Good fun, Runs on all PC specs.
takuu  urkki;-;6 points out of 5
Yelrix;-;Very fun! i would reccomend this to people that like firstperson shooters.its addicting and a great timewaster!it doesnt have that good of graphics but i would tell any friend to buy this!have fun and reccomend this to all of your friends.
-=]BG[=-^~Wolf man;-;what to say abt this game u already know enuf abt CS :P :P
Fire Flame Sniper;-;The first Counter-Strike Mod for Half-Life is here, and it is pretty fun to play the mod that started it all!
Raven.;-;Great gameplay. First played during Counter-Strike 1.4, was awesome then, still awesome now. Highly reccomended. The Counter-Strike series is fantastic.
Johnny Sins;-;One of the most awesome games ever to exist. I recommend it to everyone who likes FPS games.
Egidijus;-;Cool Game
pesso;-;Best of memories...
AndrewOne;-;One of my favorite games! Great job Valve!
noRktreSS (Ermac) [Road to MG];-;Amazing. Although many pro players play it, and nobody speaks english.
blobles;-;What is there to say.. it's counter strike, the best shooter I've ever played, forged COD, CS forever.
adamskhanh;-;one of the best fps games ever. still play it till this day never gets old.
Tyler2g;-;Great Game
selecto;-;Best FPS game, its so awesome get it its totally worth it
BRUZGULiS;-;Addiction :)
DoodleBob;-;BUY THIS GAME ASAP.
whaa;-;Overrated, but it's good.
Olzh/K/;-;Old game is gold game :D
Skorpan;-;this is one off the most games i like i love surf on this game <3
Bass Shade;-;The multiplayer FPS that started it all. Might be a old game, but its better than COD, also, even though the graphics are , that doesnt mean the game is. Instead of picking your loadout, you get in-game money to buy weapons from a menu. There are no attachments to the weapons. There isnt THAT much to say, but its still very good. Final Verdict 10/10 Classic.
SchroedeR;-;this is the online game that started it all for me, its slowly dying but always always I find myself going back to it.
Namika;-;i have played this since i was 10 years old, what a classic game !!, always enjoyed the Lans and clans involved, very enjoyable, shame its gone downhill so much though!
aferist;-;Awesome to the max =]
Sl33pW4lk3R.wOW^;-;this game is a legend! CS 1.6 For Life!
B|ack|ce;-;My First Loved Game and still is awesome
Sleepy.Shaman;-;play this its badass
gez;-;The best shooter ever made <3
<=[ Bilbolainen;-;Counter-strike 1.6 is absolutely one of the best games ever made - ALL PLATFORMS. Soon to be 14 year old game, this game is still the most popular game in CS-franchise. I would recommend any new player to CS, to actually first buy CS 1.6/Anthology, because this game is golden.
HiiiPower;-;Most Addicting FPS of all time
Disabled Hitman;-;old school game :)
The B@$her;-;Life changing game; gives birth to a new, game changing life!
VulCuN;-;the best!!!!
ComBoro #VACation to KQLYfornia;-;Do not hate the game becouse of graphics. When it was created it was HD but it's time has passed.
NestoR ^^;-;To Jest Gra  ;D
smiley;-;yes nice game!!!
Shpace CSGOPick.com;-;Killed myself with a grenade. /10
Jokerman;-;Best FPS game in my opinion. Definitely a must buy. This review goes to all CS Series.
~=NarC^()~ EmptY;-;this game is AA VA SOME mast game hai
KAKU;-;BEST GAME !
JC2STRONG.;-;One of the best old games ever
ZARNY1337;-;VAC is  RIP CS :/
animal;-;Good clasic game
uiaeqkz g2a.com;-;Perfect BAD GAME
Compton Crip;-;I don't need to say anything about this masterpiece. CS:GO has been out for 2 years now. As a long time CS fan (Yes the hours on STEAM are short but if they logged the data on my game disk there would be at least 3000 hours on it) Counter-Strike 1.6 just gives me a certain feeling none of the later CS games give me. Listen, if you happen to be reading this because you are thinking of buying it, get it. It will be one of the most action-packed amazing $10 you'll ever spend.
Google Chrome;-;This will be more of a ''my experience with this game'' type of review, because saying things like ''great gameplay'' will not suit something I've experienced with Counter-Strike. Here you go: I remember back in 2002 I was at a friend's house and he was playing a game. I didn't know the name of the game nor I had internet to find it. A few weeks passed by and another friend came over and he didn't have a computer, so he brought a disc with a game in it. He told me that it was one of the best games and from that very moment I knew that it is going to be the game I saw at the other friend's house. When I saw the Counter-Strike logo I was filled with gamegasm (?) and I was so happy. I don't remember a day when I was so happy like back then. So, the journey started. I was playing it hardcore. Made friends, clans, was involved in communities and even made two myself. Counter-Strike is my first game which I played competitively and it was a whole experience. Playing public servers and maybe some servers with mods was very fun, but playing it competitively made it very intense and stressful. In a pleasant way, ofcourse. Shooters these days try to be different, advanced in a way. Sometimes the most simple games like Counter-Strike are the ones that live to this day. Also, there are plenty of mods to keep your attention to this game. The gameplay is very simple - defend as a Counter-Terrorist, attack as a Terrorist to plant the bomb or save the hostages as a CT. I am sure most of you already know this and I doubt there are gamers that haven't heard or know the gameplay of Counter-Strike, so I am sharing here more of my experience. I wish I could find my CS Anthology account which I've lost since 2008. So, I decided I am going to buy this game again and here you go - more than a thousand hours played. I still play it from time to time to this day and it brings back many great memories and I sometimes even stumble upon people I've played with years ago. I think Counter-Strike changed gaming in a major way and we wouldn't have many games like we have today, if this game wouldn't exist. I am sure many of people already have played games like CS:GO, but never the roots. I doubt any of you will play it for more than an hour, because it's much more simple and it differs a lot in my opinion from CS:GO and modern games. I am glad that I lived through the golden era of shooters and if I'd have to rate it, it'd 10/10 ofcourse,
Lucky Luke;-;My first game ever......:`( good memories.... it helps you to play csgo! 100000/100
DiSS;-;Old counter strike :)
LucaMelon;-;This is a classic, I must say if you want a good "old" shoot em' up this is a great game for you
puTTy;-;The Classic. Outstanding gameplay. Best community.
BlueSmasher;-;This game took me away from CSGO....This game is amazing.. I really recommend this game even if it isnt good looking all that matters is the gameplay and by far I really LIKED the gameplay of the original CS
hoou;-;The best FPS game ever made. Lots of modes. Lots of players. Great fun!
No Face;-;I love this game :)
Verdun stuipid;-;very classic much aim
HarmlessWHX;-;Damn, I love it. One of the most addictive game.
GeT_StOnEd;-;Best game of the last century. simple as that.
K T M;-;Very nice game.I just playing CS 1.6 .CS - NEVER DIE ! My "experience" is born in CS 1.6 I playing CS 1.6 since 2008.I like it ! CS 1.6
Eddi Dean;-;A classic in FPS! Great game I spent hours in! But since CS:GO I recommend everyone to step into the next generation
aaxeLsabb;-;Very nice game, play it!
sprudel;-;This game is just as good as it was 10 years ago. It's the Tetris of FPS. You will still find tons of people to play with (half of them annoying kids, just like 10 years ago) and find yourself neglecting your modern games...
regan;-;Funnest game ever, still has competetive PUG servers. Lots of fun. =)
Mimo;-;Always ready to play some old CS 1.6! :P
"$KoTeYkA"$;-;cool
-=]BG[=-^~B0nD;-;My FAV game :*
Wespa *Siwa;-;very nice shooter game and nice work gaben
Modi -A-#solo;-;Amazing game play this game I garantie u that u will fail life :S
Shaw;-;old school , old game , recomaneded !
Sutgon;-;I remember it a bit from the past... Was great.
FaTal_Kaos;-;Love this game proves better than call of duty as the counter strike servers are thriving still yet call of duty 1's servers is deader than Justin Bieber stepping out into america
`Koh;-;Good game, i like this.
LeDo;-;It's good
roOT;-;Best of Best FPS game ever made..!! :)
FiZz iZ BaD;-;Its aight, not the best tbh.
kJuinn * Kinguin;-;really nice and smooth game
Shlomo Shekelberg;-;Counter-strike is like a fine wine. It gets better with age. That is to say, the more time goes on, the higher quality players remain, resulting in a great game today.
B1XX 3D;-;The best game ;-bd
lemon;-;I'm really bad at it, but it's an amazing classic game. Yes. I definately do reccomend it.
[CHX] Chrixus "Chrixagen" Hgw.;-;One of the most important interactive medias to get yourself better than before in themes of thinking, hand-eye-coordination, reflexes, individuality and so on. It is like a million little games in one game and you can play it with enough real humans to experience for yourself.
jellisunc;-;where it all started...
|$m0k!n|-Ruff'N'Tumble-;-;After a long break i decided to download CS and see if it's still alive. It is... barely. All these years on and still the best game ever created. Good memories! Better than any CS games that followed. They just don't make games like this anymore. CS:GO is a joke next to this classic.
Stealthy;-;The original classic at its best!
Ludo237;-;A very well made FPS. The grand father of CS:GO It has a lot of bugs indeed but sometimes it's cool to play with a bunch of old friends :-)
ludz1w0w;-;cs go is mother
TheImmortalConquerOfTheUniverse;-;CS CS C ING S! NOSTALGIA + LIFE = COUNTER STRIKE
SeveN;-;I may not be good at this game but I consider this the perfect FPS.
Japve;-;1.- Install 2.- HEAD SHOT 3.- Uninstall 4.- Repeat buy to suport this great game, 2015 and still top 10/15 in the current player count in steam
TheeClaaw;-;A classic mostly got this to to play GMOD. Had a bit of fn playing online, people still play!
HL1PRODUCTION;-;Lets do it as we all wish to do it : 1. Download it 2. Play it 3. Enjoy it 4. Dont hack it 5. Become a pro 6. Represent your clan 7. Represent your country ENJOY !
kOoO;-;the one and only, forever <3
AeOn.|nFamous;-;This game is LIFE! <3 CS 1.6 forever green !
GuilleKP;-;this game is made by gods never take many hours to multyplayer mmorpg games exept but esteque fps truth is very good game
gg;-;This is the first game I grew up with and i had awesome experience since now so i higly recomend it to everyone so try it out
DBucky1;-;Classic Oldschool Game!
AfroApe;-;Throwing grenade in doors will open 'em 10/10 for realistic experiance
CycloneInAmes;-;Classic, interesting and also a good way to make friends. LIKE IT!!!
Your Wifes GF;-;Always have been one of my favorite games, I endup coming back to it.
Philip J. Fry;-;I haven't played too much Counter-Strike, but I've played CS:S, CS:GO, and CS:CZ a lot more. CS:CZ is basically CS, but with bots... and I really enjoyed it. I got this when I got the counter-strike 1 anthology bundle, but mainly played CS:CZ and some DoD. I decided to try out the original, and I loved it. I'd say the only con to this game is the fact that not too many people play it as much as people used to do. CS is a great game, and will still be one of the best FPS shooters ever made. 10/10
Ok;-;Still better than CS:GO
Samurai in UKR;-;knowledge is power
crossen9;-;Let me just get my Windows 98 up and my dial up ready so we can play with the new 3DFX card better than software rendering
Well Worn Anus;-;I've been playing CS Source and GO for a while now, I bought the valve pack and thought it'd be fun the play those games since i've always been a Half-Life fan. I've played it when i was younger, and it brings back memories. The game is really nice, still to this day. I love playing new maps, do scrims and have fun with my Competitive team. Would recommend! Although most servers are Spanish, it's still fun if you don't know the language.
Jef Freeman;-;What servers?
powellwell;-;very cool game :D
Io Asakura;-;very cool game XD
zeb0w~;-;The only one game which could be named like sports event.
Dr.CrAzYDoG;-;Really nostalgic game 10/10
ARTILLERY;-;10/10 still better than any call of duty game
Yggy_;-;Do i really have to review this game?
DanteDDL[UA];-;Is there really necessary to say something about CS? I dont think so. Legendary multiplayer action game that lives for decades!
Risontek;-;The best game on Steam store :3
Altanay?!! #we dem boyz !;-;This is the BEST !
Teprar;-;Grew up with CS. Highly recommended as a parental figure replacement.
Sangrial;-;Just play it!
BKAD;-;Still the best counter-strike game so far
KRiMZ;-;It's fun LOL.
-=NearTox=-;-;This is best game ever but grapich is no good :/
Aestoc [RU];-;Best online shooter of last years, old but damn good
ugh;-;Best game ever. Love it.
Hipstercreations;-;its good
CandyCat;-;This game is really good ;)
DontBeMadBro;-;Steam has been born on this game, few years later still one of the best FPS game n ofc graphic doesnt matter in this case.
g0tfriedrice93 #el chapo;-;Good and fun game!
PumaLoco;-;still the best fps theres ever been
agerace;-;Mouse doesn't work for mac version :(
Alucard;-;Counter-Strike amazing. Play it.
-jennaroo;-;It's fun when you know how to play because this game takes skill, but a little less skill than CS:GO.
Erika;-;Nice game
kaTsicKneSS;-;Hell yeaah :) I love this game :) You all should get this :P It is one of mah favourite games in da whole wide world :3
Munir GO;-;Reomand :)
Mysterysauce;-;I played this game back in 1.5 before shields and before VAC before steam had the GUI overlay. I'm a OG CS'er. Had alot of fun scriming using MirC, CAL Leagues, CEVO. Retired team aG and clan SKj. I blame this game for getting me into a computer profession. haha
chair$niffa;-;the best
Izden#Road2Love;-;It`s the great game. I love it and everything in this game. I recommend it everybody
rampage;-;Love this game
123;-;Still good
ViTAO nas PISTA;-;What a GAME!!
THE NIGHT WOLF;-;this game is a great game to play
Chu;-;The better version of CS compared to Source Rating 8.5/10
Frapa$.HL;-;Its is a lot better than non steam .. don't lag
Dziek;-;An absolute classic to say the least. One of the coolest shooters to grace the point and click medium.
bloodY mix?;-;Oh God I love this game :D
Pulido;-;Simply the Best!
Cristi G. (wAzzAp-.-);-;For many, the original Counter-Strike remains the definitive online shooter. Tens of thousands hop onto servers every day to continue the eternal battle between terrorists and counter-terrorists. CS is an almost perfectly balanced mix of teamwork and individual skill with enough depth and nuance to inspire countless esports competitions. Valve have attempted to improve on the formula with Counter-Strike: Source and Counter-Strike: Global Offensive, but the original remains the go-to choice for online action gamers with top twitch skills.
Jedi-Sy;-;the game speaks for its self ! ONE OV THE ALLTIME BEST FPS GAMES ON THE PLANET #FACT! this was the game that got me in to pc gaming meny yrs ago.
jewbakka the jihadi warrior;-;old but nice
[RG] ViNyL-Stabby,Stabby!;-;Jucam Un Ce Se :)?
R A N S O M;-;Recomendo Counter Strike 1.6
BLG_Bryceman461a;-;This will serve as a recommendation to all games in the CS series. THEY ARE ALL BETTER THAN CALL OF DUTY. JUST GO GET IT!
Flippy;-;Part of my childhood right there! Playded it on a old  computer for about well over 100 hours 10\10
Max Headroom (98.136.63.35);-;I think this game is great. It is a old game so the graphics are not as good as some of the newer fps but it's a fun game. It's not a game you would play for hours day after day but it is great for playing when you get bored or to play now and then and i would recommend buying
apX.;-;Great game.
Flippy;-;Kool Love this game grew up on it
ecco4you;-;Cool
KeybladeKanji;-;Counter-Strike, originally a mod for Half-Life, is a game where you're put into the boots of counter-terrorists with a objective of stopping the other team, the terrorists (players can play as counter-terrorists or terrorists), from killing all of the pedestrians. True to the original Counter-Stike mod, it uses the GoldSrc engine. What I did dislike, however, is that the game is abandoned. If more players started playing, then this game could be so much better.
Noxx;-;This game never gets old. The only thing you can improve is your skill 10/10.
The.Pheonix96;-;i cannot play because this  "The game waas actived with a product code that is vailid only in a specifig geographic region. since you are not currently in that region, counter strike is not avaible to play" :( pls help meeee i already was disable beta updates but nothing :(
s0m;-;Despite my hilariously low count of, 0.6 hours, on record, I can attest to you that, nay, I have played this game(and it's "sequels") to the ends of time. I've literally sunk close to 15,000 hours into the various derivations of CS over the years. I found out about CS from some #IRC chat I used to frequent back in the day(it might have been an ICQ chat with one of them). Namely, I started with the first ALPHA(yea, not beta, ALPHA). I can recall the loading screen and everything. From there, I progressed through the initial betas, introduction of maps, and various weapons(anyone remember the OLD cs_siege, complete with working apc and sniper tower?), etc. I then became a player in various "leagues"; I won't name drop, but I was a baller at one time. So, yes, this game is good. Some people recommend CSGO as the "modern" return of 1.6, but I disagree. CSGO is better than CSS, yes, but still not on-par with 1.6, nothing will ever be :( Goodbye WON-servers.
Mr. Hero;-;how can a game this old still be so fun? a great community!
K;-;The one and only. Back when games had simple mechanics and very little nonsense. Remember when a bullet would go where you actually fired it? Remember when recoil patterns were easy to understand? Remember when it was possible to take a game seriously and become ridiculously good at it? The Counter-Strike franchise is very much like Super Smash Bros -- they had Brawl, we had CS:Source and CS:GO. Let's hope VALVe decides to play a proper homage to this game in the future much like Nintendo did with the New Smash Bros.
XmrHacKeR;-;It is one of the best FPS game available online. Even today its craze has not ended. From a NaVi player i heard that steam version provides very low lag due to which i purchased the game and for sure i was 100% satisfied. You would not believe my ping dropped to 19~21 from 200~1500.
SABAS;-;the best
Forest1Z;-;Nice game :DD
zembie;-;The best multiplayer FPS Ever!!!
Alejandro;-;Still Awesome!
Susan Boyle;-;Oldschool, but still awesome, although there are some cheaters. I suggest to buy this game if you haven't, don't be a pirate :D
Nicksepticeye the BOSS gamer;-;i can,t play it. does anybody know how to restore setting
Shrooms;-;showing its age, still enjoyable though
Counter-Chicken;-;There's a reason why over 15,000 people still play it after 15 years.
Kamikazi Flyswatter of Godspeed;-;its ok if you don't have cs:source.
SpeedGaming# A-T-O-M;-;I LOVE THIS GAME <3
nahka;-;One and only CS-game out there
dont stop beleving!;-;A very good game i love it. this games proves that graphics doesnt matter.
activator #NewToNova;-;one of the best fps games out there. playing it since 2 years love this game
makele(ROADTOM8);-;In short way, this is the best game! :D
Quintox;-;Doesn't need no intro.. I mean come on, this is CS1.6. The godfather of all competetive tactical shooters! Best FPS to date. _O_
[] ZupaSmoka;-;it's bit old now , but it was the best game i played as a kid ...i loved it and i have my Copy
adn;-;Best of the best
Vladimir Putin FUCK obama;-;the best game ever
o_Ocrazygamero_O;-;What are you waiting for!! Go Play!!
RkS /M/;-;Cs Go time
Vpn^ [Vip's];-;Mesmerizing passion for real gamers!
Happyappy15K;-;A classic that you don't wanna pass by
sky[RO];-;Very Nice!
Pyccn;-;best ever play pks
Ahlakabeid;-;Simply full of nostalgia xD
Braz;-;Its CS... enough said!
kreeg;-;That one game where a bullet can pass through a 2 foot thick concrete wall and a 5 foot long crate, and the assault rifles have 12 random recoil patterns each.
Hipsta.;-;1021 Hours played, no-life Bruv! :)
^The-End^;-;the best online fps game ever :)
n[A]de;-;Awesome! This is a game that i had played just for the sake of "Play with friends" but now i "Makes friends while playing" . The game is Solid , enjoyable , and yes.. A must have :D
Tim;-;Best game in the world.
Simona Halep;-;Good Optimization.
San-chan;-;Yes Fun to play and just to relax
BatterySantz_ST3AM;-;As with most old-school multiplayer shooters, you will get your ship wrecked without learning some tactics and gaining skill, but then the fun sets in. It should be noted that this game is "alive", with plenty of players, but most are silent if you want to do more than just play the game.
Jefy;-;Old school <3
Uranium_;-;nice game i love it best game absolutely best
Robert;-;the GOAT.
insane [SGP];-;Old but gold
VieraDidnos;-;Classic game. Great shooter even today! 7/10
Wassila;-;What can I say about it ? It was my first love, we spent countless together... This game is for sure the best game of all the time!!!! It's been 13 years since the first headshot, and still got the same excitation!!!!!
D@nK;-;if it's the original it's the best
(g)old prequal bossen;-;ofc i do the beest game ever !
t-bag;-;Old but gold..
ahopnehep;-;in boats we love swag forever Jennifer Lopez
Galil`;-;One of the best first person shooters.
DA[N]TE;-;A game that became legend.
adriaN$t3@m(On vacation );-;KEWL and easy game :D
silk;-;Almost 4000 hours spent in this game, never gets old, 10/10
JUSTINtime;-;VALVE HAS PATCHED CS 1.6 GO BUY IT NOW!
RagingBunny;-;Great addictive game.
T.Hanks;-;I do recommend this game heartily! Great feel of the gameplay and classic maps that makes it for an unforgivable experience!
Viejra;-;What can i say, game which will be always in my heart at numer 1 place.
phaneron;-;Remember where all of us played this game in cybercafs?
Buckle Boo;-;Hell yes!
KevSam Guest;-;love this game
Bowsmin V2;-;Love it so much. Glad I can play this agian
SOmeTh!n[G];-;this game is aMazing
esdeath;-;10/10 would play again
TitasK;-;Nice game!!!
Starix;-;i love this game
.:|c|u|:. (Old Fart) Crusty JR.;-;When you just want to shoot people in the face and rage because they shot you in the face, play this.
wowzer;-;Possibly one of the greatest first person shooting games ever made. Try it out and see how you like it. Too bad that numerous number of hackers are around these days, but not a probem if server admins are present. You can try maps like dust/dust2, assault, or even fy maps like snow and iceworld. Awp maps are also great if you like scoping and killing opponents with one shot. Maybe even go for some of the fun surfing maps that are still around. Lastly, fyi it does take some time to find the optimal sensitivity setting that you play the best with.
Majin_Zed;-;Cool game!
bubbles;-;This game is so good
K!113R.* /z/;-;Very nice game!
[25th]Excelsior Eventide;-;This game will never get old!
lundavKiNG;-;Sick game, enjoy it alot
Themole2114;-;This game is one of the main reasons that Steam exists. At first, you might take a look at the graphics and buy CS:S or CS:GO instead, but I say get this one first. Hours of fun, especially with custom maps.
du_rezende;-;Really nice game!
SilentM4;-;This is a really awesome classic game! If anyone ever played it, she/he will never forget about it! Deservers the 8 euros, and also you will get Condition Zero!
?. StopWrieR`;-;why icant play?
Argiii - CSGOSkins.NET;-;Great Game! Its Old But Worth Buying!!
`Esc[Sky}--->Alexander48*;-;The Game Like
TRAXX :o;-;the best
Jax;-;I would definitely recommend this game for Counter-Strike or FPS players.
KnOX^;-;Awesome Game.. love it
FeniXSauruS 1c 1d;-;best game of counter strike by far nothing ever compares to it
CLOSED;-;yeah marvallous game..!!
fragman;-;There's not much to say. This is just one of the best online FPS games!
[GiRT] Professor Wizard;-;One of the best mods ever became such a legendary game!
DeliVeriuS;-;Best "old school" fps.
RIP;-;Classic.
Kentis;-;The Original FPS game for everyone!
LuXor;-;Come play then rage quit because of mexicans and hackers
RuSSiAN wOLF;-;Best shooter game :) I love it ! :D
mart1n88;-;Just love it :)
hanako;-;it started it all
KingCharlie;-;well christmas sale is here and the best online game ever available for 4.99 usd go ahead merry christmas and a happy new year
adu.;-;Old but still good! playing since i got my network connection !
Free Team Fortress 2 Items;-;I can't stop playing that !
D$T;-;the best game in EU
RamboedYoAss;-;I Love this game very very much man.But can anyone help me out with a laggy flash light problem and nightvision haha. Also Is there ANYWAY i can get the HD models that look F****** cool Thank you guys SOOOOOOOOOO MUCH
Cassius Clay;-;tb
fahferd;-;de_dust is still a blast after all these years. The game runs well even on laptops!
Soil;-;great game
The Entire Population Of Canada;-;I stil play this game today its that good, anyone who dont have this game should get it immediately!
nvd[t];-;Best fps Game ever known
Suberiji;-;It's an oldschool classic!
--;-;play hard go pro!!!!
Realou;-;This is probably one of my first multiplayer games. I used to play it CONSTANTLY on my previous accounts and non-Steam version of this game too. This game has a lot of custom gamemodes such as zombie, surf, gungame, minigame, deathrun & etcetera. I don't play it anymore because bit by bit I became a graphic freak. But from what fun I had in this game I'll rate it as.. 10/10
AdmiralMOHAX;-;Good game 20 - 21 century and FIFA
MIKAN;-;The most popular action game in the world !
xAPFEL;-;very nice game.
CloudAttacker;-;Great Game!
X-v;-;One Of The Best Online Multiplayers Game to enjoy and Only the name is enough.
psychopath;-;Love this game <3
Buakaw;-;Old but gold.
Loku;-;Nice game...AWESOME (y)
Call Me B-Rye;-;It's Counter Strike, nuff said.
iscreaM;-;Play hard, Go PRO (:
'ShokkK- ^NebliNa';-;This game is really good.. !
Mad Father;-;This is game is good.
$worn;-;Probably one of the best games that I have played in my entire life and I think it will always hold a place in my heart no matter how many other games come out and try to replace it. WON WHAT WHAT?
Forest1Z;-;Nice game :DD
zembie;-;The best multiplayer FPS Ever!!!
Alejandro;-;Still Awesome!
Susan Boyle;-;Oldschool, but still awesome, although there are some cheaters. I suggest to buy this game if you haven't, don't be a pirate :D
Nicksepticeye the BOSS gamer;-;i can,t play it. does anybody know how to restore setting
Roland;-;Cant aim. 10/10 Best game out there -IGN
OmegaSE7EN;-;the standard in FPS.
whispyrs;-;The biggest Competitive First Person Shooter there ever was and ever will be. Extremely Skillful and Team Based Tactic. Amazing, 10/10 1.6 Forever -Buy this over CS:GO
is now playing Dota 2;-;ITS NOT WORKING >.<
funkyfresh;-;This is one of the greatest games I have ever played, full of modifications, active and cool!! Can't say more.
fatalsz;-;This was my childhood in a nutshell
DECEPTICONS;-;tthis is my all time fav game <3
j0 -;-;the best game
The Gullible Tit;-;Classic game. 8/10
aku siapa yah :);-;it's funny games now this game is not serious games like in 2006 since now CS:GO more better than other CS but, this game is have one special for me
NIP-Gaming;-;Great game, old but gold. I don't get bored at all
Blackhand | -UNITY-;-;This is still the ultimate FPS in terms of skill and balance. I have yet to find another game that has come close to the level of skill required to become a professional.
[WPC]GHoSTDoG;-;dopest, most skillful game out there.... harkens back to a day when the internet was simpler place and people put time and effort into games. the community was/is the best (minus the hackers, of course). evolved into what all shooters try to emulate and fail at today.
Master Edward;-;Great game, lots of hours of fun!
SkArFeR;-;Old School :)
Schwarzenegger98;-;Honestly I prefer CS:GO, but in this game you can have a lot of fun playing with friends in Surf or ZombieMod servers!
Limit;-;Counter-Strike its the best game ever :X
-;Z1N~';-;Simple Adictive and Elegant !
dorniX;-;Since 2002,since it appeard in Romania,it's the greatest and the funnest game i've ever played.
Raven;-;Addictive ;)
2ez4tazzy-csgo hunt.com;-;old is gold
heaT;-;A must buy game for old school FPS gamers. It's tons of fun when you get into it. Like people say - old, but gold.
jIRI;-;The only one game that holding me for more then ten years.
batman12;-;Very Nice game
Sergeant;-;Hellio guys plz help me when i am run Counter Strike it works fine i see ct then the black screen show's up and Half life ahs stopped working :/ plz help me
9s;-;Game that 'll never RIP
Phoenix*HD;-;Even if this game was released in 1999, it's still one of the world's most played games! I really recommand this game, to any person who like shooter games! ;)
rACke;-;So ing sick!
#whynot;-;Great game.
AMIN-OZ #UA-07;-;the best game ever
eduardo;-;The best
Drunk;-;Good game of all series CS,but have 1 terible bug when you playing on laptop you use 2 videocards and can be bug with craphick 2D ....
xBuby;-;It`s a very nice game. Try it !
(smile)`;-;This game is immortal! She will never forget.
S1mple;-;This is Legend Game <3
R3kl3ss;-;Best game of all the time.Classic
[HRS]Ozz;-;The original Counter-Strike was one of the most played games of my life. I've spent countless hours playing this game from 1999 to the release of Counter-Strike Condition Zero. I can remember so many things about this game like the old PunkBuster anti-hacking program, the transfer from a standalone game to being forced to use Steam to play my Valve titles, the countless hackers using OGC and the amazing community created maps. There are more maps, weapon skins and character skins released for this game than probably any other game ever made. This is truly a classic and will be one of my favorites forever. Long Live Counter-Strike 1.6!
Inferno. #[CSGODICES.COM];-;just love this Game <3 :D
mLw* Luffy[x];-;You Kill Someone They Die. You Get Killed You Die. Heart breaking story
MzLi;-;Classical, if you looking for the basics you should start with this game. Good community and lots of fun. The gameplay is easy but can be repetitive after a few hours, but there are so many servers with so many modes that it can't be boring for more than 10 minutes.
hanako;-;it started it all
Scarletti;-;It used to be a superb game. Now it's just too old to stand, simple as that. When I was young I had tons of fun with it though. 8/10
Bu||Z || A.B ||;-;love this game... ll A.B ll
L1Nk;-;Very cool game)
Cliffe Mr.Number 506494899;-;Good game.Just not quite picture quality, very classic.
EdinsoN;-;the best game 4ever for me :)
T'Pica'El'Oyo!;-;the best game
Vaping Elite;-;what can i say ? most played fps ever with a reason
ACID;-;If you want to learn spanish,russian,swedish language play this game.
TuNiiSeN;-;1.6.... what a classic! Still owns some games!
goarack;-;i remeber when this was a free Mod for half-life
MetallicAwithCliff;-;Very good game still, this game is still fantastic, undead <3
Putin;-;I love this game!
l0litechk;-;the best online multiplay action game
ICE;-;Old classic but still fun to play till this day.
AttiTuDe Killer;-;its simply best :)
HUNTER;-;THIS IS THE BEST GAME EVER PLAYED
d0NNiYEllie;-;the best game in the world.
-Hudda;-;And there you have it...the best FPS game next to COD4
wOkeN';-;Very nice game :))
Erminst123;-;cool this game :D and in VIP AND ADMIN!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Dark Snowz;-;Play this :p
Taurex^;-;the best game
Darxpe3D;-;cs 1.6 one of the best and addictive fps games ever made
Silver1G #Aha, VacBan -_-;-;The Best Game
- mattzee;-;My First Shooting Game <3
HITBE@$T POP AND BOT;-;made some nice friends through this game :)
Gunter;-;Although i have minimal play time on this game, its because i play CSGO a lot more but this game was a blast to play as even though it has low resolution, it brings fun in a nut-shell however if you love CSGO this one is a bit more complex. The slight lag you may get doesn't matter as its minimal. 9.5/10
RedBandana;-;if you like team based strategy and some good ol' fps , this b the game for u mon
Faker`;-;<3 back to this game today <3
Ed Wuncler 3;-;BEST MULTIPLAYER GAME...(csgo is the 2nd best multiplayer game)
Snoopz;-;This game has a odd aiming system compared to CSGO and CSS so this is a true classic and it is still fun today but it does show its age a little. 8.9/10
Banger;-;classic!
-DaRkStAr-;-;It fuckin sucks, It suckin fucks, It fuckin blows, It's a piece of shit, and I don't like it.
venom;-;the most amazing game ever made :D
CNT (^^,);-;Great game !
Sully;-;Hands down best competitive shooter
Black Storm;-;the most legendary game of all time it was released in 1999, but players do play in 2015 so the game itself tells alot about it. moreover it's version r updated about every 4 to 5 years latest is now i think is COUNTER STRIKE GLOBAL OFFENSE . some of the most famous players were markeloff,potty,get_right,guardian nd some famous teams were - NAVI, SK GAMING, etc. in india there r teams like NSD who won asian champoinship from 2006 to 2012 till cs go released . it was now suffering from DDOS attack in india nd because of that players r shifting to csgo. THANKYOU
Nayr;-;i love this game!
Berzerk;-;Counter strike is a strike with bullets which strike the striking strikers with striking bomb and ammo.
BULLY #HR9;-;playing since 2009 <3
KoreNN;-;Old ain't bad!
Boofthechook;-;I love this game 100000 / 1
poutis;-;oldsrc but goldsrc
dec0;-;Great game for adreniline rush, especially when you're the last alive and needing to complete your objective versus 3 people!
XxX_360_Panda_noScope_69xXx;-;One of my first games, I LOVE IT (but still I prefer cs:go, because its refreshed version)
F2P Helper|Daxter;-;A Classic Combat and Strategic VideoGame, Everyone remembers playing Counter-Strike after School.
WOLF  DEVA.INDUNGI.RO;-;THIS GAME WILL REMAIN THE BEST FOREVER! Trust me :D
Pl@T!NUM;-;I have made screen resolution to widescreen so i m not able to reduce it pls help!!!!!!
skipper2K;-;classic and still fun to play
Baklavinho;-;Still, there is no any game like this one. Full of fun :)
seriousLy?;-;BIG UP, stole 10 years of my life
R374RD3DZ38R4;-;This game is very good to play on low-power PC since it is old and it even can make you better at CS:GO since the basic gameplay mechanics are extremely similar. I use this game as something to do with my ADHD hands while listening to music which i find to be great (just turn the game sound down and join a Deathmatch Server)
Robo Queer;-;Anyone else feel the need to Look through the Ironsight, or Downsights ? When playing a CS Game ?
EEEy #PANDAA | CSGORumble.com;-;Humm.. #REKT?!
DaNa;-;Great shoot game!
Karna;-;5 years back was really addictive game. 10/10
jointblazer88;-;COS U CAN SHOOT N STUFF
P, Floyd.;-;Wow. This is a game I grew up with and it's one of the most popular online first-person-shooters out there, or atleast; it used to be. The game was everywhere, and it had its reasons to. This was the game that was seen on the computer screens of the LAN parties, tournaments and other major computer related events. It's action-packed, skill-based and it had a huge following. Even today you may find lots of server filled with players. The gameplay surrounds around you and your team. If you play the "DE maps" you're a terrorist, you must plant the bomb and make sure that the CT's won't defuse it and if you're in the CT team, you must defuse the bomb before it goes off. If you play the "CS maps" you must rescue the hostages as a CT and if you're on the terrorist team you must keep the hostages held-up and eliminate any CT that tries to stop you. Any round can also be won by eliminating the opponents. This game spawned a franchise and will always be remembered as one of the starting grounds of multiplayer, teambased first-person-shooters. The game is from 2000 and is outdated by its succesor; Global Offensive. But if you're into old games, you should check this out but I highly doubt you haven't heard of this game before.
SydnoX;-;Counter Strike 1.6 was a legend.
MEPHISTO;-;BES GAYM EVAR mlgquickscopsmokeweederryday420doritosmountaindew2014m8
#Nighthawk#;-;the best game that has ever been
DoubleNine|5| -UNITY-;-;it is my
ae;-;This game is awesome, thanks valve for making it. I know its very old tho =D
Carry me senpi;-;Pathron
returpack;-;Great and cheap multiplayer awesomeness!
MagikMuzik-;-;Great!
Farman Daniel;-;If you dont take into account that this game is 14 years old... IT IS AWESOME!
KocurekCZ;-;Nice game ..!
iNtenzo;-;Perfect game :)
tuan.ncong;-;from my memory with love
A.Einstein;-;Best game ever !! I would recomand this game to everyone.
SMOKE WEEDS ALL DAY;-;Write a review for Counter-Strike Please describe what you liked or disliked about this game and whether you recommend it to others. Please remember to be polite and follow the Rules and Guidelines.
ompe;-;U Had to start somewhere <3
Even;-;Counter-Strike is everything forever =) Play with your friends,win,and have fun!
dikiy_dikiy_west;-;CS FOREVER
den;-;the best game until csgo release
Tzicass;-;a verry good game and verry old !!!!!!!!
Arek;-;I've spent so many hours playing this game, meeting new people. I you've never played this game... what's wrong with you?
Infinite Powerade;-;What better than a classic, there's nothing really left to say about this game. It's wonderful, totally worth of it's entire price, that isn't that much either.
d.STARRR;-;The game is a godlike shooter!!! <3 The graphic is bad but in this game the graphic is not important^^... The fun that you have in the game is OVER 100% =) MUST HAVE *^*
Zander;-;Counter Strike is a game that teaches you how to use your eyes to there full potential. You must be a fast thinker and good at stratigic thought.
Noob;-;my very first fps, been playing for 8 yrs now and i still love this game! imo this is one of the best games ever. Various mods make this game really addictive, so you just can't get bored.
duB0-;-;Just a fun old school game
WhoDaHeckCaresSon???;-;cool!:D
ARMANI CODE;-;the best Game EVER !
Grr_I'm_Here;-;Better than COD. >:3
Smack;-;It's an awesome game. Have been playing it for years and still not fed up with it. Counter-Strike 1.6 will never die! :)
Ltw # Dem0n Hunter;-;EAC is trash... CAUTION
Laggy;-;That moment of pure passion when your enemy's lifeless body slumps to the ground, and to the top-right of the screen you see your name and feel your score increase. You might have played this game for 50 hours, or you might have played it for 5,000; but it doesn't matter how experienced you are, because it's all about that moment.
Von Hansel;-;Counter Strike 1.6.... the game that set the standards of shooters and paved the way for new video games. On my old Steam Account, I racked at least 1000 hours on Counter Strike and Counter Strike Condition Zero, and all for a good reason, because it is probably one of the best team shooters in the world. 10/10
Jger;-;Almost 7 years of playing this game and still goin' on! I hope it will not die because of global offensive. It will be a good idea to introduce steam achievements/trading cards for it, because it's a very played game
Wreckord`;-;Playing for 12 years and counting. 10/10 best FPS ever made.
||MaTriX||N!KL@U$;-;Counter Strike is a game that teaches you how to use your eyes to there full potential. You must be a fast thinker and good at stratigic thought.
-=HunTeD=-;-;nice game. runs without any problem on my laptop.
GasMask;-;I'm proudly to say that i played this classic since Beta 4 and followed it's history to unknow mod to a blockbuster online game and to it's downfall (CS:GO). It was one of a kind game at the time that featured detailed real weapons and real everyday maps. CS, i salute you!
Anthrax;-;So, the original CS, where it all begun. Great game which made a great series!
MC Eiht;-;Can't call yourself a Counter-Strike player without trying this one out at least once. People are still playing it after about 15 years. Just imagine how much support this game got from the community and how popular it became within the hearts of many players.
LEOKRET;-;This is a classic and better first person shooting game the history.
Mr7Beans;-;It's OK.
_MAx_sTon3^=;-;where there is cs der are gamers i would blindly buy this game withoput any hesitation
iceSCREAM;-;1 of the best fps games
Niedzwiedz;-;The mother of all FPS's around. Definitely recommended.
[DDD] Deadplanet;-;Good FPS for those with low end computers
TR > P4nthy* [ Joe ] < gfte >;-;The best game ever made.
Dominic Young;-;The most amazing game i have ever played in my life. WORTH PLAYING!
marceloBiceps (paszaBiceps);-;Old buT GoLd :) I spent over 4.000 hrs in this game and im glad !!! I totally recommend!
-=[LOD]=-Odd8aLL;-;ONLY GAME THATS I PLAY!!! YOU CAN KEEP ALL THE FANCY GRAPHC GAMES _ NOTHING COMPARES TO THE ORIGINAL 1.6
JADARAN.MN;-;*** My config 2014 *** sv_cheats 1 cl_gg 1 rate 25000 senstivity 1 cl_yawspeed 500 gl_spriteblend 0 ex_interp 0 bind c "cl_righthand 0" bind f "cl_righthand 1" fps_max "100" gl_vsync "0" gl_ansio "0" cl_dlmax "512" hud_centerid "1" hud_fastswitch "1" net_graph "1" cl_cmdrate "100" cl_updaterate "100" sv_accelerate "6.5" violence_ablood "0" violence_agibs "0" violence_hblood "0" violence_hgibs "0" _cl_autowepswitch "0" sv_airaccelerate 15 sv_friction 4.1 echo "YeS's Config" *** My rainbow crosshair *** bind "mouse1" "+attack; adjust_crosshair;cl_crosshair_translucent 0; -attack"
prt$$$;-;simply the best.
toro777;-;Best FPS competitive shooter on steam. Better than CS Source and CS Global Offensive. A lot of cool mods to. Idk if they have leagues still but make a team with friends and have fun, or meet new people in public servers.
MR.JOSH;-;Will always be the best game ever created.
Discockel;-;Probably the best game in the world.
\/\/ /\ \/\/;-;that's classic
NARUTO X AHRI;-;My first love when I was 8 :D
AiSSA;-;Awesome :D i love this game :D
Public Enemy No. 1;-;Counter-Strike is one of those games that still has people playing on servers 15 years later and probably still will due to it's addictive and competitive gameplay. Strongly Recommend it. 10/10
JunkY Dzo  KS;-;Great game
aNN11h1lat1oN;-;CS FOREVER
xavimora6;-;One of the best shooters ever made. No levels, no accessories for your guns, no "cheat" guns... just you and your skill. Lots of hours spent in this game and so much fun I have had with it. 8.5/10 ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- Uno de los mejores shooters de la historia. No hay niveles, ni accesorios, ni armas "chetadas"... solo t y tu habilidad. Muchas horas jugadas en este juego y me he divertido mucho con l. 8.5/10
dahston;-;This game gave me swagger
Topovak;-;I really liked this game because it's very good, Many Many servers and players you can play with I have some experience,but more memories when i first started to play this game. So i recommend it!!!!! to all it's not some strong game that you will be in lag or your computer is weak and you cant on this game,so this game is very small and everyone can play it!
Rev;-;So this game was released when i was still a sperm and still it has a huge popularity wich is insane no other game can do this EVER. counter-strike ha totally changed all gamers lifes amazing.
Justiss;-;Classic CS doesn't get any better than that.
Astr0. * Intel;-;Best game EVER made in history of the world
r@pt0r;-;game is activated in particular region... now you are not in that region so you cant's play this game...! how to resolve this..!!
Guatemala Border Patrol;-;BEST game in the _WORLD_
Swazi Gold;-;Old school will remain cool!
traficant;-;Even if CS 1.6 is old, I will continue to play it until my hands won't help me anymore. Not 2015 graphics but its one of the best epic fps in the history of the gaming for both kind of players, pro's or for those who just play for fun.
Backstab;-;Man awesome game been playing for years now thats all i can say :)
DayZ;-;OLD SCHOOL CLASSIC
worzell;-;I found that once I lowered my resolution to 640 x 480 I became 70% better at the game. Makes heads bigger and easier to aim at so it's pretty similar to CS:S. gg ez noobs get rekt fgts easily 9/10 go buy it
KIKKAA - VAC;-;Since ~ 2003
japaniiz` immortality;;-;Counter Strike 1.6 we love you !
U.U;-;very cool game
ESPA 12;-;very cool game
diegobdota2;-;very cool game
GuaS00NN';-;very cool game
Lonely;-;very cool game xD
ESPA 04;-;very cool game :D
GS.cz # Garlin;-;3742 hours of gameplay. What else i can say about this game :D
deadlift;-;a legendary game
axioM`;-;'s mad whack awesome
Fieldy [];-;Classic. Nuff said.
beer enabler;-;Everybody get up, it's time to slam now We got a real jam goin' down Welcome to the Space Jam Here's your chance, do your dance at the Space Jam, alright
I am Groot !;-;Mother of all FPSs!
Samurai in UKR;-;knowledge is power
crossen9;-;Let me just get my Windows 98 up and my dial up ready so we can play with the new 3DFX card better than software rendering
vanderley5974;-;this is a great classic from the 90s
EsconZ*;-;Best Game Ever. Buy It ;D
Ninja-;-;Even though its a pretty old game, its still fun as hell!
NesTig;-;8/8 i spent some time there
aaq.w;-;Awesome GAME ! <3 (y) I LUV THIS GAME <3 THE BEST GAME EVERRRRRRRRRRRRRRRR !
R1ddick;-;Best online shooter in the world of all times
GG;-;A very nice game! I play this game every day!!
Sherlock;-;I love this game!
Tr1LuL!Lu mixarea.ts3.ro;-;The best one !
StyLe;-;clasis and good game :D
][ONLY][ Fonty;-;Pro: - very fun and competitive game - works well on every platform (linux included) Cons: - None Now buy it !!!
-BengO^;-;simply i kike this game too much ! i m not a good gamer but soon i would be a good gamer of cs 1.6 :)))
Drink Team;-;the best game ever made!
Preach;-;how could one not like this
CASSADY;-;on my imac CS 1.6 the mouse glitches, lags whatever... lost 7 quids ... :( CS:GO way better despite of its usage, my imac can play the game perfect with lags!!!
.fibro IS BACK;-;Recommend!
woop;-;cs is love cs is life <3
Orion;-;Still the GOAT!
Princess;-;Love this game. You can play it for 5 mins or 5 hours, try hard or barely try. It will always be my go-to game.
andRew;-;Where it all began.
espirit;-;remembers me good times :)
Caliojack;-;''it was okay''- ign 10/10
Twist3r;-;cool
dnRx;-;No I don't recommend this game, I just bored when I wrote this recommandation.
Tomas;-;Get a gun and do headshots. Sounds easy dosint it?
Babushka;-;The game is great, if you can find a server that isnt Dust_2 where everyone rushes long A.
Carnivorous Goat;-;Easy for the hackers to exploite
vez;-;IF YOU LOVE WALKING ON INVISIBLE BLOCKS, THIS GAME IS FOR YOU.
Fer0;-;The time spent on this game <33
Doe Duweit;-;Its classic
nice morph;-;if there was a game that would let you shoot  out of you disfunkcional p3nis anyway 3/3 would suck
~BdBoy~;-;I love this game is the best Game in the world
NeOn;-;! recommend th!$ game it's re@ly c{}{}l
motar69k} B > items;-;My favorite old game <3
sTL| finesse .;-;Instead of writing a long, drawn out, TL;DR review, I'll just give a summary of what that review would be: Best game ever.
Repride;-;A classical FPS shooter. If you're just as much as a fan of the CS series like I am, you'll like the original as well. Would recommend any day :p
Fifflaren, Come back in NIP pls;-;Let me just say one thing: Who likes to play Counter-Strike 1.6 just play! As the saying goes, Spomenite childhood !! The game is excellent, but other versions of Counter-Strike is also awesome:) The very rare I go because I play Counter-Strike: Source, and other games .I advise everyone to play. If you have not played in Counter-Strike 1.6 - That you have not had a childhood = ((
Closeed;-;I Recommend it :D
HellKera;-;Best emotions have been feeled in this game!
Natsumi-chan;-;I do believe this was the first FPS game I ever played and I remembered I really enjoyed it. This was the game who started e-sport growing, with players as Heaton, get_right, etc, and you can really tell how it has embarked the industry and media. CS is the top e-sport game in the world. There is reasons for that! Great gameplay, voice, maps, gamemodes, servers and many fun things to explore in this old FPS game. If you want to play serious or just want to have a fun, this game has it. I'd recommend to buy it if you want to be apart and feel like you own something that has revolutionize the gaming industry and the e-sport genre. Or you could just buy CS:GO, that'll work aswell.. ;)
justiN | Dinohops;-;ya its cool
macuser007 #Cloud9;-;Still the best competitive FPS
Cowboy;-;Many people in this game have been playing since 1999+, and certainly have the skill to prove it. This game changed the gaming industry greatly, and is of very high quality, though ages like anything but a fine wine. Only get it if you have someone you know that can teach you how to play it. Otherwise stick with CS:GO.
YoGGi;-;10/10 best cs game ever!
remzy;-;CS FOREVER :)
Virtual Biscuit;-;I don't think that a reveiw could ever possibly do this game justice. Regardless of wether you've played any game in the Counter Strike series before, everyone will find something they love in this well populated multiplayer FPS. Be warned: People are good at this game!
agerace;-;Mouse doesn't work for mac version :(
twitch.tv/monzacsgo;-;This game doesn't need a review.
RolleR ReiNsTeR;-;THE game.
Biscuit;-;A good fps but i would get Source or GO first
SmUrF3R|n0;-;Classic! nuff said!
Ge4ce;-;This game is the best game!
Hope;-;A great competitive game, with mostly a great community! I love this game and I really managed to make some new friends :).
CV;-;Best old school game
[SDT] JhoN;-;This game are best VERY BEST's !!!! 2001. Oh yeah, 1992 1.5 <3 Like GAME <3 !!!
Yes!;-;yep it's the original countre strike, be a terrorist or a counter terrorist and shoot points to score, beautiful smooth gameplay, much better than that crappy source engine updates, come up with a good spraypaint logo to reach the bonnus round, i like the surf levels as well, valve when will you finally listen to the community and make surfing an actual game mode? it is a very respectful game for it's age and i give it a good score in the end.
rikera;-;nice game , ilkie it so much
cunhas;-;Very addictable game , its an old game , but still gold
Bulletproof0504;-;Got this game for my sister. First question-How do I run? XD 10/10 Would do again.
Sh!nch@n;-;My first game ever purchased, it will be in my life forever :)))))
Aqq;-;I'M LOVE <3 COUNTER-STREKE 1.6
maker;-;play to have fun  !!
Demonic Tutor;-;Most realistic first-person shooter ever! A must have for every gamer, that knows what a good game is!
.v;-;Its not just a game :P <3 ;)
=LAS= Rambozo The Clown;-;15 years and it still has a somewhat strong multiplayer community. That's just enough reason to buy it. 10/10
Wet?;-;does anybody still play cs?
Red;-;probably would be better if the playerbase was actually ing english
JET1X #SprayQuaza;-;Boom Headshot -5
Waka Flocka Flame;-;Play the original that started it all. complete with no skin no crates no keys and a whole lot of nostalgia!
exus;-;The greatest online multiplayer game of all time.
SHoX;-;this game is dosent good when i play on server dosent work and say : "time out "
Wibble;-;Its as outdated as the Nintendo Entertainment System but it will always have a special place in my spleen.
Sylvester Stallone;-;screen problems.. it is sucking up.. can't put back the screen in original way after it gotten wider.. no opption at all.
.YerpS1g;-;The king of all FPS games.
indigo7333 - hate cheaters;-;Best game of all times. Hope it will have Match making system like CS:GO with a bit better graphics.
HodgeDogs;-;Ive been played this game all versions since i was a kid. This game will always be in my heart forever. Ive played MORE than 330 + hours before even steam came out. Played always this after school when i was a kid and i always wanted to go home earlier to play this. It feel like now when the new generation has come ive grown away from cs 1.6. Ive tested global and the newer cs and i dont like them. Its not like before. I RECOMMEND THIS GAME HARDLY + Loads of fun in all ages +Hours of replay +All kind of maps + Still graphic looks cool + Nice gore +You feel overpowered when you have warmed up
Zloca;-;this game is awesome
durante6;-;good game even though it is an older game still has many players 10/10 would get quickscoped again
CapioBizeps;-;best FPS game of all time
Reaper;-;Great game.
Raz1911;-;Let me start off by saying that the Counter-Strike pack is a stand-alone product. You don't need the original Half-Life to play this game. In the retail package you get a full version of CS as well as Team Fortress Classic, Opposing Force multiplayer, and the Wanted, Redemption and Firearms mods. The entire pack is overflowing with multiplayer fun, but, of course, the real focus of the retail release is Counter-Strike. There is a single-player component to CS and, while it provides a good primer, this mod is all about online action. You basically play a game of cat and mouse, with the mouse being a terrorist group and the cat a squad of counter-terrorists. As a terrorist, you're goal is to plant a bomb at a specific location or hold a group of hostages. As a counter-terrorist, it's your duty to defuse said bomb or rescue the ill-fated hostages. Taking out all players on the opposing side will also assure your victory. CS is an action lover's dream, with games lasting only four or five minutes (if that in some cases) because, unlike Half-Life, one shot to the head can mean instant death. CS is the perfect mix between fast-action and realistic damage. You can't just absorb bullet after bullet and expect to walk away. Working as a team is a must and, while you're in the game, taking the lone wolf approach will often get you killed...and fast. It's the team-based tactics that make CS so fun. I can't stress how important it is in this game to act as a team. If your team is on the defensive side you'll all benefit by creating a cohesive strategy. If you team is on the offensive side, you will all benefit by sticking closely together as well. I'm sure you've seen movies or television show demonstrating this "Conga Line" style of infiltration. Well, that's exactly how your team will have to act. This creates a fantastic game balance that will keep you coming back for more. It'll also keep you from thinking about your school work, your job, and interaction with your loved ones, and often work around the IGN offices will be put on hold so we can clog our network with CS. Visually the game will not disappoint. While the Half-Life engine isn't the prettiest beast out there, there is plenty of animation that creates a smooth look and feel, and the gun models are some of the most realistic looking of any shooter available. The environmental textures look realistic enough and complement the provided camouflage well enough for you to be hidden, but not be invisible. As in real life, the distinguishable difference between good guy and bad guy is a little difficult, but the balance to this is if you can't tell who it is then you probably won't be able to hit him with your gun. Now, if you've purchased sniper rifle, you should have plenty of scope magnification to tell the difference between terrorist or counter-terrorist, but otherwise you may be taking out a team member from afar. As good as it is, a couple of features of this game really stood out as frustrating... at first. But over a period of time they actually became enhancements to online multiplayer gaming. One feature is buying your weapons at the start of each round. This takes a little getting used to at first since, in most shooters, you just run around picking up weapons at your heart's content. Usually by the time you figured out which guns, grenades, and armor you were going to take in your early games, the bad guys would come over and kill you. But a couple of tries later, after getting the gist of things, you're off in no time. The other feature that took some getting used to was the "wait and watch" feature after you get killed. Once you sustain a lethal injury, you have to wait for the next round to start before you can join in again -- you don't just spawn again and start shooting. This actually adds a ton of anxiety to your efforts of staying alive and completing your objective. But like I mentioned before, the rounds are short, so you shouldn't have to wait too long before you can jump in the action again. Not surprisingly, the user interface is very Half-Life-esque. Gamers who have played Half-Life or any of the other mods for the game will have no trouble with the menu system. Even for the first time user the interface is easy to use or fumble through. The only thing that even slightly tripped us up in the interface is the "Update" on the server page. First-time users may be confused into thinking this meant update my version of CS. Not true, it actually means update the list of game servers. But the rest of the interface is easy to understand and even easier to navigate. Just about the only aspect of this game that we could make negative comments about is the sound. Sure, the realistic guns sounds are spot on, we just wish the same amount of attention to detail was given to the rest of the sound in the game. Some levels have lighting and thunder. When the thunder crashes it sounds a little wimpy. We were hoping for some deeper bass and clearer sounding claps from the lightning. In most of the level the user can go inside or out side of buildings, the sound of their footsteps should also change to reflect what type of surface they are walking on. The sound of footsteps getting closer and closer could also have been improved. As it stands now, it's hard to tell how far down the hallway or street a bad guy is from you by sound alone. So how long does the magic last? Well we've been playing this game for over a year now and we still can't get enough of it. Are we tired of it? Hell no! We're still surprised by how fun this game is. This game actually made some of us squeal like little school-girls after getting sniped from an unexpected angle on high. On the other hand some of us were drawn to stand up and scream obscenities at the monitor. I guess we'll just have to get them next time! In a nutshell, if you're looking for the next step in online first person shooters, then look no further. CS is fast paced, intense, and satisfying--this game will not disappoint. This is truly one of the best mods for one of the all time greatest first person shooters ever, and the retail package of CS is simply bursting with multiplayer goodness. If you like to play shooters online, get this pack!
F3nix!;-;the best game forever.
Tole<3;-;ing high game
_________My Effect~Ra!ToN;-;That's the best gamer ever and over 10 years the 1!
Pro;-;Piece of Art
ayy lmao;-;the good old days
ArcadioN. #;-;This is Realy Amazing CS
JacKs0NN;-;This Game Is Best
EatingPizza;-;Still the best FPS since Doom2
Plesniv. Roky.;-;It isn t working!! i bought it at twice on 2 profiles and it always tell me error; Couldn t find UserMsgBase pointer. ... who knows how to repair it?
Endangered Soy-Cow;-;CS:S is better, this is MUCH more complicated (i.e. you have to buy ammo after you buy the gun)
asd;-;I will miss...
Sweet Crap;-;THIS IS THE BEST GAME EVER LIKE EVER COME ON THIS DARN PLANET!
Freddy K. <3 E;-;1.6 will laways have a place in my heart <3
twitch.tv/odiboT;-;Still one of the better FPS-games!
Mumbling Cobra;-;Though the tournaments may be over for this game, its still crazy fun to play... its really hard to explain it but youll know that this here is own of the greatests FPS games of all time.
CrYsis;-;Graphics Does'nt Matter
f0r3st;-;addictive
@Fabilys;-;If u want to learn to play this game all over again after one week break. Go ahead
BLEU CORDON XIV;-;This will be more of a ''my experience with this game'' type of review, because saying things like ''great gameplay'' will not suit something I've experienced with Counter-Strike. Here you go: I remember back in 2002 I was at a friend's house and he was playing a game. I didn't know the name of the game nor I had internet to find it. A few weeks passed by and another friend came over and he didn't have a computer, so he brought a disc with a game in it. He told me that it was one of the best games and from that very moment I knew that it is going to be the game I saw at the other friend's house. When I saw the Counter-Strike logo I was filled with gamegasm (?) and I was so happy. I don't remember a day when I was so happy like back then. So, the journey started. I was playing it hardcore. Made friends, clans, was involved in communities and even made two myself. Counter-Strike is my first game which I played competitively and it was a whole experience. Playing public servers and maybe some servers with mods was very fun, but playing it competitively made it very intense and stressful. In a pleasant way, ofcourse. Shooters these days try to be different, advanced in a way. Sometimes the most simple games like Counter-Strike are the ones that live to this day. Also, there are plenty of mods to keep your attention to this game. The gameplay is very simple - defend as a Counter-Terrorist, attack as a Terrorist to plant the bomb or save the hostages as a CT. I am sure most of you already know this and I doubt there are gamers that haven't heard or know the gameplay of Counter-Strike, so I am sharing here more of my experience. I wish I could find my CS Anthology account which I've lost since 2008. So, I decided I am going to buy this game again and here you go - more than a thousand hours played. I still play it from time to time to this day and it brings back many great memories and I sometimes even stumble upon people I've played with years ago. I think Counter-Strike changed gaming in a major way and we wouldn't have many games like we have today, if this game wouldn't exist. I am sure many of people already have played games like CS:GO, but never the roots. I doubt any of you will play it for more than an hour, because it's much more simple and it differs a lot in my opinion from CS:GO and modern games. I am glad that I lived through the golden era of shooters and if I'd have to rate it, it'd 10/10 ofcourse,
N1ntendo;-;The best multiplayer game
Pure Fuckboy Extract;-;THE PHANTOM, EXTERIOR LIKE FISH EGGS INTERIOR LIKE SUICIDE WRIST RED I CAN EXCERIZE YOU THIS COULD BE YOU PHYS ED CHEAT ON YOUR MAN HOMIE AAAAH TRIED TO SNEAK THROUGH THE DOOR MAN CAN'T MAKE IT CAN'T MAKE IT,  STUCK DOOR STUCK, MAN DOOR STUCK! DOOR STUCK!
In It For The Nudes^jbl;-;The best online first person shooter ever made. EDIT: It's sad when a game released in 1999 is better than a game that came out in 2012.
Aytebit;-;I played it for a while, died a lot and didn't kill anyone, but I had a damn good time doing it.
lukzMay;-;Love this cs,I Remeber for ever
Tim Kostya;-;Counter-Strike! Awhh what can I say about this master piece? well, It's one of the best first-person shooters that have ever been made, still today you can find tons of peeople playing online! Don't be fooled by how many ours I've got playing this game on steam, I've played since early 2004, this game is practicaly my childhood. LOL You cannot compare this game to CS:GO, with modern graphics and , yet both of them are incredible on its way. I love the fact that you don't have scope blur when you walk, the fact that M4A1 and USP have enough bullets. Love it! I rate it 15/10
b1zz;-;old but good
Raptor Jesus;-;Better, more addictive, and easier than CS:GO Alot of people still play it, and its counterstrike. So buy it.
J.;-;aint no school like the old school
mahti;-;A real classic!
FOX;-;The best game
Liquid;-;This game is da shiznic! epic graphic and awesome gameplay,
George Costanza;-;blah blah good game blah, this isnt where i parked my car?
Sk[i]LLer;-;This is the best game I have seen ;)
MR.EXPOSURE.FTW;-;I liked this game
iMaster;-;I love this game
NONE GG;-;Almost all the games that I have in the library - excellent. In a review on Counter-Strike GO I have already stated my opinion.
Yggy_;-;Do i really have to review this game?
zerogravity BJJ* parei;-;I've played this game since I was around 6 years old back in 2002 and it still makes me laugh and have fun whenever I launch it to this very day. Over 12 years of endless entertainment. No other game on this planet has given me more entertainment and enjoyment than Counter-Strike 1.6 has and I doubt no game ever will. Reason i've only got 38 hours here is because I no longer use the account I originally played cs 1.6 on. func_vehicle is what makes this Counter Strike game the best out of all the others in the franchise. Find a server that has car maps or maps with func_vehicle entities and you will have endless fun running over teammates and enemies in all kinds of hilarious and goofy vehicles not giving a care in the world. You can drive a fork with a meatball on the end of it. Do i need to say more? Mods on this game are amazing too. There is a mod where you can catch pokemon, level them up, train them and use their skills. Call of Duty mod that is suprisingly better than cod its self, Warcraft mods, zombie mods, basebuilder and so on... There is even a map for the jailbreak gamemode that has driveable snowmobiles. 1337/10
Hellraiser;-;Ahh CS...For many of us born in the 90s, this game took our FPS virginity...Writing a negative review about this game is like writing a negative review about sex...I'm sorry if you had such a tragic experience...
smokeMiGS;-;Thumbs up mate.
Mega;-;Got called Hacker by little kids because shooting randomly the wall 10/10 -IGN Wall shooting simulator 2984
RaZvAN;-;The Best Game
dRumbeR;-;Play def.
Soldaten;-;Very good thx
crack;-;i love this game
iZnoGouD;-;In my opinion the best of the three parts(i am excluding condition zero because it was not really well known at all.).
f0r3st;-;addictive
@Fabilys;-;If u want to learn to play this game all over again after one week break. Go ahead
N1ntendo;-;The best multiplayer game
Pure Fuckboy Extract;-;THE PHANTOM, EXTERIOR LIKE FISH EGGS INTERIOR LIKE SUICIDE WRIST RED I CAN EXCERIZE YOU THIS COULD BE YOU PHYS ED CHEAT ON YOUR MAN HOMIE AAAAH TRIED TO SNEAK THROUGH THE DOOR MAN CAN'T MAKE IT CAN'T MAKE IT,  STUCK DOOR STUCK, MAN DOOR STUCK! DOOR STUCK!
Strikey;-;Ruined my life.
Ernest Wolf;-;This will be more of a ''my experience with this game'' type of review, because saying things like ''great gameplay'' will not suit something I've experienced with Counter-Strike. Here you go: I remember back in 2002 I was at a friend's house and he was playing a game. I didn't know the name of the game nor I had internet to find it. A few weeks passed by and another friend came over and he didn't have a computer, so he brought a disc with a game in it. He told me that it was one of the best games and from that very moment I knew that it is going to be the game I saw at the other friend's house. When I saw the Counter-Strike logo I was filled with gamegasm (?) and I was so happy. I don't remember a day when I was so happy like back then. So, the journey started. I was playing it hardcore. Made friends, clans, was involved in communities and even made two myself. Counter-Strike is my first game which I played competitively and it was a whole experience. Playing public servers and maybe some servers with mods was very fun, but playing it competitively made it very intense and stressful. In a pleasant way, ofcourse. Shooters these days try to be different, advanced in a way. Sometimes the most simple games like Counter-Strike are the ones that live to this day. Also, there are plenty of mods to keep your attention to this game. The gameplay is very simple - defend as a Counter-Terrorist, attack as a Terrorist to plant the bomb or save the hostages as a CT. I am sure most of you already know this and I doubt there are gamers that haven't heard or know the gameplay of Counter-Strike, so I am sharing here more of my experience. I wish I could find my CS Anthology account which I've lost since 2008. So, I decided I am going to buy this game again and here you go - more than a thousand hours played. I still play it from time to time to this day and it brings back many great memories and I sometimes even stumble upon people I've played with years ago. I think Counter-Strike changed gaming in a major way and we wouldn't have many games like we have today, if this game wouldn't exist. I am sure many of people already have played games like CS:GO, but never the roots. I doubt any of you will play it for more than an hour, because it's much more simple and it differs a lot in my opinion from CS:GO and modern games.
Brig;-;Every server is spanish or french. I can now fluently swear in both languages 9/10
Mr.Mimi | Trade Knife;-;I met a lot of people who slept with my mother. 10/10
Hedroks;-;Still better than Call of Duty: Ghosts...
Rezej;-;I never played a better first person shooter. Graphics doesn't matter for gamer, gameplay only.
Eno Etukeno;-;When you crouch, you lift your feet in the air and fall to the ground. 10/10
safeoff';-;WARNING : DO NOT buy this game, if you do, you'll never see the sunlight again !
pretty decent at counter strike;-;CS is one of the greatest and undermined games in history. It is, in my opinion, the best game to ever have a crosshair. It is not a contact sport, so for the girly girls, it is an activity to indulge in. It starts off with a team trying to kill another team. I started playing cs when I noticed jacking off isn't the only activity to do on a computer. I started inviting a lot of friends out and getting drinks, as well as a boom box, to spend a nice summer day in the living room playing this wonderful game. I wanted to play every chance that i could. On my road of cs adventures, I encountered a couple of problems; those being that nobody was as fervent as I was about playing, and that when we did play, nobody was good enough, so it wasn't a lot of fun. Then I discovered that I could sign up for a class with dboorn. I was overly excited, and signed up, but with skepticism at how the class was going to be. Sure enough, I was proven wrong. We started off by practicing a little bit. Then we split off into teams and started playing almost everyday of class. I made some friends, and played with people who had built up their skill gradually over the period of the course. When I play counterstrike, the whole world disappears. Only I, the mouse, and my teammates remain. We are united in a common goal. We strive collectively towards an end we all desire. Each player has a spot to hold. They stand ready and waiting, eager for their chance to aid the team in what they hope will be a forthcoming victory. Thus, CS celebrates the unity of man, the indomitable spirit in all of us that pushes us and drives us towards excellence. When I play CS, I play until my veins pump battery acid, and then I play some more. CS is unique among the games because it teaches all of us that no matter where we are in life, there is a role for us to play, and we can help our fellow man by fulfilling that role, and thereby our destiny. What destiny might you ask? I spoke before of unity. And it is that unity that brings us all together like one big loving family. That is the nature of counter-strike; the many working as one. One machine made of well oiled cogs and wheels, moving in unison, happy to play their part in the production of something greater than themselves. Not that these small metal objects are actually animate, I'm of course speaking only metaphorically. Over the course of the years, I have increased in skill, but I have learned a greater lesson than how to be a better cs player. I have learned how to cooperate with a team to accomplish a goal that we all share. Even if that team is less than ideal. I have realized that cs is about more than just one's athletic ability. Instead, there is a deeper meaning behind the colt, the AK, the AWP, the deagle, the sands under my feet (in d2 or inferno). And more importantly, the teammates at my side. I love them. It is the human element of cs that gives cs its greatness. In conclusion, I love cs. I love to win. I love pushing myself to my physical limits. It's that feeling that first drove me to the computer. For every second that I am not playing cs, there is only an unquenchable thirst to play. A thirst that grows as every minute passes by when I am outside, sitting at the television, or playing sports. I had an extraordinary time playing this game, and I will return to look at the future students of this game to see that bright eager look on their faces to remind me of how I used to feel. This review may be over, this game may be dead, but I will never stop playing couner-strike (1.6).
DESTRUKT;-;It's... aight.
yeti;-;Classic. Simple.
aIX#adderal;-;Very nice ... oldschool game
Azuz;-;One of the most over-rated game ever. Other mods died while CS didnt die when it should have. The lack of changes and improvements to the base game trough years is utterly disgusting and not a proper excuse. Character slows down when its shot? Server side location tracking instead of client based for better accurate data? Years behind other mods, that died.
H3A;-;This is a great game. Very different from go
Cowboy;-;Many people in this game have been playing since 1999+, and certainly have the skill to prove it. This game changed the gaming industry greatly, and is of very high quality, though ages like anything but a fine wine. Only get it if you have someone you know that can teach you how to play it. Otherwise stick with CS:GO.
remzy;-;CS FOREVER :)
-M;-;BEST GAME I HAVE EVER PLAYED IN MY LIFE I MOSTLY PLAY WITH MY FRIENDS ONLINE LOVE IT I WOUD RATE 5 STAR OUT OF 5
ZeroArc;-;8/8 Would do random headshots with the Galil again
CrafterSvK;-;Some classics... :)
Collin;-;havnt played it a lot but source is good
SuperCoolSilver;-;A nice classic, fun to revisit from time to time
GanjA;-;4ALBET 3LIYAAA
Ge4ce;-;This game is the best game!
Hope;-;A great competitive game, with mostly a great community! I love this game and I really managed to make some new friends :).
CV;-;Best old school game
[SDT] JhoN;-;This game are best VERY BEST's !!!! 2001. Oh yeah, 1992 1.5 <3 Like GAME <3 !!!
Yes!;-;yep it's the original countre strike, be a terrorist or a counter terrorist and shoot points to score, beautiful smooth gameplay, much better than that crappy source engine updates, come up with a good spraypaint logo to reach the bonnus round, i like the surf levels as well, valve when will you finally listen to the community and make surfing an actual game mode? it is a very respectful game for it's age and i give it a good score in the end.
Asc3nd;-;This game has no skins it only 100/10 would bang :(
BalkanWarfighter;-;Simply legend
Sir Steel Mittens;-;I really need to learn spanish
ITDOESNTMATTERWHATMYNAMEIS;-;Would be still fun if it werent for hackers. fun servers are goone
vanderley5974;-;this is a great classic from the 90s
EsconZ*;-;Best Game Ever. Buy It ;D
Ninja-;-;Even though its a pretty old game, its still fun as hell!
axioM`;-;'s mad whack awesome
Fieldy [];-;Classic. Nuff said.
w00t-_^;-;People only still play this because they have bad computers are just jealous and claim 1.6 is better than source. But on the topic, this game is what started it all. If it was never created, there wouldn't be Counter-Strike:Source.
Roller [];-;Best classic shooter to date.
DMG;-;This is the best game of all the CS games. The only downside is that it is an outdated game, and it's not really worth getting into it now. If you're barely getting into Counter-Strike, then just go for Global Offensive, it's the better choice for the new players.
CHRISTIAN;-;LoVe tHiS gAmE...................................
Kozmy;-;played this game for too long. it has a special place in my heart
LK walkiNG- * GIGABYTE;-;the best game ever
sparkz-;-;90s'
OGi .noxPUMP;-;The best game in the world. That's all. B-)
Russians makes ME RACIST!;-;The world will NEVER forget this game! I am really proud of it!
Puro;-;Best FPS world.<3
/ FEARLESS /;-;old school game ....it was a pleasure to play it thanks valve
I'm Stylin;-;As of 2015 I get a resolution problem loading any Goldsource games I cant see any of the menu buttons. I have tried every fix I could find nothing works.
JesterHat;-;Goes for like a $, Just buy it.
NoXXeM;-;Cool game ^^
ComplexeET;-;Toy for da black guys.
Master Chief;-;I know what you're thinking. 'Did he fire all 7 shots or only 6?' Well, to tell you the truth, in all this excitement, I've kinda lost track myself. But being this a .50 Desert Eagle, the most powerful handgun in the game, and it is a one-shot kill with a headshot, you've got to ask yourself one question. 'Do I feel lucky?' Well, do you, punk?
djpetercastro19;-;its a good game for haters
mr_ahmed1997;-;its really nice game i know its old but its really still batter than call of duty
Sean3;-;Counter-Strike set the foundation for online competitive team-play FPS. And it's still a viable game over 10 years later.
SHiKA;-;One of the best Counter-Strike games in my opinion. Dying out, but still worth playing.
woop;-;cs is love cs is life <3
Orion;-;Still the GOAT!
Princess;-;Love this game. You can play it for 5 mins or 5 hours, try hard or barely try. It will always be my go-to game.
tak.yon (chris);-;One of the, if not THE biggest essential to the online FPS genre. Seriously, any of the CS games are BRILLIANT, but 1.6 will always be my favorite. Buy this one if you want to get into the series, for it's suprisingly thriving community, and the basic, yet addicting gameplay.
Um Hipopotamo Casual.;-;So much fun. Cant explain. Thats why i`ll stop the review here. Ty
LiveActionTentaclePornPuppeteer;-;Best FPS of all time
kea | HeavyMetal #DsK;-;Oh...it's only the best team based first person shooter of all time.
woW_Haziq;-;such a nice game :D
`Ghoste;-;Since ~ 2003
__Xelium__;-;Dis is great nad there is still player online! and if you can play CS:GO! its great!
ReveN;-;Had my best hours in CS. Old but gold.
Wibble;-;Its as outdated as the Nintendo Entertainment System but it will always have a special place in my spleen.
POLSKAA MORDA;-;So good 10/10. Played this game when i was ten. IST MAGNIFICENTLY!!!!!!
danio43us67;-;A very fast-paced shooter with great gameolay at the time when it came out, today occupied by a small pack of hardcore Counter Strikers that will not forgive a single move of the mouse that is slower than theirs.
GeoLynx;-;Good classic shooter, and followed up (increased players), very low specs needed, hugely populated and simple fun.
Ren Froger;-;good game, one of the best made in its time 10/10
Wolfina~  #FUCKYOU;-;The best game ever :) Fun,Friends and really good time :3
uw0tm8;-;great game
Doe Duweit;-;Its classic
kukaraca;-;if there was a game that would let you shoot  out of you disfunkcional p3nis anyway 3/3 would suck
~BdBoy~;-;I love this game is the best Game in the world
NeOn;-;! recommend th!$ game it's re@ly c{}{}l
sTL| finesse .;-;Instead of writing a long, drawn out, TL;DR review, I'll just give a summary of what that review would be: Best game ever.
Repride;-;A classical FPS shooter. If you're just as much as a fan of the CS series like I am, you'll like the original as well. Would recommend any day :p
Fifflaren, Come back in NIP pls;-;Let me just say one thing: Who likes to play Counter-Strike 1.6 just play! As the saying goes, Spomenite childhood !! The game is excellent, but other versions of Counter-Strike is also awesome:) The very rare I go because I play Counter-Strike: Source, and other games .I advise everyone to play. If you have not played in Counter-Strike 1.6 - That you have not had a childhood = ((
Dzonny!;-;My childhood in essence
GATTA GO;-;ing love this game
Johnny Branmuffins;-;This game still bawls
LeSour -;-;Old but gold
lone wolf #CrypToNiaN;-;There is a huge lump in my throat as I edit this review. If you own this game and reading reviews for fun, keep scrolling. So this game is only MP without mods and its dying atleast here in my country(India) and its $10 which is way too expensive in terms of our currency. Get the physical copy of Counter-Strike Anthology from a local/online retailer which will have half the price of this game alone without any sale! RIP Counter-Strike 1.6 :(
I'm  Glm _;-;Go CSGO, I own cs 1.6, go is better the css, and 1.6, cs 1.6 can help alot understanding the 2 other main valve games, css, csgo.
PrEdATOR;-;Why did i got VAC ban for not having CS: GO ? U baned me for cheating in CS: GO + I dont haw CS:GO!!! that lame Steam ... Just taking money from kids, and thats all .
Liquid;-;Great game, 10/10 IGN ++ EDIT: No,  IGN this game is worth
connorryanmolloy;-;it's way too  to play!
Das ber Lan;-;game is great(as ypu know it) but valve isn't working on it at all now cares about counter-strike:global offensive, there is too many servers with players downloaded it from some other site for free R.I.P. CS (1999-2012)
PwnDaddy123 : Retired Gamer;-;hm in dis one gabe newel redeems himself by makin the sequel to quake hip counterstrike filled wit plenty of headshots and wepons to take out ur enemies i hily recomend
acme '[193.192.58.206:27034];-;Great!
CapioBizeps;-;best FPS game of all time
Reaper;-;Great game.
Raz1911;-;Let me start off by saying that the Counter-Strike pack is a stand-alone product. You don't need the original Half-Life to play this game. In the retail package you get a full version of CS as well as Team Fortress Classic, Opposing Force multiplayer, and the Wanted, Redemption and Firearms mods. The entire pack is overflowing with multiplayer fun, but, of course, the real focus of the retail release is Counter-Strike. There is a single-player component to CS and, while it provides a good primer, this mod is all about online action. You basically play a game of cat and mouse, with the mouse being a terrorist group and the cat a squad of counter-terrorists. As a terrorist, you're goal is to plant a bomb at a specific location or hold a group of hostages. As a counter-terrorist, it's your duty to defuse said bomb or rescue the ill-fated hostages. Taking out all players on the opposing side will also assure your victory. CS is an action lover's dream, with games lasting only four or five minutes (if that in some cases) because, unlike Half-Life, one shot to the head can mean instant death. CS is the perfect mix between fast-action and realistic damage. You can't just absorb bullet after bullet and expect to walk away. Working as a team is a must and, while you're in the game, taking the lone wolf approach will often get you killed...and fast. It's the team-based tactics that make CS so fun. I can't stress how important it is in this game to act as a team. If your team is on the defensive side you'll all benefit by creating a cohesive strategy. If you team is on the offensive side, you will all benefit by sticking closely together as well. I'm sure you've seen movies or television show demonstrating this "Conga Line" style of infiltration. Well, that's exactly how your team will have to act. This creates a fantastic game balance that will keep you coming back for more. It'll also keep you from thinking about your school work, your job, and interaction with your loved ones, and often work around the IGN offices will be put on hold so we can clog our network with CS. Visually the game will not disappoint. While the Half-Life engine isn't the prettiest beast out there, there is plenty of animation that creates a smooth look and feel, and the gun models are some of the most realistic looking of any shooter available. The environmental textures look realistic enough and complement the provided camouflage well enough for you to be hidden, but not be invisible. As in real life, the distinguishable difference between good guy and bad guy is a little difficult, but the balance to this is if you can't tell who it is then you probably won't be able to hit him with your gun. Now, if you've purchased sniper rifle, you should have plenty of scope magnification to tell the difference between terrorist or counter-terrorist, but otherwise you may be taking out a team member from afar. As good as it is, a couple of features of this game really stood out as frustrating... at first. But over a period of time they actually became enhancements to online multiplayer gaming. One feature is buying your weapons at the start of each round. This takes a little getting used to at first since, in most shooters, you just run around picking up weapons at your heart's content. Usually by the time you figured out which guns, grenades, and armor you were going to take in your early games, the bad guys would come over and kill you. But a couple of tries later, after getting the gist of things, you're off in no time. The other feature that took some getting used to was the "wait and watch" feature after you get killed. Once you sustain a lethal injury, you have to wait for the next round to start before you can join in again -- you don't just spawn again and start shooting. This actually adds a ton of anxiety to your efforts of staying alive and completing your objective. But like I mentioned before, the rounds are short, so you shouldn't have to wait too long before you can jump in the action again. Not surprisingly, the user interface is very Half-Life-esque. Gamers who have played Half-Life or any of the other mods for the game will have no trouble with the menu system. Even for the first time user the interface is easy to use or fumble through. The only thing that even slightly tripped us up in the interface is the "Update" on the server page. First-time users may be confused into thinking this meant update my version of CS. Not true, it actually means update the list of game servers. But the rest of the interface is easy to understand and even easier to navigate. Just about the only aspect of this game that we could make negative comments about is the sound. Sure, the realistic guns sounds are spot on, we just wish the same amount of attention to detail was given to the rest of the sound in the game. Some levels have lighting and thunder. When the thunder crashes it sounds a little wimpy. We were hoping for some deeper bass and clearer sounding claps from the lightning. In most of the level the user can go inside or out side of buildings, the sound of their footsteps should also change to reflect what type of surface they are walking on. The sound of footsteps getting closer and closer could also have been improved. As it stands now, it's hard to tell how far down the hallway or street a bad guy is from you by sound alone. So how long does the magic last? Well we've been playing this game for over a year now and we still can't get enough of it. Are we tired of it? Hell no! We're still surprised by how fun this game is. This game actually made some of us squeal like little school-girls after getting sniped from an unexpected angle on high. On the other hand some of us were drawn to stand up and scream obscenities at the monitor. I guess we'll just have to get them next time! In a nutshell, if you're looking for the next step in online first person shooters, then look no further. CS is fast paced, intense, and satisfying--this game will not disappoint. This is truly one of the best mods for one of the all time greatest first person shooters ever, and the retail package of CS is simply bursting with multiplayer goodness. If you like to play shooters online, get this pack!
Gianpovse;-;great game
F3nix!;-;the best game forever.
Brolie.exe;-;Best FPS of its time. Really fun and great community.
constantin cs.worldcs.ro;-;epic and clasic game . i recommend this to everyone with a bad pc and to fps game lovers. cs never die.
TazIsCute;-;A good game to play when you are bored.
neffedron/MACZANKA;-;The best FPS game ever :)
wing;-;what a classic game!
Guess What?;-;this game is the ing good damn son a
kim; needs vanguard pass ._.;-;1.6 the best
Frag;-;The classic shooter upgraded with modern controls: Counter-Strike was something unseen, yet highly needed in the late 90's and early 00's. It carried with it the idea that you didn't need a single player "story mode" to make ripples in the video game industry. As future competitors would attempt to reflect, all CS needed was an incredible skill-based gameplay with a start-of-the-art ability to play against players from around the world. Toss in some alternate gameplay styles to help break up the chance of monotonous moments and throw it all over a large assortment of levels for good measure; youll end up with a dish that, for years, has been best served with a dedicated server and a good group of friends. It's no wonder that CS gave birth to some of the best online team play the world has ever seen and continues in that tradition to this day. If you haven't played the original Counter-Strike yet, you're missing a small part of your soul... hurry, go get it back by quick scoping with an AWP down Long A on de_dust2.
Jessica;-;Old but gold
Raions;-;Pfff.... Nothing much too say the game's old odseivly I don't reccomend it anymore but for the time this game was realised it truly shined.
tzzzzap;-;I play this game since I was like 14 years old . Teamwork game in most of the times . Solo game if you are pro .
J.;-;aint no school like the old school
mahti;-;A real classic!
FOX;-;The best game
Liquid;-;This game is da shiznic! epic graphic and awesome gameplay,
George Costanza;-;blah blah good game blah, this isnt where i parked my car?
Sk[i]LLer;-;This is the best game I have seen ;)
oNe!;-;one of a kind
Imblackson;-;one of my most favorite games of all time.
prnvsujay;-;NO Words to express !! Just download and enjoy each second of the game play. Highly Recommended !!
Troll Loc;-;Is there any way I can update my version of Counter Strike witch is v42 to v44(full). Isn't there a patch or something I can download? This may sound stupid to some people, but I'm new to this stuff. If anyone can help me, I would very much appreciate it. Anyways, I remember playing the pirated version back in a day. It was tons of fun. Counter Strike is a game you definitely must own.
|TITAN| KU$H;-;This game is a genuine classic. Grew up with it. Got over 600 hours on it. Loved almost every moment of it (except when I got killed by aim-bot and wallers) but oterwise a great buy. It has its perks and like a trillion mods of which I'd say 25% are running at any given time from servers worldwide. Definitely recommend it to players who like oldschool games.
alejandro;-;Nice game :D
E Datha;-;not worth the money
MaX;-;Classic, I like it just as much as CS:GO and the community is great. No competitive option for normal players, but still fun when playing with friends.
Booger McLindon;-;I don't dislike, like, love or hate this game,
Poltergeist;-;Nice game.
PTF!;-;Great and awesome game :)
tAreqSm1Le'^^!;-;i can't leave this Game forEver <3
TheRebellior #KNEIV;-;This Is One Of The Best FPS Game`s I Have Ever Played.
Mr.s Cockster;-;the best ever :D
awptix;-;Sceneplayers ~
fallout1312;-;This is by far one of the most fun online shooters ever. If not the best ever made, And in my opinion the game that pretty much started the genre. Ive been playing the game off and on since it's release and still to this day it never gets old. The game runs really good on modern pc's and it's really a game that when your doing good you really feel a sense of accomplishment. Plenty of fun maps to play on, plenty of servers to play on, plenty of customization options. This is one game that you can really taylor to suit your style. Plenty of user created skins for your weapons that can really make this game look amazing. And I still prefer counter strike over counter strike source. I don't know, call it nostalgia or whatever but there really is something about just good ol' counter strike 1.6 that is just simply magical. It truley is a classic in every sense of the word. And STILL is just as enjoyable (if not more enjoyable) then any online shooter on the market today. So glad I got to grow up with this game. I would definitley recommend it to any fan of competitive online first person shooters. Come Join the fun.
Tux the penguin!;-;Best FPS game ever made and works great on mini laptops! :D
OwnedPeace*;-;Thanks to Valve, old but amazing.
The_Kefka;-;This game is good... ...But be owned by professionals who have been playing when it was on WON.
L.E.M;-;Old School
Blade;-;great game
[CSUNC] Zer0 R.I.P.;-;Awesome classic with an active community. Also... I have 192 times the recommended memory. 10/10 would be op again
let joy;-;Meaning of life is not there, purely to get distracted and not more.
asX RAH;-;Only played a little, but it was fun.
Noname;-;Is a'ight
TheSilentBang #PCupgrade;-;Saw a hostage pick up a Mac-10 and kill a terrorist. 10/10 recommend CSGN.
- EtaY -;-;The best game for ever!
Vi[p]eR;-;Join the best and classic shooter game.
KQLY;-;CS:GO NEXT GEN .
Jamal Conquer;-;game for nerds ,bad story line.
Altamos off 7 days;-;Best moment of chldish age :D
"The" Kapt.;-;Nice and i have a cfg no alias just perfect :)
tuan.ncong;-;from my memory with love
A.Einstein;-;Best game ever !! I would recomand this game to everyone.
SMOKE WEEDS ALL DAY;-;Write a review for Counter-Strike Please describe what you liked or disliked about this game and whether you recommend it to others. Please remember to be polite and follow the Rules and Guidelines.
ProMac'nCheeze;-;This game may seem "stupid" to some people, becasue of the graphis. This game is exactly like CSGO and the only difference is the graphics. Otherwise, everything is the same thing (excluding camos).
timeBandit;-;Play it,because it ain anything better!
nobody;-;Well, this game is kinda old school, but still gold, like this, i'm playing it like from 2009, but i'm still likeing it.
tehfuck;-;twas teh game
ReMnant;-;This is a great game, made in 2000 and still has a reasonably high amount of players. definitely recommend buying.
FERFA1999;-;If you were a fan of this game back in the day you'll feel nostalgic and want to buy it but don't, it doesn't hold up if you've done any gaming of any sort since then.
Viancci;-;This is still the best fps out there. It has not undergone significant changes and therefore remains good and competitive, but only on ESEA coz apparently the Valve's support for the VAC on public servers no longer works since CS:GO has taken place over the professional scene. You know, it's a dirty strategy for old school players to buy and enter in the CS:GO world. So if you want enjoy this game atm, you must spend money and raise your level, coz if you plan to play on public servers you'll only see lots of cheaters and ID Lans lol. Valve should update VAC for Cs 1.6
nock30440;-;Mouse Facing Glitch ~ 10/10
smash;-;its pretty ok
|rAr3z#;-;This is my favourite game and also from my point of view the moust interesting shooter game ever made. Is best to play it with friends or with other people to test your skills.
Grumpy;-;Old School <3
R4hr #Clutched;-;good game, awesome with the wallbangin'
ninj.[A];-;The best of the best ! OLD SCHOOL !
ZuluTheRed;-;Old but good
GadMiuM;-;Very Nice "Old-School" Game
Woody;-;This game is awesome!!!!!! Just got it last night and brings back soo many good memories, I recommend it to everyone!!!!!! =P
zNaaaK;-;The Best Game Ever
FroLanD-[PL];-;This Is Very Good Game.
TheeClaaw;-;A classic mostly got this to to play GMOD. Had a bit of fn playing online, people still play!
HL1PRODUCTION;-;Lets do it as we all wish to do it : 1. Download it 2. Play it 3. Enjoy it 4. Dont hack it 5. Become a pro 6. Represent your clan 7. Represent your country ENJOY !
Tret;-;Riot shield OP as  32/9
noahchaffin;-;why arent there any bots included?
Mega;-;Got called Hacker by little kids because shooting randomly the wall 10/10 -IGN Wall shooting simulator 2984
smacck. [A] #CS:GOFAN;-;Aswesome Game Loving It <3
JLZ;-;I like this game
Ghetto Life! #;-;its nice
Goatcus;-;You have a choice of either curling up into a ball or falling on your face when you die. 10/10
^whiter;-;There's simply no game like cs1.6.
Rndomize;-;Still beter then CSGO
DeVi|_;-;Love it. Can't stop playing!
SmajGoleK;-;The first best Counter-Strike ! I recommend !
Nnja;-;It's a really fun game you should buy it
Smokin';-;Very good game! I like it! Lets play. ;)
cL1Kz0r;-;I like this game because it is one of the best games I have ever played.
Heh;-;Good Game i love thi 10/10
RoYaL PowdeR;-;Awesome Game, I have been playing cs 1.6 since 2006 and It's my favorite game and Be care full in this Game You will Find Some Dangerous and Sexy, White/Black PlayerS lol u must be 15 to play this Game :D........
avi [3G] Steel[S]eries;-;a Good Game ... Best game 4ever
AWE YOLO WE;-;Old but gold!
Chamomile Tea;-;The classic genre-defining FPS. Counter-Strike may be 16 years old but there are thousands of servers with an overflowing amount of players. The difficulty curve is no joke. But once you get used to it, you never get tired of tea-bagging dead players after a headshot. Since it is only multiplayer, you get practically infinite replayability. 8/10 - A Big Heavy Dose of Fun
Reccez;-;This game was my childhood this was litteraly the best FPS ever. you should get it on sale its wourth it.
Lizbeth sao <3;-;I've played it off and on for the past 8 years of my life. It is a true classic game. And it is still alive!! The multiplayer community is alive and thriving! You won't have to deal with annoying Russians (depending on if you actually pick a Russian server...) or 8 year old FPS kids. Pick this game up if you love classic, FPS action with an amazing community.
The Dominator [TTC];-;This brings me back to the old days !! LOVE IT. 10/10
toni iZ HiGh AlL tHe TiMe;-;This game is my childhood, so oldschooled =D I don't like csgo it isn't like 1.6 ahhhh i love this game <3
sEkh -.-;-;the best
SNiPER X;-;this game is always fun!
ALPacino;-;counter strike normal
BlacKEyE;-;cool
McDonalds;-;CS:GO is defiantly better, but this brings back better memorys.
yeti;-;Classic. Simple.
Zebra;-;This is where I started with. This never gets old.
New Acc;-;Having only played CSGO for the past year or so, it is really nice to see what that game was rooted off of. I now know playing 1.6 what all the hype about Counter Strike is and the history behind it. 1.6 for it's time period was such a benchmark game. Really awesome!
Jon Celsius;-;great purchase and great experience!
WicKed;-;This is the only PC Game which I play till to date from the time it was released. I am playing this game for past twelve or thirteen years and I am still very much addicted to it. The game play is phenomenal, highly challenging and had a very realistic feeling during then. The recoils are amazing and very realistic. This was the only game of its period to have gun recoil. The whole game playing skills revolved around the ability to control the gun's recoil which was its best feature. Great game of all times !!! Cheers!
sketch;-;Legendary Game. Nothing more to say xD
gun1.;-;The most beautiful game i've ever seen!
Festive l UnReal;-;Classic Memories.
xXButtmuffinsXx;-;its funny and u can play multiplayer and lan enjoy :)
simplistic;-;Counter-Strike 1.6 Never die! The Best game in the WORLD!
#lds.org;-;CounterStrike was and is the foundation of the great fps games - Great game play for its time. Great team play game. Full recommendations to all who love fps.
InNeR G;-;where it all started for counter strike
dafuQQ;-;I play this game since 2001 and I still can't stop coming back:) It's the best game ever!
Alan Milk;-;Great.Nice Game But server has bug still
aL;-;play hard go pro
Mishka;-;Chuck Norris approves (y)
MACHINE;-;Great team based game where you HAVE to utilize your teammates abilities and yours to go far and dominate.
KingShane;-;Before my time neutral review 5/10!
bchill53;-;Not really my type of game. But if you're into online FPS, you may like it.
Galati - La Multi Ani MIE!!!;-;#Just #Pay :)
papaping;-;The game CS:Source destroyed by completing dividing one of the biggest competitive gaming communities in two. Best game ever. RIP CS.
Chocolate Mountain Man;-;In 1999, this was one of the games you played on internet cafes with friends, and it still is fun to play with friends, as long as they don't screen look.
Remzi;-;LAN Party!!!!
~soufest.;-;My entire childhood! Recommend 5 stars for those who like simple fps games
baraabh99;-;it very very cool
NaNee  [BIH] #needcsgoteam;-;Great game <3
TheWarrior943;-;This will be more of a ''my experience with this game'' type of review, because saying things like ''great gameplay'' will not suit something I've experienced with Counter-Strike. Here you go: I remember back in 2002 I was at a friend's house and he was playing a game. I didn't know the name of the game nor I had internet to find it. A few weeks passed by and another friend came over and he didn't have a computer, so he brought a disc with a game in it. He told me that it was one of the best games and from that very moment I knew that it is going to be the game I saw at the other friend's house. When I saw the Counter-Strike logo I was filled with gamegasm (?) and I was so happy. I don't remember a day when I was so happy like back then. So, the journey started. I was playing it hardcore. Made friends, clans, was involved in communities and even made two myself. Counter-Strike is my first game which I played competitively and it was a whole experience. Playing public servers and maybe some servers with mods was very fun, but playing it competitively made it very intense and stressful. In a pleasant way, ofcourse. Shooters these days try to be different, advanced in a way. Sometimes the most simple games like Counter-Strike are the ones that live to this day. Also, there are plenty of mods to keep your attention to this game. The gameplay is very simple - defend as a Counter-Terrorist, attack as a Terrorist to plant the bomb or save the hostages as a CT. I am sure most of you already know this and I doubt there are gamers that haven't heard or know the gameplay of Counter-Strike, so I am sharing here more of my experience. I wish I could find my CS Anthology account which I've lost since 2008. So, I decided I am going to buy this game again and here you go - more than a thousand hours played. I still play it from time to time to this day and it brings back many great memories and I sometimes even stumble upon people I've played with years ago. I think Counter-Strike changed gaming in a major way and we wouldn't have many games like we have today, if this game wouldn't exist. I am sure many of people already have played games like CS:GO, but never the roots. I doubt any of you will play it for more than an hour, because it's much more simple and it differs a lot in my opinion from CS:GO and modern games. I am glad that I lived through the golden era of shooters and if I'd have to rate it, it'd 10/10 ofcourse,
RoiKaS'' RIP Hussein Fatal;-;Old but Gold
jdn-dp-;-;WHERE IT ALL STARTED.
,3raa8i ;;-;Fail Game , Just Give Me The Money :)
mr.brown;-;Nice , and very addicted ;c
SilenT_ Ch4n;-;THE REAL CLASSIC!!!
El.Grande|El.Poods;-;its super awesome  yeah
ThePineapple1337;-;Lock n' Load! This is the game that marked an era. Indeed it did. And it's not very bad today either, in fact some people prefer this than the newest addition to the CS franchise. Well what do you know. It is highly unlikely that you, dear reader, has never heard about Counter-Strike. In case you haven't, the gameplay is very simple. There are two teams, Counter-Terrorists (the good guys) and the Terrorists (the bad guys, to the general public). In addition there are two official gamemodes, Hostage Rescue and Defuse. In hostage rescue, the T's (Terrorists) have captured a few gentlemen and are holding them hostage. The CTs (Counter-Terrorists) have to go in and shoot the bad guys and save the day. Meanwhile, the Ts have to kill the CTs, but not the hostages. No, hurting a hostage will cost you money. Quite alot of it, well, almost all of it. The second gamemode is called Defuse and is the most popular. The Ts have to plant an explosive device, also known as bomb in two select areas of the current map, called bombsites. They go by the name of A and B, respectively. The choice of where to plant the bomb is down to personal preference. Meanwhile, the CTs have to shoot the Ts and defuse the bomb (preferably both, but the CTs will still win the round if all Ts are dead). If the CTs die or run out of time, the Ts win. The rounds last about 5 minutes each and is divided into 30 rounds until map change (which is very rare since all the servers just play on de_dust2). In Counter-Strike you have a money system. You start the first round with 800$, which is enough to buy an improved pistol or body armour. The winning team will receive a set amount of money while the losing team will recieve notably less. Once you advance the second round, most of your teammates will switch to automatic rifles, but investing in sub-machine guns and shotguns can be a sensible choice albeit not the most popular for some reason. Mainly becuase you need more skill to master SMGs than what is needed for a rifle. There is a good amount of weapons to purchase, each divided in their own category (Pistols, Shotguns, SMGs, Rifles, Machine guns and equipment). It is not advisable to buy the most expensive weapon you can buy when you are losing, it's best to hold on to your money and buy a cheaper option (this is commonly known as "eco round", economic round). You might be outgunned, but at the start of the next round you will have sufficient funds to buy a better weapon and so on. As you can see, the gameplay is very simple. The communication consist of commands over the radio (Cover Me, Enemy Spotted and the most used "Fire in the hole"). You of course have the global and team text chat and normal voice chat using your own microphone. Once you get into the game you will probably be the first one to die. Expect that to be outcome of every round. Yes, Counter-Strike is easy to learn, but very difficult to master. To make it worse, in Counter-Strike there is no option to play offline with bots (this only applies to 1.6, the "first" CS) so you're probably going to get harassed verbally by your fellow teammates (quite ironic, don't you think?). Good thing there are many guides in the Internet available for you to read about how to improve yourself in CS. We're almost done here, except for a few things. The Counter-Strike community to begin with. I wouldn't call it cancerous, but the community isn't very friendly or welcoming so to speak. If you decide to hide instead of killing the enemies even though they've outnumbered you your teammates will make great use of their very rude vocabulary, or you will get votekicked off the game. Same thing goes for weapon choice, tactic choice etc etc Do keep in mind that yelling at someone for something in a video game isn't really a sign of strength. More like the opposite, if you spend all day screaming at people in a video game you shouldn't take people seriously. Ignore them or change server. Also the map rotation on all the servers. If the server isn't playing some poorly made custom map you will be playing de_dust2. That's it. Even though there are more maps (even a map called de_dust) you will always end up in dust2. Few servers play on cs_italy or de_nuke. Yes, dust2 is the most popular map but people play on it so much I could make a fully detailed sketch of it in my head if I was woken up in the middle of the night! So in the end, if you are looking for a fun shooter that will present you a great challenge look no further. Gameplay doesn't change much but you will get better and better at it so it never gets boring. And it's very fast paced, what you'll need it two minutes and you got yourself a great dose of entertainment. Also it's suprisingly compatible with Windows 8 although this was released at the time when Windows 98 was the huge hit. And it doesn't take up much space really, so a low end PC can handle this really good (well, depends on your graphics card and other stuff, but you don't need military grade hardware). I hope my review has come to great help in deciding whether you should spen money on this or not. Thanks for reading! Counter-Terrorists Win!
m4rt1n '______';-;1 Of The Best Shotters After Years This Game Is Alive A Giant Community 10/10
(~J!N%~)Pr0_M@Gg3R;-;this is one of the best game i have been playing since 7 years. still i didnt get bored of playing it. its just one of the best game made ever
Looprekon;-;Probably one of the best FPS game ever - after quake series ofc -
Robokitteh. :3;-;Even if this game is old, it's pretty amazing and fun. Some mods kinda suck, but classic remains the best.
[SoS] Severus;-;Epicness of a Generation
dioman21;-;The last time i played this game was at 2004. Now the shooter games have changed. Better graphics, better annimation and of course better physics. But this game even if passed 14 years, still remains in our hearts. (10/10)
God Hates Us All;-;Nice game
paper ghost;-;The original where so many people destroyed their computers over this game from being sniped. Ahh.
Misa Amane;-;I gave it a shot, played few hours. Pretty funny game with a lot of mods.
God Slayer -:D;-;In Love With This Game <3
daatyson;-;The lord of counter strikes
asdf;-;:o
Azumuth;-;Good Game its worth it
ZVEARKA !;-;Counter!!!
Mercy/Jack;-;Great game.
Anfetaminas;-;Nice game :)
chiken;-;One of the best games !
Archaiden;-;Best of all times.
Botasky;-;awesome after so many years!
raid;-;I suck at it. But it's still fun.
=*pabo*=;-;It's Counter-Strike. No comments!
Nightcrawler;-;Addictive stuff.
Panda-Chan;-;This is my favorite game on steam. Even though its pretty old its more fun than tf2 and garrys mod.999,999,999,999,999,999,999,999,999,999,999,999,999,999,999,999,999,999,999,999,999,999,999,999,999,999,999,999,999,999,999,999,999,999,999,999,999,999,999,999,999,999/10
knjy.;-;the best cs in the world
FTP;-;CS was the very first FPS game I was introduced to (over 10 years ago OMG), and I've been in love with it ever since. Makes me a lil giddy sometimes, and compared to the graphics and simulation of today's shooters the quality is pretty  (I'm prepared for some flak), but really, it's like that bottle of wine that has aged and mellowed on the beloved alcohol shelf *hic*...NOTHING can beat the classics. A bottle of the finest Chardonnay for this veritable *hic* shooter! And another just for me. *Collapses in drunken stupor*
P@R@NoiD_LoRD;-;Classick!!!
:f;-;i love headshots
Maticb;-;Classic. Loved it when it came out and I still play it sometimes.
bilu;-;I love this game, 2015 and i still playing cs 1.6
Gandalf;-;Very Good Game!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Legendary Gaben Master;-;This game is so good man 10/10 IGN Even "Counter Strike Source" is more dead than this even here in 2015 its still funny Man trust me so funny!
smash;-;its pretty ok
|rAr3z#;-;This is my favourite game and also from my point of view the moust interesting shooter game ever made. Is best to play it with friends or with other people to test your skills.
Villainous elf-skinned strumpet;-;this is good. it reminds me of quake but more realistic.
marceloBiceps (paszaBiceps);-;Old buT GoLd :) I spent over 4.000 hrs in this game and im glad !!! I totally recommend!
-=[LOD]=-Odd8aLL;-;ONLY GAME THATS I PLAY!!! YOU CAN KEEP ALL THE FANCY GRAPHC GAMES _ NOTHING COMPARES TO THE ORIGINAL 1.6
JADARAN.MN;-;*** My config 2014 *** sv_cheats 1 cl_gg 1 rate 25000 senstivity 1 cl_yawspeed 500 gl_spriteblend 0 ex_interp 0 bind c "cl_righthand 0" bind f "cl_righthand 1" fps_max "100" gl_vsync "0" gl_ansio "0" cl_dlmax "512" hud_centerid "1" hud_fastswitch "1" net_graph "1" cl_cmdrate "100" cl_updaterate "100" sv_accelerate "6.5" violence_ablood "0" violence_agibs "0" violence_hblood "0" violence_hgibs "0" _cl_autowepswitch "0" sv_airaccelerate 15 sv_friction 4.1 echo "YeS's Config" *** My rainbow crosshair *** bind "mouse1" "+attack; adjust_crosshair;cl_crosshair_translucent 0; -attack"
Rollolo;-;It's nice.
asfash;-;Top
Game Fucker 69;-;''Old but gold.''
heiL;-;This has been one of the best and most competitive FPS for the past 17 years. It's slowly dying, but still has an active community of 30,000 players daily.
Lelouch Vi Britannia.;-;Nice Game :D
[Sigmnt];-;due to its special gameplay back in the time 10/10 . now its just 2/10.
^_^Hpsv~;-;Awesome Addictive game :D
d1nG d0nG;-;I like this game so much
LaLa;-;one of my favorites!!
StefyZz;-;Trying to be the best
Muriko Jr. w33;-;This is a narcotic game
Diego35HDs;-;AWP simulator 1999. 10/10 would AWP again
Kenny;-;ALL-TIME FAV
AlpiCS;-;the best shooter
trojanul2008;-;It`s never to old!
Cosgrove;-;One of the best games ever made.
NTTM;-;Best of the Best Master of all FPS games
||ECS|| Arslan;-;amazing game. runs on slow internet also (y)
Saizo;-;Best CS, Pros : -Moddable -Skins are free -Chickens. -Rages -Kiddos -Funny Cons : -Noobie Cheaters (I prefer cheater, the noobie one sucks) -Nothing -Dunno -Dont ask me Learned spanish and russia in 3 weeks, Thank you Counter-Strike.
Kitan;-;cuz its cool :)
sempiro;-;still more balanced than csgo
M1krO;-;Best of classic!
aaroNcs;-;Dont have words for that game.. best childhood memories there :)
Negative Player;-;Old game, but its class
NOtice me popeye;-;This Game is old, but Gold. A great example of FPS game. Really it is. Especially When you bring your Friends into this Game. *Recommended*
n3c;-;Well... isn't it a classic? CS should not require a review. You should get it, whether it's 1.6, CS:S or CS:GO.
SeNNsiTY;-;Awsome game!
bLu  Duck;-;Good enough for FUN. BEsides that try Global Offensive.
TowTruck67;-;In my opinion, should be like 2.99 not 6.99, and there is no achievments
|_,ink (-.^) CompleXGamer.Au;-;This is the game that got me into CS and furthered my career in this game lovd it from the start and enjoying every minute of it! If your on CSS come and join me on the Australian DTK ( Dying To Kill) Servers, i am an admin on De_dust 2 deathmatch! looking forward to kicking some  with you! mwhahah
shaun0107;-;7/10 +No Microtransactions +simple great for its time
Xenomorph #7DaysCooldown;-;Pick up your weapons,and fight :D
Ad1k [KZ];-;,         Steam   ,    .
puppydawG;-;this is 50x better than csgo lolz
Stryger *G2A.com/r/stryger*;-;What can i say about this game, works fine, a lot of players are still playing this game because its really addictive and enjoyable!
Gangler;-;BEST steam game, EVER!
Any Mean Rank UP;-;I love this game!
JP;-;Still the most epic game ever created. Yes CS:GO is great, and is a definite CS reviver, BUT, 1.6 will forever be the game that ruined our lives! Commited thousands of hours to 1.6, 1.5 and all previous iterations. Started way way back when it was still a mod for HL1. Growing up and watching the game grow and turn into what it has become has been a truly great experience. This game is still alive, and you can still have hundreds of hours of fun on it, so give it a go :)
SabaoNegao;-;Still beter than CoD:Goats...
TeCci;-;Absolutly the best work from valve in the last years. Source and CZ were not really good but GO is just on the right way.
^Sky-C0D3R.;-;everything is good
Stoked;-;Classic. Memories will stay.
Player'10;-;The best game ever
HornS;-;CS cource forever! But CS:GO...
Don Reggae;-;Old but gold
Rao;-;Great Game
Doctor [];-;Old school game. This game change the wolrd.
WeedTime;-;Shooting game Very good
SlipKnoT;-;Old Game But Still The Best and Favourite fps Shooting Games to All The Gamers :)
Broski_Higgins;-;it only but kinda good for its time but maybe then why on keep it the steem stoar Jessa Rhodes?
Haste;-;Greatest Game Created
A Rather Festive Saggybuttcheeks;-;1.6 the best
xiao;-;tis is real classic
VETERAN*;-;This game is absolutely amazing! Even though the graphics are not one of the best but still the game gained popularity. If you will know how to play counter-strike it will be easy for you to play other games. And there is no game like Counter-strike ( in my opinion) that will give you pleasure when you are doing 5 kills and all are headshots And I'm 100 % sure that this game is a LEGEND!!!
cropTool;-;Basically the best competitive FPS of all time If you don't already have 10,000 hours invested then it's probably not worth playing
Fr4nkS;-;GREAT  GABEN! I r8 8/8 m8 its rly gr8
Titanium|-nArk0s-;-;The best FPS (First-person shooter) video game ever!
nuttzz;-;"Old but gold".
bassboyyy;-;This game is probably the best game on steam. 10/10, Absolutely awesome.
funkstar.;-;POLECAM BARDZO WAM TO. SUPER SIE SZCZYLO W TE TERORYSTY.
Dr.Zed;-;Very cool game, me liked ;)
.:: ~~!! D3AdSh0t !!~~ ::.;-;Its old but great game for multiplayers......
vicoFiction;-;No work, No food. Only 24 hours of work (play)! <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3 <3
LYCETUFF-^;-;Awesome game of all the times
icespear;-;love this game
{Gb'} Peyton | CSafm.com;-;Try American Football Mod @ 216.52.143.168:27015
Starkweather;-;Let's face it, this was better than CZ.
Bertram Bjrn;-;Classic 1.6, the true Counter Strike.
seeeetttt #banNa4tygodnie;-;The game is great. Has the full potential, the graphics and gameplay are doing it.
kA[MR]aN ;x;-;Its a to class game.
DEATHfromABOVE;-;Classic cs nothing like it. a must have for gaming collectors
NiP^GeT_RiGhT *EIZO;-;Really reccomended game!
Mo;-;Great Game!
Aiedail;-;This game is P E R F E C T
CrafterSvK;-;Some classics... :)
Kip Fatta;-;When I was 17 years old, I escaped 34 days from school to play this with my friends and I didn't pass in school that year . Now it's 11 years later and I still consider that year the best in my life . 11/10 would escape from school again .
IgoR;-;I like this game
querry;-;The one and only yeah..
J.;-;Classic.
Eerk;-;I just bought a Macbook Air and for some reason when u get into a game the mouse goes funky on me and wont let me move around properly. its not the mouse either because it works fine until I'm in a game and it does the same thing with the touch pad on my mac... any suggestions?
stephan_fukasawa;-;A classic dorm room shooter, it may have been topped by games with better graphics and options, but the core Counter-Strike formula is still unmatched for a pick up and play simplicity.
kLiZz(AFK);-;CS 1.6
ButterScotch;-;amaizing grapfix..mindblowing sounds..and obviously superflous gameplay !! loved it !
thecoolone4075;-;Still an awesome game. 8/10.
SiNNNeR;-;Yes I very recomand this game !!!!!!
BREADED CHICKEN;-;Still a good game.
Zexphi;-;I disliked this game because hardly anybody plays it and it is pointless without other players to play against.
Juma;-;Best shooting game ever made. Period
Ragnark;-;Still nice after all these years. Just need to get all those annoying cheating kids off your back
Moh;-;I grew up playing this game and I'm still playing it. This game will never die. Things i like about this game. Best war game. You will never get bored. Fun all time playing. And especially when it brings memories back.
Quack! en vacances;-;nice, what'eva!
ZenosyX;-;ah, the beauty of old gaming remains. this game is more than just "alive and kicking", even though it's old by now. it's a nice game which focus more on skill and reflexes than cute graphics and advanced functions. if you like fast-paced shooter you'll probably like this one too. there's lots of mods, addons and maps out there... since this is an older game which allow people to create their own through 3rd-party software. in my opinion, that alone make this game awesome.
TKEY;-;classic game that will not die
samfisher3000;-;Classic game. It's great. What more can I say? 9/10. Everyone should own this.
Frozz;-;it's like sex for the first time
Popo;-;A classic multiplayer FPS with many different servers for gamemodes, such as Casual (hostage and defuse), Deathmatch, and more. The community still lives after 10 years because it is such a great game.
Freedom ^;-;cool
B-LiTzE-R;-;Counter Strike is an first person shooter that was released in the late 90's. Whats it about? Well Counter strike is an online first person shooter where you either play as an terrorist or an counter terrorist. The terrorists objective is to transport a bomb to a bombsite located on each map marked as (A) or (B). Whilst the counter terrorists main objective is to stop the terrorist force from planting the bomb. Theres also a gamemode where the terrorists will have hostages and the counter terrorists objective is to rescue the hostages before the time runs out. Game ends when the counter terrorists has saved all hostages or the terrorists has whiped all counter terrorists. Is it worth buying? Since this is an really old game and the graphics are really outdated compared to the games we have today i would still say this game is worth buying. The game is over 15 years old but still has a alot of active players and playing with friends make it even better. Counter Strike also has alot of maps, mods and other stuff that makes the game better in any way. Graphics. 7/10 Sound. 8/10 Gameplay. 10/10 This review is based on my own opinion and noone elses!
Gem323;-;very classic game this is one of my memory from childhood
FUCK YOU VOLVO YOU CUNTS!;-;Fun game! easy
spede;-;One of the best (all-time) multiplayer competitive games.
Joy III;-;Best game ever played!
mbeezy;-;The reason i started gaming <3
Kristo. ^^;-;Awsome.
Col. John Casey* Jill Spasti;-;The best tactical fps of the century!! a must have!
Wolfmeere;-;Use to be a good game but full of hackers and  servers 10/10 ign
Matrix #86 #scripting in LoL <3;-;This has to be one of my favorite CS games of all time :)!
Nothing^^;-;Is very good game, i play it for a long time.
[Ch.];-;One of the best games of my life.
Forzan96;-;This is the best game ever together with garry's mod and advanced warfare
Maestro;-;Old school fun game!!
CrazyBlazedTony;-;highly addictive and awesome players
seasoss;-;Great game! This game shows you how FPS has evolved into one of the most popular game genres. This game is old, has not many multiplayer servers and has graphics that aren't the best, but I assure you that you will have some fun with it. If yoiu are getting this game because yiu are looking for a good FPS, buy Counter Strike: Global Offensive or even better Counter Strike: Complete.
Burmeli;-;CS KAIKILLE PRKL!
||IPG||sabkabaap;-;will the game work in yosemite??
EnVy Yasuhiro;-;One of the best oldest PC FPS Shooters of all times, I play this game til this day, been playing since 2000 back when CAL League was popular. OG account with 7 digits
Padrino;-;This Is the best game I've ever play.... :)
Happy;-;nyc game in the world
Chris;-;A cluster of prepubescent children. Famous for the useless  people stick on their servers. Also home of   and according to Hilary Clinton causes the most school shootings after Doom. Cunter-Strike is a Massively Multiplayer Online First Person Shooter mod for the hit online electronic computing internets machine game "Half-life" made many years ago. It is aimed at brainless 13 year old boys and lifeless nerds who think it's cool, not knowing it's a secret recruiting tool for the special forces. Though of course no one can actually get into them, and real tools who can't distinguish between gaming and IRL bad ideas join the army. (Please note, if you're playing this game, you are gay. There is no hope, other than learning how to play better.) Note: Requirements include being a  and looking like Brian Peppers.
sil3nt600 // NoRegretzz;-;i can shoot people and jump while doing it 10/10 masterpiece
Getix [Invite Please :(((;-;nevur forgt rip in pice best geym <3
Snowman.;-;Legendary.
Sud sraek;-;I played it a lot many years ago. Now, I returned to it. Since I am grown up man, I feel like computer games are not important in my life anymore. BUT!!! I played Counter-Strike again, after 6 years... and... it's still on. It's still so brilliant and addictive and genius. Really, I like it, I LOVE IT!!! I never forget about it. I am acting like a counter-strike-teenage-boy again and I fell I made a right decision, returning back to this game...
SoP ` Frozy;-;Amazing game for very fast FPS actions !
:: ViRuS :: (HaRdWeLl);-;:* this game
///urderer;-;One LOVE!!! Shoot in the head!!!
HPZ;-;So, this game have poor graphics and it's really old, but it still awesome. This game is based on strategy team work game, that's why i love Counter Strike games. Yes ... almost all FPS are based on teamwork. But Counter Strike 1.6 is special, you play just for play (no rewards), here you can improve your teamwork to play other games, for example! Or you can simply kill players with no reason... The community have already sent some funny mods for this game and it's currently running in some servers you can join (Zombie Mode, Deathrun, Jailbreak,...). Repetitive? Well it depends on you, if you play all time in the same map in same gamemode, of course is repetitive, but if you make pcw(team/clan war) with your friends in alternated maps, the game will never be repetitive.
Coffee Bean;-;Still the best FPS
Bud Spencer;-;may be old but still fun if ya want to play CS GO with out the items and just play then ya better get this or source its way more worth it . the graphics suck but the gameplay makes up for it
atlas;-;eah
beefdude22;-;Russians:The game
dank;-;Fire in the hole!
iCRYnewFITTAmouseKINZU;-;Nice game !
DRX;-;The best game of all times
Lili;-;Had over 9000+ hours on this game on an alternative account. A really GREAT FPS i totally recommend a game like this, any Counter-Strike actually is good.
BershikaRO;-;The best game ever.
prokda;-;I have a lot of hours on non-steam version. COUNTER STRIKE FOREVER!
xyz.exe | 71;-;I love this game!
Insane Droid;-;One of the best shooter games in the world, the master piece that made Valve go to the stars and kick some Treyarch asses
Odnoklassniki;-;Is incredible game!!!!! :)))))
wEEzybaBY*;-;Nice game!!!!!!!!
Its Ryan | Scoutz n' DANK Knives;-;It's nothing like CS;GO as far as mechanics go. I say this because of how you control your character and spray control seems to be very different. The AK-47 has completely random spray pattern. It's not consistent! However the game itself is good, and provides a fair challenge for those who consider themselves to be good at CS;GO. Trust me, you will struggle at first.
CroSSbow;-;Best CS in history. What is bad ? There is no matchmaking like it is in CS:GO. But still, really, really great game !
Zui Leng;-;fun for the 3 seconds of each round i'm alive for.
TrojanSalesmen;-;best Counter Strike out there screw CSS! even with CS:GO i still think Cs.16 is still the best
Milk Man Jon;-;Russian and Spanish simulator
KKonFire;-;This first person shooting game is quite good. but the developers might have worked on the Bugs. Its pretty much addictive. Best for LAN gaming, less suitable for Internet gaming in India
keke;-;Old school fps game,
Maeroks;-;It's a must have, no question asked. If you don't own it, go to the nearest mirror, slap yourself, look how stupid you look. Once you're done with this bad advice I gave you, return to your computer & add the game to your Steam cart & purchase it right away. [Don't do tomorrow what can be done today.]
Tret;-;Riot shield OP as  32/9
Ster Ster;-;I have no clue what to do. 11/10
AYR;-;Counter-Strike 1.6 is life.
kaijke;-;The best game in the world.
Cheesecake;-;everyone play game. is good game!
yunGGunner;-;One of the best games of all time. For me at least.
TrojanSalesmen;-;best Counter Strike out there screw CSS! even with CS:GO i still think Cs.16 is still the best
AnGeL oF DarKnEsS;-;Best work till now from valve :D
wEEzybaBY*;-;Nice game!!!!!!!!
CroSSbow;-;Best CS in history. What is bad ? There is no matchmaking like it is in CS:GO. But still, really, really great game !
Its Ryan | Scoutz n' DANK Knives;-;It's nothing like CS;GO as far as mechanics go. I say this because of how you control your character and spray control seems to be very different. The AK-47 has completely random spray pattern. It's not consistent! However the game itself is good, and provides a fair challenge for those who consider themselves to be good at CS;GO. Trust me, you will struggle at first.
\_()_/;-;Best shooting game ever <3
MaikeleleleR.;-;Nice game :)
captain trouser pants;-;i remember when i was in high school playing this ahhh the good ol days where you could play a match without being threatend to be swatted anyhow carry on playing the game
Mustikas Jr.;-;I'm pretty pro on this game, doe. All join relaxx.eu!
Niolai;-;Probably my most enjoyed game ever! It's a classic and a must have!
Eyoub;-;Defuse without hands since 1998 10/10 - True Gamer
kominax `ON <3;-;This game is the best!
chill;-;Survivor - I Can't Hold Back
kevinblue3;-;Better than CS:GO but no competitive.
GreenBallz;-;Best CS ever, and ever will be
P@R@NoiD_LoRD;-;Classick!!!
:f;-;i love headshots
Maticb;-;Classic. Loved it when it came out and I still play it sometimes.
The Spinning Ham;-;Best FPS game ever.Still playing at 2015 :D
Za'Ki[DeaDlY];-;very nice game
PeX;-;one of my favorite games growing up sadly i didnt have it on steam :P 10/10 doe xD
MakeMeFade;-;The Chess of FPS
happy;-;Very Good Game! :)
kOLEone;-;Quite simply the best first person shooter.
J.Jensen;-;I think this is the game I have played most in my lifetime of gaming and I thank Valve for keeping it updated throughout this whole time. You will always be remembered!
zelionaja marka;-;its very fun game , but its hard for newbies
BluntSAURUS;-;A classic. Can't beat it
Candy;-;If you love intense, enjoyable, and competitive FPS games then this is the game for you, Why you may ask? It is one of the most decorated Shooter games of the 20/21st centuries.
IrIsH^;-;Still great, after so many years.
Best Anime = Corey In The NIQQER;-;Very fun game, I played it a lot when I was much younger. child memories right here
MaX3p;-;let's come back to the best game ;D
[][S.P] /A/;-;Best frame per second game ever
[EMLG] awarner1990;-;ok, i love the game, but i kinda messed up the resolution, and now it makes my game huge and i cant see most of the screen. what do i do to fix it?
Jaymex :D;-;A classic fps, a childhood classic.
Playyern;-;Old but gold!
Jef;-;This game is one of my all time favorites. 10/10
Hobo;-;This games community is not that ruined as its rivals
sergiorpacheco;-;Great game.... buy.
i punch babies;-;this game is the
1998 honda civic;-;One of the best games I've ever played, having spent more than 1/3 of my gaming time easily on cs 1.5/1.6 alone.
ToXiC#PronessRedefined;-;Just aaaaaawesome!!!!!! must try it out guyz 5/5 stars though valve has moved to go which i do not support :( gg guys i hope a day comes when valve again supports 1.6 as it does to GO
Max Headroom (98.136.63.35);-;I think this game is great. It is a old game so the graphics are not as good as some of the newer fps but it's a fun game. It's not a game you would play for hours day after day but it is great for playing when you get bored or to play now and then and i would recommend buying
apX.;-;Great game.
Trollolicious;-;now thats a classical childhood game
hiphopeveryday;-;Best game in the history! 1.6 Never die!
qqq-_-qqqqqqqqqp! =DDD;-;old but gold
Adhisha;-;Wat can i say, if u love fps games, playing with friends, having fun, crusing people and saying evey better player who is better than u a hacker....then this is the perfect game for u :P
whisky&vaping&marlboro;-;Thanks for the memories..
Kotso Kotso Kotso;-;The most classic FPS game. Counter-Strike is a mod of the legendary Half-Life by Valve. Even if it was released at 1999, people still play it due to its essential playabillity. It contains a lot of different gamemodes and you can easily learn how to play it. I recommend it.
Mooie;-;First game i got on steam. played it so much. best version of counter-strike no doubt.
KILLER (amature);-;I heard that when i was made it was a huge succsess and now it's still popular. :D
Itsutsunagi;-;This game is a bit old, sure, but it was revolutionary back in its day. The first time I played this, I was hooked - both into Counter-Strike, and Steam as a whole. I love the simple yet complicated game-play. Brilliant, fast-paced multi-player action, with also single-player (and co-op) missions for Counter-Strike: Zero lets you experience quite a rush. If you enjoy this title, be sure to pick up the later CS titles, too; Global Offensive and Source. Definitely recommend this to everyone, both young and old, new and experienced.
DoM!NuS;-;World's Number 1 online action game.
OrkneyJude;-;bought it. played it. got it taken off me for some reason. I would buy again.
DECEPTICONS;-;tthis is my all time fav game <3
j0 -;-;the best game
The Gullible Tit;-;Classic game. 8/10
Macke;-;Very recomended.
Seeker;-;My childhood in one game.
|HF|Stevee;-;oti laba OldSchool sple.
GGTeam Wafflez;-;Do you like planting bombs, defusing bombs, recovering hostages and killing hostages and just having a ing good time in general, then buy this game... if you dont like any of the things i just said, then  off and go back to playing COD.
Os95;-;I really miss this game :(
frikandel boi;-;good old 1.6 love is in the air <3
Soldier001;-;Wordless... 10/10
abc;-;nice oldschool game :D
bot;-;old school :)
Master of Ki;-;There's a lot of potential in this game, Valve please don't leave it, we need your patches. Gaben, please add skins and smite cheaters with your fist.
Aimless. crack ;D;-;Nice Game Love it too much <3
Mr.Funky Right;-;This game is 16 years old still has all it's glory as the old days still one of the best FPS's ever and second on my list of all time favorites, and even after 16 years the game is still being played at a large rate, Highly recommend this game, if you can master this work of art you can just about be a master at any other FPS
feel (cGaming clan Recruiting);-;Nice game :)
shaGuar;-;Good old Counter-Strike... We won't forget!
The secret banana;-;Every one that plays this game is not english. period.
heugh;-;this game totally isnt outdated! 1/10 would fire in and/or outside a hole again
daedpul;-;this game is so gud i just luv 2 play with my friends this game is intence fun not easy but not to hard easy to get the hang of i think counter strike is like the mother of shooting games its everything realistic no regen health bullets kill fairly fast 2 forces doing many objectives and i just luv this game so much i can name all the good reasons
Preadtorrr;-;Fun but when i try to move it doesnt let me but when it does its fun (it lets me move5% of the time)
kw1nd.;-;Cool
#SWAG;-;Meh it's ok nine tmnt turtles out of ten
Lone Wanderer;-;lots of fun !!
LeonardoW;-;The undeniable god of online FPS games. PERIOD.
Double Diamond;-;Very good game if you like to be a non stop killing machine
Veloci_Raptor #KennyS Fan;-;you cant see the sun again if u install & play it
*SAS>;-;cool game it's very fantastic
-[.40 cal ]- Glazed {C};-;you need to play CS and nothing else.
CLiNT BeaSTWooD;-;Best game ever still to this day.
ime kapja;-;Probably the most played game in the old days. Epic gameplay, not so epic graphics, but tons of fun and joy for hours. 10/10
Creeperboy;-;This game is amazing!
HAZAISCOOL98;-;Even though it came out over 10 years ago it is still a great game to play and the servers are filled with lots of players and the community lives on. I would recomend this game to anyone.
Nerow;-;Cheaters paradise.
DaraX #  # Ltu;-;Nice OLD School Game ;)
PAR;-;The best game <3....
grofu;-;is alright
-fr-zhANg- \ ( ^ v ^) /;-;Played this game since I was in Hight School till now (cs 1.3). 1.6 is by far one of the best online FPS competitive game of all time and won't disappoint.
1-X 4r! =);-;3 words: Fun and Classic..! Recommned for that people who like to play Classic games :3 (Dam its more then 3 words xD)
WorldRuler1234;-;Counter-Strike, it is literally impossible to be a PC gamer and not know what this game is. They're all great. Go play them.
MaRiNaC;-;nice shooting game
KarliN;-;What a fun game. As a single play mania it was a little bit shame to see no bots in Counter Strike but there were still many servers running so you'll have no problem playing it. Since there were no active asian servers because Nexon got hold of asian market with 'Counter Strike Online' I had to play in a Brazilian server which made me go through horrible lag but even with the lag it was still enjoyable. Gear up, You can still enjoy the beginning of Counter Strike series. +) Easy and straightforward game play. Shoot on sight. +) Optimized Aiming.
VenomBananas;-;Classic game.
Nazim_Jr;-;The Best Game ILike it
gabyswizo;-;Best online FPS ever. The simplicity of this game makes it one of the most fun to play, with a match never the same to another. The Steam version has no changes or bonuses whatsoever.
[XVI]Roiner_Valesh;-;I played this since 15 years, i still playing it. Totally Reccomended
Poltergeist;-;Nice game.
Keromatsu ();-;Better than a F2P game, not saying what it is though.
barbara;-;bomb
Alber;-;Hours, and hours, and hours, and hours, and hours, and hours back in the day, and still these days every now and then.
maxi7;-;An original classic, Counter-Strike. Even though on my old account I only had 400 hrs compared to my 1,200 on Source, This game was still amazing. Now, CS:GO will take over, but I still enjoy playing 1.6 every once and a while.
Forta Majora!!!;-;good game ! action !
Mr.Juno;-;This Game is an addictive game :)
squidgystuff;-;shrek is love, shrek is life
STARLIGHT;-;The best game in the World!
__[H]0|3|3Y- -[MaGG3R]- ^;-;any one help me my cs is not installed any one suggetion me.................. :P :D
stampede for dank weed;-;i cant find the skins i bought valve why
wape;-;This will be more of a ''my experience with this game'' type of review, because saying things like ''great gameplay'' will not suit something I've experienced with Counter-Strike. Here you go: I remember back in 2002 I was at a friend's house and he was playing a game. I didn't know the name of the game nor I had internet to find it. A few weeks passed by and another friend came over and he didn't have a computer, so he brought a disc with a game in it. He told me that it was one of the best games and from that very moment I knew that it is going to be the game I saw at the other friend's house. When I saw the Counter-Strike logo I was filled with gamegasm (?) and I was so happy. I don't remember a day when I was so happy like back then. So, the journey started. I was playing it hardcore. Made friends, clans, was involved in communities and even made two myself. Counter-Strike is my first game which I played competitively and it was a whole experience. Playing public servers and maybe some servers with mods was very fun, but playing it competitively made it very intense and stressful. In a pleasant way, ofcourse. Shooters these days try to be different, advanced in a way. Sometimes the most simple games like Counter-Strike are the ones that live to this day. Also, there are plenty of mods to keep your attention to this game. The gameplay is very simple - defend as a Counter-Terrorist, attack as a Terrorist to plant the bomb or save the hostages as a CT. I am sure most of you already know this and I doubt there are gamers that haven't heard or know the gameplay of Counter-Strike, so I am sharing here more of my experience. I wish I could find my CS Anthology account which I've lost since 2008. So, I decided I am going to buy this game again and here you go - more than a thousand hours played. I still play it from time to time to this day and it brings back many great memories and I sometimes even stumble upon people I've played with years ago. I think Counter-Strike changed gaming in a major way and we wouldn't have many games like we have today, if this game wouldn't exist. I am sure many of people already have played games like CS:GO, but never the roots. I doubt any of you will play it for more than an hour, because it's much more simple and it differs a lot in my opinion from CS:GO and modern games. I am glad that I lived through the golden era of shooters and if I'd have to rate it, it'd 10/10 ofcourse,
LightningRane;-;SImply a classic game, nothing will ever match the tension of being the last terrorist on your team and trying to detonate the bomb, has it aged well? Pfft no, but if you want to experience what got many people into online shooters then buy it. You honestly deserve it. Unless you have the new Counter-Strike.
JovaNa.;-;Best of best
<SPG>;-;No words can describe this amazing game.....
-;-;Best game in the world :)
GUNHAPPYTOM;-;An awesome game takes me back to the good old days !!
Iron King;-;one of my all time favorite games... this is a classic. i will never forget the fast paced action this game encompasses due to my youth. i played countless hours of this and loved every second of it.
Trollogtfo;-;Aaah, keep spending so much money on this game hahaha, love it though
-=[X][G]=- DL - silverfox;-;more then 5 years play this game
Dr.Pepper Is Gay;-;This game is 10/10
SECRT;-;The game is too lagy i got rip off. I going to play mega man 6, bros.
BLUNT GW#;-;Nice game
ALABAJZER;-;i love this game this game is awesome!
sux -ENDURANCE-;-;Nice game !!!!!!!!!!
Sean3;-;Counter-Strike set the foundation for online competitive team-play FPS. And it's still a viable game over 10 years later.
Dr. Patryk;-;Ahh... Good old times.
$CoOBY-D00;-;PRO's KA ADDDDA... :P
Basti;-;One of my all time favorite games & the best eSports game ever. Played it on various accounts since 2003, real masterpiece.
Obito. #nt2ez4wall<3ace:');-;rekt. play cs go xD
Iced Tizzle;-;Skins are free. I now have a Bayonet. 10/10 better than csgo
Sonnington;-;Probably the best shooter ever.
mwheeldown.rebel;-;recomand !
B005T3D;-;EPIC and LEGENDARY game
Zora Gamer;-;Still better than any other Call of Duty.
lyfe;-;Massive :D
Cthulhu;-;This game is immortal.
GravityMaster;-;cool
();-;OH MY GOD BEST GAME EVER I HAVE SPENT MORE THAN 1000 HOURS ON THIS AND IT CLEARED MY RECORD TIME OF HOW MUCH I WAS ON PLAYING THIS GAME AND I GOT VAC BANNED FROM THIS GAME TOO OH MY GOD I LOVE THIS GAME ITS THE BEST
U FoCKiN WoT m8!;-;hehe i bet it would still be fun 2030
457ndyf;-;ing neopets is better then this piece of  game
RiseAgainst;-;cool
~|The|~ PhoeniX <3;-;WooW ! So cool ^^
Logique;-;Nice game. Amazing with friends.
Cats Empire #EidInventory;-;hey you are good in csgo but also have few hours playing it, how? -nah i just played cs1.6 long enough to play any other fps game.
kakarot;-;The best action game!
Stefan SX;-;Counter strike is a game that teaches you how to use your eyes to there full potential. You must be a fast thinker and good at stratigic thought. I have NEVER enjoyed a game as much as i do with cs
IVaIR;-;I dont uderstand steam, I hate when in your library are so many games that you dont play it makes me fell terible and i cant buy only the Counter Strike 1.6 beacuse there is only Buy Counter-Strike 1 Anthology and Buy Counter-Strike: Condition Zero  hapens.
Shaden.;-;this is the best game i play before cs:go i recomand it because it has everithing do you need when you are tired
detectiw !;-;The best game ever !
Itswilsonbro;-;old,cheap,fun and purely a classic cant go wrong here!
neteX;-;1.6 the game i was competitive in :)
Buddy;-;I would put this game inside of my mouth, and then i would molest it and love it forever keeping it in my basement for 10 years until finally gaben finds it and returns it to the valve habitat in which i will be sent to prison. In prison i will be spending the majority of my time molesting my pillow dreaming that it is actually counter-strike.
TacoKitties;-;So I recently bought a valve pack... now all counterstrikes crash min ingame even though they run 30-60fps
Mika *Stix6029*;-;The first ever Counter-Strike game that started it all ! The game that marked a generation and taught us that we can run faster with a knife,you will not regret buying this game. Score: 10/10
Envy.;-;Classic. 9/10
b3cUl3tzZ;-;A game where you can relax with your friends
>Romeo<;-;The Best!
Original;-;mybe old grapchics but when you install it you will know why its called the best FPS game ! *** have over 3,000 hours on cracked version***
KaK0 Da Malezai.;-;great game
well | CS 1.6;-;Legendary game <3
Nptn;-;Good Game Played It 5-6 Years In old acc
varosHima;-;The best
RANINAGHI;-;Old but good :D
=(e)= Spat856;-;This game is amazing but it feels really clunky. if you want to get a better feel of Counter-Strike just get Counter Strike: Source. Its pretty much CS but with a better feeling physics and better internet sync. Besides that the game feels a little weird its still a really fun game.
SPRMKD!;-;BEST GAME! :)
==[4wp]3rtunity==>;-;GooD Game. as wellas one of my fav games..!! Nyc work..!!
PolarBear <3;-;1.6!!! I have played WarZone version of it for 3-4 years... Steam version is totally better ;) You can join servers where your friends are at and even bots are good at this game :D
Axollyk;-;I missed this game. This is the best game of all time!
MR.CAVS;-;First game added to steam. http://store.steampowered.com/app/10/
Frank-N-Furter;-;It's ing Counter-Strike.
ebg;-;This game has the graphics of Half-:ife but is an amazing shooter. It has years of expirienced gamers still playing in its servers and... Dang it random person! If you haven't bought this just scroll up and press the buy!
Gollypon;-;I laughed, I cried, I lost 10 pounds! If you loved the book, you'll love the movie 10/10
AnKO~DC;-;the game of heros
God Howard;-;No iron sight or pistol whipping? What a load of
AK1Scrub;-;BEST GAME EVER MADE, with the exception of previous versions like 1.5. I've been playing this game since internet cafes were prevalent and I STILL can't get enough.
Cringleberry;-;Doesn't crash in 4k 10/10
LemmeNinjaDefuse!!;-;----------------------------------------- Counter-Strike ----------------------------------------- ----------------------------------------- Overview ----------------------------------------- The basic point of the game is to play as terrorists and counter terrorists. Stopping the terrorists planting bombs is the key feature to this game. As terrorists you can plant the bomb or on other maps, you can try to stop counter terrorists from saving the hostages. ----------------------------------------- Any Addons ----------------------------------------- You can download gun skins and let them be visible to you and you only. No DLC for this map because you can make your own custom content (This is not easy to do). ----------------------------------------- The Community ----------------------------------------- The community is still live and active so this game is NOT dead. There are still hundreds of 24/7 servers active on every map and even on custom maps. ----------------------------------------- Final Rating ----------------------------------------- I think this game is outstanding. 9.5/10 Definatly pick it up if you just want to shoot some people. :)
G-Man;-;What means smurfing?
clayman;-;Might be the best game ever made in the history of FPS shooters! 10/10
Mystic Killer | L!0N_H34RT | -;-;No matter for how long you play it.. you'll end up playing it everyday! :D
jvs;-;Source  pra frutas o
Casp^ (   ) SAVAGE;-;544hours on record, not for nothing, best classic ever
Sawaeron;-;> Joined server > Chose T side > Planted bomb > Got kicked for "Tienes mucha porno cierrala y luego entra" > Translation says "You have a lot of porn then enter." 10/10 would get kicked for porn I don't own or watch
Kitsy;-;Nah, this game is fun but glitch as hell serch for a popper game..
Gernenolf;-;Game pretty good. But ... Here is so friendly players that they love your whole family. Here you can find my father, and learn who drives your nurse in the movie. Here are 10 summer geniuses from around the world will teach you life, and help to expand your vocabulary. A check your patience and endurance. Here you can learn multiple languages. Winter here only selected cancers. Here you are the king and God, if you bought the mother of a microphone. Here's your virginity under 100% protection. This is the place for you and your friends !11111
Unnamed Newbie;-;10/10 Would get wrecked by Russians any day.
Jordan Hameski;-;Play hard, go pro!
w;-;Counter Strike is like Life to me ,,, i am nothing without it and the best part that because of steam it makes it more safer to play thanks valve For making such an awesome game!!!
champioN;-;Nice shooter game for ever ! :)
DasWiesel;-;Classic. Probably the best CS.
Spurgeri;-;tgaeyr 0gh u<5yuitghtriflkjyoiu56yuit0oi<spdoxgbujidutfiyrtnfsdioupgiobhgidbt9uhotre98rgt7438gr4398grtehguowerafuhfrewuiortilhsfrouipehrupyesahuiuoewtiaow8reputghjrdaikjloeujt5geiroshyuaiurkj nmghbewjrhshfyuisew9d90rfuw3a9<gTE4R4RTG5UOHPGREAYPO9GHTF'UY8 6YU5KFDESRG8ER RF9DGIYIFR34WIOQR4TPOL5L5K4OPTG09IRGDZFRG7Y78UR5EPOYTL5O4900+RE8T0E94R8T7UFBGFDLHF+TOHJRSUTIK7Y6TFULPOIUY9P8I9OHI9OLCYF
A-to-M;-;reakemduyou bleat'
The Irons;-;Second best game
IamPac;-;Nice game .
ChiminimMeister;-;The Counter-Strike series is without a doubt the best fps games of all time.
Sir Guyman The III;-;The hand models, animations, weapon textures, and custom maps all make this game an enjoyable experience. Oh yeah but just add functional bots so I dont have to download  Z-Bots, which, are not realistic in any way possible (aimbot, movement patterns, staring contests with enemies). Although the game is a classic representation of how modernized tactical shooters should be produced, the hackers are always going to be there to ruin the fun. Also, some seriously dysfunctional hit detection occurs during most matches. Also, not trying to be too judgemental, but the game would have been a lot easier to play if the crosshairs had center dots. I say this because Source and G.O. have center crosshair dots, which make aiming much more persistent. ***8.5/10*** Final Statement: It's a damn ugly game, but that's what makes it good. Once modded, it can look like it runs on a completely different engine. However, the detail and missing physics are not present due to the limitations of GoldSrc's dated capabilities. Oh, and this game does not deserve to be ran with mods. Just simple and complex retextures of the weapons provided within the game. I would like to tell you that this game is better than Source and G.O., but half the community sticks to the newer iterations rather than the original.
allworth;-;Time to say goodbye to the grandpa! :) However, it is one of the most popular online games ever.
dicks;-;Played better than most of russians then get banned from server. 10/10 would rek again more russians
Skitel * <twitch.tv>;-;Good game. Classic :)
ebg;-;This game has the graphics of Half-:ife but is an amazing shooter. It has years of expirienced gamers still playing in its servers and... Dang it random person! If you haven't bought this just scroll up and press the buy!
Nptn;-;Good Game Played It 5-6 Years In old acc
well | CS 1.6;-;Legendary game <3
Mr.Grepper Schwankson;-;Servers that include boats, but sometimes...
@LFREKOIL;-;THIS GAME SHOULD BE REQUIRED ATLEAST 100HOURS LOGGED BEFORE ANYONE CAN PLAY CSGO.
Zave;-;I hate this game. 10/10 would play again.
Mexicano # Fusion;-;The best shooter !
Ahri;-;You never heard about Counter-Strike? wah, lol.
Nexx;-;This game actualy take my Life :v i cant stop playing it since i kicked my enemys a$$ out ! to all who say 10/10 dont make me laugh it deserve more than 999999999999999/10 you fools ! its all about good memories <3 love yA
Lone Wanderer;-;lots of fun !!
Zave;-;I hate this game. 10/10 would play again.
Nobody's Hero;-;I have been playing 1.6 before, now it's kinda memories for me.
@LFREKOIL;-;THIS GAME SHOULD BE REQUIRED ATLEAST 100HOURS LOGGED BEFORE ANYONE CAN PLAY CSGO.
Mr.Grepper Schwankson;-;Servers that include boats, but sometimes...
yeah, ok bro (No Monitor);-;Wall banged through an entire concrete building. 10/10
Rise against The cow!;-;CS   !!!!!!
Bub;-;The original Counter-Strike, Valve made a multiplayer masterpiece here; it is almost faultless, apart from its old graphics. 14/15 - "Good"
B005T3D;-;EPIC and LEGENDARY game
Fiflax;-;After 2 years of not playing this, i can say that ill never get tired of it.
Rockefeller;-;Old but gold
Redd;-;Lot's of Fun in this classic CS, brings back Nostalgic days when i played it back in a LAN room, EXPECT A CLASSIC FPS FIRST PERSON SHOOTER!
Eternal Darkness;-;This game made history. 9/10
f0cus. -A-;-;My Love <3
Jaeger(ReCalled);-;Fells good to play the original. Still hard at times because CS:GO is many years after this game, but fells good to play!
Jaeger(ReCalled);-;Fells good to play the original. Still hard at times because CS:GO is many years after this game, but fells good to play!
[AG] PantherDaPro;-;AWESOME MUST HAVE :D
That_Feel :A;-;Greatest game of its time!
qske;-;not as awful as the other ones
g1banica;-;Quick action game for everyone :)
JHG89365KLGDF+4;-;i was told to be done with it through Closed shutters, flooded floors, i wanted to sail out the front door. morning anew I'm counting the texts you sent me I'm trying hard to take this well, but the cradle has been rocked and my feelings are a stir. and I'm not really sure how to approach this landing despair and so many eyes on me, i felt like commiting suicide open the door, 40mph, dead forever more and so little time, we we kids just exploring, trying to find a way out of this surburban story And that my friends is an Emo song straight out of the state of New Jersey. Taking back sunday? Thursday? Pffftt this is way more garbage tier than that.
subboy^_^saurus;-;BEST GAME OUT !
l)ark LighT^;-;csshield v5 error couldn't find usermsgbase pointer what is this i cannot play counter strike :(
Juvil;-;Entertainment for the whole family.
FaggotFC;-;I liked it, but now it lacks a player community. Fun, Good and aweosme!
HOW_TO_MLG_SKILL;-;counter strike is my life.
Katana;-;Based off of the acclaimed Half-Life mod, Counter-Strike is one of the most beloved FPS is recent memory. A team based tactical shooter with a simple concept but complex way of using it. For any Counter-Strike collector, you have to get the original!
NaturallyStoned;-;One of the best first person game
Sliither;-;Old-school as , best game if you are good at shooting games.
rainbow potato;-;Love it. 10/10
Lukathecoo;-;Best game ever confirmed I give it 9/11 doritos ALAHU AKBAR
[F]ire|Fox|;-;No FPS game will ever come close to the original Counter-Strike. It's a shame the days when everyone played it are over.
Barney;-;A real classic. One of the best first person shooters of all time and my favorite game of all time aswell. This game is so good that it will for sure never die! :D 10/10
bel;-;Go go go! Go and play the best multiplayer FPS ever made.
Amine D.;-;The best game !
|Prime|;-;i want my money back , i don't like the game!
Erwin Rommel Back Aug 6;-;Still fun today.
Shut Down;-;Recommended :)
Lord Of The Onions;-;better than cod... SERIOUSLY this game is a great success which will never die... PS: old skool game
Erlioth;-;This game ruined my life. Played beta-1.5 30 hours at a time. Easily have hours clocked in the 6 digits between versions, just not on this steam account. Stopped going to school. Stopped eating. Dropped out
boxr-BeaveZ;-;One of the best FPS's ever created, while obviously being old & CSGO being the new stuff, there are still small & nice communities left on 1.6 making it worth playing still.
eh fuck off;-;Great classic created by good developers, the CS community is still strong today.
TheGamerAlex[!]^;-;ABSOLUTLY GOOD GAME! I can jump now 255 CountJump 3 Strafes 100 Sync! Good game with bugs :F
Harry The Enfield;-;An awesome game that i never play ;(
machine guns for kids;-;I don't remember how I managed to log this many hours into this, I do not remember at what point in my life this was. Irregardless, timeless classic from what I remember.
SANTA;-;I Love This Game :*
MrTNorton;-;An addition to the older generation of counter strike but a link in the game that we have today counter-Strike Global Offensive. Its physics are alright and I recommend it but advise you look at the newer versions of the game but its nice to own some of the originals.
hopping everywhere;-;"old school" game. She is beautiful, but time has passed
ballislyfe23727;-;ruined my life
Grimaud;-;Inventor of the First Person Tactical Shooter genre a.k.a. MMORPG. Also the first known instance of anger came from this game.
Friendly  GamerQQ;-;This is the game that started it all for me. When it was a mod for Half Life and Steam didn't exist, those were the days. Since then the Counter-Strike franchise has only expanded and has only increased its esports realm. The original counter-strike may lack in graphics for today's standards however for its time it was awesome. I enjoyed AS_ maps like oilrig, arctic, and various other maps that are no longer in the 'mainstream cs:go scene'. 10/10 - Sometimes I play this to remember the good times. I wouldn't pay more than $2.50 for this game, or buy the Valve Complete Bundle to get this great game and more great Valve exclusives.
KU BE JKN www.gamelife.ro;-;Old but very beautiful game
Raresh;-;This games is an epic one ! It makes you either the perfect Terrorist for Osama Bin Laden , either the perfect Anti-Terrorist for missies Barack Obama !! I played so much as a Terrorist , that I can kill both Bin Laden and Obama in the same day. 09.11.2001 / 10
NEO esta de patinete *;-;SEM IGUAL CS 1.6 !!!
Dhx [TRADING/BUYING/SELLING];-;i dont know why this game so accdicting
bad vibes;-;My most played game.. ever.. countless hours played since March 2000 when I first discovered the mod. It's still a great shooter to this day. People talk about how many days /played they have in World of Warcraft, but that probably doesn't come close to what some of us have in CS. It's hard to imagine that I've played a single franchise for this long, and it just doesn't get old. 15 years down, and probably another 15 in future iterations. D2 24/7.
[B.M.O] Mikeo (3);-;it's good i guess
CrAzY #10th std #STuDiES;-;Counter - Strike Is a game which most off the ppl play in india.... its very intresting game.. I Like Counter - Strike Very Much... xD
ph420-o.O;-;after a decade of CS CITY  from beta release to 1.5 to 1.6 to source to CSGO there all AMAAZZZINNNGGGGGG. The 1deag evolves as do we!!!!! CS is what the foundation of steam was even built on... if you own steam and no cs city  you dono what you got yourself into :D
Vanish;-;Great Game!
SnakeFist;-;Its ok... i guess.
SaimoP;-;Back to the classics! Never forgetting the thousands of hours I played this game, looking through every mod and searching for tons of unofficial versions of the game, because I couldn't afford it. I started playing 5v5s in Source and now I am searching for PUGs in 1.6 too. It will be so fun when I find some!
kakarot;-;The best action game!
();-;OH MY GOD BEST GAME EVER I HAVE SPENT MORE THAN 1000 HOURS ON THIS AND IT CLEARED MY RECORD TIME OF HOW MUCH I WAS ON PLAYING THIS GAME AND I GOT VAC BANNED FROM THIS GAME TOO OH MY GOD I LOVE THIS GAME ITS THE BEST
Buddy;-;I would put this game inside of my mouth, and then i would molest it and love it forever keeping it in my basement for 10 years until finally gaben finds it and returns it to the valve habitat in which i will be sent to prison. In prison i will be spending the majority of my time molesting my pillow dreaming that it is actually counter-strike.
~|The|~ PhoeniX <3;-;WooW ! So cool ^^
Logique;-;Nice game. Amazing with friends.
U FoCKiN WoT m8!;-;hehe i bet it would still be fun 2030
457ndyf;-;ing neopets is better then this piece of  game
AnKO~DC;-;the game of heros
God Howard;-;No iron sight or pistol whipping? What a load of
Shaden.;-;this is the best game i play before cs:go i recomand it because it has everithing do you need when you are tired
LemmeNinjaDefuse!!;-;----------------------------------------- Counter-Strike ----------------------------------------- ----------------------------------------- Overview ----------------------------------------- The basic point of the game is to play as terrorists and counter terrorists. Stopping the terrorists planting bombs is the key feature to this game. As terrorists you can plant the bomb or on other maps, you can try to stop counter terrorists from saving the hostages. ----------------------------------------- Any Addons ----------------------------------------- You can download gun skins and let them be visible to you and you only. No DLC for this map because you can make your own custom content (This is not easy to do). ----------------------------------------- The Community ----------------------------------------- The community is still live and active so this game is NOT dead. There are still hundreds of 24/7 servers active on every map and even on custom maps. ----------------------------------------- Final Rating ----------------------------------------- I think this game is outstanding. 9.5/10 Definatly pick it up if you just want to shoot some people. :)
Monster!;-;One of the best game i ever played!
m$^ [A];-;Best FPS Game ever. I fart everytime i play it.
BEC00L # 7 Days CD again...;-;Old but still gold
Wodecky ';-;AHA POLECAM TO GOWNo
M1r3l skill or l3gend ?!`;-;Best shooter from 2000 till now. Like everything.
boxr-BeaveZ;-;One of the best FPS's ever created, while obviously being old & CSGO being the new stuff, there are still small & nice communities left on 1.6 making it worth playing still.
eh fuck off;-;Great classic created by good developers, the CS community is still strong today.
TheGamerAlex[!]^;-;ABSOLUTLY GOOD GAME! I can jump now 255 CountJump 3 Strafes 100 Sync! Good game with bugs :F
chuck;-;Get on a non-steam server. Wreck everyone. Get banned/destroyed. 10/10 would give my soul again. P.S these hours are just on steam, i've recently purchased this game, i've played since when i was 4 years old, like 20 hours a week, so 602 hours is just like a .. extra i've played, now i'm 16 years old.
Papa John;-;There's a pizza shop in this game that I used to virtually visit as a child because my parents couldn't afford a car. Great times and many memories later, I am Papa John's spiritual leader. 10/10
I Can't Believe You've Done This;-;Played with middle aged woman from Yorkshire, UK. Thought I was playing Second Life.
[LgK] KrAzY!;-;I Love This Game :D Playing Since 2010
Rampuri;-;The mother of all FPS The gameplay is so perfect giving the player the whole control over the character's movement at all times that it tests the players skills. It's a perfect example of a game which is easy to learn but hard to master
Lusos Archorios;-;Vey interesting and good fps game, you all should try this classic game
Vineric!;-;Very nice game.
ChesterAVR;-;Cool game)
tvojnajebanytatko;-;Nice game
KasMes^^ggf.;-;Awesome game, luv it
Lord Of The Onions;-;better than cod... SERIOUSLY this game is a great success which will never die... PS: old skool game
Snowstorm;-;Legendary game!
Soundwave214.exe;-;I really loved this game! till' got broken -,-
Flop;-;I really like this game.
thebombboom;-;pretty fun except for them hackers on gun game.
Faiz;-;I spent a better part of my childhood playing this game, back before Steam became the ubiqitious gaming medium (read: Valve's money-making lovechild) for "shut up and take my damn money". How can I describe this game? What one phrase summarizes the ostensive thrust of epic time sink that is Counter-Strike? Easy - "just one more round!" And the whirlpool of regret washes over you as dusk turns to dawn and you realize that you didn't study for your freakin' biology exam. For shame. Too bad this box isn't large enough to contain my stories of grand LAN parties. Needless to say, this was an amazing game. Though after years passing, the humor lies in sadness that the same 13 year olds that I left behind are still playing.. Worse yet, they're being domineered by server admins who are exactly 1 year older! (I figure a bedtime extension merits you the ability to ban & kick players). So yeah, before the new CS comes out, spend some time acquainting yourself with this FPS tour de force.
ambulance driver;-;I've been playing since the days before steam. I've spent hours upon hours playing and I still talk to some clan-mates from our "CAL" days. Great times, great game.
DJ-sAMgabrielle #Retired +$28;-;Here's my 12 word review for this beautiful game. Every time i play this it takes me back to my childhood.
flipinny;-;Been playing it since it came out...
Shocker;-;The best action FPS game ever made. Hands down. 10/10 Would play another 1k hours.
Kaori;-;Better than source
jorj;-;Running and shooting has never felt so easy.
b0ng;-;before switching to CS:GO this was one of the best CS ever :)
Gretchens Bitchen Linens;-;wouldn't mind this game if the community wasn't full of wife beater enthusiasts and Nazi supporters... just sayin'
ballislyfe23727;-;ruined my life
KU BE JKN www.gamelife.ro;-;Old but very beautiful game
StraightShooterr;-;Before there was a Call of duty. Before there was a Battlefield, Before there was a Halo. There was one multi player FPS that reigned supreme. Because all the new comers migrate to CS GO, the community is made up of mostly older, more mature people.
Erlioth;-;This game ruined my life. Played beta-1.5 30 hours at a time. Easily have hours clocked in the 6 digits between versions, just not on this steam account. Stopped going to school. Stopped eating. Dropped out
zzw+;-;A classic and a must play.
Bad Penguin //PortugalFunMapS;-;This game is realy good! Old but gold!
Mariotravel209;-;Counter-Strike is just simply one of the best FPS games out there in the PC Gaming Industry! Trust me, it's really worth buying! same goes with it's sequels :D
THE ROCK;-;old school rocks ofcourse :)
__[H]0|3|3Y- -[MaGG3R]- ^;-;any one help me my cs is not installed any one suggetion me.................. :P :D
dreamy;-;greatest fps of all time. rip
Paper de vidre;-;played just a little. it's ok
TonitoDos;-;I wish I played this 2012 or 2011 cuz then I would reck my friends :(
Adio;-;Still the best CS
JIm;-;250 hours of playing pixelated CS:GO.
KroTeK;-;That is a very interesting game, a very nice shooter game.
STARLIGHT;-;The best game in the World!
Mr.Juno;-;This Game is an addictive game :)
maxi7;-;An original classic, Counter-Strike. Even though on my old account I only had 400 hrs compared to my 1,200 on Source, This game was still amazing. Now, CS:GO will take over, but I still enjoy playing 1.6 every once and a while.
GTFO ThePac2Man;-;Its to old
sparroW;-;Good game but there aint many communities out there to play in!
Forta Majora!!!;-;good game ! action !
~Tw!sT. * Findingclans;-;I hope CS [Counter Strike] The Epic game don't need a review and i would like to say that this is the most Convinient and loving game i've ever played :D
[RedSkull];-;IT's Really FUN
jon saiyajin;-;This game was kind of fun, I played it for over 2000 hours.
wape;-;This will be more of a ''my experience with this game'' type of review, because saying things like ''great gameplay'' will not suit something I've experienced with Counter-Strike. Here you go: I remember back in 2002 I was at a friend's house and he was playing a game. I didn't know the name of the game nor I had internet to find it. A few weeks passed by and another friend came over and he didn't have a computer, so he brought a disc with a game in it. He told me that it was one of the best games and from that very moment I knew that it is going to be the game I saw at the other friend's house. When I saw the Counter-Strike logo I was filled with gamegasm (?) and I was so happy. I don't remember a day when I was so happy like back then. So, the journey started. I was playing it hardcore. Made friends, clans, was involved in communities and even made two myself. Counter-Strike is my first game which I played competitively and it was a whole experience. Playing public servers and maybe some servers with mods was very fun, but playing it competitively made it very intense and stressful. In a pleasant way, ofcourse. Shooters these days try to be different, advanced in a way. Sometimes the most simple games like Counter-Strike are the ones that live to this day. Also, there are plenty of mods to keep your attention to this game. The gameplay is very simple - defend as a Counter-Terrorist, attack as a Terrorist to plant the bomb or save the hostages as a CT. I am sure most of you already know this and I doubt there are gamers that haven't heard or know the gameplay of Counter-Strike, so I am sharing here more of my experience. I wish I could find my CS Anthology account which I've lost since 2008. So, I decided I am going to buy this game again and here you go - more than a thousand hours played. I still play it from time to time to this day and it brings back many great memories and I sometimes even stumble upon people I've played with years ago. I think Counter-Strike changed gaming in a major way and we wouldn't have many games like we have today, if this game wouldn't exist. I am sure many of people already have played games like CS:GO, but never the roots. I doubt any of you will play it for more than an hour, because it's much more simple and it differs a lot in my opinion from CS:GO and modern games. I am glad that I lived through the golden era of shooters and if I'd have to rate it, it'd 10/10 ofcourse,
TheMeatMan;-;Great game for practicing FPS skills
stampede for dank weed;-;i cant find the skins i bought valve why
Keira DragonKnightley;-;Nice game!
Valdis;-;A classic that would never be forgotten
Kill4Kiss;-;So many history from the game <3
Big H;-;if only people played it
mwheeldown.rebel;-;recomand !
Sonnington;-;Probably the best shooter ever.
momarms;-;Old is gold :)
totalnoob;-;old but gold <3
NucLeuS^;-;Best game of the first decade of the 21st century, and, along with its sequal, global offensive, best team based tactical shooter there is. 10/10.
svempa;-;One of the best games ever made.
Sotchi.xDDDDDDDDDDDDDDD;-;pLay On DuReX
Aurastream;-;Hey there! Remember all the good old gaming days? Searching for mix teams, joining up with some random dudes playing all night long? Totally missing some school days here and there? Then you probably, like me, played this game countless of hours. You know all the default maps better than your first name and have surely tested out thousands of custom maps, hundreds of aim-maps, hundreds of KZ/jumping maps, Warcraft 3 mod (a mod to a game that was a mod, how ironic?), Zombie-mod, gungame mod, evenly and evilly slaughtered all your friends in deathmatch, met thousands of players from all around the world, even from Africa and pwned unimaginable amounts of hardcore and noob-players. This game will absolutely never die, players will keep trying to find and therefor create new servers and the old PCW/mix-games are still going to be played in the silent even though the competetive gaming scene has gone over to CS:GO. And thank you scene for doing that. This game really needs the cult status in the shadow of newer and more refreshing games. Let it still be there, reminding newer generation of players how the good old times were. Let all the videos be there on youtube especially of the bigger contests. It makes me happy. So, what is this game all about? Well, it is simple. The main theme of the game is either "bomb-planting terrorists vs bomb-defusing counter-terrorists", "hostage-rescue-mode" or "save the VIP-mode". A competetive first person shooter game that has immersive action-packed gameplay all over your screen. You will most likely be flashed, smoked out, shot from far away by a sniper, spawnkilled by your sister, knifed by your brother, exploded by either a bomb or a thrown HE-granade or camped to death by a noob. Sounds good? Then join in the action! You are not just late, you are very late!
{adpt} ReNo.o7;-;Good old school game. Some cheaters though which admins on servers need to watch for. Lots of servers still up to play in. FPS, buy guns and complete objective. Can become repetitive and boring.
Allram;-;Best game in the genre!
famas_king;-;started in 1999 still people love it and play it a must game for every FPS player
Steve;-;CS 1.6 is the best version ever made. The best FPS game ever made. I have spent thousands and thousands of hours in this game. Still today it will be a bliss to play this game if you like FPS games. Definetely a MUST have.
I'm Mexican crimson.gg;-;Best fps game ever - hands down
sdaniaal;-;Looks like the rest of my life is gonna be waiting for server to fill up.... Screw that #### i'm out.
Rampage;-;Verry cool, verry nice, i like it!
French Money;-;counter strike global offensive may be good but counter strike 1.6 will always be the best
Mighty Justy;-;This game will never die.
TP;-;I put Counter Strike and Battlefield as my two favourite online fps games. Now those two are way too different to say who's better but this is definetly a very fun game that every fan of the franchise needs to try out. The fact that it still has a tone of competitive servers make it still a relevent game and as fun to play as it's ever been. I'd recommend CSGO for higher end machines, but if you're playing on a lower end pc like me this is a must have game
Ramona.exe;-;cool
ZeniTh;-;Addictive
Nachuj tok gyvenim bliat!!!!!!;-;What?
RoastedChicken;-;The most influential FPS game of all time. Probably the best one too. 11/10 i ing love this game.
Izuna;-;Game of my childhood. <3
Panda | csgo-flip.net;-;one of the best games ever.
RaVeXX a.k.a jobistaja;-;in my opinion, this is the best game ever made. LOVE IT.
CreEP!;-;Classic..
RaipattuGeddu;-;.....cs is life.....cs is every thing.....
Exchanging Id /Selling ID;-;Awesome fps gamehttp://store.steampowered.com/app/10/# too much competitive <3
reediculous;-;Hands down best FPS game ever. #nesc #1447 #ureshii
Ventsislav;-;Simply the best first person shooter of all time.
Sp!R!T^_^ #RannVJRunn;-;one of the most amazing action games of this generation... we hope that the game is played even by the next generation :D
ssssstevie^v^;-;I liked this game once. It looks like minecraft o.o
Zevs;-;very strong game :D 4ever cs 1.6 !!!!!!!!!!!!
XxX_KnightMare_XxX;-;Even though there are better and more advanced Counter-Strikes, still worth it.
aLexftw;-;Best shooting game ever!
Insert_;-;It's K.
Nachuj tok gyvenim bliat!!!!!!;-;What?
RoastedChicken;-;The most influential FPS game of all time. Probably the best one too. 11/10 i ing love this game.
Insert_;-;It's K.
aLexftw;-;Best shooting game ever!
LenHard`;-;One of the best FPS games in history. Its one of a kind. Easy to run and fun to play.
_;-;Reminds me of old school gaming
CreEP!;-;Classic..
zQr;-;Best game, thanx
RaVeXX a.k.a jobistaja;-;in my opinion, this is the best game ever made. LOVE IT.
Panda | csgo-flip.net;-;one of the best games ever.
David.;-;Admin destroyed me and my cs 1.6 not working (connection to server time out)Help PLEASE!!!!!
RaipattuGeddu;-;.....cs is life.....cs is every thing.....
[K] Killo. @ProPlayer;-;Great game !
g;-;After all these years this shooter remains to be a classic that can't be ignored. No other shooter is as accessible, easy to play, simple nor skillful as this. It can be enjoyed anywhere with the 64MB portable version for LAN parties. It's all about aim, accuracy, quick reflexes but does have a strategical element since it is a tactical shooter and there's no respawning. This game was a major turning point in the history of FPS, and this game is what made online multiplayer competitive gaming so popular.
reclusi0n;-;wallbang is real :3
ScrubbestLeague;-;I'm really bad at this game but people seem to like it. I think I paid like $5 for it.
EpIcTiMeS;-;I love this game!!! Buy it!
m$^ [A];-;Best FPS Game ever. I fart everytime i play it.
Blaze;-;Cannot beat a classic, if you love counterstrike source or counterstrike global offensive play 1.6 if you haven't original always
Ramona.exe;-;cool
reclusi0n;-;wallbang is real :3
g;-;After all these years this shooter remains to be a classic that can't be ignored. No other shooter is as accessible, easy to play, simple nor skillful as this. It can be enjoyed anywhere with the 64MB portable version for LAN parties. It's all about aim, accuracy, quick reflexes but does have a strategical element since it is a tactical shooter and there's no respawning. This game was a major turning point in the history of FPS, and this game is what made online multiplayer competitive gaming so popular.
famas_king;-;started in 1999 still people love it and play it a must game for every FPS player
sdaniaal;-;Looks like the rest of my life is gonna be waiting for server to fill up.... Screw that #### i'm out.
Noxie;-;dis gaem is like gabens mouth, nice
wbyokomo;-;There is nothing special on this game anymore, not safe to use, cheaters everywhere.. Better buy Counter-Strike: Global Offensive
-PurePentafyllo-;-;The greatest game in the whole universe, what if is so old, it haves so many players playing even today, this game will never forget it, it will be always in our hearts COUNTER STRIKE 1.6.
Exchanging Id /Selling ID;-;Awesome fps gamehttp://store.steampowered.com/app/10/# too much competitive <3
Masked Man;-;ahh... the classic counter-strike... only one of my favorite games :D. anyways, moving on to the review. pros: Very alive (with alot of servers) Many Mods for it (examples: Zombie Mode, CSDM, gungame and many others...) HD models are from CZ (i don't use them though) Bots (Podbot is my favorite) Cons: no respawning on normal mode
Khiladi1000;-;Nice game
Marcelus;-;CS deep on our hearts since 1999!  Is not outdated at all, is the same ex-girlfriend that wants to suck the life out of your being. I also recommend CS GO over Source: http://store.steampowered.com/app/730/ Spread the love! ;)
monkEY-;-;The Alpha and Omega, beginning and the end. One of the finest competitive shooters of our time.
Zah;-;This is first game when i play. Best game ever! But, now, its time to go far away, CSGO. :D
Ink Incorporated Incorporation;-;This is the original Counter-Strike game that started the series. It started off as a Half-Life mod made in 1999, and Valve got their hands on it to make it standalone. I'm sure a good deal of you guys are familiar with the concept of Counter-Strike, but let me explain. There are two official gamemodes in Counter-Strike. You have a gamemode involving bombs, and you have a gamemode involving hostages. Counter-Terrorists, the good guys, have to defuse the bombs and rescue the hostages. They also have to kill the terrorists, the bad guys, which is another way for a victory on their side. The two factions have different weapons such as counter-terrorists having a Maverick M4A1 Carbine while the terrorists have an AK-47. There are six types of weapons in Counter-Strike. You have pistols. Pistols are the secondary weapon of the game. They have decent accuracy, a good rate of fire, and low damage. The next group you have is the shotguns. They're designed for close range combat. One is pump-action while the other is automatic. You also have submachine guns which are automatic guns often used for close-range. They don't do a whole lot of damage. You have automatic rifles such as the AK-47. These guns have good accuracy, a high rate of fire, and moderate damage. You have sniper rifles which are the most accurate guns, and they are very good at killing. They're not very easy to use at close range, though. The last group is the machine gun group. The machine gun group only has one gun that has a large ammo reserve, decent accuracy, and a lot of damage. Some weapons cost a small amount of cash like the pistols, but some guns can cost a lot like the A.W.P sniper rifle or the machine gun. Other advantages include: -The game has a large community. -You don't need a good computer to run it. -The community has made custom maps and gamemodes. -Your skill from other Counter-Strike games can transfer pretty well. -The game is simply just fun and addicting. It's just ten bucks! Go for it!
-PurePentafyllo-;-;The greatest game in the whole universe, what if is so old, it haves so many players playing even today, this game will never forget it, it will be always in our hearts COUNTER STRIKE 1.6.
Noxie;-;dis gaem is like gabens mouth, nice
wbyokomo;-;There is nothing special on this game anymore, not safe to use, cheaters everywhere.. Better buy Counter-Strike: Global Offensive
Ink Incorporated Incorporation;-;This is the original Counter-Strike game that started the series. It started off as a Half-Life mod made in 1999, and Valve got their hands on it to make it standalone. I'm sure a good deal of you guys are familiar with the concept of Counter-Strike, but let me explain. There are two official gamemodes in Counter-Strike. You have a gamemode involving bombs, and you have a gamemode involving hostages. Counter-Terrorists, the good guys, have to defuse the bombs and rescue the hostages. They also have to kill the terrorists, the bad guys, which is another way for a victory on their side. The two factions have different weapons such as counter-terrorists having a Maverick M4A1 Carbine while the terrorists have an AK-47. There are six types of weapons in Counter-Strike. You have pistols. Pistols are the secondary weapon of the game. They have decent accuracy, a good rate of fire, and low damage. The next group you have is the shotguns. They're designed for close range combat. One is pump-action while the other is automatic. You also have submachine guns which are automatic guns often used for close-range. They don't do a whole lot of damage. You have automatic rifles such as the AK-47. These guns have good accuracy, a high rate of fire, and moderate damage. You have sniper rifles which are the most accurate guns, and they are very good at killing. They're not very easy to use at close range, though. The last group is the machine gun group. The machine gun group only has one gun that has a large ammo reserve, decent accuracy, and a lot of damage. Some weapons cost a small amount of cash like the pistols, but some guns can cost a lot like the A.W.P sniper rifle or the machine gun. Other advantages include: -The game has a large community. -You don't need a good computer to run it. -The community has made custom maps and gamemodes. -Your skill from other Counter-Strike games can transfer pretty well. -The game is simply just fun and addicting. It's just ten bucks! Go for it!
Zah;-;This is first game when i play. Best game ever! But, now, its time to go far away, CSGO. :D
Fiery;-;I didn't even play this game when I first reviewed it what the  why did I review this Counter-Strike. If you don't know what this game is, you should probably slap yourself and stop playing games because this  literally founded multiplayer first-person shooters. Okay, not "founded", Quake did that first but it sure as hell helped them develop into what they are today. While the graphics definitely haven't held up to standards today (kind of obvious since this game was released in ING 2000 AND STARTED DEVELOPMENT IN 1999), this game is still fun. Why? There's a lot more maps in the game, and as a result of low graphical quality, it's a LOT easier to run on old systems or just bad systems in general. And the gameplay is still just as fun as CS:S or even CS:GO. This game used to still be the 3rd most played game on Steam next to Team Fortress 2 ( ) and Dota 2, but that changed when CS:GO actually started to become a good game back in 2013. Now there's really only the most dedicated CS players that play this game. I don't recommend going into this game unless you're a dedicated CS veteran who wants to relive the history of CS and see what the first game got everyone hyped for. This game's great, I'm not going to lie, it's just the learning curve as of right now is STEEP. And that can be good or bad for some people. I'm definitely going to be spending more time in this game in the future just so I can get hours in the game and act like I'm actually good at Counter-Strike for once. That's about it, though.
Jani-Petteri #Deagle-Nigga;-;Wins Counter-Strike Source and Counter-Strike Global Offensive
monkEY-;-;The Alpha and Omega, beginning and the end. One of the finest competitive shooters of our time.
bFire^;-;Better than Source :i<3
leftSidej;-;Having only played CSGO for the past year or so, it is really nice to see what that game was rooted off of. I now know playing 1.6 what all the hype about Counter Strike is and the history behind it. 1.6 for it's time period was such a benchmark game. Really awesome!
travelPL;-;because they the best classics
Vertigo;-;10/10 its just counterstike :P
Albert;-;Cs its one of the best games ever , simply! 10/10
JeGeRmeIsTeR;-;It's old but very good game!
El Capitan Duck Sauce;-;I played this game for a few years and it made me puke constantly and have bloody diarrhea every day. 10/10 A++++++ would play again
the frying pan trader;-;fire in the hole fire in the hole fire in the hole
Pudliszki #PLEBANIA;-;so, i find it more fun than cs go dunno, my shots just hit better, it feels better
-=_x_L1ker_x_=-;-;Game is Love!!!!
[HK] P-Body;-;Nice Voice of Fire in the hole Simulator
Deneix;-;Wish if its like the old days ;( means I cant find the server that have fair fight and not dm like casual
Soggy;-;Miss the old days
Hotshot FROM HELL;-;My life < Counter Strike 1.6. Bought this game a bit too late... wish I would've been around to play it back in it's prime.
[TVV] Ravenclaw513;-;got this game free in a giveaway. Hours of fun ahead!
www.twitch.tv/Naiwy;-;Old school counter strike, the good times ;) 10/10
[GBD]XxGetRektM8xX;-;the old school CS!!! It is good to entertain yourself if you are searching for great classics
Donny;-;Played this one until CS:GO was released :)
ret3p;-;Back in the day, this was one of the games I spend the most hours playing. All day, everyday.
Saarawy /TEODORA<3;-;BEST GAME!
PiGood;-;A little better than Pac-Man.
Plankie;-;OK !~
Copper |Cu|;-;i think this game is one of the best games what ever coded in the written history
Bishopking63;-;Honestly it does nothing to explain to the player the concept of accuracy and it ruins the experience, how with just a crosshair am I expected to understand the difference between it being a little wider and a little narrower. Its a fun shooter don't get me wrong, but the whole crosshair  is bad and should have been reworked instead of kept in every CS game
Vuural;-;FIrst game in inventory!
sERGiobdN1;-;Old school lovely game
SSSG. Lucifer (Mai mult FER);-;This game is my childhood. I recommend this with all my soul and my hearth! :3
titty;-;Best competive FPS game ever.
nrw;-;The Best Game
R.;-;When u buy it u are happy. when u have play counter strike in a 1h u will  kill u self
Izzy;-;Counter-Strike, the father of all Counter-Strikes. 100/10
g4mbit.n0thing-;-;Best game of 90z,
pooploser420;-;Like minecraft without blocks
Fede;-;the best FPS on the world
Mosin;-;I started to play when I was 5, now I finally bought the steam version.....
Rhino Tank;-;Oldschool fk yea
Steve;-;Very good game aprt from the cheap  Servers running 64 tick and need upgrading with the amount of money people spend on the game
sweetstocking;-;im a counter strike fanatic and always will be, this i think is the best in the series it is what created and started the demolition modes in most fps games and fps multiplayer games, there is even a freakin nexon korean mmofps of this (i play that alot), this game and game series rules if you do not own it what is wrong with you ?! its part of PC FPS history!!!
Le TGM;-;The mother of all fps games. Old but gold.
Albert;-;Cs its one of the best games ever , simply! 10/10
the frying pan trader;-;fire in the hole fire in the hole fire in the hole
SlipperySloth;-;One of the best FPS games of all time. 10/10
Jordy;-;Where it all began!
Kinguin.ScreaM SAIYAJIN;-;Game Perfect game!
Ycee;-;Its counter strike ffs ;)
Vincent Law;-;- counter strike 1.6     ?!  !?     Clan War  -   -   ....  ... :D
StealthyWarrior;-;This FPS game should be a example of what a true fps game should be. None of perks upgrades none of that. Only you,your skills,teammates and guns. Talking about guns then all of them take skill to master because every single gun has its own spray pattern. Taking look at player count shows that this FPS game is much more popular still after all these years than its competetors. It is a must buy for someone who wants to play High learning curve strategic First Person Shooter.
Kinguin.ScreaM SAIYAJIN;-;Game Perfect game!
Ycee;-;Its counter strike ffs ;)
Vlad;-;This game is very old,but it is still one of the most enjoyable and played games.I read in a comment that,for gamers,the graphics aren't important,but the gameplay is.When we talk about Counter-Strike 1.6,it is very true.
despicable weeaboo subhuman;-;: Squid now
Aizel;-;Nice game
JeGeRmeIsTeR;-;It's old but very good game!
dmg;-;The game of the games
travelPL;-;because they the best classics
ARTHUR LP;-;the one and only best game ever
SSSG. Lucifer (Mai mult FER);-;This game is my childhood. I recommend this with all my soul and my hearth! :3
sorin 2;-;its awesome game
[AG]DR.GREEN75;-;This Game Will Never Be Bested, Still fantastic after all these years. Growing Up Playing This Game Was Amazing. The game that molded a generation. Best. Game. Ever.
TechnicalWaffle23 - DERANKED AGN;-;Killed my chilhood
Vuural;-;FIrst game in inventory!
plmkoo;-;good but there are only like 4 US servers and most disable flashes the shield certain weapons etc but its a good game surf maps are fun too but weird.
Bishopking63;-;Honestly it does nothing to explain to the player the concept of accuracy and it ruins the experience, how with just a crosshair am I expected to understand the difference between it being a little wider and a little narrower. Its a fun shooter don't get me wrong, but the whole crosshair  is bad and should have been reworked instead of kept in every CS game
ko:o;-;-10 cheats for all -_-  kids
[TVV] Ravenclaw513;-;got this game free in a giveaway. Hours of fun ahead!
Deneix;-;Wish if its like the old days ;( means I cant find the server that have fair fight and not dm like casual
www.twitch.tv/Naiwy;-;Old school counter strike, the good times ;) 10/10
Nelly Bravo;-;Well I can Remember standing in line for this game on day 1. it was on a cd and this is well before steam was invented. you had to install the retail patches yourself back then it was a pain. thank goodness they brought out steam hey. anyway this was my first online game I ever played and I've not stopped since. I still play counter strike to this day 15 years later but im on csgo nowadays. this game lost me my girlfriend so thanks valve haha overall amazing game 10/10
Spin0 x)';-;One word for CS Its "Awsome"
Vegeta.^.^;-;Counter Strike one of the best series of games.This is the best part of the series.This isn't the game which has high graphics or is realistic but to be honest it is very addicting. No negative reviews about the game...Just amazing. 'Recommended'.
convuLt;-;My very first game on Steam, great game however I do not recommend it anymore as most servers has viruses which redirects you to a russian server and NOBODY WANTS THAT!! >:( But it's a great game and will always be one.
Chief Keef;-;Best game of its time, and recent times.
Nelly Bravo;-;Well I can Remember standing in line for this game on day 1. it was on a cd and this is well before steam was invented. you had to install the retail patches yourself back then it was a pain. thank goodness they brought out steam hey. anyway this was my first online game I ever played and I've not stopped since. I still play counter strike to this day 15 years later but im on csgo nowadays. this game lost me my girlfriend so thanks valve haha overall amazing game 10/10
Hero11507;-;Very nice game
iAdmiraL;-;Better than Minecraft i love this game so i recomande it
Pato #TpaBa#Kypo_0;-;Nice game !!!!
Restalious;-;Still better than cs:go.
CanArslan12;-;its still very good game to play, even with 512mb to 16gb ram :)
Ingen Fantasi;-;Can't go wrong with this classic.
Alhanafi;-;this game is my favourites game :D
Shaggy;-;Albeit being over a decade old, it's still an amazing game. I have played it both non steam and on steam, making total number of hours played well over 1500 Counter Strike does not come with built in game mode like deathmatch. Hence servers employ amxmodx [amxmodx.org] to create new game modes and modfy game experience of existing ones. Some of game mode I came across are: Deathmatch classic half life dm Capture The Flag A classic mode with each team having a flag and is required to bring opponents' flag to their base. Jailbreak A role play mod where prisoners must find a way to rebel and overthrow guards. Missile Mod Choose a missile from missile menu and kill your opponent. Beware, for your opponent has missiles too. PokeMod Pick up pokeballs lying around and choose active pokemon, you'll get its ability. For instance water pokemon give you heath regen while you are in water. Deathrun A path laid with terrorist controlled traps is awaiting to be crossed by a huge pack of Counter terrorists thristy for terrorist's blood. But if you fall off, you die. Hence deathrun. Hide n Seek Although the name says hide n seek, hiders don't hide. They simply run away and try to out trick seekers in a map skill and experience dependant. Hiders get an HE grenade, two flash grenades and a frost grenade while seekers have knives. Kreedz (KZ) KZ mod is a non violent mod where players find their way through curvings and tricks of map by use of strafe, bunny hop, etc. It is a 'sport' type game, where players compete for the best times amongst the game's several courses. Super Hero Mod You'll be given a list of heroes to choose from. You must choose two of them to get their powers. Trouble in Terrorist Town (TTT) This mod is about a group of "terrorists" who have traitors among them, out to kill everyone who's not a traitor. Cod There are various classes to select from, giving you different abilities including becoming near invisible when wielding a knife. Zombie Escape Zombies are infecting everyone around you and you must survive for given time period. Zombies with hp of over 2000(depending of server) are coming for your brains! If they infect you, you become one of them and carry out their mission: infect all humans. Surf Mod A fun mod with ramps all over map. You must surf these ramps and get kills by perching on a 'vantage' point to get kills(or to get killed) Nightcrawler Nightcrawlers are around you totally invisible. pay attention on your team mates, if one dies, you have an idea of where the nightcrawler was at that time. All in all, it is a very amazing game.
[TDC] MOISTMAKER;-;As of writing this, it is the year 2015. Currently as of 7/19/2015 this game has 20,626 players. More than Battlefield 4 and Call of duty on PC. Old graphics but fun game.
General.Duck!!!!!;-;It was fun. I like this.
Gavin;-;The best FPS game there existed on earthrealm!!
zK;-;The devs must be , 2015 and take a look at the graphic... 2/10
SuY;-;The best Counter Strike Version ever created!
qwerty;-;Classic FPS.
Ronc102 = Gay;-;Great game!
qwerty;-;Classic FPS.
Ronc102 = Gay;-;Great game!
GHOST.LV | Nume Jucatore;-;Nice game!
d a b;-;Awesome game! Enjoy Playing!
_,  Callum;-;Just an absolute brilliant game, you can play on any server you want and you will have a lot of fun!!
cam go ham;-;Very fun. but make sure you got opengl or you're out of luck!
MrPatrick;-;Very Nice! Great times!
